Authors
Edwin Jahiel
Number of Reviews
424

Title
Review for Enchanted April (1992)
ENCHANTED APRIL (UK, 1991)  *** Directed by Mike Newell. Screenplay by
Peter Barnes from the novel by Elizabeth von Arnim. Cinematography, Rex
Maidment. Editing, Dick Allen. Design, Malcolm Thornton. Music, Richard
Rodney Bennet. Cast: Josie Lawrence, Miranda Richardson, Joan Plowright,
Polly Walker, Alfred Molina, Jim Broadbent, Michael Kitchen, et al.  A
Miramax release. 93 min. PG.
An enchanting movie. taken from a novel by Elizabeth von Arnim, who was
born in Australia, grew up in England, married a German Count in 1890,
lived in Pomerania and became a prolific, much respected writer. Debts
forced her husband to sell his estate and move to England in 1908. He died
two years later. Elizabeth, first in Switzerland and then in England,
hobnobbed with major literary figures, married, in 1916, the second Earl
Russell (Bertrand Russellšs brother), soon left , then divorced him. She
lived in America, Switzerland, London and the French Riviera. Died in the
U.S.A. in 1941, at age 75.
In 1921 she rented a medieval castello in Portofino, Italy, and there she
wrote a novel, The Enchanted April(1922) about four women who, in the early
1920s, find (or find again) romance and themselves during a one-month
spring holiday in an Italian castle just like Elizabethšs.
The movie is not only a faithful adaptation of the book but it was filmed
in the very country-house (Castello Brown) where Elizabeth had stayed. The
story starts with Lottie Wilkins (Josie Lawrence, best-known as a stand-up
comedienne) whose husband Mellersh (Alfred Molina) is an opportunistic
solicitor, something of a lout and, like many men of the period, a male
chauvinist pig. Lottiešs eye catches an advertisement for an Italian
rental, gets carried away, decides to use her nest-egg. She finds an
instant housemate in Rose Arbuthnot (Miranda Richardson), whom some
call "a disappointed Madonna." She is the neglected wife of Frederick (Jim
Broadbent). He writes pseudonymous sex novels, and while not a bad sort, is
immersed in the social whirl and his own insecurities.
To share expenses, the two women first enlist old Mrs. Fisher (Joan
Plowright), a curmudgeon and  "a woman of parts and property" who lives in
the past, when she hobnobbed with the Who's Who of England. Then, young,
beautiful and blase socialite Lady Caroline Dester (Polly Walker, the
terrorist killer in Patriot Games ) like a latter-day Penelope, wants to
escape her suitors and the social whirl. She feels out of sorts. Hers is a
more literary case of "ennui" or what Baudelaire called "spleen" or what we
might call "anomie" today.
After the grey wetness of London and the womenšs various mini-slaveries,
the same-sex company, the new-found liberation and the Italian sun and
flowers feel like Paradise. Things get better and better in the castello.
Affectionate relationships are gently formed.  Unexpectedly, Lottie invites
her husband. He comes for the wrong, material reasons but soon, falling
under the placešs enchantment, he turns into an understanding man who
finally finds his wife attractive.
The landlord, Mr. Briggs (Michael Kitchen), a romantic, mildly bohemian
type who plays the oboe, drops in, attracted by Rose who, he thinks, is a
war widow. Why, after all, would 1920's women travel alone?  Finally,
Frederick shows up, first meeting Lady Caroline whom he knows well, then
his wife, whom he will also treat with affection. The trio situation is
gently handled but with the unrealized potential of a farce by Feydeau,
whom, oddly, writer Barnes has adapted for the British stage.
Moviegoers and novel readers are abundantly familiar with the subject of
motley groupings and the theme of sunny Italy transforming repressed
Anglos. Nothing very new here, nothing particularly dramatic. But how
charmingly executed! My only complaint is that whereas I find the four
ladies utterly charming and deserving the best, the two husbands are much
too generously and improbably redeemed.
The actresses are letter-perfect, the husbands a tad grotesque, the deja vu
magic convincing. Beautifully shot, the film balances well its ironic use
of London with the sentimental mood of Portofino. It uses ellipses with
tact and no arty editing, avoids the obvious. (In a remarkable scene, a
lizard simply walks the length of a recumbent, sleeping lady, and leaves
without the usual moment of panic).
The tempo is slow, not recommended to fanatics of action movies, car
crashes or gun play, but slow like a musical movement marked "lento."
Enchanted April is not an "impressive" film that makes transcendent
statements or is fed by a dynamic plot. It is a sweet, un-maudlin,
appealing work. Often, from small movies, big pleasures grow.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Bulworth (1998)
BULWORTH *** Directed by Warren Beatty. Written by Beatty & Jeremy Pisker
from a story by Beatty. Produced by Beatty & Pieter Jan Brugge.
Photography, Vittorio Storaro. Production design, Dean Tavoularis. Editing,
Robert C. Jones & Billy Weber. Costumes, Milena Canonero. Music, Ennio
Morricone. Cast:   Warren Beatty, Halle Berry, Oliver Platt, Don Cheadle,
Paul Sorvino, Jack Warden ,Isaiah Washington,Joshua Malina, Christine
Baranski, Richard Sarafian, Amiri Baraka, Sean Astin, Laurie Metcalf,
Wendell Pierce, Michele Morgan, Ariyan Johnson ,Graham Beckel, Nora Dunn,
Jackie Gayle. A 20th Century Fox release. 108 minutes. R (foul language,
drugs)
"Bulworth" is something of a mess. But it is a Good Mess. It  is the first
summer film that I saw on my return from the Cannes Film Festival --and I
feel pretty good about it. I wish it had been selected for Cannes instead
some other US movies. Had this been the case, I guess that "Bulworth"'s
strong, idiomatic hip-hop dialogue, its African-American nature, its
in-references, would have puzzled the public. Yet its liberalism and
reformism would have found a receptive audience among the French and other
nationals who are much more militant than the Americans.
For Warren Beatty it's a strong comeback after the insipid, flat fiasco of
1994's  "Love Affair," a re-remake of two earlier movies --the first one
excellent, the second good. In version 3, Beatty had co-written, produced
it and sort of starred, along with wife Annette Bening. In "Bulworth" he is
the movie by his presence, plus co-producing, co-scripting, as well as solo
directing -- the latter for the third time, following his "Reds" and "Dick
Tracy."
Beatty directs himself as incumbent California Senator Jay Bulworth, a
Democrat, whom we meet in the last three days of the 1996 primaries. In his
Washington office, surrounded by photographs of 1960s liberal icons JB
keeps clicking his remote control, watching on the monitor an endless
parade of his campaign footage that endlessly uses his inane slogan "We
stand at the doorstep of a new millennium." The man hasn't slept or eaten
in days. In a near-catatonic state of depression, he takes stock of his
sorry condition, his abuses of power and betrayals of a political past that
once was rife with post-New Deal, Kennedyite ideals. Like too many others,
he's sold his soul to the company store.
The opening sequences are brilliant, hard acts to follow. Additional deft
strokes show Jay's entourage, make us aware of his corruption. Promising a
lobbyist for the insurance industry his help in defeating a plan that would
provide coverage for the have-nots, Jay extracts a ten million dollar
freebie, a life insurance to be paid to his (unseen throughout the film)
daughter. With a sleazy middleman, Bulworth arranges for a contract -- on
his own life. A breakdown can't go any further. It may seem unbelievable
but it is fascinating.
Landing in California, acting oddly from alcohol and his breakdown,
Bulworth is whisked off to a black church of South Central Los Angeles,
where things get curiouser and curiouser for an audience who couldn't guess
in a million years that the Senator's decision to end it all has freed him
to --in 60s parlance -- "tell it like it is." And does he tell them!
Throwing away his speech, with  total honesty, he scolds (with some
affection) the African-Americans about their shortcomings then denounces
(with no affection) the white Establishment that keeps no promises and does
nothing for a minority that cannot contribute millions to politicians.
Panicked, his chief-of-staff (Oliver Platt) throws a fire alarm. All rush
out. Somehow Nina, a gorgeous young woman (Halle Berry) and her two perky
female friends get into Jay's stretch limo, along with the Senator's men
and a videographer from CNN. They all find their way to a Beverly Hills
reception by showbiz personalities whom the Senator shocks by continuing
his stream of criticisms and unpleasant verities. The next stop is an
all-black, all-night disco, with gang-like figures and much snorting of
white stuff. Jay carouses, dances non-stop with Nina, boozes, and,
surprise! discovers a new joie-de-vivre.
At dawn, this entourage moves to a fund-raiser at the Beverly Wilshire,
where the unkempt Jay in a wine-stained shirt, goes now on a veritable
rampage of denunciations. He stupefies the audience with a merciless
harangue, magically delivered in rhyming rap-style. It's unbelievable but
also powerful and funny. While, in spite of the abundance of the f and the
m-f words this is no genuine protest rap, it serves its purpose, is
entirely comprehensible to white ears, and adds to the many outrageously
comic elements of the movie. From now on, it will be the Senator's main
mode of communicating. His transformation gets increasingly weird, to the
point of his dressing like a homeboy. Valiantly, Beatty keeps up his
specialty, found in many of his films no matter what the role, that is, a
self-mocking goofiness through thick and thin, here even as, with his new
taste for life, Jay now frantically tries to rescind the contract on
himself.Complications and episodes pile up.
Beatty, always a card-carrying, liberal activist among the Hollywoodians,
but unlike most of them, semper fidelis, gives his all to his role in
"Bulworth." His heart is in the right place, his old pretty-boyishness  (in
spite of the tiniest eyes this side of Norma Shearer and Dianne Wiest) has
given way to his uncamouflaged 61 years. The real Beatty may have a high
I.Q. but most of his screen personae have looked dim to me. In "Bulworth"
this works in his favor, since I share with many the impression that too
many politicos are more canny than brainy.
Jay is in a state of divine madness. Almost infectious is his relish in
exposing the infinite ambitions and corrupting mega-powers of corporate
America and multi-national conglomerates that buy and sell  politicians.
His denunciations of the puppets in government are vibrant. Even though his
targets do not include everyone, viewers probably sense that the
accusations cover untold numbers of office-holders, from petty officials to
ward heelers (who are not healers) on up.
With the focus so persistently on Bulworth, the very able supporting cast
(meaning everyone else), hardly ever goes beyond sketchiness. In context
this would be no filmic sin, except that a surplus of directions taken and
characters shown, some key roles -- like Nina's-- remain hazy. There are
needless red herrings too. The finale is strictly from hunger.
Among the in-jokes popping up is writer Amiri Baraka ( ne LeRoi Jones)  as
a presumably homeless old fellow who, in indistinct ways, plays soothsayer,
chorus or cheerleader to  Bulworth. He could have been skipped. But the
contract-killer device is no gimmick, since it gives Jay his freedom of
thought and of speech. Coincidentally, the mysterious hired assassin and a
major change of mind were the engine of Vyacheslav Krishtofovich's fine
Ukrainian movie "A Friend of the Deceased" (1997), very recently released
in the U.S.
Beatty's decision to use literally and symbolically Black America as his
main leitmotif is a strong, clever focus, but here comes the major rub. In
his too-quick immersion into black culture, Jay shows us a very real
subculture that has life and soul (good), but also an under-culture (bad)
of drug-dealing, gun-toting, profanity-prone adults as well as kids.
Unwittingly and unconsciously -- I'm sure, -- and probably because the
scriptwriters got carried away and were unable to have a tighter structure
that would consider all the trees in the woods, Beatty and Pisker demean
the millions of neglected, minority Americans who, against the odds, try to
live decent lives.
If you haven't  guessed by now, "Bulworth" is a postmodern (whatever that
means), hip-hop variant of Frank Capra's "Mr. Smith Goes to Washington" or
"Meet John Doe." Although basically as sentimental and unlikely as those
movies, its savage truths make of it a daring, fresh political work more
than a fantasy.
P.S. Some statistics. Beatty, in 37 years of movies, has been in some two
dozen films, an average of 0.64 per annum. In an earlier generation,
Gregory Peck, in 49 years, was in 59 movies, a rate of 0.83 per annum.
Earlier yet, in the keep-churning-them-out studio age, in 37 years (like
Beatty), Clark Gable made about 75 films, an annual rate of 2.02.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Daylight (1996)
DAYLIGHT *  Directed by Rob Cohen. Written by Leslie Bohem .Photography,
David Eggby. Editing,Peter Amundson. Production design, Benjamin Fernandez.
Music,Randy Edelman. Producers, John David, Joseph M. Singer and David T.
Friendly .Cast: Sylvester Stallone (Kit Latura), Amy Brenneman (Madelyne
Thompson), Viggo Mortensen (Roy Nord), Jay O. Sanders (Steven Crighton),
Karen Young (Sarah Crighton), Danielle Harris (Ashley Crighton), Claire
Bloom (Eleanor Trilling), Colin Fox (Roger Trilling), Vanessa Bell Calloway
(Grace), Stan Shaw (George Tyrell),Sage Stallone (Vincent), et al.  110
min. Rated PG-13
When the Titanic went down the ship's orchestra was playing "Nearer My God
to Thee."  You'd half expect the survivors in the disastrous disaster flick
"Daylight" to intone "Nearer Stallone to Thee." They don't, but many
members of the audience may be humming "Nearing the End, Whoopee!" The film
reminds me of the fellow who would repeatedly hit his own head with a
mallet, "because it feels so good when I stop."
In tired old fashion "Daylight" opens with the Motley Group Introduction.
Among them:  a disappointed writer from Indiana who, in her awful apartment
fights cockroaches and rats while getting her manuscripts rejected; a
dysfunctional family of three; a band of evil-looking thugs who hijack the
car of a diamond merchant (he too, for some reason,  looks evil-- perhaps
he's a thief?). There's also Claire Bloom (in the nadir role of her life),
her old husband and their dog, returning from a visit to a canine
psychiatrist (sic); a prison bus transporting convicts; a sportswear
entrepreneur who wastes some of our time in an irrelevant executive
meeting; various Tunnel and Bridge supervisors, including African-American
Vanessa Bell who is also the girlfriend of sweet tunnel cop Stan Shaw. Last
but not you-know-what is El Stallone as a limo driver. His name, Kit
Latura, spelled backwards is Arutal Tik.
What those disparate (and often desperate) people have in common is that
they all find themselves in vehicles going through congested streets.A band
of evil-looking thugs has hijacked the car of a diamond merchant (he too,
for some reason,  looks evil-- perhaps he's a thief?). The ridiculously
ugly criminals drive in a wild, totally unbelievable and incredibly stupid
manner and transform the New York streets into battlefields.
The army of cars, buses and trucks reaches a tunnel connecting Manhattan to
New Jersey. It is unnamed and not identified as its model, the Holland
Tunnel. In this underground/underwater location the stolen car has an
unfriendly encounter with trucks of chemicals. A lulu of an explosion
triggers a series of horrendous disasters, a mini-Hiroshima Holocaust of
flames, toxic air, flooding waters, loose electric cables - you name it,
they got it - which result in gruesomely abundant corpses, twisted bodies
and metal, both ends of the tunnel getting sealed, and the group of the
aforementioned motleys being trapped.
We  learn that Kit Latura (whose anagram is Trakit Aul) used to be the
Chief of   Emergency Medical Services but was disgraced when a wrong
decision by him resulted in the death of some of his men. The details come
out in bits uttered without the clarity of crystal, but no matter. Right
away you get the point:  Kit Latura (or Arial Tukt) must save his
fellow-humans plus the Jungian dog to redeem himself. Which he does.
It's a horrendous task that involves subterranean alpinism, trips (a la
Flash Gordon serials) through enormous, murderous exhaust fans, acrobatics,
immunity to pain and wounds, the strength of Samson,time out for wise
sayings, rats, heroics by Stallone and some others, plus panicked, often
antagonistic men and women who -- you guessed it  -- will become brave and
understanding. There is also a scene of Stallone and his patootie-to-be
trapped in rising waters that are about to reach a ceiling -- straight from
the torture chambers of Emperor Ming, other serials, Fu ManChu and
black-and-white B-movies. There is outrageously obvious religious symbolism
when an exit is found just behind a wooden statue od Christ. As for
Political Correctness, the group will lose two black men, one white male
and one white woman.
The acting is broad. Stallone's inelegant voice and enunciation have not
changed. He seems to be searching all the time for which one of his two
facial expressions to choose. The sounds emitted by things and humans are
loud, speech is rapid, mumbled, often barely understandable except for the
"we're not going to get out of here, are we?" refrain.
All that is bad.With so much junk and overkill, at no time do you believe
the goings-on, feel any kinship, or share any pain in this puppetish movie.
Nor do you learn anything beyond the superficial about the characters, who
all go beyond stereotypes and into caricatures. I was, however, impressed
by those indestructible flashlights that never run down and shine so well
under water.
The Perils of Sylvester are made even more cartoonish since, if I
understand it correctly, the Emergency Medical Service is just what it says
it is. Yet Stallone is not only a fast-thinking acrobat-medic but a
technical savant who knows all there is about tunnels, their complexity and
their disasters.
"Daylight" is a return to the mostly dumb disaster flicks of the 1970s. The
director has stated that the first movie set he ever walked on was "The
Poseidon Adventure," which impressed him, as did soon after "The Towering
Inferno" whose lessons he took to heart when he was trapped on the ninth
floor of a Boston hotel in a fire where five people died.
The aim here clearly is to top those earlier pictures. I admit that its
special effects do just that, with modern techniques: miniatures,
scaled-down sets, computer graphics and other tricks. "Daylight" was shot
in the Italian Cinecitta Studios, with  means and logistics that are
impressive, hence the single star I give it. Otherwise, it rates 5 yawns
out of 5.

Title
Review for Edge, The (1997)
THE EDGE ** 1/2  Directed by Lee Tamahori. Written by David Mamet.
Produced by Art Linson. Photography, Donald M. McAlpine. Production design,
Wolf Kroeger. Editing, Neil Travis. Music,Jerry Goldsmith. Cast: Anthony
Hopkins (Charles Morse), Alec Baldwin (Bob Green), Elle Macpherson (Mickey
Morse), L.Q.Jones (Styles), Harold Perrineau (Stephen), Bart the Bear. A
20th Century Fox release.120 min.R (language,violence)
"The Edge" is a curious movie that qualifies for the epithet
"experimental." No, it's not conventionally weird, strange or bizarre. On
the contrary, on the surface it's just another grandiosely shot picture of
survival, tenacity and machismo in the mountains of Alaska (played by the
mountains of Alberta). Its plot is anything but original.
To the wilds of Alaska, aging billionaire Charles Morse (Hopkins) flies in
his private, 8 million-dollar plane. With him are his much younger wife
Mickey, a fashion model played by model Elle Macpherson; fashion
photographer Bob (Baldwin) who fairly discreetly lusts after Mickey (they
may or may not be lovers); Bob's African-American assistant  Stephen
(Perrineau). Bob is on an exotic shoot of Mickey, Charles just (?) comes
along.
The fancily rustic lodge is run by elderly Styles played by the excellent
character actor L.Q.Jones, seen in many westerns and a near-fixture of Sam
Peckinpah movies. He engages tenderfoot Charles in an ironic contest on
local lore --which the mogul handles handily. Aha! There's something more
than just money to this fellow!
Indeed, Charles is a bookworm, someone who lives his life vicariously
through books of all types, including practical ones, and from which he
seems to remember everything. Bob the photographer may have cameras, but
Croesus Charles has photographic memory. His is a wealth of information,
from trivial-trivia to trivia-not-trivial and more...
Charles is played magnificently by Hopkins, his face hardly registering
emotions, ever serious even when he ocasionally half-smiles. On the first
night at the lodge, Mickey asks him to go downstairs and get her some food.
He descends with a lantern, starts slicing, finds himself aware of
something ominous around him. Suddenly the lights go on, all appear
shouting Happy Birthday. It's a dumb, tasteless joke. Charles is presented
with a pocket watch and knife.
Already the suspicion that there's something bizarre going on dawns on us.
Already too, the absurdisms of the movie start crawling in, and the many
whys and hows to come.
Irony and satire creep in. Fashion photography is quietly mocked for its
excesses. Is it really necessary to go to such wilderness for a model to
pose? Does billionairess-by-marriage Mickey need the money? I won't go into
the many possible reasons for the above. Bob has artistic ambitions. Spying
the portrait of an Indian he admires this great, pure "19th century"
artifact, wonders who had shot it. "I did, last year" replies host Styles.
So much for connoisseurship of art. So much for the one-upmanship that
gives the edge. One begins to see the wry, sly humor in  David Mamet's
script.
The next day, Bob, shooting ridiculously costumed Mickey, is unhappy with
the process as well as with his assistant  having forgotten to bring shoe
polish. We're inching further into the realm of the absurd, which is
compounded when know-it-all Charles declares "The inside of a banana peel
will shine shoes." Sounds like information from those "At Home" tips in
newspapers.
Bob decides that  Charles and he must find the Indian hunter of the photo
and incorporate him into the shoot. They fly off in a hydroplane. As
Charles and Bob chat about the effect the tycoon's wealth has on people and
the effect Mickey has on Bob, out of a blue sky Charles comes up with "How
are you planing to kill me?" That very moment, out of the blue sky  birds
collide with the craft which goes down into a lake. Charles, Bob and
Stephen survive. There is an abundance of scary moments in scary mountains.
Now to something personal. I don't usually dispense advice, but I do
counsel all, no matter what they do, to carry always a  Swiss Army knife, a
pocket flashlight and a lighter. This is the nth  film to vindicate me.
Charles's gift knife frees, underwater, Stephen from his jammed safety belt
and will be a survival tool in other ways. The other two items are missing.
Bob finds some six bookmatches. How they have remained dry is another
puzzlement.
Cool, near-unflappable, fast-reacting Charles, with nary a change of
expression, is obviously the man to get the trio out of their predicament.
A Nobel caliber Old Boy Scout, he knows the answers: making a compass from
a metal needle on a floating leaf (very possible); later, trying to fish
with his gold watch-chain (ho-hum); stating you can make fire from ice by
using ice as a lens (most doubtful), and so on. He has the edge over Bob.
Especially when a huge, man-killing Kodiak bear starts stalking and
attacking them.
What we have here is a tongue-in-cheek, Mamet-ized adventure that takes on
film cliches and conventions. Three men start out together. Needless to say
that they'll first go around in circles; that there has to be an accident;
that the  first to go is the man of color (when none available, movies go
to a supporting player); that they can go without food for days; that
somehow the remaining survivors make an instant, anti-bear  circle of fire
(but  earlier, why did Bob use one of his precious matches for a smoke?).
Charles and Bob ought to have been dead from cold by now, but never mind.
Still keeping his edge, Charles devises a trapper's way to kill the bear.
Next the companions are seen
wearing  (uncured!) bear-fur coats.
The point of this extravagant yarn is, of course, to throw together
competitors, show their true natures, how they change and, if they survive,
how their future lives and relations might be affected. The once-jaded,
impersonal Charles finally does declare "I'm going to start my life all
over again." Sheesh! And the two engage into would-be probing dialogues.
There's much more but it shall not be revealed. Enough to say that the
finale cuts abruptly and shows us no aftermath. Before this, Mamet's black
humor had worked, but only partly. This because the movie, tongue or no
tongue in cheek, is overwhelmed by non-stop harrowing scenes that make it
downright unpleasant. The recipe's mix of ingredients does not really take.
The sites and sights are impressive, the photography excellent, the score
generic, and Bart the bear, helped by ursutronics,is properly chilling in
the already chilly air.

Title
Review for Anne Frank Remembered (1995)
ANNE FRANK REMEMBERED (UK, 1995)**** Written, produced and directed by 
Jon Blair. Photography, Barry Ackroyd. Editing, Karen Steininger. Music, 
Carl Davis.  Cast: Kenneth Branagh (Narrator), Glenn Close (reading 
excerpts from "The Diary of Anne Frank"), Miep Gies,Hanneli Goslar and 
Peter Pfeffer. A Sony Pictures Classics release.122 minutes. Rated PG.
Awards: Oscar winner in 1996; Jury Prize at the 1995 Hamptons Festival; 
Gold Plaque at Chicago International Film Festival; Audience Award at 
the International Documentary Festival, Amsterdam.  
I have just finished watching this long documentary, on tape. I am 
stunned, shaken up and grateful that I can write on it rather than 
discuss it verbally.
In the classic "Hiroshima, mon Amour," a French woman, an extra in a 
"Ban the Bomb" movie being shot, and a local Japanese architect, have a 
touching brief encounter. She tells him of her visits to the martyr 
city: "I have seen everything in Hiroshima." He replies: "No, you saw 
nothing in Hiroshima."
Some of us may think that they've read or seen everything about the 
Holocaust and Anne Frank, This film proves we have seen nothing. The 
story is a neverending one. Something new discovered every day. As one 
of the participants in the documentary says of the long, nightmarish 
train journey to a concentration camp: "You refuse reality. After a 
while imagination stops." 
"Anne Frank Remembered" was made principally by the man who was given 
the 1994 British Academy award for his documentary "Schindler." Jon 
Blair has done a terrific job in combining war and remembrance, the 
portrait of Anne and the horrors of the Nazis, old and sadly familiar 
archival footage and much that was unfamiliar or newly found. He and his 
staff  interweave with superb skill and balance past and present, 
interviews with surviving friends of the Frank family.
The film even transcends personal tragedy and unspeakable mass crimes 
during World War II. It stands for all types of man's inhumanity to man 
fostered by prejudice, racial, ethnic, religious discrimination.
At the center of this work is 80-plus Miep Gies, a gentle, gentile lady  
who in the 1940s worked for Otto Frank. (Anne's father had a small 
pectin-making business in Amsterdam). While the Franks were in hiding, 
she was their contact with the outside, their purveyor of food, 
necessities and news. Miep is a marvelous woman whom one would never 
call "an old lady." Her faculties are intact, her mind  lucid, her 
intelligence high, her manner eloquent yet straightforward. Miep is also 
the person who found and saved for years the diary of Anne Frank.
The movie does not push the pedal on pathos or sentiment. It doesn't 
have to. Places, events and people speak for themselves. Miep is not the 
only witness. She shares the screen with other, equally unrhetorical yet 
quite sophisticated friends of Anne and her folks.
They take up a big chunk of time, yet they're always effective as they 
speak calmly, go to the end of what they're saying and do not produce 
sound bites. 
You never have the impression of watching "talking heads." This is 
reinforced by the interviewer, present, unseen and unobtrusive. 
Exceptionally he is heard asking a question, always brief and to the 
point. He never controls or manipulates his subjects, never puts words 
in their mouth.
The film does start with background information that the average person 
does not know perhaps, especially when we refer to the Franks as Dutch 
Jews. The Franks were an old, distinguished family of Germans who, like 
countless others, happened to be Jewish, cultured, totally assimilated, 
patriotic, with relatives who had fought for Germany in WWI. Their 
children, first Margot then Anna (as they called her) were born in 
Frankfurt.
Unlike many other Germans, Otto Frank saw the handwriting on the wall. 
With his wife and children he left Germany for Holland in 1933, as soon 
as Hitler was given dictatorial powers. They were later joined by more 
Jews, many of them erstywhile personalities in Germany, like a former 
Minister for the Press.
Emigrating very early, Mr. Frank was wise. But later, when one was sure 
of the defeat of Germany and optimism set in, it was not so smart to 
hide instead of fleeing, assuming this were possible. This is perhaps 
the only miscalculation by Otto Frank, who was a superb, sensitive, 
devoted husband and father, an all-around superior human being, and the 
sole survivor of the four Franks.
There was, of course, the trust that Jews put in the Dutch, a justified 
confidence. While, after the occupation of Holland, some Dutch Nazi 
groups sprouted up, the great majority of the population were protective 
of "their" Jews -- witness the steady help to the Franks. Only one other 
country can claim the same massive, heartfelt assistance to Jews: 
Denmark. 
Anne is not sentimentalized or idealized. We hear that she was a 
naughty, even impertinent child. The mother of a friend used to say "God 
knows everything...Anne knows everything better". In hiding, she was not 
always easy to be with. She wrote of her contempt for her mother and her 
dislike of 54-year old dentist Fritz Pfeffer. (He was the eight person 
to go to the hideout, after Otto's associate Hermann van Pels, his wife 
and son).
"Anne Frank" is a succession of gripping moments, scenes and sequences, 
done with restraint and taste (including Branagh's narration), which 
make it all the more devastating. A must-see film, above all  for those 
young and youngish who, in this information age, know so pathetically 
little of history. 

Title
Review for Patti Rocks (1988)
PATTI ROCKS (1987) *** Directed by David Burton Morris. 
Written by Morris, Chris Mulkey, John Jenkins and Karen 
Landry. Produced by Gwen Field & Gregory M. Cummins. 
Photography and editing,Gregory M.Cummins. Art 
director,Charlotte Whitaker. Music,Doug Maynard.Cast: Chris 
Mulkey,John Jenkins,Karen Landry. A FilmDallas production. 87 
minutes. Rated R.
An old French saying goes: "Within every man, there is a pig  
asleep." "Man" does not refer to humanity, and "pig" does not 
refer to gorging oneself with food. What this means is that 
within every male are dormant,lewd, sexual tendencies. How 
true this may be is not the business of this review, but Billy 
(Mulkey),one of the two male protagonists of "Patti Rocks," 
does support this theory with a vengeance. The swine is not 
simply dozing off in him, it is wide-awake. 
Mid-thirtyish Billy works on the river in Minneapolis-St. 
Paul. He is as sex-obsessed a macho compulsive as has ever 
ungraced the screen, and then some. The expression 
"working-class stiff" takes on a new meaning in his case. At 
Christmas time,his latest girlfriend (who lives far away) 
informs him on the phone that she is pregnant. He panics, 
wants to tell her that he is married, with two kids, but he 
lacks the necessary guts. He calls up his former best friend 
Eddie (Jenkins) who is older and a garage supervisor. They had 
not met ever since Eddie had fired Billy. Billy talks his 
reluctant pal into driving with him to the city where Patti 
(Landry,Mulkey's wife at the time of filming) lives and  
somehow help him break the news to her and talk her into an 
abortion. 
The drive through a bleak Midwestern landscape takes up much 
of the movie. The two men are skillfully photographed and 
recorded in a moving car as they talk and talk and talk,  
exclusively about sex. The car becomes like a barracks plus a 
locker-room on wheels as Billy, guzzling beer and tossing the 
empty cans on the back seat, delivers a non-stop commentary on 
his urges, accomplishments, and nauseating notions about 
women. His exploits may be in part fantasies, but the language 
is very real. Even by low-life standards, it  breaks records 
for grossness, foulness, scatology, pathological male 
chauvinism and misogyny. Eddie shares the drinking and  
supplies the amen-type reactions. But he laughs so much and so 
loudly that we suspect he is unconvinced by his friend's  
notions,lifestyle and verbal excesses. Indeed,Eddie, a rather 
gentle and sad-looking man whose wife left him, has his own 
problems. At one point he refuses to stay on the trip. 
The  long ride is interrupted by an encounter with a skunk. 
This forces Billy to throw away his pants and undershorts and 
to borrow Eddie's shorts, which he will wear, trouserless in 
the snow (mercifully the winter is  mild) to the end of the 
film. There's also a very crude -- and funny -- encounter with 
a faded prostitute who challenges Billy to prove his  phallic 
boasts. 
Up to now, much of what's happening  may seem  pointless. In 
fact, the first meeting between the two men made me think that 
there was a homosexual subplot somewhere, an impression 
reinforced by Eddie's looks and manner. When this turned out 
to be a wrong lead,"Patti Rocks" felt like a movie trying to 
get out of a non-plot. Yet when the two men reach Patti's 
place, you realize that the film had already emerged, that 
what seemed to be a protracted overture was actually Part One 
of Two. 
Patti turns out to be a surprise, a human being and not, as  
advertised by Billy, merely a piece of you-know-what.   
Neither a floozy nor a romantic heroine, she is sensible, 
self-controlled, natural, and in her simple way, likable. She 
may be a sucker for Billy as a bedmate, but she has realism, 
allies resilience with compassion and a kind of proletarian 
generosity. She has decided to have the child, and laughs at  
Billy's menace of suing her "for theft of semen." When Eddie, 
urged on by his friend, goes into her bedroom to tell her 
about Billy being married -- which Patti calmly suspected all 
along -- a bond of sympathy born of newly revealed   
sensibilities is formed between those two. It leads to some 
sweet, pathetic love-making, then to a temporary outburst by 
Billy, followed by a friendly breakfast "a trois," where Billy 
gets maudlin with the photos of his kids. It also leads  to 
Patti's friendly dismissal of Billy. Eddie, long womanless and 
affectionless, may  have started a new relationship.  
As both men ride back to the Twin Cities, the unreconstructed  
Billy, always seeing himself as God's gift to women, explains 
that the ideal would be pay-as-you-go sex. Without 
complications or commitments, he can get the flesh he needs 
the way you shop for beef in a supermarket. 
It goes without saying that "Patti Rocks" is not for all 
audiences, or even for most. Billy's disgusting language and 
"philosophy" ("it's a man's world, baby" is the mildest thing 
he says) make it a turn-off. But if an amply forewarned viewer 
does watch this film and does not walk out prematurely, a 
great deal of truth surfaces: about men, women and male-female 
relations; about loneliness, incommunicability;  above all the 
violent reaction of men scared by women as equals. 
Truth is not beauty here. Billy seems aberrant, even by 
extreme standards, yet a nagging suspicion remains that behind 
the exaggerations the characters essentially  represent 
attitudes that are far from unusual. 
This is a maverick movie that cannot be judged by ordinary 
screen standards. Interestingly, this work where women get so 
very demeaned and verbally mauled, ends up as an oddly 
feminist film. 
Most of the time the acting is very  convincing, as if the 
players were behaving rather than performing, and we were 
observing them voyeuristically with a hidden camera. In fact, 
the three  actors and the director built this film on 
improvisations. Filmically there is a questionable area 
though, as  Billy is too much of a dumb jerk to make his 
relationship with either Eddie or Patti really credible. 
Director Morris is the Minneapolis independent who made "Loose 
Ends" in 1975. "Patti Rocks" is a sequel. This explains the 
"12 Years Later" mention at the film's start.  "Loose Ends" 
starred the same men as "Patti." It was written by Victoria 
Wozniak, who became, then unbecame, Morris's wife. By 
"Patti"'s release, everyone was on a second or third marriage. 
This somehow adds to the film a lot of veracity -- and not 
much hope.
"Patti" was made for only $350,000, a pittance, but one that's 
just right for the subject. The problem was with the original 
rating, an X given for its piled-up verbal obscenities. Upon 
appeal it was changed to an R, a very strong R no doubt, yet 
one that goes naturally with a picture that should perhaps be 
placed in a time-capsule, so that beings of the future can 
find out how a certain segment of our population sounded and 
behaved in the late 1980s, if not also before and after. 

Title
Review for Donnie Brasco (1997)
DONNIE BRASCO(1997) *** 1/4  Directed by Mike Newell. Screenplay by Paul
Attanasio, based on the book by Joseph D.Pistone with Richard Woodley.
Photography, Peter Sova. Production design, Donald Graham Burt. Editing,
Jon Gregory, Music, Patrick Doyle. Cast: Al Pacino, Johnny Depp, Michael
Madsen, Bruno Kirby, James Russo, Ann Heche, Zeljko Ivanek, et al. A
Tristar release. 131 minutes. Rated R (violence, gore, language)
The book this movie is based on is "Donnie Brasco, My Undercover Life In
The Mafia." Unlike many such memoirs, the text-to-screen dramatization
seems to be faithful, and uninflated by imaginary events or embellishments
that could add color and suspense.
FBI agent Joe Pistone, posing as Donnie Brasco, did infiltrate the Mob in
the 1970s and eventually this mole operation was hugely successful, brought
dozens to trial and recovered millions of dollars. The conduit for Pistone
was Lefty (Al Pacino), an older wiseguy with whom "Donnie" struck a
friendship that grew.
The relations between the two men were initially for their mutual
convenience. Donnie needed a sponsor. Lefty needed a protege that might get
him out of his low rank in the Mafia. He had been in the underworld for 30
years, had made 26 hits, yet had really nothing to show for all this.
I see the twosome as an ironic (but not so planned) version of new partners
in the police force. The younger man hopes to learn. The older one hopes
that the team will make an impression on their superiors.
"Donnie Brasco" takes an honorable place among gangsgter movies,
specifically within the Mafia sub-genre. The greatest of these are the
"Godfather" trilogy and "GoodFellas." But the differences between them and
the new work are numerous, beyond the crucial fact that the earlier films
were mostly fiction while the recent one is fact.  "The Godfather" was a
saga and a grand opera about "capi dei capi," the bosses of bosses, the top
echelons. "GoodFellas" was at a lower rung, but even so, its people feel
like capitalists compared to the grungy Mafiosi in "Donnie."
Here we have "soldiers," the day-by-day operators who do the actual,
physical dirty work, who have to struggle like laborers to meet their
quotas, who are constantly hustling, who fight other lowly Mafiosi over
territories and opportunities.  Whether among the high ups or the low
downs, there is no honor among thieves.  But when we watched the grand
plans of alliances and treacheries among the CEOs or even the Captains in
earlier films, here we see penny-ante activities, street fights instead of
championship bouts.
It's all a de-romanticizing, eye-opening and fascinating process. The film
is not exciting, since it keeps to a minimum "movie suspense." This
true-to-life nature also gives it a grayness that contrasts with the
rainbow colorfulness of its predecessors. Its low-class characters are
real, therefore uninteresting. There is no room left to play with the
expanded or full  personae we found among the Corleones, their subalterns
or their successors.
Where the new movie tries to score is with the relationship between Lefty
and Donnie. For Lefty, the biological father of an unworthy petty crook and
drug addict, Donnie becomes a surrogate son. For Donnie matters are more
complex. He starts out as the agent who hoodwinks Lefty and Co., but over a
long period he cannot help developing a weird (or is it, really?) affection
for Lefty. There are moral problems here that are unusual in Mafia stories.
The main difficulty, other than maintaining his cover, is that Donnie,
married, with children, has to disappear for long stretches and ignore his
family life. The effect on his wife and kids is thickly underlined in the
movie. So is the fact that after years of being someone else, it is natural
for the infiltrator to adopt many attitudes of his companions. Things do
rub off. When in one of his rare visits home Donnie-Joe uses the wrong
negative in a sentence, his wife reacts with "... and to think I married a
college man." From what I was able to find out, the "assimilation" of
Donnie is, in the film, made larger than in reality, but then a few
creative liberties are unavoidable.
"Donnie Brasco" has an elliptical structure, so that the passage of time
was none too clear for me, nor were some sections of the movie. On the
other hand, director Mike Newell does a fine job of empathy and of
understanding the hoods' mentality and the overall Mafia scene.
Newell is an Englishman who has worked in the UK, the US and New Zealand.
His  best-known films are "Four Weddings and a Funeral" and "Enchanted
April." Some eyebrows were raised when he was chosen to make this movie, so
different from his familiar, romantic works. The owners of those eyebrows
might be reminded that Newell has also directed somber dramas like "Dance
With A Stranger" or "The Good Father," and that many of the Hollywood
gangster classics were directed by European newcomers, like Fritz Lang.
Performances are what you would expect from the versatile Johnny Depp and
Al Pacino, meaning very good. All the trickier too as the protagonists have
to stick to just one basic expression. Throughout, Depp's is guarded and
Pacino's hangdog-unhappy.
There is violence in the film,  notably a startling sequence of pure gore.
Yet what, for me, turned out to be the most depressing scene  had to do
with the FBI. Throughout, the FBI people make trouble for Joe and look
villainous.  After Pistone's task was accomplished, in an anonymous
(hotel?) room and with only the Pistone family present, a couple of
bored-looking superiors coldly, perfunctorily award him an FBI medal plus a
check for $500, and quickly leave. It's devastating.

Title
Review for Promesse, La (1996)
LA PROMESSE (THE PROMISE) (Belgium, France, Luxembourg) (1996) ***  Written
& directed by Jean-Pierre and Luc Dardenne. Photography, Alain Marcoen &
Benoit Dervaux. Editing, Marie-Helene Dozo. Art direction, Igor Gabriel.
Music, Jean-Marie Billy and Denis M'Punga. Produced by Luc Dardenne and
Hassen Daldoul.  Cast: Jeremie Renier (Igor), Olivier Gourmet (Roger),
Assita Ouedraogo (Assita) and Rasmane Ouedraogo (Amidou).  in French with
subtitles.  A New Yorker release. 94 min. Not rated.
Those whose Latin extends beyond  "E Pluribus Unum" might just remember
"homo homini lupus" (man is a wolf to man). That's what the first part of
"La Promesse" tells us. But it is followed by " homo homini agnus" (man is
a lamb to man). At least that's my reading of the third feature by the
Belgian Dardenne brothers.
The movie, premiered in a parallel section of the 1996 Cannes Festival, has
been highly praised by American reviewers. It is mostly  set in or near the
city of Liege (Belgium). It is essentially a two plus two character drama.
The first duo consists of young Igor and his father Roger. Igor is 15 -- as
per information I gleaned in various documents. (The film proper is rather
frustratingly vague about times, places and other factual information). The
boy, already a heavy smoker and beer guzzler, but still a virgin, is
something of a Peeping Tom, works in a gas station as an apprentice
mechanic. He swipes the customers' wallets and shows up at the station
fitfully --which results in his dismissal.
Igor is his father's main helper in an illegal operation of  illegal
immigrant workers, African, Eastern European, Korean, etc., whom the ring,
for a high price, spirits into Belgium hidden inside automobiles carries on
car-transport vehicles. Then Roger, charging outrageously again, gets the
immigrants fake papers and houses them  in stinking, disgusting hovels
within decrepit buildings.
The traffickers know no decency. When, for example, there is political
pressure on the gang, the operators sacrifice some of the aliens by
pretending they'll be sent to America (after due payment), but betray them
to the authorities.
The story then focuses on an African couple (Amidou and Assita) and their
baby. Amidou, working for Roger, falls off a scaffolding and dies, but not
before exacting from Igor the promise that he will watch over Assita and
her child.  Since the body would cause an investigation, father and son
dispose of it by burial in concrete.
(It was unclear to me whether or not Amidou might have survived if taken to
a hospital -- which Roger refused to do as unsafe for his business. So
Amidou's death, may have to a killing by omission).
The man's death is not revealed to his wife. She is told instead that
Amidou had disappeared, run off perhaps to avoid paying debts. Roger now
tries to get rid of Assita by sending her to nearby Cologne (Germany) where
he would arrange for the woman to work as a prostitute.
About 40 minutes into the movie, Igor begins to feel pangs of guilt that
keep increasing.  He defies his father and attempts to come to the woman's
help. The process of a rising conscience and consciousness takes up the
rest of the film. It is intermingled with some local touches of racism and
xenophobia.
The entire process is filmed like a documentary, with a constantly mobile,
moving  and often handheld camera. There is obviously a desire by the
filmmakers to keep a realistic look and tone, which is understandable and
adds power to the movie.  This technique is valid in principle. It
distances the work from the smooth and slick Hollywood-type films. But it
often goes overboard and could induce fatigue in the viewers.  A modicum of
using the Steadycam system might have helped. ( This gyroscope-like method,
introduced in the mid-70s, puts a special harness on the operator and
allows moving the machine without jiggling).
The episodes are done with naturalness, economical dialogue and no
traditional  verbal elaboration. The burden is on telling details, on
implications and on the facial expressions of the performers.  Roger, and
above all Igor, acquit themselves nicely, with the latter's gradual
transformation following a credible development.
"La Promesse" is as far as one can go from commercial movies. It is
well-meaning but also well-handled, never showing any traces of glop,
sentimentalizing or romanticizing. Among its virtues is that if you imagine
that this subject had been filmed in routine ways, it might have made of
Assita a colorful --perhaps even wise -- character. Here, she is rather
attractive but, like her drab surroundings, a sad figure. In a good touch,
to find out if her husband is alive or dead, she consults the entrails of a
chicken and later is taken by an older African lady to a  witch doctor.
Both Assita and Amidou come from Burkina Faso (the former Upper Volta), a
small, poor country where, surprisingly, there is Africa's greatest ferment
of movie-making, partly encouraged by the regular Pan African festivals in
Ouagadougou, the capital. Director Idrissa Ouedraogo, a winner of major
awards (e.g. at Cannes) is widely known internationally.
Their real family names of Assita and Amidou are also Ouedraogo. It must be
Burkina Faso's equivalent of Smith or Jones or else Idrissa's dozens of
relatives have made it in cinema. A year or two ago, when Idrissa's latest
film was shown at the Cannes Festival, the credits had such an unending
list of Ouedraogos that at the press screening the critics kept bursting
into laughter exponentially.

Title
Review for East Is East (1999)
EAST IS EAST (UK, 1999) *** 1/2. Directed by Damien O'Donnell. 
Screenplay by Ayub Khan-Din based on his play. Produced by Leslee 
Udwin. Photography, Brian Tufano. Editing, Michael Parker. 
Production design, Tom Conroy. Music, Deborah Mollison. Cast: Om Puri 
(George Khan), Linda Bassett (Ella Khan), Jordan Routledge, Archie 
Panjabi, Emil Marwa, Chris Bisson, Jimi Mistry, Raji James, Ian 
Aspinall (their 7 children), Lesley Nicol (Auntie Annie), Emma Rydal 
(Stella Moorhouse), Ruth Jones (Peggy), et al. A Miramax release. 96 
minutes. R (language)
Indian (not Pakistani) Om Puri is one of the sub-continent's greatest 
actors as well as a major player in international cinema and TV.. He 
must have one the best-known pockmarked faces in the world, along 
with actor Robert Davi (the drug lord in the James Bond film "License 
to Kill"), and Manuel Ortega (Panama's former lord). In 1998 Puri 
attracted more world attention in "My Son, the Fanatic" in which he 
plays a Pakistani cab-driver, in England for 25 years and most 
assimilated --too much by Pakistani standards --while his only child 
reverts to Moslem fundamentalism.
Those roles are reversed in "East is East." Puri plays George Khan, 
who, in 1937 emigrated from Pakistan to Manchester, married 
Englishwoman (Caucasian) Ella, had seven children with her. We meet 
the tribe in the early 1970s living in Salford, a working class 
suburb  of Manchester. Ma, Pa  and some of the kids run their fish 
and chips place. Husband and wife are a loving --and sexually active 
--couple, in spite of George being bullheaded and mercurially 
autocratic, as well as often charming, especially to Ella. The 
children (six sons and one dancing daughter) have grown up in a 
spirit of  total assimilation. They may be "brown kids" to racists, 
but they feel like most other English youths of their social class.
When it comes to religion, all but one pious son go through the 
motions of pleasing and obeying Dad.  Ella acts just like a Muslim 
mother (but she is no convert), mediates between kids and Dad, uses 
wiles and strategies to keep the peace and is lovable totally but not 
soupily.
The children are so westernized that when Dad's away they consume 
gluttonously ham and sausages. When Dad's head is turned, one son 
flirts (or more?) with a neighbor's blonde daughter and most of the 
siblings do "unacceptable" things.
Matters, however, really come to a head when the senior son is about 
to wed a Pakistani belle in an arranged marriage. At the start of the 
ceremony, the young groom, in a switch from Hollywood movies about 
brides fleeing the altar, runs away, and off.
We are left wondering a bit about the earlier years of the Khan 
family when George gets to center stage as a newborn  Muslim. 
Pakistanis and Brits seem to co-exist quite well. although racism 
does lurk in the background. And reverse racism too.  But there's no 
Paki-bashing by hooligans, no egregious discrimination. Perhaps 
because those are Enoch Powell years when the racist. politician 
wages war on immigration, perhaps too because of a mid-life crisis, 
George reacts with increased traditionalism of which the most acute 
symptom is his strong desire is arranged marriage for sons 2 and 3.
Thereby hang the most comical events of the film, in fact 
transitions from benevolent irony to farce and to near-screwball 
comedy. I will give no details, not even clues as to the developments.
"East is East" is a grand little movie, funny yet also pathetic, 
amusing but also touching on very serious matters regarding 
immigration, the many faces and degrees of assimilation or 
non-assimilation, mixed-marriages, the old and the new, and much else 
of crucial importance to the brown or white or black or whatever 
inhabitants of the British Isles.
The source play was a major hit in England, and so was the movie. The 
British Film Academy gave it several nominations, the "Evening 
Standard" and the London Film Critics voted it as Best British Film 
of the Year. It was Dublin-born Director Damien O'Donnell's first 
feature and the play (1996) as well as the film-script, both firsts 
by actor-turned-writer Ayub Khan were highly honored in the UK and 
the Continent.
The acting is impeccable, all the more so since many of the players 
are also newcomers. The Khan children, by the way, are all but one of 
mixed parentage and all felt in familiar territory. Not so director 
O'Donnell, an Irishman who steeped himself in the cultures of 
Pakistanis in the UK as well as of England in the 1970s -- with 
wonderful success.
The movie is knowledgeably and intelligently built, with credibility 
and authenticity, a number of un-telegraphed surprises (from a 
strange circumcision to a barber's chair) and a heartfelt feeling for 
all involved, including the dictatorial George, whose likable sides 
survive his imperiousness.
My single caveat comes from the sometimes hard to catch in full some 
bits of dialogue spoken in (there must be a term for it but I don't 
know it) working-class English. But I had no problem with some of the 
Arabic formulas and courtesies.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Shine (1996)
SHINE (Australia, 1995) *** 1/2  Directed by Scott Hicks. Written by Jan
Sardi. hotography, Geoffrey Simpson. Editing,Pip Karmel. Production design,
Vicki Niehus. Music, David Hirschfelder. Produced by Jane Scott. Cast:
Geoffrey Rush (David Helfgott as an adult), Noah Taylor (David as a young
man), Alex Rafalowicz (David as a child), Armin Mueller-Stahl (Peter
Helfgott), Lynn Redgrave (Gillian), John Gielgud (Cecil Parkes), Googie
Withers (Katharine Prichard) et al. A Fine Line release. 105 min. PG-13
"Shine" was the sensation at last year's Sundance Festival. You can see
(and hear) why. It is not a film-by-the-numbers concoction of special
effects or robotic characters, made for everybody's major target audience
of teens to 25-year olds, plus a few old geezers in their thirties. It is
about real people, doubly so as this is a true, un-fancied up story. While
the facts are special, they are not as as unusual as some may think.
Artists can and do crack  under severe pressures, the way Australian
pianist David Helfgott did.
The movie is excellent, although it leaves some questions unanswered about
certain  times, places and people's backgrounds. The Helfgotts live in
Perth, I believem but various press items say Adelaide, Melbourne or "a
city." There are other unclarities.
Peter Helfgott, the head (most emphatically) of the family, is a Polish Jew
who had emigrated to Australia before World War II. (I have seen mentions
of "a German Jews," perhaps because he speaks the language). His late
father seems to have been very authoritarian. Peter's passion was music but
this was opposed. A violin he had bought when young was smashed by his
father.
Peter is a gravely traumatized individual. All or most of his relatives
were killed in the Holocaust. The man is a pauper, not merely a low-income
earner.  He dwells in a miserable house, almost a shack, with his wife and
kids.
The apple of his eye is young David who, as a child, is something of a
piano prodigy. His teacher is his father. Peter is imperious,bullying,
tyrannical, intolerant yet at the same time terribly possessive. "No one
will love you as I" is his leitmotiv to David at all stages of  his son's
life. It is clear that Monster Dad is not quite all there.Which gene went
wrong in him is unknown. So is  information of how and when Peter acquired
the musical training that allows him to teach his son so ably.
When  a professional teacher wants to instruct  the so-promising David,
Peter's "I can't afford to pay for lessons" is true statement but also an
alibi. He just won't let go of his son.Eventually he relents. Later he
grudgingly accepts having the local Jewish community lend a hand to the
boy. Visiting Jewish-American super-star violinist Isaac Stern offers to
get David to America, a wonderful scholarship and invitation are extended
Peter, perhaps  the Holcaust destroyed so many families, wants the boy to
stay with him. He refuses to let him go to the U.S.A.
In spite of his horrid, mad background, when David places second in an
all-Australia competition he  becomes a young star nationally. Finally
breaking away from Dad, he ignores his maledictions and opposition and
accepts a scholarship at London's Royal Academy of Music.
His first public concert in England is a triumph. But it is immediately
followed by a mental collapse, then a long maladythat lasts for several
years. Eventually comes a cure, incomplete but sufficient to return David
to the world of performing brilliantly in public. He will tour North
America in March 1997.
Except for some lack of fact-giving "Shine" shines in every way.  The
performances could not be better.  In small parts, beautifully done, are:
the great, amazing, versatile Sir John Gielgud ( David's teacher in London)
who will be 93 in April 1997 (Aries); Lynn Redgrave (the astrologer who
marries David and helps his recovery), a youngster of 54 (in March 1997),
sweet and lovely ; the charmingly named Googie Withers (David's good,
understanding friend) who, though not a major star, enhanced more than a
dozen, mostly British films from the late1930s to the mid-1950s. She
resurfaced in two fine features in 1985 and 1994.
The youngsters who play David as a child and as an adolescent are perfectly
cast. Geoffrey Rush (David as an adult), an admired stage actor who has
also been in films, is  extraordinary. His constant, endlessly repeated,
jabbered comments to himself and to others, uttered with a happy, friendly
face, are a unique tour-de-force which copies the real David. The only
approximate comparisons I can make are to the manic David Thewlis in
"Naked" and to several agitated characters by James Woods.
Peter is played by the former East German actor Armin Mueller-Stahl. He has
been in American films since 1989's "The Music Box." You may remember him
in "Avalon,"  "Kafka,"  "Night on Earth" (the New York cabbie) and "The
Last Good Time." While David is the center of the movie, Peter's portrayal
is the most cryptic and perhaps complex.
Eloquent  bits of business are numerous. Like Peter, a non-believer,
visiting a rabbi to make arrangements for David and donning a skullcap
--perhaps for the first time everr. Or else he once had faith but the
Holocaust may have caused him to lose it. As he starts on the corridor
leading to the exit, he removes the cap.  Like Peter again,in his pitiful
yard,  simply glances at a barbed wire.The reference to death camps is
instantaneous.
"Shine" gives a new meaning to "family movie," as do the current "Mother"
and especially the French "Thieves."
This review and others  can be found at : http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for SubUrbia (1997)
SUBURBIA * 1/2 Directed by Richard Linklater. Written by Eric Bogosian, from
his play. Photography, Lee Daniel. Editing Sandra Adair;. Production design
Catherine Hardwicke.Cast: Jayce Bartok (Pony), Amie Carey (Sooze), Nicky
Katt (Tim), Ajay Naidu (Nazeer), Parker Posey (Erica), Giovanni Ribisi
(Jeff), Samia Shoaib (Pakeesa), Dina Spybey (Bee-Bee) and Steve Zahn
(Buff), et al. A Sony Pictures Classics Release of a Castle Rock
Production. 118 minutes. Not rated.
(deserves a strong R for foul language)
Texas-born Richard Linklater is a true-blue cinephile who left the
University of Texas after two years,  returned to Austin after two more,
founded the Austin Film Society, made Super-8 movies and the feature-length
"It's Impossible to Learn to Plow by Reading Books" (1988), unseen by the
public. The title smacks of an alibi for unfinished studies.  I believe
fervently in true education but I am also familiar with  academic
prententiousness, bla bla, and Jargonauts. So I am neither for nor against
Linklater's dictum.
I am a great fan of Linklater the filmmaker who has charted young people so
cleverly . "Slacker," hs firt released feature, popularized the term as the
film followed a huge variety of hangers on in Austin with deft sketches,
goodhearted irony and a para-Godardian style that was also genuinely
Linklaterian.
"Dazed and Confused" (1993) recreated the last day of high school among
1976 students. The generation was the identity-less, post-Vietnam one,
poised between the hippie, idealistic, politicized, psychedelic 60s and
early 70s, and the pragmatic, Me-Me 80s. Linklater followed the kids like
an experienced anthropologist. Though less ironical than in "Slacker" he
did not spare us the inner emptiness of the youths, but without judging or
taking sides he sifted nicely the mavericks from the herd, showed cool
understanding and regaled us with much droll footage.
"Before Sunrise" (1995), was the meeting of strangers on a train, a French
woman and an American man, both 23.  Their brief encounter lasted well
under 24 hours.Uncannily catching the sights and moods of Vienna, it added
to the influence  of Jean-Luc Godard that of  Eric Rohmer and even Jacques
Rivette, yet Linklater remained once more his own, original man.
"SubUrbia" is preciously spelled with a capital U for no reason I can
detect except that it sounds like a burp. The characters are contemporary
20-somethings; the place is an invented town in Texas (shot in Austin); the
film's time is again limited from an early evening to the next morning; the
locus is a suburban convenience shop's parking lot where five pals, mostly
same-high-school graduates, congregate. Whether or not they have temporary
jobs they are innate slackers, but slackers who are not interesting,
amusing or touching. More or less nihilistic, they suffer from delayed
adolescent angst, drink, smoke, are dazed and confused, and talk talk talk,
getting drunk on words and booze. They also beleaguer the young Pakistani
owners of the store, often in racist ways.
Jeff comes closest to being the central character. He philosophizes
nebulously, has existential and identity problems. Tim  received an
honorable discharge from the  Air Force after  he "accidentally" sliced a
bit of his finger.  He has a chip on his shoulder and much booze in his
system. Buff is an unbearably obnoxious, jerky, clowning loudmouth who
vaguely thinks of making videos. A spike-haired female called Sooze is no
souse but Jeff's girl-friend who wants to become a performance artist in
New York. She gives her pals a terrible sample performance  of mostly
four-letter vituperations. Her personal friend Bee-Bee, a fragile,
recovering alcoholic, is younger and  outside the clan.
The shiftless quintet has gathered partly to wait for the visit of former
classmate Pony who has broken into MTV. Nothing major, but enough to
qualify him for a chauffeur-driven limo and an accompanying publicist,
rich, spoiled Californian Erica. Following this Waiting for Godot spell
come reactions, permutations, jealousies, ingratiations, other tortured and
tortuous relationships, more inane talk.  No matter how much they pose as
desperate or soulful  characters or whatever, they remain cardboardishly
flat.   Particularly frustrating is  the case of Jeff  who has potential
but whose omphaloscopy makes him a kvetcher without a cause.
The movie has no closure, which is OK, but works in blurry red herrings
that toy with the audience, which is not OK. Vagueness is all. Speech and
behavior may be accurately imitating life among certain types, but the
species are indifferent and unappealing. (I suspect that in real life the
boys would smell like Parisian "clochards.") Some youths wallow in
self-pity, others get irrationally or stupidly aggressive. others yet are
plain dumb. The prevailing non-thinking is that society sucks, but no one
dreams of doing anything about it.
Watch "60 Minutes" and its investigations show you see vividly how much
rottenness there is in this world.  Our parking-lot denizens, however,
never pinpoint  anything specific. And we are left in the dark about the
backgrounds of the characters, their families, the influences on them. At
the very least, and by omission, the situation is no compliment to home
life, school life or American life in general.
For what they attempt to represent -- a dysfunctional segment of young
America-the actors are good and well-directed. But the script is one of
weak opportunism  --this from Eric Bogosian of, among others,  "Talk Radio"
fame.  A few flashes of behavior, action, dialogue and monologue shed no
light. We can only react with "OK, guys,  you're alienated, I'm sorry. So
what else is new?"  Before we start caring for them, they would need a
brain transplant, and we would need a Florence Nightingale or Mother Teresa
heart.
It is sad to be negative after years of admiration for Linklater's movies,
but the truth is that "SubUrbia" 's two hours are as boring as watching the
grass grow. Except that this grass also keeps making irritating, loud
sounds. And when it's up, it's not fescue but crab-grass.

Title
Review for Twilight (1998)
TWILIGHT ** 1/2 Directed by Robert Benton. Written by Benton and Richard
Russo. Photography, Piotr Sobocinski. Editing, Carol Littleton. Production
design, David Gropman. Music by Elmer Bernstein. Cast: Paul Newman (Harry
Ross), Susan Sarandon (Catherine Ames), Gene Hackman (Jack Ames), Reese
Witherspoon (Mel Ames), Stockard Channing (Verna), James Garner (Raymond
Hope), Giancarlo Esposito (Reuben), Liev Schreiber (Jeff Willis), Margo
Martindale (Gloria Lamar), John Spencer (Capt. Phil Egan), M. Emmet Walsh
(Lester Ivar).A  Paramount release. 96 minutes. Rated R (violence, sex)
Cybill Sheperd has been complaining loudly that TV ignores actresses past
age 40. She claims that mature women bring to the screen experience, their
own kind of beauty, and other goodies. Cybill herself,  recently turned 48,
is as attractive and even more interesting than ever.
The cruelly though realistically titled "Twilight" gathers a splendid cast
of actors now in their golden years. Paul Newman, 73; Gene Hackman, 68;
James Garner, almost 70. Compared to them the women are youngsters of near
52 (Sarandon) and 54 (Channing). All these performers vindicate Cybill
Sheperd's arguments.
Newman has the lion's share in "Twilight." Present in every scene, he is
still appealing and handsome. The old charisma, the blue eyes, the
under-acting that suggests hidden depths, still work their magic. He plays
again a private eye (shades of his 1966 "Harper"), called Harry Ross. Harry
was a cop for 20 years, a P.I.  for 5, then, for an unspecified period, an
alcoholic, following his daughter's death. He is unattached.
Frustratingly, the scenario gives only the barest bones of his past. Did
his alcoholism follow or precede the separation from his wife? Was it a
divorce?  And so on. This murkiness, typical of the whole movie, does not
help our understanding of who Harry really is. More's the pity since Newman
deserves roles that document his characters' complexities.
The prelude is in Puerto Vallarta where musicians are lifelessly playing
"Solamente una vez," and where we see 17-year old Mel Ames
(ReeseWitherspoon, 22 any day now) topless in the water, in the altogether
in bed, and happily unsullied by silicone.
Harry, employed by her family to rescue her from her scummy lover Jeff,
gets her back, but only after Mel accidentally wounds Harry with his own
gun. This will launch the false rumor that Harry has lost his manhood, a
joke that joins other sexual ones, on aging, prostates, lighters that work
only after several tries, and such...
Cut to Los Angeles, two years later. We meet Mel's shapely mom (Sarandon,
or a body double) "au naturel" in her mansion's swimming pool. Like
daughter like mother.
Jack and Catherine Ames have taken in Harry as expiation for their
daughter's involuntary gunshot. Living in comfort over the garage, Harry
performs vague duties, playing cards with Jack being the clearest of them.
Jack is dying of cancer. Mel is snooty to the "handyman." Harry politely
lusts after Catherine. Catherine, still very much in love with her husband,
flirts with Harry.
When Jack charges Harry with a mysterious delivery of money, all kinds of
bizarre wheels are set in motion. The movie is an obvious attempt to
recapture the old "film noir" genre of, primarily the 1940s, with many of
its conventions: voice-over narration by the hero, an L.A. location,
double-crossings, false leads, faded newspaper clippings, sudden corpses,
etc. But no rainy streets at night or  lamps swinging symbolically from
light to shadow.
A great old film noir was "Out of the Past." The past was an oft-used
element of the genre. The Ames couple are former movie stars, whose
original affair coincided with the disappearance of Catherine's first
husband. This mystery is now unconvincingly re-woven into the current plot.
An addition for the 1990s has Stockard Channing as an old fling of Harry's.
Now a police lieutenant, she takes chances with her promotion by being
protective of him. It makes for some nice but improbable scenes.
Several more nice but improbable scenes go hand in hand with good
performances, snappy dialogue, zippy repartee. The movie's components, and
for that matter their sum, are none too coherent. No one is fleshed out,
from the principals to the supporting characters. The latter include blowzy
blonde Gloria  who is colorful; the reappearing Jeff who is pretty good;
gumshoe Reuben who is artificially dragged in for comic relief.
In the heyday of Hollywood's film noir, many of its directors were prolific
servants of the studios. Robert Benton is a post-studio-era writer-director
whose enviable track record barely exceeds a dozen titles: "Bonnie and
Clyde," " Bad Company," "The Late Show," Kramer vs. Kramer," "Places in the
Heart,"  "Nadine," and others, down to Benton's and Newman's collaboration
in "Nobody's Fool," from a novel by Richard Russo, the co-scripter of
"Twilight."
Benton's movies are often high-key imbedded with affecting low-key
passages. In "Twilight" he apparently opted for a high-key subject with an
unusually subdued treatment. It's in keeping with the characters of Harry
and his contemporaries Jack and the ironic Raymond (Garner), a former cop,
later a film-studio's security chief, now retired and living in a dream
house..
At the same time, while the typical classic film noir, although not
humorless, takes itself with seriousness, has passion and, inevitably, a
"femme fatale," "Twilight" departs from this norm. It is facetious at times
yet not at the high, often parodistic level of the new "noirs" of recent
years. And "femme fatale" by no stretch of the imagination can apply to the
appealing Susan Sarandon. This, and more, adds up to "Twilight" intending
to be a "new old noir," but hybridizing itself and falling between two
stools.
It's a risky concept, an interesting approach. Much happens, but in an
autumnal rhythm that feels slow. The film holds your attention all right
but dilutes itself with overkill in complications and underkill in
character exploration. The makers' gamble is not quite successful.
Production values are classy. Among them: three great houses (one left
unfinished by Frank Lloyd Wright); veteran Elmer Bernstein's good and
unobtrusive score; the photography by Piotr Sobocinski, one of the several
graduates of the Lodz Film School who now work  in America and keep
reminding us that Poland's losses are our gains.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Wag the Dog (1997)
WAG THE DOG ** 1/2. Directed by Barry Levinson. Written by Hilary Henkin &
David Mamet from the book "American Hero" by Larry Beinhart. Photography,
Robert Richardson. Production design, Wynn Thomas. Editing, Stu Linder.
Music, Mark Knopfler. Cast: Dustin Hoffman, Robert De Niro, Anne Heche,
Denis Leary, Willie Nelson, Woody Harrelson (uncredited), et al. A New Line
release. 93 min. Rated R (language).
At any given moment movie genres come in twos, threes or in wolfpacks.
Currently playing are "Wag the Dog," a shaggy dog story without a dog, and
"As Good as It Gets," a shaggy dog story with a dog. The title "Wag the
Dog" suggests another kiddie movie about a friendly hound, It is not. It's
an adult (sort of) satire of politics, Hollywood, and the media. And
although beautifully acted and intermittently quite funny, I find that its
premise is mean and opportunistic as the inspiration obviously comes from
headlines about President Clinton. It is all the stranger since, chances
are, the filmmakers are Democrats.
The President of the United States has been charged by a young girl  of
molesting her when she was touring the White House with a group of Firefly
Girls, whatever those are. By the horniest stretch of imagination, the
accusation is unbelievable, but as the country is only days away from  an
election, it can do irreparable harm.
The President is away in China (collecting Chinese votes???!!!). His
desperate aide Winifred Ames (Heche) calls Conrad Brean (De Niro) to a top
secret meeting in a White House bunker. Brean, a Mr. Fixit spin doctor opts
for a major diversion. He enlists Hollywood producer Stanley Motss,
pronounced Moss (Hoffman) to fabricate an imaginary war with Albania --a
ludicrous, farcical yet clever choice given America's ignorance of
geography. The conflict comes complete with phony documentary footage made
easy (and funny) by digital techniques. It includes references to a
nonexistent new bomber (an airplane that is). A country singer (Willie
Nelson) is hired to write a patriotic parody of "We Are the World" that
massed choirs perform.
In its last section the plot somehow gets lost. The end of the "crisis"
tries to top the fabulation with a returning war hero who is not what was
expected. This is a strictly from hunger development, though Woody
Harrelson has memorable presence. They baptize him Schumann (read Shoe Man)
and incite the public to pepper the country with symbolic shoes (sic).
The hoodwinking of an entire nation is imaginative but never gives you a
chance to suspend your disbelief. The eagerness of the media, especially
TV, to swallow and disseminate the "news," the gullibility of the nation
and its leaders, the cooperation of the military go from very, very, very
marginally believable to incredible..
The other element is the comically exaggerated. But whereas in a gem like
"Dr. Strangelove" the roles are out and out caricatural, here their
outrageousness is semi-realistic as both Washington and Hollywood converge
in their belief that, in De Niro's words, "war is show business." Dustin
Hoffman, in his physical and temperamental likeness to and parody of the
outrageous producer Robert Evans, merely pushes the envelope, which he does
with great gusto. With frantic pacing and faster and faster talk (a
contemporary variant of Howard Hawks' screwball comedies), under the lead
of he agitated Hoffman and the unflappable De Niro, there is an avalanche
of in-jokes about movie-makers and politicos.
What motivates Hoffman is twofold: his gripe that producers don't get
Oscars, and his compulsion to produce the Himalaya of his career. This is
amusing, up to a point. The yak yak however tries to pack too many esoteric
references that contribute to some troughs of monotony. The dog barks but
does not bite, the film does not open eyes or soar to a higher level. Its
parts can be entertaining but their sum stays on the ground.

Title
Review for Honey, I Blew Up the Kid (1992)
HONEY, I BLEW UP THE KID (1992) * 1/2. Directed by Randal 
Kleiser. Written by Thom Eberhardt, Peter Elbling, Garry 
Goodrow. Cinematography, John Hora. Production design, Leslie 
Dilley. Cast: Daniel and Joshua Shalikar, Rick Moranis, Marcia 
Strassman, Robert Oliveri, Amy O'Neill, Lloyd Bridges et al. A 
Walt Disney release. 89 minutes. Rated PG. 
A honey of a movie? Not. Its predecessor, "Honey, I Shrunk the 
Kids," was far richer in possibilities, suspense, plot, 
characters and humor. 
Had the filmmakers kept faith with the original's grammar, the 
sequel would have been titled "Honey, I Blown Up the Kid." But 
nobody cares about tradition these days. 
It's all about Adam, played by the Shalikar twins who are 
variously reported as 2 or 2 1/2 years old. It depends, I 
suppose, from whether you count the age at the start or the 
end of the filming.  
Accidentally zapped by a special ray, Adam becomes larger each 
time he is exposed to an electromagnetic force field. In 
stages, he reaches 112 feet--at least that's what the press 
release says--a world record for a human. The previous 
champion I could locate was "The Amazing Colossal Man," only 
60 feet tall.  
The ray's inventor is Wayne Szalinski, Adam's dad. He is once 
again played by Rick Moranis as a hyper type and a super 
high-tech Rube Goldberg. He looks dim and is inept with simple 
daily chores. Welcome back to the old cliche about the 
absent-minded professor, the spacey scientist or the 
intellectual discombobulated by "real" life. (A lot of 
strange people are named Wayne these days, in movies).  
"Honey 2" is a single-joker, whereas "Honey1" had variety. The 
Spanish saying "if you lie down with babies, you wake up  wet" 
applies here. If your entire movie is about a colossal kid, 
there's little you can do except follow him with the camera, 
hope for the best and try to be flexible, fitting whatever 
baby does to your framework. 
As Adam's size increases so does the movie's yawn quotient. 
Two feeble mini-subplots--Wayne's nasty superior, Adam's older 
brother and a babysitter--are of small help. The film does 
very little with people, context or dialogue. It's all about 
special effects and Adam's "ooh, aah" cuteness. Big deal. Adam 
doesn't say much either. A little Eve would have been more 
interesting, since girls seem to develop speech faster.  
I retained just one nice, throwaway conceit and two good 
lines. The Szalinskis' suburb in desert-surrounded Las Vegas 
is called "Vista del Mar" ("Sea View"). The sentences, funny 
in context, are: "There's no way I'm changing those diapers" 
and "Look at that mother!"   
The special effects bring modern techniques to the venerable 
screen genres about gigantic people, animals or prehistoric 
creatures, whose size was caused by arrested evolution, 
encounters with aliens, nuclear radiation and such.  Some of 
those pictures became classics, like "The Lost World" (1924) 
or, better yet, "King Kong" with all its mythological, 
Freudian or sociological implications. Sometimes, as in "The 
Attack of the 50 Ft.Woman," the movies dreadful enough to 
become howls.  
"Honey 2" is neither campy, droll, or suspenseful. You know 
that no harm will come to the child, that Adam will do only 
material damage,  and that he will get back to regulation size 
at the end. I heard just one big laugh from the audience, and 
this from an adult. The many children in the theater were 
quiet throughout. Confused by the sights? By the technobabble? 
Overawed? Plain bored? 
Nowadays even the best special effects seldom impress the 
public. We take movie magic for granted. It is no longer like 
earlier periods when giant squids, invisible men or 
Lilliputians took the spectators' breath away and had them 
asking each other: "How did they do it?"  
In the small part of a laboratory watchman is redhead Ken 
Tobey, that likable second-shelf actor, who, as Kenneth Tobey, 
had his hour of glory when he played the lead in the classic 
sci-fi horror "The Thing" of 1951. Nice to see him again. It's 
a small bonus for aficionados clutching at straws.  

Title
Review for Made in America (1993)
MADE IN AMERICA (1993) ** 3/5. Directed by Richard Benjamin. Written by
Holly Goldberg Sloan, from a story by Marcia Brandywynne and Sloan.
Photography, Ralf Bode. Editing, Jacqueline Cambas, Music, Mark Isham,
Production design, Evelyn Sakash. Cast: Whoopi Goldberg, Ted Danson, Nia
Long, Will Smith, et al. A Warners release. 120 minutes.  PG-13.
Back in 1972, Woody Allen broke filmic ground of sorts by playing Sperm
in one of the episodes of "Everything You Wanted to Know About Sex (But
Were Afraid to Ask.) "  By now, 21 years later, sperm has come of age in
films, including "Made in America," a silly, innocuous and would-be
romantic comedy. 
The movie entertained me, but then I saw it under ideal conditions. To
wit: I attended a morning screening, which means that the long day had
not yet fatigued me and my critical disposition was on the tolerant
side. The theater empty but for a couple of Whoopi-ite friends who came
along . We were not subjected to a crowd whose laughter often comes at
the wrong moments. 
Since the film had been around for some weeks, I had seen negative or
very mixed reviews and,  expecting the worst I found much of the film
enjoyable. .Of course, in restrospect, the movie is slighter, kinda
dumber and more forgettable than when you watch it.  Even so -- at least
by TV sitcom standards-- "Made in America" is a cute little picture.  
In Oakland, California, Sarah (Goldberg) runs an African-American
bookstore with paraphernalia and objets d'art. The place is called "The
African Queen," a name that could be seen initially as allusive, given
the gayness of at least one of her employees. But this is either a red
herring or a politically correct joke. The real subject attempted is
black and white relations.
It all starts with a most unlikely school-lab session where the students
are frantically pricking one another to establish blood types.  Sarah's
daughter Zora (Nia Long), a top graduating senior, discovers that her
late father could not have been her progenitor. 
She faces her mother who admits that after losing her husband she wanted
a child so badly that she resorted to a sperm bank. Zora is
understandably upset but quickly pacified by Sarah, with whom she has a
wonderful relationship. Even so, understandably Zora wants to know who
that biological father was. 
She dragoons her classmate and best male friend Tea Cake (Smith) into a
visit to a sperm bank. Tea Cake provides the excuse and the laughs. 
Zora, one of the computer whiz-kids of Generation X (cf. "Jurassic Park"
and remember "WarGames" and many other flicks) taps into the records and
finds out the name and Social Security number of the donor. 
It is all improbable, as is Zora's lightning fast tracking down of the
man. She is horrified to discover that he is white, while Sarah, equally
shocked, worries about what all this will do to her daughter.  
Note however that the movie is politically correct all the way and makes
short shrift of color differences.This  has a comforting effect on
audiences that increasingly see black Americans and black-white
relations in contexts of racism, strife and violence. 
What especially outrages Sarah is not so much that Hal Jackson (Danson)
is not black but that he is crass, loud, superficial and obnoxious. The
owner of Jackson Motors, he is a car dealer who invades the TV screen
with commercials that feature him in stunts with animals. Twice
divorced, hard-drinking, chain-smoking and played convincingly as a
dumbo, Hal lives in a beautiful home with Stacy (Jennifer Tilley) a
bimboid aerobics instructor who exhausts him sexually and whose
brainlessness is apparent even to the empty-headed Hal.   
Following confrontations between Sarah and Hal, miscellaneous
sheenanigans and physical mishaps involving people, a bear, an elephant,
a bicycle and a car accident, there grows (predictably) real affection
between Sarah, Zora and Hal, and love inevitably blossoms between Mama
and Papa.
The movie is almost mathematically divided into four half-hour quarters.
The first is very funny. The second less so but still amusing. Parts
three and four struggle for what to do next. Groping for a "denouement"
they respectively stress feelings and romance, and throw in a plot twist
(we can see it coming) before the happy, warm ending.
There's no character development to speak of here, just superficialities
and arbitrary changes, the most incredible causing Danson to reform
suddenly,  throw away his smokes and booze and become calm and sweet. 
The naysaying reviewers find the Goldberg-Danson relationship to be the
film's saving grace, but in fact Sarah and Hal generate neither mutual
electricity nor sexiness. Yet each in his/her way, does have a special
kind of charm. 
The film's main lure lies in its comedic and slapstick effects -- broad,
even cheap,  but often rib-tickling -- and in the supporting cast. Young
Nia Long ("Boyz N the 'Hood") is appealing. Jennifer Tilly is droll. 
She is not even mentioned in the movie's information materials -- a
cruel omission since she's a show-stealer in her blend of airheads a la
Gloria Grahame, Marilyn Monroe and others. 
Excellent too is actor-rapper Smith ("The Fresh Prince of Bel  Air" on
TV). He is very likable, a kinetic delight who delivers his lines with
sympathetic zest. This makes up a lot for a sketchy part that leaves us
confused about Zora's relationship with him. 
Movie veterans will spot, as one of the production assistants who are
making the Hal Jackson commercials, a dead ringer of the young Richard
Benjamin. The end credits list him as Ross Benjamin. It's nice to have a
papa in the business. 
PS. Above written in 1993. A 1996 re-viewing on cable TV yields the same
positive reactions to this often underrated, even maligned comedy.

Title
Review for Ponette (1996)
PONETTE (France, 1996) *** 1/2 Written and directed by Jacques
Doillon.Produced by Alain Sarde. Photography, Caroline Champetier. Editing,
Jacqueline Fano (Leconte). Production design, Henri Berthon. Music,Philippe
Sarde.Cast:Victoire Thivisol (Ponette), Xavier Beauvois (the father),
Claire Nebout (Aunt), Matiaz Bureau (Matthias),Delphine Schiltz (Delphine),
Marie Trintignant (the mother) et al. An Arrow Release.French with
subtitles. 92 min. Not rated.
At the 1996 Venice Film Festival -- one of the Big Three with Cannes and
Berlin -- the film "Ponette" won the International Critics award, the
"Office Catholique" award, and Victoire Thivisol won for Best Actress.
Like the girl Ponette she portrays, Victoire was still four years old when
the filming was finished. Her age is much more than a new entry in the
Guinness Book of Records. Victoire's performance is incredibly good and
totally credible.
This movie is unusual and the successful result of experimental techniques.
It is also in  the French tradition of exploring childhood and adolescence.
Hollywood mostly shows the young the way the studios or the adults imagine
them to be or wish them to be -- though some fine pictures have come out of
this approach. France shows them as they are, and mostly from the
children's point of view.
The Gallic gems  include works such as "Poil de Carotte," "Crainquebille,""
La Maternelle, "" Zero for Conduct," "The Two of Us," Truffaut's  "Les
Mistons" and "Small Change."  The long list is unfamiliar to American
audiences except for Truffaut's "The 400 Blows" and Louis Malle's "Murmur
of the Heart," and " Au Revoir les Enfants." The 1951 classic "Forbidden
Games" links the most closely to "Ponette" through the theme of death as
seen by orphaned five-year-old Brigitte Fossey.
The story of Ponettte could be called high-concept, summarized in a single
sentence. "Four year-old Ponette loses her mother in a car accident, cannot
accept her absence, waits for her to come back from the dead." But this is
not a simple concept like "U.S. boxer Stallone beats the Russian champion."
Ponette's grief and her hopes for Maman's return do not abate. It is
understandable in a girl who thinks of her beloved rag doll as a living
creature.
When the child's loving father must go to Lyon on business, he leaves her
for some time with his sister-in-law and her two kids. The.little cousins,
with alternating seriousness, playfulness and teasing, tell her that dead
is dead: "Papi (Grandpa) did not come back from the dead." Ponette's
wonderful, poetic reply :"It's because no one waited for him."
The solidly Catholic aunt  (who reminded me of Barbara Hershey) has her own
ideas about Resurrection ("like Jesus") or the power of God. Symbolic or
contradictory abstractions confuse Ponette who firmly believes that Maman
will materialize. When Ponette's father, an agnostic, returns, he is
irritated at Auntie's approach. "God is for the dead. Leave Him alone."
Cut to a summertime boarding school in which mostly children somewhat older
than Ponette --all extremely well observed and well played -- contribute
their own theories or  advice. There is as well much hilarious talk on
subjects ranging from suppositories, to what "single people" means and
who/what are the Jews.
On all matters Ponette is referred to supervisor Aurelie, and to Jewish
schoolmate Ada "who know everything." "How is it that Ada knows all about
Jews?" Answer: "Because Jesus was a Jew." Then comes an amusing discussion
which confuses Catholic, Arabs and Jews in fanciful ways.
The dialogue, naive, fresh, imaginative, is not fabricated comic relief but
typical of genuine talk of French chidren who, like so many in France,
possess an astoundingly rich and grammatical vocabulary. The single error
here is when Ponette says "J'ai mal a ma tete."
Aurelie tries to help Ponette by introducing her to prayer. Ada -- who says
she is a Child of God -- and pal Mathieu, want Ponette to become one. This
entails passing a number of physical tests. e.g. a five-minute stay in a
dumpster. With elegant kindness Ada times this out after one minute.
When Ponette sleeps, she speaks to Maman who even visiits her once. "She
smelled good." But as she is reaching utter despair, something good and
magical happens. I can only disclose that the girl is "cured," accepts
death's finality and starts out on the road to a normal life. After a
single viewing I am still undecided: Is the ending hokey or is it a
convincing culmination of a child's imagination?
Since 1972 writer-director Jacques Doillon has made some 20 features, plus
shorts and movies for televison. Though unknown in the U.S., he is much
admired in France for his original, intimate subjects (many of them about
young people), his skills with actors, his ear and eye for real life, his
sympathetic and empathetic analyses and techniques. For example, here the
camera stays almost always on the girl, with many closeups, yet smooth
framing variations prevent monotony.
Doillon sent video crews to French preschools all over. Four- and
five-year-olds were taped in interviews that elicited opinions on many
topics, including death. He then set up workshops, playing games, talking,
doing skits with the selected children. This went on for six months. Then
he wrote the screenplay using the workshop dialogues, and cast the
children.
The movie spends an absolute, minimal time on adults and their backgrounds.
In spite of unspecified times and places  there is no feeling of
incompleteness.  The grownups screen is both necessary and sufficient. The
older people are the supporting cast to the children, who themselves are
the supporting cast for Ponette. The story belongs to Ponette.
Superbly directed Victoire Thivisol becomes as real as a documentary shot
by a hidden camera. Doillon, with no maudliness, recreates a specific case
among universal traumas, in ways never quite seen before on the screen.

Title
Review for Vita č bella, La (1997)
LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL  (LA VITA E BELLA) (Italy, 1997) *** 1/2 Directed by
Roberto Benigni.Written by Vincenzo Cerami and Benigni.Photography, Tonino
Delli Colli. Editing, Simona Paggi. Music,Nicola Piovani; Production
design, Danilo Donati.Produced by Elda Ferri and Gianluigi Braschi. Cast
Roberto Benigni (Guido), Nicoletta Braschi (Dora), Giorgio Cantarini
(Giosue), Giustino Durano (Uncle), Sergio Bustric (Ferruccio), Marisa
Paredes (Dora's mother), Horst Buchholz (Dr.Lessing), et al. A Miramax
release.  In Italian. 122 minutes.PG-13.
Ever since the birth of cinema, like the stock market, the movie production
of just about all nations has had its ups and downs, its periods of glory,
its descents to Purgatory. Today, many a national cinema is in crisis, but
then even among those countries, gems are produced.
Italian film, it's been repeatedly claimed, mostly by specialists, is in
the doldrums these days. I disagree. Yes, big names such as Rossellini, De
Sica, Fellini and such are no more.  Antonioni is alive but seriously
un-well. Scola is alive and well and active, but his films don't get the
distribution they once had, notably in the U.S.A where he's almost an
unknown now. Fiftyish  Bertolucci is under-represented; Pupi Avati is not
even listed in most general reference works. Movies by the still younger,
most talented mavericks (Moretti, Nichetti, Salvatore, many others) are
minimally screened.
Yet, if for nothing else, Italian cinema today should be world-famous for
its wit and sense of the comic, the best around. A case in point is Life is
Beautiful, by and with that arch-clown, the screwball comic Roberto
Benigni. Mercifully, the Grand Jury Prize at the 1998 Cannes Festival. It
has also received seven Academy Awards nominations, including both Best
Film and Best Foreign Film - something that has not happened since 1969,
with Costa-Gavras's political thriller Z.
LIB (Life is Beautiful) has two halves. The first  is a tornado of fast
talk, lighting-quick acts, broad gestures, and inventions as hilarious as
anything I can remember.The audience is kept in stitches.
Benigni plays Guido who, in 1938 Fascist Italy, comes to Tuscan town of
Arezzo (under 100,000 pop.) where he dreams of having his own bookstore. At
first he flirts with pretty schoolteacher Dora (the quietly luminous
Nicoletta Braschi, Benigni's wife), as he does with all  the girls. But
before you can say "giovinezza" this becomes love and courtship, in
entirely original, hilarious ways.
Simultaneously, Guido goes through other, wonderfully comical routines as he
waits on tables at the Grand Hotel where his nice uncle, the Maitre D, has
hired him. Guido also impersonates people, and is not stingy with overt or
implied critiques of the Fascist regime, its bureaucracy, its racism, its
go-getters, its delusions of grandeur.
He then "abducts" a willing Dora on the very day of her official (and arranged)
engagement to a stuffy government flunky. If you're not in stitches, have
your doctor check you funny bone. Guido and Dora marry right away.
It's all  slapstick fantasy, of course, as much as any Marx Brothers film.
Almost nothing of what happens could happen in reality, yet the
fancifulness is rooted in reality. Blithe Guido is so lavish with his
unorthodox comments and, like many Italians, so full of casual references
to the Virgin Mary and to saints, that you do not suspect that he is a Jew.
Until, that is, his uncle's horse (sic) is painted green by Fascists, with
"Jewish Horse" written on it. But even so, little is made of this.
The first half is as Italian as they make them, with typical volubility,
zesr for life and sense of the absurd. It is not for nothing that this is
the land of the Commedia dell' Arte and of grand, lyrical opera.
Cut to five years later. The couple have a bookstore and a little boy. The
government targets Jews and Jewish businesses. The Nazis deport father and
son to a concentration camp  Dora (a gentile) forces her way into the
deportation train. To protect the youngster, Guido fabricates an elaborate
charade to make him believe that all this is just one big game.
The break in tone is jolting. From the laughter of Part One we are
transported to the sadness of  Part Two, which is heart-rending. In Italy,
the film swept the equivalent of Oscars (7 wins) and broke all attendance
records. But there were some strong objections to Benigni for "trivializing
the Holocaust." "Not so," he fought back  He had submitted his script to
major Jewish organizations which gave it their go-ahead and later even
defended the finished film. The Mayor of Jerusalem published praises.
Following Cannes, Benigni was a guest of honor at the Jerusalem Film
Festival where he won the first prize for a Jewish-themed work, Between the
movie's release in Italy and Cannes, he did make some cuts, said to be more
a matter of length than of content, although I suspect that the slightly
reduced version may be the cause of some continuity gaps and "collapsed"
time.
The controversy has continued. The reception of the film by the public has
been very good, by critics too, even though nay-sayers do remain who think
it is in poor taste. The inescapable fact is that the uneasy mixture does
come as a shock. It is a "first," a daring experiment that gambles not on
comedy but on Guido's shenanigans --his lies to his son -- within a death
camp. Still,  Part Two, while based on the Nazis' inexplicable monstrosity,
is also very much of a fantasy, a kind of landscape in the mind that does
not reproduce, as in a documentary, the horror of it all. In a sense, it is
somewhat like some shielded child's imagination. And its engine is not
reality but the limitless love of a father for his son.
By a strange coincidence, in both this film and Central Station, its rival
at the Oscars, the woman and the child are called Doris and Joshua.
At the Cannes Festival, the prize ceremony is short (around 30 minutes) and
dull. But for the first time in memory it was hugely livened up by Benigni.
He appeared on the stage to receive his award (the runner-up Grand Jury
Prize), jumping, hollering, radiant with joy ... and pretending he had
received the topmost award, the Palme d'Or . Frantically, like someone who
has met his savior, he threw himself prone at the feet of Jury President
Martin Scorsese who was so taken aback that he lost his ever-solemn
composure. The irrepressible Benigni went on to more profuse, comical
expressions of happiness and gratitude.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Grumpier Old Men (1995)
GRUMPIER OLD MEN (1995) ** 1/4  Directed by Howard Deutch. 
Written by Mark Steven Johnson. Photography, Tak Fujimoto. 
Editing, Billy Weber, Seth Flaum, Maryann Brandon. Production 
design, Gary Frutkoff. Music, Alan Silvestri. Cast: Jack 
Lemmon, Walter Matthau, Ann-Margret, Sophia Loren, Kevin 
Pollak, Daryl Hannah, Burgess Meredith, Ann Guilbert, et al.  
A Warners release. 105 min. Rated PG-13 (language)
In the 1993 "Grumpy Old Men,"  John Gustafson (Jack Lemmon ) 
and Max Goldman (Walter Matthau ) were small-town, retired 
Minnesotans -- respectively a  widowed Swede and a divorced 
Jew -- who had been feuding friends and neighbors since 1938. 
The film was an unworthy, dull descendant of "The Odd Couple," 
jerkily built,  minimally salvaged by  traces of comedic 
talent  in the Lemmon-Matthau pair.
I  was not anxious to see the sequel "Grumpier Old Men", but  
I did, partly as a reaction to the flood of three-hour long, 
tush-taxing and grump-making movies.  Surprisingly, it turned 
out to be pretty enjoyable, all the more so since remakes are 
usually much inferior to their originals.  
In "Grumpier," John now happily married to Ariel (Ann-Margret) 
for six months, still lives next door to Max. Max is a lonely, 
ultra-messy bachelor whose companionship consists of three 
television sets that edify him about the world through 
programs like "Geraldo." He still has John's fishing 
companionship. The old antagonism has lessened but still 
smolders -- still quite irrationally. Insults, put-downs, 
deprecation and physical tricks are very much alive. In 
addition to this  Neil Simon-ish rapport, there is a kind of 
Three Stooges behavior. 
There is no third  stooge. On the periphery is the colorless 
affair of Max's son Jacob (Kevin Pollack) who wants to marry 
Max's daughter Melanie (Darryl Hannah), the divorced mother of 
a little girl. Peripheral too, though colorful,  is 95-year 
old Grandpa Gustafson (Burgess Meredith). 
>From Palermo, Sicily, Maria ,the cousin of  a local  nicknamed 
"Spaghetti" Ragetti, moves to   town. In  needless overkill of 
plotting,  she has been unlucky in five marriages. Her old 
mother comes along. Ann Guilbert plays her convincingly as an 
Italian, though her rapid going from ignorance of English to 
relative fluency is too much.
The ladies now own  a former bait shop by the lake, want to 
transform the place into an Italian "ristorante romantico."  
The John-Max odd couple, fearing that this will affect the 
fishing, resort  to childish tricks and pranks to sabotage the 
project.
Max's  initial irritation about Maria telegraphs in large writ 
that it will be transformed into romance and badly-needed 
matrimony. Other complications, including  a break between 
John and Ariel and another between Melanie and Jacob, are also 
signaled from afar as merely passing impediments. 
The film's structure is of episodes tied together by gags, 
jokes and repartees. These are overall better than in "Grumpy 
Old Men." Both movies have the same writer and composer, 
otherwise the crews are different. ( Howard Deutch who has 
been closely associated with John Hughes has also directed  
"Pretty In Pink,"" Some Kind Of Wonderful," "The Great 
Outdoors," "Article 99, ""Getting Even With Dad.") 
Silvestri's music humorously underlines the story with 
familiar renditions of old songs.  "I'll Be Glad When You're 
Dead, You Rascal You" is gratifyingly served in its entirety 
with the opening credits."That's Amore"; "Hit the Road, Jack" 
and others follow. 
Among the funnier highlights, Matthau in love has his truck 
seat "refinished in  authentic imitation leather." (Historical 
Note: The original ads, years ago, said "genuine imitation 
leatherette"). He gets "jewelry" for Loren and in what struck 
me as the movie's funniest bit, explains: "It's a cubic 
zirconium. I got it from the Home Shopping Network." 
A running gag has Matthau videotaping (with unlikely skills) 
neighbor Lemmon posing  nude for sculptress Ann-Margret's 
remake of Rodin's "The Thinker." There is also a good, 
cartoonish dog-chasing-cat , mayhem-producing sequence topped 
by the humans squabbling while now the animals sit together in 
friendship and watch. The tone is kept light except, close to 
the end, for some pathos about Grandpa and some sentimentality 
that you see coming for miles about a legendary fish tracked 
for 20 years and finally caught. 
Most importantly, there is Sophia Loren. She wears her 61 
years with grace and not much disguise. She does her flimsy 
part with wit, warmth and grace.  Her appeal and sexiness go 
beyond the obvious (her bust, her walk). They involve her 
eyes, the way she smiles, reacts and speaks. On the other 
hand, the film  overstresses the ages of  Matthau (75) and 
Lemmon (70), the  close-ups of jowls and watery eyes, the 
shuffling gait.  
Ann-Margret (age 54 in 1995) and the rest of the cast strictly 
provide support, padding or decoration. The movie is slight, 
unambitious and  forgettable, but as short-term or instant 
gratification, it does nicely.  

Title
Review for Office Space (1999)
OFFICE SPACE *** Directed and written by Mike Judge, based on his "Milton"
animated shorts. Photography, Tim Suhrstedt. Editing, David Rennie.
Production design, Edward McAvoy. Music, John Frizzell. Cast : Gary Cole
(Bill Lumbergh), Ron Livingston (Peter), Jennifer Aniston (Joanna), David
Herman (Michael Bolton), Ajay Naidu (Samir), Stephen Root (Milton).
Produced by Michael Rotenberg and Daniel Rappaport. A 20th Century Fox
release. About 92 minutes. R (language)
Would you believe that it's been almost twenty years since "9 to 5" (1980),
the famously funny revolt and revenge of three women secretaries? It's also
the first movie that comes to my mind in the office sufferers category. The
topic has been an element in some other films too ("The Apartment" of 1960,
etc.) but in wider contexts. In more recent years, it has been neglected. A
major exception is "Clockwatchers" (1998), a first feature by Jill
Sprecher, revolving around four temporary workers, all women.
"Office Space" concerns three male employees of Initech. What the
corporation does exactly is unclear, a word that in most cases would be a
criticism of a plot, but here is perfectly suited to the absurd atmosphere.
For that matter, the tasks are not even clear to the employees.
Work is a hateful daymare, the subalterns are purely and simply slaves in
tight cubicles that remind me of the cramped interiors of  U-boats. Or else
they're like chained rowers of Roman galleys, except that the modular
enclosures can and do get moved around, to the workers' distress.
The three young men work (so to speak) mostly with inimical computers and
printers. There is just one smiling face in the office, a jocular female
telephone operator, who, like a voice chip, ceaselessly answers with
exactly the same, short phrase.
The madness of Intertech is lorded over by an oily, falsely polite,
robot-like dictator Bill Lumbergh (Gary Cole). He keeps reminding Peter
(Ron Livingston)-- the main focus of this horror story-- that he didn't put
"the new cover sheets on the TPS reports." This becomes a leitmotiv as
other managers reiterate it.
In their cluster of cubicles, Peter's fellow-sufferers and pals are a
fellow called Michael Bolton (the questions about the "real" Michael Bolton
are another leitmotiv) who looks like Microsoft's Bill Gates, and the
exotic Samir whose computer whizness will play a major part in the plot.
All employees are miserable. To add injury to insult, Initech has called in
efficiency experts in order to eliminate some personnel. The diverse
interviews are a howl.
Peter, whose job has made of his life one big dysfunction, has been seeing
a hypnotherapist at the request of his girlfriend. During the last session
(also a howl of black humor), the healer also hypnotizes himself and keels
over dead. But somehow Peter is liberated by his own trance. He embarks on
civil disobedience vis-a-vis Intertech, starts living it up, breaks all the
rules,has an affair with restaurant waitress Joanna (Jennifer Aniston) who
herself rebels against the stupidity of her workplace (another howl).
When Peter reappears at the office in non-regulation casual garb and an "I
don't give a damn" attitude, and after he tells the experts that he hates
his job and gets no work done, all this is interpreted as signs of
leadership. So  Peter gets upgraded. But with his two buddies, he plans and
executes a revolt of the slaves. It's no "Spartacus" but it is pretty
funny, and leads to  a computer scam.
The movie is the first live feature by Mike Judge ("Beavis and
Butt-Head,""King of the Hill"). It is satirical from the deja vu but
cleverly shot opening sequence. Driving to work, bosses in Porsches,
underlings in ordinary cars, manual laborers, and all others are equalized
when caught in excruciatingly slow, stop and go traffic. At roadside, an
old man with a walker always stays ahead of them. (The film was shot in
Austin, Texas)
All is not perfect in the movie. The tempo of the first part is fine, but
the  relatively rookie director does not increase the rhythm gradually,
does not  follow the rule that in comedy (black slapstick in this case), if
you don't keep accelerating, you fall behind. Part 2, the scam, loses the
impetus, and there's also the problem of no specific suspense items to keep
the viewer going.
But Judge makes up for much of this by having a fourth employee, the older,
quirky, bumbling Milton who can hardly utter his phrases. His function is a
mystery --partly and hilariously explained later. His role, conceived with
comic cruelty (par for the course in farces), is the hardest in the movie,
along with Gary Cole's variations on a one-sided character. Milton is
played by Stephen Root who steals the show whenever he's around.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Flor de mi secreto, La (1995)
A Woman on the Edge of a Nervous Breakdown
THE FLOWER OF MY SECRET (Spain, 1995) (La Flor de mi Secreto) *** 1/2 
Written & directed by Pedro Almodovar. Executive producer, Agustin 
Almodovar. Director of Production, Esther Garcia. Photography, Affonso 
Beato. Editing, Jose Salcedo. Music, Alberto Iglesias. Cast: Maria 
Paredes (Leo), Juan Echanove (Angel), Imanol Arias (Paco), Carmen Elias 
(Betty), Rossy De Palma (Rosa), Chus Lampreave (Mother), Joaquin Cortes 
(Antonio), Manuela Vargas (Blanca), et al. A Sony Classics release. In 
Spanish with subtitles. 100 minutes. Rated R. (some open but inoffensive 
sex talk). 
The nice thing about the "enfants terribles" of art is that when they 
keep the faith, they keep their youth and ebullience and can still be 
called "bad boys." Like Pedro Almodovar who was 44 when he made THE 
FLOWER OF MY SECRET. Happily for us, he stuck to his melodramatic style 
(partly inherited from Hollywood directors like Douglas Sirk and 
Vincente Minnelli), even heightened it, while not abandoning his special 
sense of humor.  
Melodrama is not always an easy term to define, or to distinguish from 
plain drama, tragicomedy or TV soapers. Beyond tricky and shifting 
parameters and classifications, melodrama is essentially like 
pornography: you can't apply rules to it, but you know it when you see 
it.
In some important respects, FLOWER does not follow the conventions of 
melodrama. Emotions are exaggerated, but not all that much, given the 
temperament of Latins; the characters are not stereotyped; there are no 
villains to be punished and no heroes who triumph. And while there are 
several players in the film, it is essentially a one-woman show.
The woman (Maria Paredes, who played the mother in HIGH HEELS and is 
perfect in her role here) is called Leo, short for Leocadia. (An unusual 
name. In case theatre buffs wonder, it is unconnected to the play 
LEOCADIA by Jean Anouilh). She is fortyish, attractive, and emotionally 
in a bad way. No, she is not crazy, but she misses her husband Paco, a 
high-ranking Army officer away at NATO Headquarters in Brussels. And she 
worries about her marriage-on-the-rocks.
It would be unfair to give away the plot and twists of the movie. Leo's 
predicament is built up gradually and brilliantly, through the people 
she comes in contact with and via events that may at first seem to be 
odd, mysterious or disconnected but in reality make a solid fabric for 
the story. There are many threads in FLOWER but they come together in 
plausible ways. There are several loose ends, but even when they seem 
absurd, they turn out to make make very good sense -- because they are 
the loose ends of  life, not those of a film's structure. 
Among them is the secret of Amanda Gris, a mysterious, best-selling 
authoress of romantic potboilers; Leo's serious literary ambitions; her 
meeting with Angel, the paunchy, simpatico cultural pages editor of "El 
Pais" (a real newspaper) who falls for her; the Leo-Angel meeting of 
minds in their love of feminist literature (almost all of it Anglo); 
their divergences on writer Amanda Gris; Leo's maid Blanca, a retired 
flamenco dancer who, at some point appears in a splendid, post-modern 
flamenco performance with her son Antonio; Antonio who finances the show 
in unorthodox ways that involve Leo;  Leo's sister Rosa with whom their 
aged mother lives in perpetual turmoil. 
(Rosa is played by the hatchet-faced actress who is a staple in 
Almodovar movies; the mother, by a versatile veteran actress of comedy 
who is excellent here and goes from tantrums to natural advice that 
helps Leo's sanity. Almodovar drew on his own mother for that part).  
There is also Leo's best female friend, a psychologist, and husband 
Paco, back on a short leave on his way to Bosnia. Surprises abound, not 
in set-piece style but in realistic, albeit highly emotional ways. 
Double-edged, funny as well as bittersweet sequences, such as Leo and 
too-tight boots or the opening scenes that deal with announcing the 
death of a son, then make a pitch for organ donation --yet fool you. 
(Don't ask). 
Almodovar does not cheat, but nor does he take us by the hand to guide 
us in the maze he has created. He ought to make a thriller some day, 
with his skills in suspense and surprise. Almodovar is openly gay, but 
in this film, if there are any hints of same-sex relations, they must be 
well hidden. On the other hand, the writer-director understands women 
remarkably well and with immense empathy and sympathy. He also 
understands the construction of films. The scenes play through to the 
end, yet retain their ability to surprise us with their mix of the 
contemporary Spanish zeitgeist, literary matters and personal problems.  
The production is first-rate, with top photography that runs from 
documentary-like objectivity to great symbolic shots, like those of the 
return of Paco seen through a number of small mirrors on the wall or 
those of the marital bed. Almodovar's usual garish-on-purpose colors 
have been much toned down, even made into pastels at times, in keeping 
with the mood.
There is a lot of drinking in the film, and even more conversation, so 
much of it that one needs a quick eye to catch the many elusive 
subtitles -- a small liability for non-Spanish speakers. I am all for 
subtitles, and I can get riled at the laziness of viewers who say "I 
can't see the movie for having to read it." In  FLOWER, however, this is 
sometimes justified, but it should not discourage one from seeing the 
film. It is not as outrageous or surreal as many other Almodovar 
pictures, not as mordant and provocative, so that you have to gear down 
to a warmer and more accessible yet rich psychological level. Even so, 
there are no dull moments or any bits you wish had been cut out.  

Title
Review for Kundun (1997)
KUNDUN ** 1/4  Directed by Martin Scorsese. Written by Melissa Mathison,
from the life story of the Dalai Lama. Photography, Roger Deakins. Editing,
Thelma Schoonmaker.  production and costume design, Dante Ferretti. Art
direction, Franco Ceraolo, Massimo Razzi. Set decoration, Francesca Lo
Schiavo. Visual effects, Dream Quest Images.Visual effects supervisor,
Jeffrey Burks. Music, Philip Glass. Cast: Tenzin Thuthob Tsarong (Adult
Dalai Lama), Gyurme Tethong (Dalai Lama, age 12), Tulku Jamyang Kunga
Tenzin (Dalai Lama, age 5), Tenzin Yeshi Paichang (Dalai Lama, age 2),
Tencho Gyalpo (Dalai Lama's mother), Tsewang Migyur Khangsar (Dalai Lama's
father), Robert Lin (Chairman Mao),  et al. A Disney/Touchstone/Buena Vista
release. 128 minutes. PG-13.
With succinctness and cine-savvy, as we left the screening of "Kundun,"  my
friend Nicolae stated: "It's not a movie, it's a state of mind."
The state of mind is Martin Scorsese's and his writer Melissa Mathison's
sincere, admiring reverence for the Dalai Lama, called Kundun (The
Presence) by his people. It is a well-meant,  not too odd subject for
former choir-boy Scorsese who, in ways clear and realistic or subtle and
allusive, has often worked into his films tenets or values of Catholicism.
It was no stretch for the director to expand into Tibetan mysticism --
although he has declared that his main interest in the film was visual.
Scorsese is a Prince of moviemakers and a Prince of cinephiles. I'm sure
that those who write about cinema feel unease, even distress, whenever they
deal with a Scorsese work that is not tops. It's like admitting in public
the weaknesses of a best friend.
"Kundun" is a primarily visual homage to the current, and14th, Dalai Lama,
a tribute to the people of Tibet, and a political protest against the
country's being gobbled up by China in 1950.
The Dalai Lamas are a succession of reincarnations, and the manifestations
of the Bodhisattva (Buddha) of Compassion. The film begins with the search
for the new spiritual/temporal leader. He is to succeed  the 13th Dalai
Lama who passed away in 1935.
The14th Dalai Lama Tenzin Gyatso, was born in 1935 in a small village in
north eastern Tibet to a peasant family. In the search for the new Dalai
Lama he was "recognized" (i.e. identified as the next Dalai Lama) in 1937,
at age two-and-a-half. In 1940 he was enthroned. But in 1959, after the
failed revolt of his people against the Communist Chinese, he fled to exile
in India with about 80,000 followers. Since1960, he has resided in
Dharamsala, India, known as "Little Lhasa," the seat of the Tibetan
Government-in-exile.
"Kundun" was a long-cherished project of Ms.Mathison. Her previous scripts
were for "The Black Stallion," "E.T.," "The Escape Artist"  and "The Indian
in the Cupboard." Over the years, often assisted by her husband Harrison
Ford, she interviewed the Dalai Lama. The latter had a big hand in changes
and additions to the scenario.
The film follows the life of His Holiness (as he is referred to in all
documents) from childhood to the flight to India. There are several
beautiful moments, but the piousness of the production results in
unintended aloofness from the subject and lack of dramatic tension. Its
contemplative mood comes at the expense of story-telling and of orienting
us. The Tibetan-Chinese conflict is shown without big dramatics --save for
some stylized nightmares of HH --which is good. Yet  excessive restraint
overall givies the impression of something one might label "narrative
soft-focus."
It would be fastidious to compare and analyze this work and Jean-Jacques
Annaud's "Seven Years in Tibet," released shortly before "Kundun." Still,
"Kundun"'s Holies vs.Heathens, with its veneer of mysticism, lack the power
of the earlier picture. It is odd that in their Tibetan films, Frenchman
Annaud made a kind of American action movie, while American Scorsese made a
kind of "intellectual" French film.
By concentrating on discreet hagiography, "Kundun" forgets details that
could be fascinating to Western audiences: the inner workings in the
process of the search for a new Dalai Lama, for example (we get mostly
people riding around);  the tests to which the pre-Lama child is subjected
(these are few and simplified); the true nature of the Dalai Lama as he
grows up and attains adulthood.
Nowhere do we get presages of the now world-famous 14th Dalai Lama ,winner
of a Nobel prize and an immense array of important honors;  worldly, witty,
highly cultivated. I remember, some years ago, his French radio broadcasts
on philosophy and other matters. He was wonderfully eloquent, sharp, witty,
more impressive than even star scholars.
"Kundun" was produced and filmed in Morocco, with some second-unit work in
Idaho and British Columbia. The Moroccan adventure was a tour-de-force
involving nature, sets, buildings, costumes, artifacts, jewelry, many
(human) extras. Casting was not easy. The performers, almost exclusively
Tibetans from all corners of the world, had no theatrical experience and
had to speak English.  Several of them are related to the characters they
play.Their suprisingly competent acting ranges from very good to acceptable
to caricatural (Chairman Mao).The flaw, however, is that as written, no
character was given enough development or dimensionality.
All this is impressively photographed and staged, with gorgeous mandalas
punctuating the sights. Yet, try as it can, most of "Kundun" did not look
to me like Tibet. Annaud's movie made an infinitely better, more convincing
choice by opting for the forbiding, snowy Andes as a stand-in for the
Himalayas.
Avant-gardist Philip Glass's score begins nicely as a mix of Tibetan music
and typical Glass repeated lines, but soon enough their merciless
reiteration becomes annoyingly strident and monotonous.
Scorsese seems much more comfortable with mean streets and places. Reaching
for profundity here he is out of his depth. The sum total of the film is
that it seems to have been conceived as a work for the heart but turned out
a work for the eye. Even then, the lack of muscle in "Kundun" rapidly makes
the viewer unable to remember specific sights, as opposed to those
indelible moments in great --even un-great-- movies.
Think, for instance, of Scorsese's "GoodFellas." Your inner eye and ear
jump to many scenes, especially those of Joe Pesci's brutality and warped
humor in the bar. Think of "Kundun," and very few scenes emerge, except
perhaps those of the lively 2-year old future Dalai Lama repeating
triumphantly "mine!"

Title
Review for Fair Game (1995)
**
Directed by Andrew Sipes.
Written by Charlie Fletcher, from a novel by Paula Gosling.
Photography, Richard Bowen.
Editing, David Finfer, Christian Wagner, Steven Kemper.
Production design, James Spencer.
Music, Mark Mancina.
Cast: William Baldwin, Cindy Crawford, Steven Berkoff, Salma Hayek,
      Christopher McDonald, A (Joel) Silver 
Production distributed by Warners.
89 minutes.
Rated R (mayhem, killings, language). 
Q: Why did you go to see FAIR GAME?
A: Because there was nothing else to review.
Q: Come now, you wanted to ogle supermodel Cindy Crawford in her screen 
   debut, right?
A: No.  Prurient ocular tendencies are disappointed in any case, since 
   there is a single, fleeting glimpse of Crawford's bust "au naturel." She 
   is, however,  in tight tops most of the time.  And I expected no display
   of acting in this kind of movie.  It is unfair to judge anyone who is
   mostly in fast-moving evasive actions.  Garbo couldn't have acted in that
   part, nor Lombard, Streep, Lange, or you-name-her.  Also, when it comes
   to looks, I think that the Mexican beauty Salma Hayek (DESPERADO) is the
   real winner.  To my taste anyway. 
Q: Okay, what's it all about?
A: Dade County, Florida lawyer Kate is the target of mysterious
   people--for reasons one cannot fathom.  There's an explanation near the
   end, but it's still a silly muddle.  What's at stake is over 800 million 
   dollars.  The Kate-hunters are ex-KGB men plus one woman deadlier than 
   Lotte Lenya in FROM RUSSIA WITH LOVE. 
Q: Whom does Baldwin play?
A: Aw, c'mon.  Whom else than the 
   super-duper-heroic-fast-invincible-unscathable police detective Max who 
   meets cute with Kate in the interrogation room (not a bad scene) and 
   joins his fate to hers.  This is a one-theme movie, except for about 
   three diversions.  Rita (Hayek), Max's ex-girlfriend, makes a scene at 
   the police station, later unloads Max's junk on the street below.  Quite 
   funny.  At the station, too, a man in jail suit gets a gun and endangers 
   all --until Max tackles him.
Q: I've a feeling I saw this just days ago.  But where?
A: In COPYCAT, also a Warner Bros. release.  Call it a studio system.  
Q: Tell me more about the action.
A: It has all the things you expect, plus more.  Shootings, corpses, 
   unending bullets from Max's gun, chases, a helicopter, more chases, 
   attacks, counterattacks, derring-do...  Typical of 
   producer-Schlockmeister Joel Silver.
Q: You mean there's this horrible violence that's destroying our 
   country?
A: Are you kidding? No one can take any of this seriously.  The audience 
   kept laughing.  Imagine  Max jumping into a swimming pool, in slow-motion 
   no less, during which he gets off several shots from his handgun!  
   Imagine the good guys being chased by the killers who drive three black, 
   electronics-laden Jeep Wagoneers that feel like three Darth Vaders on 
   wheels. 
Q: Electronics you said?
A: Yes, the most important aspect of the whole movie is that the bad 
   ones are computer geniuses, and I mean geniuses.  Ah, that KGB training! 
   Their machines do things my computer couldn't even start thinking of, 
   and they do it with the speed of light.  No waiting for little screen 
   clocks to finish spinning their hands. 
Q: Do the electronic marvels  impress you?
A: Here and in other movies they remind me of the Greek mathematician 
   Archimedes (he of "Eureka!" fame), referring to the lever and exclaiming 
   "Give me where to stand , and I will move the earth."  Now we can say 
   "Give me such equipment and I can get my next-door neighbor elected 
   President of the United States." 
Q: Are these techno-miracles superior to others in films?
A: The villains and their gizmos beat all hollow the C.I.A machines that 
   progressively enlarge satellite photos in PATRIOT GAMES.  They hear and 
   see everything, with sophisticated heat-sensors too.  They get 
   information on people faster than in THE NET.  To trap Crawford and 
   Baldwin in a hotel that uses electronic room keys, by remote control the 
   KBGers cut off the current there, lock all the rooms.  But our heroes 
   somehow get out.  The sinister ones can also falsify documents and create 
   anything they please in a flash.  That's why, the moment an FBI man shows 
   up to help, you know he's a fake.
Q: Who are those former KGBers?
A: Only Allah in his wisdom knows.  Kazak (the arch-monster) is played by 
   Steven Berkoff.  Most of the time his accent is American.  Then he tries 
   what someone with a dead hearing-aid battery must have told him is a 
   Russian accent.  Toward the end he lamely attempts a British accent.  
Q: Any other goofs?
A: Lots.  Aside from the plot not making sense, there are constantly 
   impossible heroics and acrobatics.  Max puts his car in cruise control 
   and jumps onto a moving train; as the car crashes, Max lands in the 
   wagon without a scratch.  A screenful of bank names includes "Union de 
   Bancs Suisses" instead of "Banques," which makes it the "Swiss Union of 
   Benches."  There's more. 
Q: What's the most spectacular side of the movie?
A: Its explosions of everything.  They invariably become huge fireballs 
   which, added together, would rival the fiery napalm ending of 
   APOCALYPSE NOW.  Our lovely couple is of course always a step ahead of 
   the blasts.
Q: Do Baldwin and Crawford make love?
A: Please! Don't you take it for granted? Don't you know that on TV and 
   in movies cops are always handsome, bright and able, and that both male 
   and female leads are unattached? 
Q: Any more funny bits?
A: The whole movie is so outrageous that it can be funny up to the time  
   viewer fatigue sets in.  There's an amusing scene of Kate (who catches on 
   fast) going  to a computer store and vamping a young nerd into letting 
   her use his machine.  That's where the sexual allusions come in.  When 
   the young man's glasses steam up and he says things like "I was playing 
   with my joystick" or "hardware," Kate's ironical-sexy expression, 
   facial and spoken, is perfect.  Crawford may deserve a comic role.  
Q: You normally rate movies severely, like recent ones that were more 
   ambitious than FAIR GAME.  How come you give  it two stars?
A: Because it is unambitious and unpretentious.  It is honest in its 
   dumb, cartoonish, boom-boom lack of depth.  When the video comes out, if 
   you watch it from your bed, the film is so undemanding that it can be 
   restful. 

Title
Review for Striptease (1996)
STRIPTEASE ** 1/4  Written and directed by Andrew Bergman from the 
novel by Carl Hiaasen. Photography, Stephen Goldblatt. Editing, Anne 
V.Coates. Production design, Mel Bourne. Costumes, Albert Wolsky.  
Cast: Demi Moore (Erin Grant), Burt Reynolds (Congressman David 
Dilbeck), Armand Asante (Detective Al Garcia),  Ving Rhames (Shad), 
Robert Patrick (Darrell Grant), William Hill (Jerry Killian), Paul 
Guilfoyle, Jerry Grayson, Rumer Willis, et al.  A Castle Rock release. 
115 minutes.  Rated R (stripping, language)
Occasionally, ignorance can be bliss. I have not read any books by 
Carl Hiaasen, so that I cannot join those who find "Striptease" vastly 
inferior to its course novel. I did find the early parts of the film 
fairly dull, but things picked up rather nicely and while the plotting 
and continuity were pretty incoherent, the movie was overall 
entertaining.
In  a Florida Court, divorcee Erin Grant (Demi Moore) is desperate.  
The judge gives custody of her little girl Angela (Rummer Willis, 
Demi's real life daughter) to husband Darrell who is scum and jobless. 
But the judge remembers Darrell's football-playing days. To appeal 
this decision, Erin needs money, so this ex-secretary at the FBI 
resorts to stripping at the Fort Lauderdale Eager Beaver topless bar.  
When outrageously dumb, horny and soused  Republican Congressman 
Dilbeck (Burt Reynolds) watches Erin's convolutions on the stage, he 
wants her badly. He also gets into a fracas. Though incognito with wig 
and dark glasses, he is recognized by Jerry Killian, a regular who 
worships Erin. Killian plans to blackmail Dilbeck so as to have the 
Congressman help Erin's case. But Killian is found floating in the 
lake adjoining Detective Garcia's vacation cabin. From here on out the 
story involves the strippers, Darrell who is a dismissed FBI informer 
and wheels his daughter, all bandaged up, in wheelchairs to steal  
them  from hospitals and rest homes. Erin's efforts to get (by hook or 
crook) her daughter result in kidnapping. The venal Congressman who 
must be reelected to continue doing dirty work for a sugar company, 
keeps pursuing Erin, offering her two $2,000 for one hour's private 
striptease in the huge yacht of sugar barons (he ups the ante to 
$5,000 for Session Two). There is also the imposing, dignified 
African-American bar bouncer Shad (Ving Rhames),who is Erin's friend 
and self-appointed protector. (He has his own scheme of a fraudulent 
lawsuit that involves cockroaches in yogurt). 
The gallery of characters includes the sugar people who run the 
Congressman,  watch him warily, provide thuggish bodyguards; Darrell's 
lowlife sister and her cop husband; and of course, the owner of The 
Eager Beaver, the strippers, a cute monkey, a predictable python, its 
unpredictable replacement, and so on. 
Years ago, male audiences would  have flocked to see someone of  Demi 
Moore's stature "au naturel," and in general many people would have 
been shocked by the idea. Not today. Even so, those  patrons who do go 
for Moore voyeurism may be disappointed. Not because her callipygous, 
tirelessly exercised (and siliconed?) figure is not excellent, but 
because you only get few glimpses of it.  Furthermore, Moore's 
gyrations are athletic rather than erotic. As for the other strippers, 
they have a kind of inoffensive nudity, all in the line of duty.  
I don't know whether the book, reputedly quite funny, explored the 
issues of stiptease or viewed them from a pro-feminist point of view. 
The film does not. It merely goes its merry and outrageous way. Demi 
Moore, the central character, is a nice person whose main flaw is to 
have married so incongruously. She is sweet, educated and civilized. 
Why she took as a husband the  trashy, gross, illiterate hick Darrell 
is a mystery that nagged this viewer all through the film. 
What, on the other hand, gives appeal to the movie, is that so many 
people in it are nice. Killian is nice. The strippers are nice. The 
club owner is nice. The big, muscular bouncer is very nice--to all 
those who are nice. Assante, who in some films can be overbearing or 
irritating, is also nice. What's more, no one is nice in a pointed, 
saccharine way.
The funny bits come mostly from the contrasts between the Nice and the 
Bad, the latter, of course being  Darrell and the Senator's entourage 
and patrons. Moore, rightly avoiding to do comedy, becomes, in a sense 
, the straightwoman  for Reynolds, who is making a real and comic 
comeback on the big screen. His exaggerated part goes beyond political 
satire and into outrageous lines, clownish appearance and behavior. 
It's hard to resist his absurdism, as when he goes from his room, 
where he is ridiculously undressed, vaselined and sniffing lint from 
the laundromat machine that  Moore had used,  to outside the room. He 
is correctly suited as he steps out among a banquet crowd of  Young 
Christians whom he addresses on family values. 
Reviews of this film have been negative, partly, I think, because the 
movie doesn't warrant Moore's 12.5 million dollars paycheck. True 
enough, but if you ignore this outrage, the movie can be quite 
entertaining.

Title
Review for Muse, The (1999)
THE MUSE (1999) **3/4. Directed by Albert Brooks.Written by Brooks
and Monica Johnson. Photography, Thomas Ackerman. Editing, Peter 
Teschner. Production design, Dina Lipton. Music, Elton John. Produced 
by Herb Nanas. Cast: Albert Brooks (Steven Phillips), Sharon Stone 
(Sarah), Andie MacDowell (Laura Phillips), Mark Feuerstein (Josh 
Martin), Jeff Bridges (Jack Warrick), Steven Wright (Stan Spielberg), 
Mario Opiniato (The European),  cameos by Cybill Shepherd, Lorenzo 
Lamas, Jennifer Tilly, Stacey Travis, Rob Reiner, Wolfgang Puck, 
JamesCameron and Martin Scorsese (themselves). A USA Films/October 
Films release. 97 minutes. PG-13.
   What fun a movie database is! Under "Brooks" as a last name, I 
found 140 actors, 112 actresses (including the legendary Louise 
Brooks), 10 composers. There are 21 directors, of whom 4 are biggies 
as well as writer-directors: Albert, Mel, James L. and the late 
Richard. The first three are also actors (with James L. only 
occasionally).
I really don't know what the significance of all this is, except that 
the four Brooks are brothers in talent. And that I like all of them A 
lot.
Albert Brooks was born to the radio comedian Harry Einstein, who 
thought it would be funny to name his son Albert.  Albert-now-Brooks 
has been all over the big and the small screen. The Muse is the sixth 
film he has directed -- after Real Life, Modern Romance, Lost in 
America, Defending Your Life, and Mother.
He is a funny man, an artist and "auteur" who, somewhat like Woody 
Allen, variously puts his neuroses and insecurities on the screen, 
along with a sort of pessimistic view of fellow humans, society, 
values and all that, as his titles indicate.
The Muse fits well into Albert's "oeuvre," but adds the problems of 
an aging man. Brooks (now 52) plays Steven, a Hollywood screen writer 
married, with children (wife Laura is played by Andie MacDowell), 
With at least 17 scripts to his credit and a single Oscar nomination, 
this makes him only a mid-tier success, but in showbiz it still means 
a lot of money.
Having received a Humanitarian award which he does not take too 
seriously (he explains to his youngest daughter that it's what they 
give people who have no Oscars), the writer, who puts a lot of faith 
in his latest script, is shocked to hear from his producer that he, 
Steven, has "lost his edge." This translates into becoming a pariah 
in Tinseltown.
The first part of the movie, with Steven's bewilderment and growing 
despair, is a familiar but still colorfully clever expose of the film 
business shallowness, stupidity, cruelty, fake friendships, 
hypocrisy, opportunism, etc.  Unlike most older, traditional satires 
on this theme, The Muse, in keeping with today's trends, brings out 
the true fact of studio executives being younger than ever ( 
practically "kids"),  ignoramuses with no brains, judgment, 
experience, knowledge of film, its past, its history.
This is an aspect that could and should have been expanded, but 
Brooks, instead of going for the jugular, decided to switch from 
realism to fantasy. He had a gimmick.
Helpless and panicky Steven goes to true pal Jeff Bridges for help. 
The latter avows that his recent success (look at his manor house!) 
came from having a Muse, a true descendant of ancient Greece's 
mythological daughters of Zeus.
Since Hollywood people will believe anything, Steven contacts her. 
She is Sarah (Sharon Stone), a chic and weirder than weird creature 
whom prospective clients must approach with outrageously expensive 
gifts from Tiffany's. "Beware of Greeks bearing gifts" gets a nice 
twist here.
How Sarah works her magic is not really explained. Somehow she does 
it by simply being there and occasionally correcting some ideas 
pitched by filmmakers. As a muse, she inspires, but she's also like 
mythology's Pythia who delivered pithy oracles.
Sarah, at first, second and subsequent sights, feels like an 
air-head, a capricious, spoiled beauty. She charges no fees, but 
Steven absolutely must cater to all her many whims, starting with her 
moving from a guest house which now bores her to the Four Seasons 
Hotel. She specifies what and where her suite must be, that she needs 
a limousine, and other extravagances. Of course Steven foots this 
bill ($1,700 a night) and the rest, becomes her errand boy and must 
obey all of her eccentricities.
His finances suffer, as does, initially, his marriage, until his 
suspicious wife  believes the unbelievable, in fact makes friends 
with Sarah who, in another move, invades the couple's home. The next 
invention comes when, on Sarah's advice, Laura becomes her own 
capitalist. In the meantime, Sarah's presence has given Steven a 
bright idea (actually dumb but with box-office potential) for a new 
film.
Brooks the actor can be maniacal, as here, which may or may not be 
your cup of tea.  It is, for me, even though his Steven is not 
especially likable.  Brooks the writer-director is a 
balloon-deflator. The Muse is no exception. Sharon Stone, in a 
wonderful --if one-tone--performance, plays her mysterious self to 
the hilt. Is she a devilishly clever, inventive gold-digger or what? 
An answer comes near the end, but it neither satisfactory nor 
convincing.
The fakeness and crassness of Hollywood are, I repeat, not given 
enough play, except for some comic and/or funny-painful bits. No 
longer persona grata at a studio, Steven forced to park his car where 
the proles do sweats out miles on foot for his appointment with Mr. 
Spielberg -- who turns out to Steven Spielberg's know-nothing cousin. 
It is a hilarious scene.  Or else, at  a reception at Spago ( 
Wolfgang Puck's super-trendy eatery), Steven and an European with 
impenetrable English have a discussion that would enchant Groucho 
Marx.
There are many walk-on roles or cameos by movie celebrities, some of 
them Sarah's clients. Note the constant plugs for Spago. Confusions 
and mixups a la Feydeau work well. Some details are clever, such as 
Steven's not being tanned as so many others are.
The message of the movie has to be that if you're down and out in 
Beverly Hills, the very fact of believing that a muse can help you 
makes you help yourself.

Title
Review for Anna and the King (1999)
ANNA AND THE KING(1999) ** 3/4. Directed by Andy Tennant. Written by 
Steve Meerson and Peter Krikes, based on the diaries of Anna 
Leonowens. Photography, Caleb Deschanel Editing , Roger Bondelli. 
Production design, Luciana Arrighi. Music,  George Fenton.Produced by 
Lawrence Bender & Ed Elbert. Cast: Jodie Foster (Anna), Chow Yun-Fat 
(King Mongkut), Bai Ling (Tuptim), Tom Felton (Louis), Syed Alwi (the 
Kralahome), Randall Duk Kim (General Alak), et al. A Fox 2000 
Pictures release. 2 hours and 28  minutes. PG-13
The British woman Anna Leonowens (1834-1914) did exist. When she was 
24, her husband -- a Major of the Indian Army-- died.  She lived in 
Singapore with her two children when, in 1862 (she was then about 28) 
she accepted the offer of Siam's King Mongkut, to come to the palace 
in Bangkok and educate his many, many children. She was a teacher 
here for five years. Later she wrote two books about her experience. 
In this century, Margaret Landon, an American who had spent over ten 
years in Siam, upon her return  to the USA wrote articles about Mrs. 
Leonowens. Later (1941), in an  amalgam of biographical and 
historical facts, plus fiction, she published  a novel based on 
Anna's life. This became the 1946 film, "Anna and the King of Siam" 
with Rex Harrison in his first American movie and Irene Dunne.
Then came the Rodgers and Hammerstein Broadway musical "The King and 
I," from the Landon novel. Yul Brynner, in his first leading role, 
was the King. Later yet, the stage musical became a movie musical, 
also with Brynner (who won one of the films 5 Oscars) and  Deborah 
Kerr.
The December 1999 release is mostly Instant Visual Gratification. 
Extremely lavish, beautifully produced, staged and photographed, it 
was filmed in Malaysia and not Thailand, which has officially banned 
all Anna/King movies. Still, at two-and-a-half hours it is even 
longer than "The King and I" which was stretched out by song and 
dance.
Thailand is the modern name of Siam, as most people know. Or do they? 
A newspaper article today reports: "A survey out last month found 
that among 500 students ages 12 to 17 from across the country, 
one-third reported learning about the war in school. The study, 
commissioned by the Vietnam Veterans Memorial Fund, shows that nearly 
one-third couldn't correctly identify Vietnam's continent; 3%, or 15 
students, named North America." And that:"...when veterans ask 
students who won the war, as many as half say the United States, even 
though one- to three-quarters have relatives who fought."
The basic story is the confrontation of East and West and the 
friendship (more exactly what the French call an "amitie amoureuse") 
between the king and the governess. I will not waste space by 
summarizing a plot familiar from the earlier versions to many.  Anna 
is put in charge of the King's boys and girls, 58 of them in this 
version. His Majesty has several dozen wives and concubines, and this 
in Bangkok which today is the sex-for-hire capital of the world. 
However, nowhere do we even glimpse a bare breast, or a soupcon of 
lovemaking.
The monarch is played by Chow Yun-Fat, a superstar of Hong-Kong 
action films. Except for his approving an execution --but what's a 
beheading or two compared to contemporary screen mayhem?-- the 
demi-God Mongkut is portrayed by Mr. Chow (or is it Mr. Yun-Fat?) as 
a good-looking, fine speaker of English and above all as a sensitive 
and truly sweet man. As in real life, the King tries to initiate 
opening Siam to the West.
Anna arrives in Siam with her lively son Louis, a boy not impressed 
by titles or ceremonials. She does bring with her a sort of jingoism 
(though the term was not born until 1887), which could be summed as 
"There's one right way, It is the British way."
But then, this is a 1999 movie. It has to be Politically Correct. Not 
only is there no hint of the old Britannia's disrespect of WOGs 
(Worthy Oriental Gentlemen, a supercilious appellation), but Anna 
with miraculous speed learns some Siamese, quickly appreciates the 
strange new ways and quirks, fully (well, almost fully) understands 
the people and their land. While always polite, she is outspoken, a 
true Women's Libber.
Jodie Foster does this with cool, elegance, a pointy face and a 
reserve that make her hidden feelings quite British. British too is 
her accent. Having read somewhere a denigration of that accent 
(critics will say anything)  I checked out some reviews from 
London--where the movie is in 42 theaters. The critics confirmed that 
her Brit-speak was very good.
Now, except for the splendid production values, Mr. Yun-Fat steals 
the show in ways which are subtle compared to those of Rex and Yul. 
Those two got much mileage from their theatricality. They were, in 
their way, little Caesars vis-a-vis all, including Anna. Rex was a 
pre-echo of his autocratic Professor Henry Higgins in "My Fair Lady." 
His main weapon was his voice. Yul's was his physical energy and 
bluster. Both were clearly enjoying their rather comic, "fun" roles. 
But here, the King is a thoughtful fellow, a thinker even, vigorous 
yet on the  gentle side -- and a crypto-romantic. He calls attention 
to himself more by quietness than by flamboyance.
Countering much of Anna's political correctness is the portrayal of 
Britain's expansionist policy. Queen Victoria is not yet Empress of 
India (1876) but her country's imperialism is woven into the story, 
notably through a crass merchant, Mr. Kincaid, and politely haughty 
diplomats, especially a Lord played by Mister Superjowls, Geoffrey 
Palmer, familiar as Lionel in the TV series "As Time Goes By."
The theme of British interventionism runs throughout, but in a 
spasmodic, un-rounded way. It starts with attacks by killers who 
would destabilize the Siamese monarchy. Presumably, they come from 
neighboring Burma, which is a pawn of Perfidious Albion. This leads 
to a murky political subplot, with surprises which are essentially 
unnecessary, distracting, implausible--in fact silly-- and  clichés 
such as blow-them-ups found in action flicks. The movie's ending is 
downright soupy.
The bad guys are initially called "death squads," which is an 
anachronistic expression. There is no lack of anachronisms or 
historical goofs. In the film, at his first ever European-style 
reception for foreigners, the King's brood sings "Daisy, Daisy" years 
before the bicycle built for two became a reality. His Majesty, in 
his first ever dance (he had been a monk for many years), and, mind 
you, a dance with a European woman, proves a fine, agile waltzer. He 
offers elephants to the American President, receives a letter of 
thanks from Abraham Lincoln, who mentions the battle of Antietam 
(September 1862)  as causing 70,000 deaths, whereas these were closer 
to 27, 000.
Yun-Fat's Monkgut is infinitely nicer than the man depicted in the 
real Anna's journals. These are full of inventions as well as self 
aggrandizements.  His flirtation with Anna --whom he addresses as 
"Ma'am" while the other notables say "Sir" to her--is the biggest of 
all fabulations and anachronisms. In reality, Mongkut (1804-1868) was 
58 when Anna entered his service. In reality too, research has 
concluded that Anna never even met the King; that she was a teacher, 
not a governess; that, that, that ---ad infinitum....
There are, in many languages, sayings to the effect that people who 
come from far away can be major liars. Anna's diaries, written when 
Siam was still a "terra incognita" to most of the world, overflow 
with fabrications. It is not surprising that the understandably 
touchy Thailand of today has banned successively all the movie 
versions of Anna's "story," and have been particularly offended at 
the portrayals of King Mongkut. The current movie, coming in the age 
of the Internet, has caused a furore and a flood of messages from all 
sources. Thai ones, including protests by students; non-Thai, 
including exposes by researchers.
The only sensible way to consider the problem is to look at all the 
Anna-King movies as fantasy-fiction.
In version #3,  over and above all else, the spectacle is the thing. 
It was a huge undertaking which also involved  Oscar-worthy blending 
of photography, special effects and computer-generated images. From 
the palace to huge statues, from the grandest barges since 
"Cleopatra" to small, labor-intensive throwaway details, this is a 
paean to imagery, whether invented or not.. I'd love to see the 
movie's out-takes.
If the sights are painstakingly cultivated, the sounds lag behind, as 
they often do in films today. Inauspiciously, the opening has a 
muddle of conflicting noises, music and speech. The truly colossal 
list of end-credits rolls to a dumb, jarring, irrelevant and horrible 
song written by George Fenton and two other culprits. "How Can I Not 
Love You" is sung in an awful Junior High voice.

Title
Review for Snitch (1998)
MONUMENT AVE. ** Directed by Ted Demme. Screenplay by Mike Armstrong.
Photography, Adam Kimmel. Editing, Jeffrey Wolf. Production design, Ruth
Ammon. Music supervision, Amanda Scheer-Demme. Prodcuers, Jim Serpico.
Cast: Denis Leary, Jason Barry, Billy Crudup, John Diehl, Greg Dulli, Noah
Emmerich, Ian Hart, Famke Janssen, Colm Meany, Martin Sheen, Jeanne
Tripplehorn, et al. A Lions Gate release. 90 minutes. Not rated.(Violence,
language, drugs).
In the 19th century arts, reaction to romanticism begat realism (mostly in
France) which begat naturalism, which begat verismo (in Italy), which, in
the 1940s, begat Italy's neorealism in movies, which begat various types of
neo-naturalist films in America and elsewhere.
Monument Ave. is a slice-of-life movie that leaves the viewer uncertain as
to whether it is plain realism (telling it like it is) or mixed with
naturalism (heredity, environment, circumstances beyond their control
determine the life and fate of the characters).The film has its share of
atmosphere but is lacking in explanations, motivations, and development of
characters.
Charlestown, a one square mile Boston enclave of Irish-Americans, is a
depressing location. Monument Avenue separates its blue-collar area from
the part that apparently is being yuppieized by outsiders. Only the
drabness of its "natives" and their homes is shown. Within this, the focus
is almost exclusively on insular low-lifes, specifically a group of five
pals who drink a lot, talk a lot, snort coke and are what's usually
described as "petty thieves," an expression that makes me wonder where
"petty" starts and where it  stops. Their specialty seems to be car thefts,
under the tutelage of Bobby O'Grady (Leary).
The first thing you might notice is that the United Kingdom does not have
an exclusive in local accents. The Charlestownites' speech  can be as
tricky as cockney. As they gab, their sentences often overlap; many
conversations are set bars with distracting ambient noises; some accents
come and go -- not  a major objection given the devilish difficulty
performers have with accents. The sound recording is not adequately sharp.
To follow the dialogue is a problem. Not that the audience misses much, as
the talk is less than fascinating. In one of the clearest arguments, the
pals are discussing movie actors and specifically female breasts, natural
or siliconed.
This is one of the more picturesque bits in the movie. Another is the
opening, a skillfully done sequence that looks like a car chase at night,
but is not. It has marginal relevance to the story, such as it is. A third,
most suspenseful and frightening, has the boys grab, insult, mistreat and
almost shoot an unfortunate black man who had wandered onto their turf.
Several of the characters display crosses hanging from their necks, but
religion does not go a long way with these men and women. Nor does their
very limited vocabulary in which the only clearly uttered words are the
f-verb and the f-adjective. They are used perhaps 1,350 times, or once per
four seconds, which makes the film a champion in the Guinness Book of
Records.
In the bars (more exactly, gloomy pubs), both nothing and everything goes
on. A friend just out of jail, suspected of having talked too much to the
cops, is executed Mafia-style -- the way many Mafiosi are gunned down in
restaurants. The Irish code of silence (called omerta in the Mafia) makes
the witnesses tell  police inspector Hanlon (Sheen) that they saw nothing.
He has already guessed that their alibi will be "I was in the bathroom."
"21 guys in the bathroom at the same time?" marvels Hanlon in one of the
very few bits of (sinister) levity of the movie.
The petty thieves have no capo, no don, no godfather, as in the Mafia, yet
there is a puppet-master,  Jackie O'Hara, called rather too cutely Jackie
O, as sometimes Jacqueline Bouvier Kennedy Onassis was. He is played fairly
interestingly by Colm Meany who justly became famous for his lovable Irish
father in the wonderful The Snapper (U.K., 1993). His subsequent film
roles, both light and heavy, have not been impressive -- although he is
very good in the not-yet-released Claire Dolan.
Jackie is unloquacious by Irish standards. Behind his show of friendliness,
is a quietly menacing figure, that of a benefactor to some locals whom he
helps with donations -- or loans that place them under his thumb. There's a
current of antagonism between him and Bobby, who, presumably the smartest
of a sad lot, a candidate for first place among the boys in the hood, a man
conscious of Jackie's manipulations.(This is spelled out in an explosion of
tempers during in an awkward hockey-on-asphalt game).
Leary has presence, cool and not overdone within the film's context, and
with glimmers that may make you say about him :"What a waste! He could have
done better things." The rest of the characters are merely unexplored
sketches.
The plot is minimal -- but that's no criticism. Real life does not always
have plot material in it, so that the lack of it would not have been a
drawback had more care been lavished on the characters. Were the
film-makers thinking that their creatures were so empty that there was no
way to round them out? Instead, the film concentrates on mood, more
atmospheric than artificially colorful -- and does this well. Even so, the
photography may have tried too hard to be uncompromisingly realistic by
shunning the use of supplementary lighting, so that some interior scenes
remain too dark and eye-straining.
At picture's end, suspense does pick up. I will not give away the details,
but it is unlikely that when gunplay explodes, the dancers right next door
to it do not seem to hear it; and that inspector Hanlon appears within
seconds. Also, the death of a character just as he had decided he wanted
out, is too neat a cliche of tragic irony.
It's a sad little film. As an abused girl --Jackie's mistress who has, on
the side, an affair with Bobby--states: "Nothing's gonna change."
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Three to Tango (1999)
THREE TO TANGO  (1999) 1/2 * . Directed by Damon Santostefano. 
Written by Rodney Vaccaro & Aline Brosh McKenna, based on a story by 
Vaccaro;. Photography, Walt Lloyd Editing,  Stephen Semel. Production 
design, David Nichols. Music, Graeme Revell. Producers, Bobby 
Newmyer, Jeffrey Silver, Bettina Sofia Viviano. Cast: Matthew Perry 
(Oscar Novak), Neve Campbell (Amy Post), Dylan McDermott (Charles 
Newman), Oliver Platt (Peter Steinberg), Cylk Cozart (Kevin 
Cartwright), et al.  A Warner Brothers release. ca. 100 minutes. 
PG-13 (sexual situations, language)
The Warner Bros. logo now comes with the music of Casablanca's "As 
time goes by" aka "you must remember  this..." Wrong tune for Three 
to Tango. a would-be romantic comedy-farce. Time goes by 
interminably. And , later, you couldn't remember this flick if you 
tried.
The story:  Oscar (straight) and Peter (gay) are friends, architects 
and associates. They need badly a contract  with tycoon Charles, for 
a cultural center in Chicago. Most unlikely circumstances -- forced, 
reinforced by competitors, and unfunny-- make Charles believe that 
Oscar and Peter are a gay couple.
Married Charles has a girlfriend (mistress, in older English), glass 
sculptor Amy.who has many males flitting around her. Charles, feeling 
safe with the falsely gay Oscar, directs him to keep an eye on her. 
Desperate for the architectura; contract, Oscar plays along and 
accepts the task. And with  200 % predictability, Oscar falls for Amy 
while she, in a state of sexual confusion, falls for him. The rest is 
not, but should have been, silence.
The title Three to Tango is a dumb, irrelevant variant of  the 
expression "it takes two to tango." The  opening credits are an 
irrelevant  montage of jazz music (not even tango!) and boogie-woogie 
dances. The closing credits of sung jazz are irrelevant.
TTT is one big humus pile of irrelevancies. Its plot tries, feebly, 
to work in tolerance of gays;  it succeeds, stongly, in making them 
somewhat caricatural or indifferent at best. The overall ambiance has 
something vinegary about it.
Today's "celebrity" cult has reached the stupidest levels, as the 
public gorges itself with anyone who's appeared on a screen, or had 
his name in the media, her face photographed, their private lives 
mentioned in print, on the air, on voice-mail or bathroom graffiti. 
It is this public that the movie is targeting, with actors from TV.
One of the many weaknesses of this is that people who are not glued 
to television can hardly differentiate among the thesps. It's another 
world from that of Bogie, Errol Flynn, Wayne, Tracy, of Irene Dunne, 
Bette Davis, Kate Hepburn, or later McQueen, Hoffman, Newman, Peck 
and such. Or even from that of the many familiar faces of character 
actors in the studios' stables. There are still stars and sub-stars 
that get immediate recognition, but these are fewer and fewer as the 
performers more and more look alike, unmemorable, un-striking and 
interchangeably generic. Such is the case of the cast in TTT, with 
only Oliver Platt standing out -- and this because of a hideous beard.
The film advances in lead-footed steps. It is like one of those of 
those old diving suits with heavy boots that were shown in movies in 
the days before the snorkels of Captain Cousteau. The actors are 
unattractive --and so are their roles. Not one performer is above 
dumbness level, or interesting  as playerr or as character. I know 
that some people think that Neve Campbell is super-cute on TV. Could 
be, but in this film I find her and her nasal voice, unexciting.
The dialogue is undernourished. The attempts at humor are cheap, as 
typified by a spectacle of twin vomiting, by scenes of irrelevant, 
vague "comparses" such as Oscar's and Peter's pals who are no more 
than wooden furniture sitting on furniture. Or by a tacky metaphor of 
Oscar in Amy's workshop, blowing glass which she tries to shape.
Logic is one-dimensional. Why Amy finds herself falling for Oscar 
(gay or not) is a mystery, unless you decide that two such 
nonentities make a good match. Why Amy is (or was) in love with the 
insufferable Charles makes no sense. Why does free-spirit Amy who's 
moved in with Oscar (she owed rent), have to stay in the tub under a 
blanket of soap-bubbles; why she asks visiting Oscar to turn around 
when she emerges from the water; why this modesty of the bygone Code 
days; why is she incalculably less sexy than Claudette Colbert as the 
latter bathed in asses' milk in  C.B. De Mille's 1934 Cleopatra 
--these are among the many unanswerable questions.
I did not laugh once. Some audience members did so a number of times. 
My curiosity made me search the Internet for viewers' reactions. 
Several were enthusiastic, albeit ungrammatical -- as is Platt's "for 
Oscar and I" -- mostly because Campbell and Perry "were so hot." 
Well, I'm sure that Eskimos think it is hot when the temperature 
stands at 20 degrees F.
Any good spots? Perhaps, if you have a magnifying glass. No, make 
this the Mount Palomar telescope.

Title
Review for Joe Gould's Secret (2000)
JOE GOULD'S SECRET (2000) *** 1/4  Directed by Stanley Tucci. Written 
by Howard A. Rodman, based on "Professor Sea Gull" and "Joe Gould's 
Secret" by Joseph Mitchell. Photography, Maryse Alberti. Editing, 
Suzy Elmiger. Production design, Andrew Jackness.Music, Evan Lurie. 
Produced by Elizabeth W. Alexander, Stanley Tucci and Charles 
Weinstock. Cast: Sir Ian Holm (Joe Gould), Stanley Tucci (Joe 
Mitchell), Hope Davis (Therese Mitchell), Sarah Hyland (Elizabeth 
Mitchell), Hallee Hirsh (Nora Mitchell), Celia Weston (Sarah), 
Patrick Tovatt (Harold Ross), Susan Sarandon (Alice Neel), Patricia 
Clarkson (Vivian Marquie), et al. A  USA Films/October Films release. 
108 minutes. R. (occasional language)
This is a true story. In the early 1940s, Joe Mitchell, a staff 
writer of the New Yorker Magazine encountered Joe Gould  - an 
eccentric, bohemian,  self-styled writer and genius, a bum, 
panhandling drunkard,  sponging, scrounging street person, strikingly 
ragged, ever-performing and grandstanding figure, the author - he 
claimed - of a monumental work-in-progress, "The Oral History of 
Time," and a man who spoke seagull language.
The latter trait became the title of a 1942 New Yorker profile by 
Mitchell, "Professor Sea Gull." It was a hit, which brought no riches 
to anyone yet made Gould famous in certain circles, notably the 
Greenwich Village sort. Gould's new celebrity opened doors for him, 
though there were no drastic changes in his personality or modus 
vivendi.
He kept referring to Joe Mitchell, a courtly, diffident Southerner 
married to a photographer and the father  of two charming girls, as 
"my biographer," a title that soon became a burden for Mitchell, 
just as the now-dependent-on-him Gould did.
The movie is a now flowing, now starts-and-spurts depiction of the 
relationship of the two Joes. Its epicenter is the portrait of Gould, 
whom Sir Ian Holm plays with in-your-face passion, demonic energy, 
ego-projection, explosiveness, and hamminess (appropriate here) that 
make it the most electric role of his career.
Eccentrics and/or bohemians are not uncommon, but genuine as well as 
lovable eccentrics are rare. Forget  the mythology of much 
literature, film and journalism which often depict them as the salt 
of the earth --when at most "spice of the earth" would have sufficed. 
Professed anti-conformism is not by itself enough to make great 
characters. Joe Gould is not great, but he does stand out, and in a 
sense, that's all that is needed to hold your attention today, in our 
era of homogenized sameness when individualism --notably on-screen 
figures -- is at a low ebb. (Beyond films and people, think of cars. 
 From the 30s to the 50s kids used to play the game of identifying 
each marque and model. The autos were so distinctive. Now they're 
like the proverbial peas in a pod).
Joe Gould reeks with personality while blurring the line between who 
is the real Joe and who the invented one. Hirsute, dishevelled and 
unkempt, must also reek with odors, the result of not bathing, not 
changing clothes, sleeping in flop houses or missions. 
Delicately--and unrealistically-- the film does not mention this 
point, and when Gould attends a party we don't see the other guests 
sniffing the air.
Joe Mitchell, on the contrary, is a breath of fresh air. Quiet and 
polite,  he suggests a bundle of complexities that do not come to the 
fore, a mystery of creativity, writer's blocks and problems that 
remain un-analyzed and seldom suggested. Of the two Joes he is the 
more interesting behind his near-but not-quite-placid facade. And 
indeed, in his lifetime, Mitchell produced one book, "Up in the Old 
Hotel," a collection of his writings. And after Gould died (1957) in 
a mental hospital, Mitchell did another New Yorker story on him in 
1964, "Joe Gould's Secret." That was the last thing he ever wrote, 
even though for the next 30 or so years, Mitchell dutifully came to 
the magazine office where he was heard typing away. The mystery is 
Mitchell, and not Gould.
Stanley Tucci plays Mitchell with extraordinary realism. He is not a 
star, an actor, or a player, but he is, in an unshowy fashion, a 
living, complex presence that is totally credible and implies a great 
deal more than meets the eye. Tucci lives his part with immense yet 
guarded understanding, and buttresses this with the great love Tucci 
has always professed for the New York of many decades ago. It shows 
all the time, with a certain sweetness that, curiously, goes as far 
as eliminating any references or allusions to the on-going World War 
II in the 40s.
In a time when film soundtracks consist of platitudes, grunts, jejune 
dialogue and noises from explosions or crashes, Tucci is kaking us a 
gift of a real talkie. And of a real adult work. I don't mean "adult" 
as in sex and expletives but as in grown-up. We ought to genuflect.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Last Days, The (1998)
THE LAST DAYS (1998) **** Directed and edited by James Moll. Produced 
by June Beallor and Ken Lipper. Photography, Harris Done. Music, Hans 
Zimmer; P; presented by Steven Spielberg and Survivors of the Shoah 
Visual History Foundation. An October Films release. 88 minutes. 
PG-13.
The Witnesses:  Congressman Tom Lantos, Alice Lok Cahana, Renee 
Firestone, Bill Basch, Irene Zisblatt.
Ordinary --or even extraordinary--standards, criteria and judgments 
cannot apply to documentaries, especially those on the Holocaust. The 
most valid and obvious thing one can say about "The Last Days" is 
that it belongs to that handful of life-and-death documents which are 
indispensable viewing by all humans.
Put it this way. Whenever I am asked to name my favorite movie, or my 
Best 10 or 100, I reply that I cannot do it unless it is a list of 
the 1,000 Best.  On the other hand, if all films were to disappear, 
except for a few  that could be saved, I would begin that very small 
list with "Night and Fog, " the 1955,  32-minute documentary on 
extermination camps. It was made by Alain Resnais who is French but 
not Jewish. And the most recent film in that to-be-rescued group 
would be "The Last Days."
It is about the Jews of Hungary, one of the largest groups in Europe. 
In the mid-1930s the population of that country was about 8.5 
million. The ruler (as Regent) was the pro-fascist, antisemitic 
Admiral (in a landlocked country!) Horty. In June 1941 Hungary joined 
the Axis war on the USSR. By then the country's population had 
increased through Hitler's "gifts," annexations of areas in 
neighboring lands, These also has Jewish populations.
Like the Jews of Germany, those of Hungary were and felt assimilated 
in every way. They co-existed well with their Gentile friends and 
neighbors, although, to their bewilderment, when persecution later 
came full force,  antisemitism often showed its hidden face, 
especially in provincial towns and rural areas.
By 1941 there were about 825,000 Jews in Hungary, many of them in 
Budapest. By and large they felt safe. After all, they were "true" 
Magyars! They had no knowledge of Nazi atrocities elsewhere. This 
"ignorance," though hard to believe today, was quite common among 
both Jews and Gentiles all over the world..
By the end of World War II,  620,000 Hungarian Jews had been 
exterminated. The horror began systematically when, on March 19 1944, 
Hitler, by now mistrustful of his ally, invaded  the country. As it 
is often said, although he did not admit -- even to himself-- that 
after the rout at Stalingrad the Germans had already lost the war, he 
was more hell-bent than ever on winning his war against the Jews and 
making the Final Solution really final.
The title "The Last Days" stands both for the last days of the war 
and the last days in the lives of Hungarian Jews. The film  focuses 
on five Shoah survivors, each of whom tells his/her story to the 
camera in something like a historical stream of conscioussness.  No 
interviewers are seen or heard. Nor is there the usual narrator. The 
survivors themselves (who, coming to America after the war created 
families, professions and occupations) are the ones who narrate their 
past in bits, pieces, scenes or sequences. They are also shown 
visiting, decades later, their old Hungarian haunts and the scenes of 
the  Nazi crimes.
Thie tragic tales are edited and blended superlatively well, in 
criss-cross fashion. Intercut are period, family, and other 
photographs,  as well as documentary footage  of the war, the camps, 
the killers and the killed. Much  of this was shot by German 
soldiers. Every sight and sound shakes you to your foundations.  A 
great deal of the footage is new or rare or recently discovered.
It is not possible for me to find the right words that would 
characterize the skill, effectiveness, lucidity, and emotions of the 
process. Adjectives such as "superb," "magnificent," or "astounding" 
imply esthetic or showmanship values, all of which make those terms 
inappropriate. The witnesses are tremendously moved and moving.
All five witnesses are most likable. Opening the film is Tom Lantos, 
the 10-times elected Congressman from California and the only 
Holocaust survivor in Congress. He often adds striking notes of black 
humor which reinforce the horrors. He is the only Budapester of the 
group, the son of patrician parents, both killed in camps. Highly 
educated, handsome, elegant and calmly eloquent, he points out that 
he would not be here today without Raoul Wallenberg, the heroic Swede 
who saved thousands of Hungarian Jews --and later vanished in Soviet 
hands. Mr. Lantos came to the United States in 1947 on a Hillel 
scholarship--with no money but with a big Hungarian salami which was 
confiscated by customs.
Without duplicating the film in writing one cannot describe or 
characterize each participant, especially since their own 
descriptions of facts, events, thoughts and feelings are stunning, 
rich in variety yet similar in pain. Each time I have seen this film 
something special has jumped out and struck me. At the latest 
screening one of those moments was a witness, recounting her low 
point in the camp, says "that's when I stopped talking to God." And 
every time I am dumbfounded by the matter-of-factness of a German, 
Hans Munch, head doctor of a camp where experiments were made on 
humans. This chill-making is balanced by the warm scene where a black 
G.I., now a doctor, is brought an astonishing gift, the legacy to him 
by a man he and other soldiers had liberated from slavery.
The witnesses were all teen-agers then. They grew up fast, and grew 
older with admirable faith, in their beliefs,  and in the positive 
side of humanity.
There is more suspense in the film than in fictional thrillers, 
stunning absurdism and surrealism (among the Nazis), a depth of 
feeling and pain  that no fictional melodrama can approach. One can 
hardly think of 88 screen minutes as packed as these.
Director Moll and co-producer Beallor had previously made for TV the 
prize-winning "Survivors of the Holocaust" and "The Lost Children of 
Berlin." They bring hearts, minds and expertise to "The Last Days" 
which won the Oscar for Best Documentary.
It also has won the highest possible ratings from all film critics, 
more praise than for any film I can remember in the last many years.

Title
Review for In the Bleak Midwinter (1995)
A MIDWINTER'S TALE *** Written and directed by Kenneth 
Branagh. Photography, Roger Lanser. Editing, Neil Farrell. 
Production design, Tim Harvey. Music, Jimmy Yuill.  Cast: 
Michael Maloney (Joe Harper), Richard Brier (Henry Wakefield), 
Julia Sawalha (Nina), Nicholas Farrell (Tom Newman), John 
Sessions (Terry Du Bois), Mark Hadfield (Vernon Spatch), 
Gerard Horan (Carnforth Greville), Celia Imrie (Fadge), Joan 
Collins (Margaretta D'Arcy) and the voice of Noel Coward. A  
Castle Rock/Sony release. 98 minutes. Rated R (language) 
It would be an insult to the acting profession to state  that 
Kenneth Branagh is today Shakespeare's paramount interpreter. 
True, he is excellent, but there are many actors or directors 
who can do a bang-up job with the works of the Bard, 
especially in Britain, a country that constantly amazes us 
with its talented people.
Whether Branagh is Number One or Number Twelve (out of 
hundreds probably) is a moot point. The fact is that thanks to 
his films, he is currently, at least in the English-speaking 
world, the most famous Shakespearean. Knowing as he does what 
he speaks of and what the theatrical profession is, he's a 
natural to have written and directed "A Midwinter's Tale."  
Long unemployed actor Joe Harper (Maloney) is a man so 
desperate for work that he invests what money he has left , 
plus a sum from his nice agent Margaretta (Joan Collins) to 
float a "Hamlet" with a cast of unknowns who will work on a 
share basis.
"Midwinter" opens to the great, distinctive tones of the 
great, late and lamented Noel Coward singing his great, funny, 
affectionately cynical song "Why Must the Show Go On?"  This 
is also the title of Act I.
Soon Joe is auditioning a succession of down-and-out 
performers. They are, collectively and individually, such a 
magnificent, such an incredible set of eccentrics, bizarros, 
hams, weirdos and hilarious types that they make that 
10-minute sequence a four star piece.  
Past this magnificent start, some of the movie becomes 
anti-climactic, though still eminently worth watching. There 
are 24 speaking parts in "Hamlet." Joe can only afford a cast 
of six  to do all the roles. He will be Hamlet, myopic Nina 
will be Ophelia, gay Terry wants to do a queen (Gertrude, of 
course).  Two are non-actors: Fadge (an odd nickname for an 
odd woman) in charge of designing the production and the 
costumes: and Joe's sister, nursery teacher Molly, the 
manager, caterer and ticket seller. The situation is fraught 
with madness.
AC II. "There's No Business Like Show Business." It's 
Chritmastime. Molly works in a village called Hope. (No, not 
the Hope, Arkansas of Bill Clinton or the famous 
loudspeaker-maker Paul Klipsch. This is England). The troupe 
hies over there to occupy the play's venue, a large, drafty 
church, where they will somehow live and work for three weeks. 
The rest is far from silence. To the tune of Coward's song, 
the players prepare, rehearse, argue, improvise, stumble and 
bumble, do group exercises. They want to make "Hamlet" 
relevant to modern times and do odd things, especially as each 
person has his own notions about what should be done and how. 
They bicker and squabble (though never seriously, since 
they're no stars or divas), fraternize and pull apart. They 
are by and large self-centered, insecure and often inept. But 
they try. A nimble camera follows them.
What Branagh does is to combine a comic send-up of his 
profession with a great deal of affection for it and its 
members. He exaggerates the idiosyncrasies of his people, both 
keeping to what they are like, yet adding at times a 
near--grotesque spin, more so than do two other films I saw 
recently, about actors who never stop acting in "real" life 
(but then what is reality to illusion makers?) : Francois 
Truffaut's "Day for Night" and Henry Jaglom's "Last Summer in 
the Hamptons."
The movie proceeds interestingly, colorfully but unevenly, 
with peaks and troughs. Its nine people talk non-stop with 
machine-gun speed. That's an obvious flaw. We cannot keep up 
with them, there are no little pauses for savoring a 
particularly good line, trivialities cannot be distinguished 
from serious points. The speed and aural muddle can irritate 
somewhat. The film ought to have modeled its speech after the 
marvelous clarity of Noel Coward's diction, especially as the 
sounds are not helped by the echoey stone of the church.
ACT III. "Another Opening! Another Show!" Matters pick up. 
Camaraderie  mounts. Euphoria sets in as opening (and closing) 
night draws near. But now comes a crisis caused by sudden good 
luck (which I will not disclose) of a character. The play is 
about to be canceled, but a last-minute shift allows it to go 
on. And it's a dandy performance of "Hamlet," emergencies 
notwithstanding. The small audience loves it, the thespians 
love it and each other, there's even a warm, Hollywood-type 
reunion between a father and a neglected son.  
Branagh said: "It's a romantic and comedic look at the theatre 
and actors, with a plot that owes much to the kind of romance 
and silliness of the old Mickey Rooney and Judy Garland 
movies." Perhaps, but with a huge difference. When Mickey and 
Judy said "Let's have a show," which was inevitably almost 
canceled at the eleventh hour but saved at the twelfth, the 
stakes were youthful fun and games. In Branagh's movie, the 
stakes are much higher for the adults and the oldsters.  It's 
a matter of precarious survival, self-esteem and  justifying 
one's life.

Title
Review for Copycat (1995)
     In COPYCAT, a thriller about a serial killer, there are two
Hunters :  San Francisco police detective M.J.  Monahan, played by Holly
Hunter, and criminal psychologist Sigourney Weaver, whose "nom de film"
is Helen Hunter.  In their own ways, they're both hunting the murderer.
     While Helen Hunter is delivering a lecture on serial killers, she
sees in the audience a man making a menacing gesture at her.  He is
Darryl Lee, in whose trial Helen had testified.  The part is played by
musician Harry Connick, made-up as a chilling low-life with terrible
teeth.  Minutes later, in the washroom, through a satanical but
preposterous scheme, he kills the cop guarding Weaver and hangs the
lady.  How Connick got there, carried, set up and used his equipment and
why Weaver did not die, are mysteries.
     Nevertheless, this opening is taut and really scary.  Indeed, so
frightened is Helen that when we cut to thirteen months later, we learn
that she had a breakdown, became agoraphobic, lives in paranoid panic,
pops pills, drinks cognac and plays Italian operas.  Cloistered in her
ritzy apartment, she sees only one human, her gay companion-employee.
All other contacts with the world are through her several TV monitors
and the computers that get her on the Internet.
     M.J. and sidekick Ruben (Dermot Mulroney) suspect that a series of
murders in San Francisco are related.  Getting suggestions in anonymous
calls soon traced to Helen, the detectives, not without difficulty,
visit the psychologist and convince her to help.  She has figured out
that the murderer is replicating the methods of famous serial killers
such as the Son of  Sam, Jeffrey Dahmer, the Boston Strangler, the
Hillside Strangler and others.
     The hunters hunt but also become the hunted in a convoluted plot.
Though not new, the twist would still be serviceable were it not for
its major improbabilities, lacunae, arbitrary editing, telegraphed
developments.  Worse, it goes into many of the cliches of the genre, so
that "copycat" describes the film's operating procedure as well as the
killer's.
     COPYCAT is an alternating mix of  acceptable logic and of
incoherence, the latter predominating.  M.J. is likable, has impressive
professional skills but is not terribly expressive.  Helen is pitiable,
has impressive professional skills but is not terribly expressive.  The
serial killer has unlikely skills of divination and impressive
techniques, including mastery of computers.  He uses these to terrorize
Helen or taunt the police.  Many of his other means are also
unbelievable, including the supply of hardware and electronics he
always seems to have on hand.
     He is revealed in sketchy, disconnected bits that past a certain
point are more confusing than interesting.  He is also the alter ego of
the Harry Connick character who is shown in prison and used in ways
that further obfuscate matters.
     COPYCAT alternates between the unexplained, which is a bad thing,
and the deja vu, which occasionally provides chills to audiences well
trained in suspense devices.  When Helen. for a change, smiles, you
suspect danger.  When she looks into her clothes closet, you expect
something horrible to be there.  When she takes a shower, you think of
PSYCHO.  Whether or not  anything happens, those are derivative tricks
and manipulations.
     A larger flaw is the non-development of  characters.  Some of the
best examples of real people are in the works of  Alfred Hitchcock.
His thrillers were generally complicated, but with "clean" lines.
Hitchcock knew when to say "enough" to twists and let you concentrate
on the suspense rather than worry about what's going on.  He had
humor.  His protagonists were well-rounded--not only in the more
"serious" thrillers where there is ongoing analysis of characters (cf.
SHADOW OF A DOUBT, ROPE, VERTIGO, etc.) but in lighter ones too.
     In NORTH BY NORTHWEST, hero Roger Thornhill (Cary Grant) comes
through as a complete person, via his behavior, his reactions, his
talks with his mother, his amorous advances, his quips ... down to his
bookmatch cover that spells R.O.T. ("the O stands for nothing").  Or to
take the case of  a  most clever classic thriller, the French
DIABOLIQUE, the beautifully laid-on character traits always
reinforce  the twists and the surprises, and vice versa.
     Compared to such accomplishments COPYCAT is weak.  Its killer
remains a cipher.  M.J. is a dedicated, serious, unflirtatious,
businesslike cop, but that's about all.  Helen gets a few more touches,
like her long sexual frustration, but that's not enough.
     Too much gimmickry and elliptical plotting--130 long minutes of
it--overtakes the movie.  It does have its moments, but too few of
them.  It also has as silly and absurd an ending as the start was
good.  Note how, when the killer gets to his Connick-copycat number,
M.J. does not act immediately as any alert cop would.  All the while
the entire audience is two steps ahead of her.

Title
Review for Basic Instinct (1992)
     Safe Sex takes on a new meaning.  Whether you call its instinct
basic or base, the movie tells you to beware.  Warning: don't get tied
to a bed while engaging into furiously panting sex, unless the other
party has supplied you with a Certificate of Sanity.  Warning: don't
get obsessively involved with carnal knowledge of murder suspects.
Warning:  The Ice Pick Cometh.  Caution: cops, do not sleuth in empty
buildings without your buddy.  Watch out: for alumni of the Berkeley
class of 1983.  Caveat to foreign car makers: your costly racing
machines may be nimble but Detroit can give them a run for their
money.
     The plot of BASIC INSTINCT has more bare flesh than bare
bones.  In a nutshell ("nut" as in "crazy", "shell" as in "shell
game"), it opens with a strokes-to-strikes scene: in his palatial
home, a retired rock star reaches a copulatory climax while his shapely
blond (but not otherwise identified) partner dispatches him with
multiple thrusts of an ice pick.
     Troubled San Francisco cop Michael Douglas suspects Sharon Stone,
an heiress (110 million dollars) who owns spectacular houses, is
bisexual and writes books about killings that later materialize in real
life.  Stone defies, mocks and taunts Douglas and the authorities.
Douglas lusts after her but will not stop investigating.  Both in
computer searches or in bed he leaves no Stone unturned.  He also lusts
after his ex-girl, police shrink Jeanne Tripplehorn.  Douglas has
frantic sex with both women, but separately.
     As a detection thriller the movie is a game of planting red
herrings and false leads and, possibly of implants.  Stone's blend of
mind-games and sex-games is not beguiling but it is intriguingly kinky,
with her provocations, her dialectics, her much-publicized and barely
visible flash of pantylessness, her fencing with Douglas, her flaunting
of live-in lover Leilani Sarelle, her disregard of traditional ways
and niceties.  Her psychological and physiological motivations are not
especially crystalline.  Tentatively, they seem to me less a result of
overcharged sexuality than of boredom and perversity caused by having
too much money.
"Basic Instinct" has several striking (in every way) scenes, top-notch
sets and photography, a menacing score, canny face and body makeup,
sexily tight clothes, nastily tight performances and direction.  Its
basic weakness however is the script structure.  It overdoes its
misanthropy (unexplained) and its trickiness (gratuitous) when it 
carries the characters' cat-and-mouse games into the audience.
     The public may be primarily paying for titillation, but that's no
a reason for neglecting the thriller elements, those that draw the line
between BASIC INSTINCT as soft porn and BASIC INSTINCT as an erotic
police cliff-hanger.  Yet the sleuthing and suspense parts are made
incoherent as the game-playing tactics reach levels of convolution
where you stop following, or caring, or both.  What you're left with is
subjecting yourself to manipulation for the doubtful bonus of shock
effects.
     As the film makes less and less sense it hides its conceptual
murkiness behind glitter.  Anything goes.  Plot and characters keep
shifting, not simply fooling expectations but actually cheating us,
notably in the concluding, arbitrary twist--a final shot that's also a
cheap shot.
     For the thousandth time since Alfred Hitchcock left us, his
lessons of holy simplicity, relative logic and clean narrative lines
that build up suspense, have been ignored.
     Thanks to its production values, BASIC INSTINCT does keep going at
an un-boring clip, but in basically unexciting ways.  Its unleashed sex
makes voyeurs of the viewers, yet its sizzle is soulless and its
studied lack of feeling, a liability.
     The police action entails much suspension of disbelief, a term
that, ironically, Stone herself explains to George Dzundza, Douglas's
partner and only friend.  The script relies heavily on very familiar
cliche's and set-pieces: the buddy who almost always gets his; car
chases (inventive but wildly improbable); political interference from
above (remember Dirty Harry's problems?); unbelievable internal police
conflicts and enmities.  The bigger-than-life syndrome extends from
performances, behavior, events and situations, down to the needless
loudness of the Douglas-Dzundza exchanges.  It's like volume replacing
melody in music.
     No real concern is created for anti-hero Douglas or anyone else.
The dialogue (in case any lookers are listening) is simplistic yet
ponderous.  A pity, because the casting is good.  Douglas's cold,
calculating persona makes him unconvincing in heroic or romantic roles,
but right for films like WALL STREET or BASIC INSTINCT.  Stone and
Tripplehorn are handsome, not too young, and--in a good match with
Douglas--like people who have been repeatedly around the block,
high-mileage but beautifully maintained.  Call them pre-owned.  Yet
while the women's faces are good to look at, the barrage of  Douglas
close-ups should please mostly his mother and father.
     In a filmic conceit, 67-year old Dorothy Malone, the vampish star
of the 1950s, makes brief and bizarre appearances.  Her lovely smile
might remind film-buffs of the young Dorothy in "Tarnished Angels, "
which is just what she represents here.
     Having started with warnings, I end with another warning.  The R
rating is a mild compromise reached after repeated modifications and
submissions, to avoid the commercially undesirable NC-17.  But it is
still a hard R, quite close to a NC-17.
     Addendum: The notorious missing seconds were reinstated at the
Cannes Film Festival.  As many people had already seen the film,
someone suggested that it might save time if the deleted naughty bits
were to have special showings by themselves.  This did not come to
pass.  The European release, however, was uncut.

Title
Review for Krippendorf's Tribe (1998)
KRIPPENDORF'S TRIBE (1998)  ** 1/2  Directed by Todd Holland. Screenplay,
Charlie Peters, based on the book by Frank Parkin.Photography,  Dean
Cundey. Editing, Jon Poll.  Production design, Scott Chambliss. Art
direction, Bill Rea.Costumes, Isis Mussend en. Music, Bruce Broughton.
Produced by Larry Brezner. Cast: Richard Dreyfuss (James Krippendorf),
Jenna Elfman (Veronica Micelli), Natasha Lyonne (Shelly),  Gregory Smith
(Mickey), Carl Michael Linder (Edmund),  Lily Tomlin (Prof. Allen), Stephen
Root (Gerald Adams),Doris Belack (President Porter), Julio Oscar Mechoso
(Simon Alonso),  Elaine Stritch (Grandma), Tom Poston (Grandpa), David
Ogden Stiers (Henry Spivey), et al. A Buena Vista release of a Touchstone
Picture. 93 min. PG-13.
"You who enter here, abandon all logic." Depending on a film's genre, lack
of logic can range from disastrous (in serious dramas), to annoying (in
action movies), to anodyne (in comedies), to fun (in farces). And
"Krippendorf's Tribe" is a farce as broad as the Titanic was long -- the
real ship, as the movie's is only 4/5ths to scale.
"KT" is the story of an academic and most imaginary fraud. Anthropologist
Professor Krippendorf (Hoffman) had received a $100,000 Proxmire Foundation
grant  to find a "lost" tribe in New Guinea. He, his wife -- also an
anthropologist -- and their three kids went on a field expedition, but it
came a-cropper.
Things get cinematically murky from here on out. Upon their return, Mrs. K
died (where, when, of what?). Apparently Prof.James Krippendorf claimed
that the expedition was a success but kept stalling with making the results
public. In reality, he fell apart professionally and personally, made a
mess of being a single father, and in the past two years has gone through
the rest of the grant money to raise his kids and buy stuff for the home.
He is broke and way behind with his mortgage payments.
The above is a relatively coherent decryption of the movie's messy --but
often funny -- exposition. It opens with a view of the K household in
disarray, furniture that looks partly like the outcome of Goodwill
(Industries) hunting, the Professor in a state of confusion and the kids
not respecting Papa.
Old Hollywood college movies were populated by overage students who danced,
sang, lit bonfires and apparently majored in ukulele. Nowadays, pictures on
Academe, in keeping with the times may stress research. So,when Veronica
Micelli (Jenna Elfman) persistently bangs on the Professor's door, she sets
the plot in motion. Veronica, whose height dwarfs Krippendorf's, was an
adoring student of his and is now a new Assistant Professor of Anthropology
at the University. She wants to collaborate with her idol --  a good way to
get fame, promotion and tenure. She also reminds him that he is giving a
lecture on his findings. In a matter of hours.
Krippendorf's panic,chaotic school office and his bluffing throughout his
lecture are as amusing as they are unlikely. Under pressure, the
invent-as-you-go scholar baptizes the imaginary tribe Shelmikedmu --
concocted from the names of his children -- and describes it by using his
own experiences as a single dad. His biggest "discovery" is that the
Shelmikedmu fathers alone raise their progeny and are respected.
So far, so bad for Prof. K. The worst news is that visual proof of his
success is expected of him. It's a nightmare. The professor must feel like
Kafka's K. With necessity being the mother of invention, he gathers his
children, builds a "New Guinea"" landscape in his yard (!), adds huts and
stuff (!) and disguises the kids as "natives" (!)  Then he films all this
like a pro, on 16 mm. no less (!).In record time (something like a few
hours) the film is shot, apparently developed at home, and edited with real
anthropological footage spliced in (!)
What follows is chaotic madness, fluff as credible as Mel Brooks
extravaganzas, the Three Stooges, The Marx Brothers or Monty Python. The
tangled web we weave whenever we deceive grows non-stop and exponentially.
At every step additional inventions are required, all  unbelievable, of
course. The tribe -- eventually including co-conspirator Veronica -- goes
through lightning-quick masquerades, transformations, and complications
which include a rival, suspicious and witchy colleague (Lily Tomlin, played
as a caricature) suddenly taking off for New Guinea so as to discredit
Krippendorf.
On the whole, the picture is entertaining, albeit uneven.  It creates in
the audience the gamut of reactions: big laughter, chuckles, smiles,
smirks. Shudders too, since this "Widowed...with Children" farce can be
just as tasteless as "Married... with children" and at times just as
unfunny.
Alfred Hitchcock's famous remark "It's only a movie" applies here. Set
aside your morals, as a precondition to having fun. Take "Krippendorf's
Tribe" solemnly and its heavy load of bathroom and sexual "humor" is
reprehensible, as is the spectacle of a dysfunctional family bonding
through major cheating.
What certainly is politically incorrect is not the showing of white people
in blackface, but the transparent and insensitive use of African-Americans
(and a South African) to impersonate "real" New Guineans. Couldn't the film
makers have gone the extra mile and somehow found natives of New Guinea?
Superfluously tacky too is a big banquet to honor donor Mrs. Proxmire on
her 100th birthday.The sight of her and of several guests connected to
intravenous machines is pure ageism -- not helped by an amazingly unfunny
question to the centenarian: "Was it you who died or your sister?"
"KT" is to a great extent a burlesque send-off of Academe. The script,
starting with the scandalous cheating on, or illegal use of grants, takes
aspects of academic life and pushes them to most outrageously absurd
levels. Cannily, it throws in the in-joke  (wasted on most viewers) of the
name Proxmire used for the grant and for a major campus building.
Wisconsin's great Senator William Proxmire served for 32 years, retiring in
1989. A devoted public servant, he created in 1975 his famous Golden Fleece
Award which,  each month,  singled out a "wasteful, ridiculous or ironic
use of the taxpayers' money." In 1985 he declared:"My own favorite was the
study to find out whether sunfish that drink tequila are more aggressive
than sunfish who drink gin." (See below for a sampling of other awards) *
Performances range from adequate to very good, the latter by the manic
Dreyfuss and his brood. In a work of pure fantasy the youngsters are smart,
imaginative, and deliver their lines more convincingly than in most
child-roles.Jenna Elfman is overdone. Save for the smallish role of Lily
Tomlin, the supporting cast have tiny parts
Photography (in Hawaii and California) is skillful. In another in-joke
which  only older or savvy viewers will appreciate, much of the musical
score nicely consists of exotic tunes, including the once-famous "Taboo" by
Margarita Lecuona ("Babalu"), a distant cousin of the admirable Ernesto
Lecuona, the Cuban composer of, among many songs, "Malaguena," "Siboney,"
and"Jungle Drums."
======================================
* Some other Golden Fleece Awards.
To the Department of the Army for spending $6,000 in 1981 to prepare a
17-page document that told the federal government how to buy a bottle of
Worcestershire sauce.
To the  Environmental Protection Agency for spending an extra $1 million to
$1.2 million in 1980 to preserve a Trenton, NJ sewer as an historical
monument.
To the Commerce Department for spending $20,000 in 1981 to construct an
800-foot limestone replica of the Great Wall of China in Bedford, Indiana.
To the NEH  for a $25,000 grant in 1977 to study why people cheat, lie and
act rudely on local Virginia tennis courts.
To the Office of Education for spending $219,592 in 1978 to develop a
curriculum to teach college students how to watch television.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Go (1999)
GO (1999) ***  Directed by Doug Liman. Written by John August. Photography,
Doug Liman.Editing, Stephen Mirrione.Production design, Tom Wilkins. Music
by BT. Producers, Paul Rosenberg, Mickey Liddell, Mat Freeman. Cast:
Desmond Askew (Simon Baines), Tay Diggs (Marcus), William Fichtner (Burke),
J.E. Freeman (Victor Sr.), Katie Holmes (Claire Montgomery), Jane Krakowski
(Irene), Breckin Meyer (Tiny), Jay Mohr (Zack), Timothy Olyphant (Todd
Gaines), Sarah Polley (Ronna Martin) and Scott Wolf (Adam). A Columbia
release. 100 minutes.R.(drugs, violence, language, sex)
 One of the times I mentioned that Jean-Luc Godard is a seminal filmmaker,
someone exclaimed" I didn't know he was an American Indian!" Loved it. Also
love Godard's paradoxes. As when, in his earlier days, his screen
audacities made a puzzled viewer ask: "But Monsieur  Godard, don't you
think that a film must have a beginning, a middle, and an end?"
"Absolutely," quoth JLG "but not necessarily in that order."
Which is what "Go" (as in Godard) does, and goes one step beyond. It is in
three sections where many key  characters are the same, but with the
"weight" of their roles variously distributed, as the three sections take
place at the same time.There's a soupcon  here of "Rashomon" seen through a
glass darkly.
The settings are primarily Los Angeles and secondarily Las Vegas-- on
Christmas Eve. A fine match, since Vegas, a city-show (cf.city-state) has
an ethos and a aesthetic which are no doubt appreciated by much of the
Angelenian Kultur and,as the Russians say, its "nyekulturnyi."
I admit that I find Christmas in California funny. Perhaps because I have
spent much time where Christmas is "real" and not X-mas: in the cold
Midwest, as well as abroad where even in mild climates late December is
persuasive. I know it makes no sense, as the source event did not happen in
northern latitudes --but still, X-mas in LA. is comical.
In "Go", the main connecting thread is, arguably, Sarah Polley, a performer
who can be three-dimensional in two-dimensional roles. She plays Ronna, a
check-out grocery clerk obviously,and understandably bored with her job.
Her co-workers and friends are Katie Holmes (as Claire) whose looks remind
me of Christina Ricci's; and the Brit in America Desmond Askew (as the
goofy Simon).
Claire is essentially a tag-along comparse, Simon is a relative newcomer to
the Star-Spangled nation. His fits the bill and the scene perfectly. He's
learned all he knows about the USA from movies, is into drug-dealing and
fast-living. Note that Askew, the name of the actor, is most apt to the
character of Simon.
Simon, intent on visiting Vegas, asks Ronna to take his place in a deal of
buying and reselling about two dozen Ecstasy tabs. This may not be her
forte, but she accepts because she's  broke and about to be evicted from
her lodgings. I won't reveal the first section of the movie, except to say
that it leads to wild and woolly adventures for Ronna.
While this is going on, in what we have to call Part II, Simon and friends
drive to Vegas. The team is a colorful one, especially Simon and the chic
and savvy  Marcus (played by Taye Diggs). Marcus,who is black, has some of
the best reactions in the film, especially when it comes to others'
unconscious (?) racism.
Vegas yields some quite amusing scenes: Simon's having simultaneous sex
with two girls met at a Jewish wedding where he wandered in; starting up a
hotel fire; getting blackmailed by a little boy next door;  stealing of a
resplendent Ferrari; an encounter with strippers that blows into to a
fracas, a shooting and the pals being chased by a father-and-son duo in an
SUV.
Improbabilities abound, especially during the car duel and the
incompatibility in width between the SUV some alleys. But it is all very
kinetic, inventive, and, for many viewers, great fun.
Part III, back in LA, concentrates on two young TV actors of soapers, and
police detective Burke, who's wired them .We had met all three  in Part I
as potential drug customers. Burke forcefully invites the boys for dinner
at his home, where they meet his sexy, horny wife. The near-result is laden
with sex, homo and hetero, but by implication rather than graphics. The
end-result, which I have to reveal,  is that the host couple has an
additional income from being representatives for an Amway clone company.
What they really want from the boys is to recruit new salesmen. Hilarious.
"Go" was to be a short film of just Part I, but when director Liman scored
with his first feature (Swingers, 1996) it was expanded. The genealogy of
Liman's works is something like this:
Decades ago, the Warner Bros. Studios begat films noirs. In them humor
often resided, but rather incidentally. (See The Maltese Falcon, or
Casablanca which admittedly is not noir)
These, developing in tortuous ways, eventually begat neo-noir, much of it
with stepped up humor, which in turn produced the Coen Bros and such.
Technology begat videos,video-stores --and some movie-drunk employees. This
begat Quentin Tarantino, who spawned followers and imitators, dull,
gauche, inspired, with others yet , as in "Go," de-noiring a great deal and
placing the funny stuff at center stage.
"Go", even when not dissected, is "deja vu all over again." But it's not
pure copy-cat-ism. It very own twists, tricks and treats, inventions, big
and small touches,may not give it a Ph.D. in originality but are worth an
M.A. as they also bring to the movie a feel of lively improvisation.The
energy level is high:  go! go ! go!  all the way.
This brings us to the mysterious lack of an exclamation mark after "Go".
It's not a full injunction to see the film. It does not, like monosyllabic
brand names (Gap, Bic, Mac), try to sell a product nor does it  fully
describe the movie's kinetic nature.Perhaps the makers themselves don't
know. Liman -- who's also his own very good cinematographer--is a jokester,
which may be explanation enough. And the lack of ! calls extra attention to
the film. "Go" also joins level 2 of shortest titles (like "If") though not
level 1(like"M").
The film's subjects (in the plural) and nature, its druggies, sex,
violence, raves and young people, plus a  Gold Medal-winning record of f...
words, will not attract mature audiences. But then Liman and writer August
knew this. They have aimed squarely at the massive youth public which could
well make "Go" a cult movie.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Holy Man (1998)
HOLY MAN * 1/4  Directed by Stephen Herek. Written by Tom Schulman.
Photography, Adrian Biddle. Editing,Trudy Ship. Production design, Andrew
McAlpine. Music by Alan Silvestri. Cast:  Eddie Murphy ("G"), Jeff Goldblum
(Ricky), Kelly Preston (Kate), Robert Loggia (McBainbridge), Jon Cryer
(Barry), Eric McCormack (Scott Hawkes) et al. A Touchstone release. 114
minutes. PG (references to body parts and functions)
Nothing holy about this flick, but plenty that's hokey. Ricky is a hustling
producer in the Good Buy Shopping Network (GBSN), located in Miami's South
Beach and lately acquired by crass capitalist McBainbridge. The boss, made
furious by 27 months of "flatness" gives Ricky an ultimatum: "You have two
weeks to bring the sales up 8% or you're fired."
Ricky, at his wits (such as they are) end, thinks only a miracle can save
him. He also falls for Kate, newly hired as a gee-whiz marketer. While
changing a tire on the highway, these two meet Eddie Murphy, a cheerful,
shaved-head eccentric garbed in a vaguely Indian-Asian two-piece outfit. He
will (how did you guess?!) turn out to be the prayed-for miracle.
The encounter is most artificial. So is everything that follows. Somehow
(don't ask) all three people make friends. Somehow (PLEASE don't ask
again), Murphy, mysterious down to his name (just "G"), becomes the
instrument of making the GBSN a hit, and promoting the love affair between
Ricky and Kate, an affair that follows the tired cliche of antagonism
becoming love.
A protracted, dull  introduction and inane fast talk impede rather than
help the story. It picks up a bit when, at Rick's reception for potential
sponsors, G (by now Rick's house-guest) shows up and spices up things
somewhat. Vaguely guru-ish, certainly upbeat and humorous, he hypnotizes
Nino Cerruti (the Italian tycoon, played by himself), cures him of his fear
of flying, and performs magic (prestidigitation) with a Rolex. All this
simply postpones the action for about three-quarters of an hour.
When G is somehow (thanks for not asking) made to go on the network to
increase sales, he debunks the products and the customers, but spouts
"wisdom" and true values that somehow (don't ask) send the sales
skyrocketing. It's all silliness and inanity.
How sad. At his best Murphy can be wildly funny with his distinctive
ebullience, his infectious, toothy grin, his patter. Not here. The film
does have the novelty of a "new," quiet, presumably thoughtful Murphy, but
does little to exploit it. The movie has no bite, no zip, no energy.
Its elements are disconnected, illogical and incredible. Murphy, even in
this bummer, is nice to watch, but  he overspouts platitudes and cliche
"morality." The Goldblum-Preston couple --who, take up half of the film and
weaken Murphy's moments-- have zero personality. (Goldblum's deep tan seems
to indicate more time spent at the beach than at work -- but it still
cannot rival George Hamilton's and the champion's, Douglas Fairbanks' Sr.).
Loggia is a caricature. The balance of the supporting cast (including an
ill-conceived, unreal villain) were written in with the
Press-this-Key-for-Reaction 2 method.
Satirizing TV shopping, its hucksters and its public, ought to be a golden
subject. But here, it becomes a toothless dud in script and execution.
This, for a host of reasons, from phony attempts at being farcical,
peddling products that are outlandish and ridiculous, overall incoherence,
ineffectual morality, sluggishness, lack of humor and effective dialogue,
the absence of a real focus and point of view... This makes the movie a
yawner with just a handful of amusing moments.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Gone in Sixty Seconds (2000)
GONE IN 60 SECONDS (2000)  *  Directed by Dominic Sena. Written by 
Scott Rosenberg. Photography, Paul Cameron. Editing,  Tom Muldoon and 
Chris Lebenzon.. Production design, Jeff Mann. Music,  Trevor Rabin. 
Cast:   Nicolas Cage (Memphis Raines), Giovanni Ribisi (Kip Raines), 
Angelina Jolie (Sara Wayland), TJ Cross (Mirror Man), William Lee 
Scott (Toby), Scott Caan (Tumbler), James Duval (Freb), Will Patton 
(Atley Jackson), Delroy Lindo (Detective Roland Castlebeck), Robert 
Duvall (Otto Halliwell), Christopher Eccleston (Raymond Calitri), Chi 
McBride (Donny Astricky), Timothy Olyphant (Detective Drycoff), Grace 
Zabriskie (Helen Raines), Master P (Johnny B.), et al. Produced by 
Jerry Bruckheimer and Mike Stenson. Released by Touchstone Pictures. 
119 minutes. PG-13.
Master car thief  Memphis (Nicolas Cage) quit the racket some years 
ago because he did not want his impressionable junior brother  Kip to 
follow in his footsteps (or tire tracks). He is now an honest gas 
station owner (I think) who teaches kids how to race go-karts.  But 
he comes out of retirement when Kip (who, alas, did join the 
underworld), is about to be punished by getting compacted within a 
car at a junk yard. The yard (and more) belongs to master thug 
Calitri (a British import). He is Kip's boss and a caricature of 
demented villainy,  Calitri about to punish Kip with extreme 
prejudice for non-performance of heist duties. He can only be saved 
if senior brother Memphis can steal, pronto, 50 classic cars to be 
shipped abroad.
It's a race against time, with clocks, watches and the countdown 
regularly printed on the screen. Memphis, in record time, assembles a 
regiment of "colorful" gang members, most of them from his old 
organization, many of them having gone straight (it's like an 
epidemic), some of them new faces. And the big heist is on: the 
gathering of the tribes, the planning, the introduction of an able 
cop who will play Nemesis, the complication presented by other 
thieves, the actual execution of the project.
It's all miserably, poorly, incoherently strung together. The 
characters as well as the cars are interchangeable. Nothing is 
elaborated, or at least explained. Heist movies have an educational, 
how-to-do-it function, but here not a single instructional detail is 
delved upon or even vaguely illustrated. The car chases are generic, 
lacking specificity,  and interchangeable. If the projectionist were 
to mix his or her reels it would make no difference, cause no 
problems.
This incoherence contributes a great deal to the film's total lack of 
interest, suspense or even sub-suspense.
Is all this dull? Yes, but the noise can keep you awake and 
especially --in some cases-- your curiosity to see if a car that your 
daddy or your pal Jake's granddaddy once owned (for we're talking 
here about a pre- and low--teens audience, the only one possible) is 
among the "classic" vehicles on the screen.
The film is a sort of remake of the 1974 "Gone in 60 Seconds," the 
first (of two or three movies) made by H.B. Halicki. That was a movie 
of chases and crashes shown in drive-ins and said to have become a 
sort of cult-film in some circles. Halicki produced, wrote, directed, 
starred, did stunts and everything else in his movie. (Does this make 
him an "auteur"?) He died  (1989) in a stunt accident while filming 
the sequel "Gone in 60 Seconds 2." His widow's name appears in the 
end-credits of the remake, as one of the executive producers.
The cast of the current flick is as dull as any, including Angelina 
Jolie who plays (?) the "de rigueur" one gal in the otherwise 
all-male/macho gang. He role is (to quote someone else's film) "Less 
than Zero." Her main function is to pout thick lips and to slow down 
the action.
The director comes from TV commercials (if you haven't guessed this 
already) with one feature to his credit, the actioneer "Kalifornia," 
(1993) which, I am told, has a certain following.
"Gone" is a  Jerry Bruckheimer  production. JB has a record of 
spectacular money-makers, most of them summertime action flicks. 
Among his latest: "Crimson Tide" (1995), "The Rock" (1996), "Con Air" 
(1997), Enemy of the State (1998), "Armageddon" (1999).
Other Bruckheimers coming in the summer of 2000 "Coyote Ugly" and 
"Remember the Titans."   Caveat emptor.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for For Love of the Game (1999)
FOR LOVE OF THE GAME  ***  Directed by Sam Raimi. Written by Dana Stevens from
the novel by Michael Shaara.  Produced by Armyan Bernstein, Amy 
Robinson.  Photography, John Bailey. Editing, Eric L. Beason, Arthur 
Coburn. Production design,  Neil Spisak. Music, Basil Poledouris. 
Cast: Kevin Costner (Billy Chapel), Kelly Preston (Jane Aubrey), John 
C. Reilly (Gus Sinski), Jena Malone (Heather), Brian Cox (Gary 
Wheeler), J.K. Simmons (Frank Perry), Vin Scully & Steve Lyons (as 
themselves), Carmine D. Giovinazzo (Ken Strout), Bill Rogers (Davis 
Birch), Hugh Ross (Mike Udall). A Universal release. 137 minutes. 
PG-13
Does America love baseball? Has Kevin Costner had box-office hits 
with the baseball films Bull Durham and Field of Dreams? Has been 
unlucky with  some recent movies --except for Tin Cup where he plays 
a golfer? Is The Pope Catholic?
So it made good sense to do a third baseball picture. He is Billy 
Chapel, the Detroit Tigers ace pitcher and prime Hall of Fame 
candidate. Now he's in New York for a game at Yankee Stadium. His 
shoulder hurts. His soul hurts as he is told that his team is being 
sold. He's 40, getting older by sports standards. He has 19 years of 
pro playing behind him. And his heart is breaking because his girl, 
magazine writer Jane (Kelly Preston)  announces that it's all over 
between them; that he really needs no one; that his real love is 
baseball; that  in a few hours she's off to England where a dream-job 
is expecting her.
That's the set-up. From here on out it's flashbacks and flashforwards 
that would be artsy and tiresome (but can be a tad tiring)  except 
that Sam Raimi --who directed The Evil Dead but caught us by surprise 
in 1998 with the so-different A Simple Plan-- manages his script and 
his team (of actors) with a sure-hand and an obvious passion for The 
Game.
Five years ago Billy and Jane first met. They met cute, but it's 
funny and fresh. Their relationship is charted back and forth, 
surprises abound, there's even a surprise young girl, Heather (Jena 
Malone) who livens, warms up and helps crystallize the lovers' 
on-off relationship. More, I cannot say, since this is sports movie 
but also a character-driven picture. It has its own levels of 
suspense, in personal and in sports matters.
There are some clever inventions (events, scenes, sequences), whether 
in rainy New York, sunny Florida or the snowy West. The plot is 
highly manipulative of course, as it plays with the characters' 
actions and reactions, and with the audience's response to what is 
on the screen. The tricks of the trade, both filmic and baseballic, 
are out in force. But they are well handled, keep your attention and 
do not ever get boring. Even the music score by Greek-American 
Poledouris, though generic/romantic, skirts the bombastic repetitions 
by Greek-Greek composer Vangelis in that popular sports-movie 
Chariots of Fire.
All this would still be high-class routine stuff, were it not for the 
superb scenes in the ballpark, their mise-en-scene, their 
photography, the realistically filmed crowds : excellent, imaginative 
photography, sound-mixes, editing that coordinates people and actions 
in the diamond and off it. We get the players, the raucous fans, and 
we get the iffy  but touching thoughts of Billy during his mind games 
with the opponents. He's fighting (under physical and psychological 
handicaps) for his team, his good name, and his exit from the Tigers 
(he'll be traded, no matter what happens).
The movie treats its players with a glove (not kid, but still), as we 
only see and hear rather comradely things with no trace of 
locker-roomitis. The closest to a nasty presence is a young Yankees 
batter who looks satanic. Billy foils him again and again. But the 
game is a gem of excitement and suspense.
The players (in both senses) are very good, although there is no true 
depth in the affair, the setbacks and the Fun With Bill and Jane. 
Costner has the right physique for the role, but it  does get a bit 
redundant as we watch him suffer. Kelly Preston is convincing as a 
real person, as opposed to one playing a part. She does not want to 
be a groupie, but the presumed intensity of the affair is made 
somewhat ho-hum by three things: the lightning fast, out-of-character 
(hers) speed of her initial sex with Billy; our knowledge that so 
many male sports figures are incorrigible woman-collectors; and the 
studio-imposed carnal cuts in order to get a PG-13 rating. Young Jena 
Malone is beautifully cast as she matches perfectly Preston's looks.
The winningest side of the film is the great edge-of-the-seat footage 
which works both on baseball lovers and on non-aficionados.

Title
Review for Simple Plan, A (1998)
A SIMPLE PLAN (1998) *** 1/2 Directed by Sam Raimi.Written by Scott B.
Smith, based on his novel. Photography, Alar Kivilo. Editing, Arthur Coburn
and Eric L. Beason. Production design, Patrizia Von Brandenstein.  Music,
Danny Elfman. Cast: Bill Paxton, Billy Bob Thornton, Bridget Fonda, Brent
Briscoe , Gary Cole, Becky Ann Baker, Chelcie Ross, Jack Walsh .Produced by
James Jacks and Adam Schroeder. A Paramount release. 120 minutes. R
(violence, language)
That boy from Michigan, Sam Raimi, made his first films at 18 and 19,
became a cult-director at 23 with The Evil Dead (1982), and has not stopped
directing, writing, producing and acting in movies and TV to this day. He
specializes in  horror flicks, cartoonish or comic bookish, and in parodies
of other genres. Raimi is not on the roster of great American filmmakers
--like his friends the Coen Brothers with whom he has often collaborated--
is not everybody's cup of tea--certainly not of mature audiences with
"taste"-- but does have a following.  Now, at the old age of 40, Sam has
made the pants just right with a gripping, serious, psycho-sociological
thriller, realistically made and acted.
A Simple Plan (ASP) is an ironic title for a sadly complicated imbroglio.
Hank (Bill Paxton) works at a feed-fertilizer store in  an anonymous small
Upper Midwest town. (The film was shot in Delano, Minnesota, with some
footage in northern Wisconsin when in search of ideal snow conditions). His
wife Sarah (Bridget Fonda) is nine months pregnant with their first child.
The couple is beautifully affectionate.
Hank's older brother Jacob (Billy Bob Thornton) seems to be not quite all
there. He lives alone in a rather dilapidated house, has no fixed
employment, is regularly on relief. His buddy and drinking companion, bluff
Lou (Brent Briscoe),  is often out of work, deeply in debt, and something
of a town drunk.
On New Year's Eve, the three men are brought together by a visit to Hank
and Jake's father's grave. In a wildlife reserve area they stumble on the
wreck of a small plane hidden by snow and ice. The pilot is dead. A bag
contains four million four hundred thousand dollars.
What would you do in this situation? Lou says keep it: "It's the American
Dream in a damn gym bag." Jacob, a follower and no leader, acquiesces. Hank
hesitates. I quote from memory: "The American Dream is to work for money,
not to steal it." But still...
They figure out that all signs (the absence of news about a plane having
disappeared, etc.) point to a stash of illegal money, no doubt from drugs.
Hank is swayed, moves from ethics to a strategically simple plan. Keep the
money, wait and see what happens, divide it when the time is ripe. He
insists that he will keep the bundle and that no one will mention it to
anyone else. So the first thing he does is to take it home... and tell
Sarah.
Her reactions rapidly escalate from the right thing to do to more elaborate
"keep it" schemes. She reinforces her opinions by sending away for papers
(she works in the local library) which prove that this is ransom money for
an heiress abducted by a gang that left many dead people behind.
This is where my plot-telling ends. What follows is an exponentially
growing mess, excellently paced, rightly devoid of the humor that Raimi is
partial to (as well as his friends the Coens in their films, including the
snowy Fargo), strong in the protagonists' characterizations (with Sarah
becoming a sort of junior Lady Macbeth), unexpected yet credible turns as
the "perpetrators" inexorably paint themselves into a corner.
The tangled web we weave when first we practice to deceive is here the
damnedest and tangledest possible. Hank bears the largest moral burden of
all. A smart man, the only college graduate in the group (and in town, I
suppose), he has scruples. But the concatenation of events, so much money,
and his companions' errors make him lose his head.
>From the start, this is a bloody affair. It keeps getting bloodier, but not
gratuitously so. From the start, this very noir ("black" in French) movie
set in gorgeous expanses of white, virgin snow, as it imparts the feeling
of an inexorable march to catastrophe. It does this with cold, believable,
suspenseful and gripping logic. In some ways, ASP evokes the doomed heist
of a very different thriller, The Killing, an early Stanley Kubrick gem.
ASP is neither a simple nor a simple-minded story, nor escapism, fun, or
entertainment. It's painful and depressing to watch, but then this is real
cinema and a corrective to the no-brainers that make up 99 percent of film
production.
There's a perfect match between images and events, tempo and psyches.
There's also a growing depth and awareness in family relations, with
revelations about the brothers' parents and Jake's seemingly simple mind.
Major credit goes to the first-time script-writer for adapting his own book
so cleverly. Major credit goes to the production designer Patrizia Von
Brandenstein (one of the best) for her discreetly eloquent sets. The music
score is unobtrusive.
Cinematographer Alar Kivilo-- about whom I knew nothing and found little
more than a fine track-record almost entirely in TV-- is a revelation.  He
does wonders with splendidly photographed snow on the land and as it falls
(no easy feat); with tricky focusing and changes of focus that keep the
foreground sharp (e.g. the ever-present crows perched on trees) as well as
the background; with economical, meaningful camera positions and movements;
with tracking shots of animals.
Symbolism runs through the picture: a beautiful fox killing chickens (a
literary allusion to D.H.Lawrence?); the leitmotiv of blackbirds observing
the scene (an allusion to Poe's Raven or to Hitchcock's The Birds?); others
too, but they don't come at you and hit you with obviousness,
The performers are all perfect. Billy Bob Thornton has the most showy, odd
part, but there's veristic quality acting by everyone, including the
smaller roles:  the ambiguous, friendly yet mysterious sheriff (Chelcie
Ross); he equally cool Gary Cole who shows a different kind of cool in the
current comedy Office Space.
Verisimilitude does get strained a bit, but rarely. I wonder how Sarah, at
work, in the boondocks, gets the newspapers so quickly. (Yes, this is the
information, fax and internet age, but still...) Why is college graduate
Hank working in a feed store?  Small things like that.
ASP also wins is in its choice of subject. Greed, the title of a great
Hollywood classic of 1925, could be the title of this film too, and of the
heading of millions of news items --since the profit motive rules the
world.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Truth About Cats & Dogs, The (1996)
THE TRUTH ABOUT CATS & DOGS (1996) **  Directed by Michael Lehmann. 
Written by Audrey Wells. Photography, Robert Brinkmann. Editing,
Stephen Semel.Production designer, Sharon Seymour. Music, Howard Shore.   
Cast: Uma Thurman (Noelle), Janeane Garofalo (Abby), Ben Chaplin 
(Brian), et al. A 20th Century Fox release. 96 min. Rated PG-13 
The title is catchy. It is actually the name of a call-in radio program 
that's the best part of the film. It is hosted by Dr. Abby Barnes, a 
veterinarian who handles questions (often funny) with aplomb, 
intelligence,  imagination and humor.  Jeanene Garofalo is charming in 
this role. You can see why her listeners like her and why one of them, 
Brian (Ben Chaplin) is so taken with her.
Brian is British, a freelance photographer who makes fine pictures. But 
art does not pay while commercial publicity photos do. Brian's attempts 
to snap a dog, a Great Dane on roller-skates, are quite amusing.  
When he calls in to say "thanks for your advice," and offer to meet Abby 
for a drink, she loses her composure. While professionally cool and 
authoritative, Abby is personally insecure about her looks. A victim of 
modern society's cult of certain stereotypes of female beauty, she 
thinks of herself as something like a dumpy, un-chic, unappealing 
brunette, perhaps a 2 on a scale of 10.
What with the emotion caused by Brian's call (and his English accent), 
she describes herself to him as a beautiful tall blonde. This fits her 
neighbor and new friend Noelle (Uma Thurman) a professional model that 
is being pushed around by a disgusting boyfriend. She towers over Abby, 
in size, not little gray cells.
Hoist by her own petard, Abby gets cold feet and has Noelle impersonate 
her with Brian. Noelle is something of a dim-bulb and, frankly, Brian's 
I.Q. does not impress me - especially since he has long phone calls with 
Abby, calls that reinforce a mutual attraction. This situation is more 
than improbable, as Abby and Noelle don't sound at all the same.
The impossiblities that follow have occasionally entertaining moments, 
if, that is, you suspend disbelief one hundred percent. The film's mood 
is pleasant , but the development is slack, coming to life when Abby is 
at the station's microphone. Some good bits are too thinly spread around 
the movie's 96 minutes.
Sometimes the story reaches a soporific level. There used to be 
sentimental flicks that moved the audience to tears, films called two or 
three-handkerchief movies. "Cats and Dogs" is a two or three espresso 
picture.
The switch of identities has made every reviewer mention "Cyrano de 
Bergerac." The resemblances are superficial. The film's logic holds no 
water:  Cyrano whispered to the handsome but un-smart Christian sweet 
words that Christian passed on to Roxane, in his own voice. 
The substitution of one person for another can be found in many a 
stage-play or film. What set "Cyrano" aside was less its plot than its 
poetry. "Cats and Dogs" is far too prosaic.
The picture is also predicated on a number of false issues. One is that 
Garofalo is an ugly duckling, which she is not, and Thurman a raving 
beauty, which she is not. Another presupposes that Abby never had a 
pass, live or by phone, made at her, which is surprising. Then we have 
the cliches about blondes:  the Dumb Blonde;  "Gentlemen prefer blondes" 
("...but marry brunettes"); etc. The movie might have explored the 
notion of "Gentlemen prefer Blands," the male mistrust of female brains. 
It doesn't.  
What carries the picture somewhat are certain dispersed gags, the animal 
jokes, and especially Garofalo.  I know Garofalo only from her 
efficient, abrasive persona in "The Larry Sanders Show," and from what I 
caught on TV recently: an unfunny, coarse stand-up appearance  based on 
a whole mess of insecurities. The overall impression until now was that 
Garofalo is like a pocket battleship. In the movie, however, her mix of 
sweetness, fears and intelligence gives her a likable, rounded 
personality.

Title
Review for Manny & Lo (1996)
MANNY & LO *** Written and directed by Lisa Krueger. 
Photography, Tom Krueger.  Editing, Colleen Sharp.  
Production designer, Sharon Lomofsky. Music, John Lurie. 
Producers,  Dean Silvers and Marlen Hecht. Cast:  Mary Kay 
Place (Elaine), Scarlett Johansson (Manny), Aleksa 
Palladino (Lo), Paul Guilfoyle (Humphreys), et al. A Sony 
Classics release. 90 minutes. Rated R (language, short 
sexual scene). 
A road movie that's not quite a road movie, "Manny and Lo" 
is named after its two sisters on the lam , Amanda, 
precociously wise at 11, and Laurel, sexually awake at 16, 
orphaned when their (unseen) mother dies. We know little 
about mom except for hints ("Was she stoned or drunk?") 
and nothing of the father. The girls were placed in foster 
homes. Lo escaped from hers, obtained an older car (the 
mother's? Unclear) and "rescued" Manny.
They take to the road, in a purposefully vague (albeit 
contemporary) period, and anonymous locations (New 
Jersey and upstate New York in reality), sleeping in the 
car, or outdoors, or in model houses they break into. They 
steal gas, shoplift food, but never behave aggressively or 
defiantly. 
The movie is the feature debut of Lisa Krueger who has an 
interesting background in film, academic in Berkeley and 
Paris, practical, as a Jill-of-all-trades, in New York and 
elsewhere. She made a short, "Best Offer" with brother 
Tom as cinematographer and brother Matthew as 
production designer. It premiered at the 1993 Sundance 
Festival,  won awards in San Francisco, Chicago, 
Oberhausen and other festivals. "Manny and Lo" was 
carefully developed at the Sundance Institute. All this 
means to me that Ms. Krueger goes well beyond the 
casual, new independent filmmaker, that her success with 
"Manny and Lo" is no flash in the pan.  
Funny what thoughts come into a film-buff's mind while 
watching pictures. Manny's narrating of parts of the this 
film recalled, in a different way, the scratchy, working 
class-voiced narration of Linda Manz (whatever became of 
her?) in the masterful "Days of Heaven" (1978)--but the 
resemblances stop there between that spectacular fresco 
and the small budget, essentially three-character "M & L."
There is solid originality in "Manny and Lo," along with a 
quiet way of presenting the girls' quandaries. Manny, 
inside a model home (desirable yet soulless) swipes 
mantelpiece photos of families. This  clear, unspoken wish 
for a normal life may be obvious but  is not pat. Obvious 
too, and on the forced side is when the sisters play, in the 
model house, a rather incongruous home video labeled 
"Welcome to Tiffany" (what is it doing there?), which turns 
out to be the record of a baby's birth. 
Lo, who keeps gaining weight and, with bad faith,  blames 
it on junk food, is in a state of advanced pregnancy. This 
leads the sisters to an illogical but eloquent visit to a 
maternity store. The temporary salesperson, Elaine, is a 
weird, authoritarian, know-it-all,  "I'm never wrong," 
figure full of advice on everything. The girls abduct her to 
an empty vacation cabin and shackle her. Why? Because, 
mixed up and lost, they need help with the pregnancy. 
While it is obvious that the pregnancy is most unwelcome 
by Lo, in one of the film's major and better ambiguities 
this "I'm my own boss" young lady, while putting up a 
strong front, is badly in need of a mother figure. Confused, 
she doesn't seem to know which evil is the lesser, having 
the baby or aborting it. 
Elaine gradually supplies the missing link, the maternal 
presence. Her odd  personality hides a mysterious past, 
her authoritative character hides her own insecurities and 
wounds. Mary Kay Place regularly steals the show. Now as 
a prisoner who goes on hunger strikes, now wobbling on 
her tied up feet, preparing healthy meals for the trio, 
serving...  The girls may think she is a real nurse, but is 
she, or does she have the experience without the title? 
Elaine goes through small but significant changes, ever 
forceful but never transformed into a sentimental or 
overtly appealing movie cliche.  
Complicitous bonding between Elaine and Manny forms 
gradually, sometimes amusingly, sometimes with 
restrained pathos. It will expand quite late into rapport 
between ever-suspicious Lo and kooky Elaine. The 
climaxes is not so much a closure as a condition curative 
for all concerned. 
I will not get into the details, whose accumulation makes 
up the movie. Some miniature episodes seem throw-away, 
irrelevant. Some red herrings are included--at one point, 
late in the film, a visitor and his car even conjured up 
"Psycho" for me. Even so, the parts fit well together, their 
mix of semi-violence and semi-sweetness has a 
consistent tone of a musical scale in a minor key. 
In this not-so-hidden but cool paean to maternity, family, 
roots and women supporting one another, it is the three 
characters' characterizations that carry the load. The 
dialogue is not especially interesting, arguments and 
dialectics are noticeably absent. But it is precisely this 
combination of what is done and what is unspoken that 
gives the film a look and feel all its own. 
No minor virtues are the good music by John Lurie and the 
picture's length. Its hour-and-a-half qualifies it for 
inclusion in the Golden Book of the famous BBNMM Society, 
"Bring Back the Ninety Minute Movie."

Title
Review for Abschied - Brechts letzter Sommer (2000)
ABSCHIED (THE FAREWELL) (Germany, 2000) *** Directed by Jan Schutte. 
Script  and dialogue by Klaus Pohl. Photography, Edward  Klosinski. 
Editing, Renate Merck. Set design, Katharina Woppermann. Music, John 
Cale. Cast: Joseph Bierbichler (Brecht), Monica Bleibtrau (Helene 
Wiegel), Jeanette Hain (Kathe Reichel) Elfriede Irrall (Elizabeth 
Hauptmann), Margit Rogall (Ruth Berlau), Samuel Fintzi (Wolfgang 
Harich). 91 minutes. In German with subtitles. Seen at the Cannes 
2000 Festival.
One day in the life of  Bertolt Brecht (1898-August 14, 1956), the 
protean writer whose influence on theater, stage techniques, cinema, 
literature and more is incalculable. Note that he film does not cover 
24 hours but only the daytime ones
It is the last day of a summer vacation for Brecht, who is in ill 
health.  He has a holiday home north of Berlin, in a beautiful wooded 
area which includes a limpid lake. With the writer are his wife Helen 
Weigel;  their teen-age daughter Barbara; his heavy-drinking 
ex-collaborator Ruth;  Elfriede his assistant;  Kathe, a rising young 
actress; political dissident Wolfgang Harich (the only other man in 
the group) and his young wife Isot.
Brecht is a mega-womanizer. The two older female guests had been his 
mistresses. The younger ones are his current mistresses. Isot even 
has  the consent of her husband. One wonders what other ladyloves are 
waiting for Bertolt in Berlin. No, it is not a French bedroom farce 
but a serious work filled with discussions, reactions, antagonisms, 
alliances, politics, and other subjects and issues, all of which held 
my undivided attention..
In the late afternoon, the entire household are to drive back to 
Berlin, where Brecht will put finishing touches to his Caucasian 
Chalk Circle opening in his theatre. Ominously, a young man from 
Stasi, the dreaded Stalinist police, shows up to take Harich (the 
political dissident) back to Berlin, but Helen keeps this a secret 
from her husband...
1956 was a year full of political confrontations in the Soviet bloc. 
That's when Khrushchev gave his epoch-making speech criticizing the 
late dictator Stalin. In the summer, in Hungary,  there was a massive 
popular and nationalistic uprising against the Soviet occupation. 
There were student protests in Czechoslovakia and Poland., and, in 
East Germany, for the first time since the end of World War II, 
voices were raised against the Walter Ulbricht communist regime.
While this widespread turmoil is not persistently spelled out in the 
movie, it is there as  a permanent background reminder which affects 
the reactions of the charcaters and those of the viewers who are 
aware of the history and politics of the times.
The film's 91 minutes are a welcome return to the average length of 
most older movies. These are packed minutes, whether one does or does 
not realize this consciously.
"Abschied" was not filmed in Germany but in Poland, where its makers 
could find a remote, bucolic spot not subject to passing traffic 
sounds, other noises and interferences. Brecht's summer place (villa 
or datcha) was skilfully built by Polish workers, with removable 
partitions that helped with the camera movements. The cinematographer 
is also Polish. Edward Klosinski, one of the best anywhere, has 
worked with all major Polish directors as well as several Western 
European ones. In spite of the single location, photography and 
editing never induce claustrophobia in the characters or the 
spectators.
This work  covers many bases, plays like expanded, aired-out 
Kammerspiel. Its hero-antihero is shown without any concessions to 
the man, his admirers, or his legend.  Politically dyed-in-the-wool 
Brechtians may protest, yet whether revisionist or not, this is a 
strong, intriguing document.
I do not remember the film mentioning it, but Brecht died of a stroke 
three days after returning to Berlin.
Movie reviews by Edwin Jahiel are at : http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel 

Title
Review for Volcano (1997)
VOLCANO  1/4 *   Directed by Mick Jackson. Written by Jerome Armstrong
& Billy Ray, based on a story by Armstrong. Photography, Theo van de Sande.
Editing, MichaelTronick & Don Brochu.  Production design, Jackson Degovia.
Music,Alan Silvestri. Cast: Tommy Lee Jones (Mike Roark), Anne Heche (Dr.
Amy Barnes), Gaby Hoffman (Kelly Roark),Don Cheadle (Emmit Reese).  20th
Century Fox release. 120 min. PG-13.
"Sumer is icumen in, Lhude sing cucu" (Start of The Summer Canon, 13th
Century)
"Summer is early this year" (in movie critical parlance : "The awful
gadzillion dollars spectaculars of sound and fury signifying nothing are
already upon us")
"Cucu" : old spelling for "cuckoo," what "Volcano" drives some of us.
1. Los Angeles gets a new earthquake. No big deal as they say in the City
of Big Deals. Then comes a gas explosion that steams several workers to
death. Next, an underground volcano erupts, sending lava all over.
2. The epic duel starts between the  OEM  (Office of Emergency Management)
and ODTAA One Damn Thing After Another).
3. If you have seen more than 12 movies in your lifetime you know that OEM
will initially have some arguments with the LAPD, the LAFD, the LAWC (Water
Company), the LASP (Stubborn People) and the like. Just momentary frictions
however.
4. OEM's top banana Mike Roark looks just like Tommy Lee Jones except that
he doesn't even attempt more than two facial expressions. His heart is
clearly not in it.
5.Just before AHBL (All Hell Breaking Loose), newly divorced or separated
Mike was going on vacation. His young daughter Kelly had flown in the night
before. She is petulant and wants to have her nose pierced.
1. There are many, all heroic and cast with politically correct gender and
race in mind. Like a  sterling Oriental-American lady MD, married to a
Caucasian architect. Or like Mike's second in command, an African-American.
2. One of Mike's top people is a woman who knows all about complicated
equipment.
3. The second lead is Amy Barnes, Ph.D., new to Mike, young, nice looking,
a scientific whiz who know all there is to know and makes lightning fast
diagnoses and predictions. She is,of course, unattached.
1. It takes up 99.9 % of the movie as explosions explode and mega-tons of
burning lava creep all overground as well as in the Underground (British
for subway). Classy stuff.
2. Dad Mike rescues many people,makes split-second decisions, is all over
the place. You bet that he can walk and chew gum at the same time.
3. When Kelly, alone in a car, is supposed to look scared, I think I caught
her with a half-smile for one-fifth of a second. Or did I imagine this?
3a. Still, watch closely a video of some film where crowds are running from
danger (like terrorists at the Super Bowl in "Black Sunday").You'll see
that  a lot of the panicky extras are actually beaming or laughing.
4. Early on, when two female scientists imperil their lives, it is (you can
guess it if  you have seen more than 12 pictures in your lifetime) that the
non-doll will buy the farm.
5. The technical hows and whys of The Battle of Los Angeles will probably
escape you as the principals talk fast in terms that sound like a foreign
language. Take it on faith.
1. It is a given that  OEM and Co. will triumph. However, as the
lava-fighters whoop it up,  your watch tells you that there's much
movie-time left and that there's more trouble to come.
2. Kelly, with a second degree burn, is taken by the wonderful lady MD to
the now apocalyptic Cedars Sinai Hospital.
1. Original dialogue flows along with the lava.  The wonderful MD to the
teenager:" Kelly, I know you're scared. I'm scared too. But you've got to
help."
2. Original concept. At Cedars, Kelly minds a little boy who disappears. In
a nearby building about to be blown up she refuses to  stop searching for
the child: "You don't understand. He's my responsibility!" Kelly has
matured.
3.Dad saves Kelly and the little boy. As in all great movies, rescue does
not wait until the 11th hour, or even 11:59, but for 11:59 and 59 seconds.
Exhilarating..
4. Original finale. Dr.Amy Barnes happens to be around.Mike, Kelly and
blonde will bond.
1.When it's all over, how is it possible that only 100 people have died?
2. The disaster must have cut water and electricity, but L.A.is so great
that it still  has water for the hoses, current for the drills, images on
TV screens.
1. If a volcano obliterated ancient Pompeii because it (Pompeii) was so
sinful, why does the far guiltier Los Angeles survive?
2. A nice point (I mean this). At the end, when Kelly looks for the kid's
mom she asks the boy "What  does she look like?" The puzzled kid says "They
all look alike" as he points to the sooty rescuers who have not yet had a
chance to clean up with Lava Soap.
1. Had L.A. been destroyed, would we start getting better movies?

Title
Review for I Shot Andy Warhol (1996)
I SHOT ANDY WARHOL *** Directed by Mary Harron. Written by Harron & 
Daniel Minahan. Photography, Ellen Kuras. Production design, Therese 
Deprez. Editing, Keith Reamer. Music, John Cale. Cast: Lili Taylor, 
Jared Harris, Martha Plimpton, Stephen Dorff, et al. An Orion release. 
103 min. Rated R (language, sex) . Art Theater.
It's a tossup as to who can name today the would-be assassin of Ronald 
Reagan and the killer of John Lennon. But it is almost certain that 
even fewer 
people could name Valerie Solanas, the young woman (then 32) who, in 
1968, fired several shots at Andy Warhol, in the belief that he had 
betrayed her. Although she did not kill him, the profound 
psychological and physical affects changed his work-style and probably 
hastened his death in 1987.
The film is well researched and, in many ways fascinating. Valerie was 
a very special case, a maverick anti-male revolutionary who had a bad 
childhood, a psychology degree from the University of Maryland, an 
original mind, a life that included panhandling, lesbianism (some of 
it paid) and prostitution. Ironically, she needed money from men to 
survive so that she could turn against them. Ordinary, or even 
exceptional standards did not apply to Valerie.
When, in 1966, she was introduced to Warhol and his entourage (in his 
large, then famous loft called The Factory) she found herself in a 
milieu of artists or would-be artists, of oddities, transvestites, 
transsexuals and camp-followers who conformed to non-conformism. 
Valerie had writing aspirations but her main purpose was her obsessive 
conviction of the superiority of women over men, something that shapes 
up as a non-stop attack on the male gender, as summed up in her SCUM 
Manifesto (The Society for Cutting Up Men). She had founded that 
society, of which she was the sole member. The manifesto (much of 
which is given as lines spoken by Valerie in the movie) was an 
ultra-radical, all-out war against men as well as against conformist 
women and even wrong-thinking feminists. (SCUM got nowhere then, but 
later became a key text among militant feminists). 
A lone wolf, Valerie, within the Warholian world was as much out of 
tune as outside it, with very rare exceptions, like her transvestite 
friend Candy Darling, and in a sense Warhol himself who, in many ways 
was an outsider among his own people. Valerie, in one of her 
black-humor, absurdist encounters, met Frenchman Maurice Girodias, the 
owner of the notorious Olympia Press, who eventually published the 
Manifesto -- and in Valerie's opinion exploited and cheated her.
The film melds nicely different shooting styles, from protracted 
scenes that remind one somewhat of Warhol movies, to fast-cutting 
sections that recall other Underground films of the period, to 
docu-dramas. All this is at the service of portraying a most unusual, 
and not balanced woman who, however, had method in her madness. 
Lili Taylor, always dressed like a butch bag lady, is perfect in her 
part and, for all purposes, since none of us knows the real Valerie, 
she is Valerie. The real Valerie was born and raised in Atlantic City. 
I was amazed to learn that Taylor is a native of Chicago, as her 
accent seems to me to be pure and wonderfully consistent New 
Jerseyian. (It is the kind of accent that only people who grew with it 
like, the way a hyena's babies look beautiful to their mother). 
The recreation of The Factory and its denizens is excellent, with 
notable performances, like Stephen Dorff's Candy Darling. Since  
pasty-faced, inexpressive, soft-spoken Warhol was, and to a large 
extent still is (through films and photos) a familiar presence, for 
viewers over a certain age a great deal of the movie's authenticity 
rides on his impersonator. Jared Harris, the son of actor Richard 
Harris, is a surprisingly believable simulacrum.

Title
Review for American Pie 2 (2001)
"I seem to have glued myself... to myself."
Starring Jason Biggs, Seann William Scott, Chris
Klein, Thomas Ian Nichols, Allyson Hannigan, Shannon
Elizabeth, Natasha Lyonne, Tara Reid, Mena Suvari,
Eugene Levy, Jennifer Coolidge. Directed by J.B.
Rogers. Rated R.
American Pie 2 reunites the cast members from American
Pie in a different setting; instead of being high
school seniors looking to score before they graduate,
they are now past their first year of college and have
gathered in a beach house to enjoy the summer of their
lives. Jim (Jason Biggs) is still an insecure geek
looking to improve his performance, Oz (Chris Klein)
is still the sweetest guy on the block, having
sickeningly saccharine phone conversations with his
studying-abroad girlfriend, Stifler (Seann William
Scott) is still a horny stoner, Kevin (Thomas Ian
Nichols) still has no personality and Finch (Eddie
Kaye Thomas) still longs for Stifler's Mom. Have I
missed anyone?
So, obviously, not much has changed. This is not a
problem, provided that the movie boasts the rapid-fire
hilarity and unexpectedly true sentiment of the
original. But American Pie 2 is the very definition of
"sequelitis." It's coarser, yes, and it pushes the
envelope even more, but its heart isn't in it. It's
easy cash to capitalize off the first film's success,
but it would have been a worthier investment to
prolong the franchise by coming up with something
original.
Part of the reason why the film doesn't work, I think,
is that while in the original the kids' quest for sex
was a coming-of-age stepping stone as much as an
outlet for their horniness. Here, everything has been
cheapened. They behave like those idiot frat boys who
kill themselves drinking; they have no motivation
except for sex, sex, beer and sex. That's not to say
that you can't make a decent comedy from that premise,
but it is one of American Pie 2's undoings.
Missing, too, is the sweetness that permeated American
Pie, the this-could-be-you quality of the main
players. Here, the characters are too aware of
themselves as pop-culture icons, and they're even more
one-note. Stifler and Finch are now caricatures while
Jim, Oz and Kevin are forced to make awkward
self-discoveries at arbitrary moments, none of them
betraying what the writers think the audiences want to
see.
And then there's the soon-to-be-notorious scene where
Jim superglues "himself to himself," which perfectly
demonstrates yet another of the film's ailments, one
that also permeated Say It Isn't So, director J.B.
Rodgers' debut. There's a fine line between comedy and
abject humiliation, and American Pie 2 is on the wrong
side of it. It's hard to laugh at the characters when
you are profoundly embarrassed for them. I shielded my
eyes watching this more than I have watching any
horror movie.
If there's one redeeming factor to American Pie 2,
it's the inimitable Eugene Levy as Jim's dad, who pops
in on Jim as he's about to score and utters lines like
"your mother and I have been known to get frisky...
not so much anymore, but..." and then when the girl's
parents walk in, blurts out "this must be your
daughter! I didn't get her name, but hopefully my son
did."
If only the rest of the movie had the wit and wisdom
of Levy's performance. This is an unworthy sequel to a
gross-fest that brought back the raunchy teen comedy.
The box-office of this onw should keep the genre going
strong, which is disappointing. The genre needs a
hiatus; filmmakers are getting lazy. 

Title
Review for Leap of Faith (1992)
     This country no longer needs the proverbial, good five-cent
cigar.  What it needs is a multi-million fund for a big, muckraking,
round-the-clock, "60 Minutes"-like governmental agency with teeth,
to take on the unorganized but multi-billion fraud, swindle and scam
industry.
     It's all around us: boiler-room deceptions that operate by phone,
by official-looking junk mail, or on TV.  Phony "charities," life,
health, burial insurance schemes; sham investments, bogus "retirement
communities," or cheating land-schemes.  We are all targeted daily,
starting with those letters that state "You, John/Jane Doe, have won a
million dollars Just send us $10 or $20 to defray expenses and become
eligible."
     The victims are mostly older, gullible people, who, in the
least-painful scenario may get stuck with unwanted magazines and in the
worst-case scenario can have their life savings wiped out.
     Among the oldest forms of deception is the cruel imposture that
exploits the religious faith of simple people.  As seen, for example,
in LEAP OF FAITH.  This movie has the makings of a dynamite expose of
charlatan evangelists and itinerant faith healers, but in spite of its
initial promise and several brilliant parts that follow, it evolves
into a confused, ineffectual mishmash that compromises, as it were, the
integrity of its cynicism.
     In LEAP OF FAITH, Steve Martin is a road evangelist who calls
himself Jonas Nightengale.  He has perfected a tent-show operation, a
gold mine.  It is a state-of-the art, high-tech affair, complete with a
large staff of conspirators, a huge (and excellent) all-black gospel
choir, computers, TV screens, hidden microphones and surveillance
equipment.
     Jonas's lieutenant-manager is Jane (Debra Winger).  Among her
accomplishments, she gets fed information about the audience by the
staff and, from her multi-screen TV console, she relays useful facts to
Jonas who wears a hidden ear piece: "in sequins, in row two, a pregnant
teenager"; "positioned in row one is the old lady with rheumatism";
behind her are the man with a drinking problem, the woman with neighbor
troubles, the widow of a farmer who killed himself when he lost
everything, and so on.
     Nightengale is a master scam artist and performer.  In the film's
opening, when his motorcade gets stopped for speeding, Jonas, without
the benefit of computerized information, somehow guesses the cop's
family problems and ends up by getting the man's gratitude plus a
contribution.  It is all extremely unlikely but for a while it
entertains in a sick way.
     Engine trouble has the custom buses and trucks stuck for a few
days in totally depressed Rustwater, Kansas, a farming community
afflicted by record unemployment and a killing drought.  Nightengale
and Co. decide to make the most of it.  As it is, in another outrageous
improbability, Jane has at her electronic fingertips all possible data
about Rustwater, down to the name of the richest man in town.
     With efficient, D-Day-like logistics, the troupe pitches its tent
and Jonas pitches his scam in a show of glitter, smoke effects and
music, far more a rock concert rather than the thunderings of
old-style, hellfire and damnation preachers.
     Jonas has chosen his pseudonym well.  He poses as a brother of
mercy, in the savior line of Florence Nightingale, but he is a
consummate showman, like Florenz Ziegfeld At the same time Jonas is the
familiar, wild-and-crazy guy from Steve Martin's Saturday Night Live
shticks.
     The machinery of the "spiritual" snake-oil salesman is beautifully
oiled and attention-getting, yet the film's development suffers from
overkill.  In a world where, as we all know, anything that can go
wrong, will, neither the aplomb of Jonas nor his electronic gimmickry
or the troupe's sleight-of-hand tricks (note how "magically" extra
dollars appear in donors' wallets) ever falter.  As in the recent
"Sneakers", the combined excesses of techno-gadgetry and of plot
twists make the movie increasingly unbelievable while the characters,
albeit colorful, get no dimensions or development.
     Two subplots are implausibly worked in.  One has the film's
likable Sheriff Liam Neeson fully aware of the fraud and trying to
expose it.  But he is checkmated at every turn by Jonas who, using
jiu-jitsu principles, turns reverses into advantages.  Neeson too knows
from the start that Jane is a manipulatrix, yet a dumb,
out-of-character, soupy and gushy affair is grafted on, with trappings
like a silly, sentimental interlude about a field of butterflies.
     The other subplot involves a pretty waitress (well-acted by Lolita
Davidovich) whom lubricious Jonas, in the best travelling-salesman
tradition, wants to add to his conquests.  More to the point, the
story somehow sticks in Lolita's accident-crippled younger brother.  He
is convincingly played by Lukas Haas, but the boy's
physical/psychological/religious makeup is a murky mess.
     On several occasions the film gets good mileage from reversals in
the attitudes of Martin and Haas, but when it climaxes with a "real"
miracle--the title's leap of faith--the movie leaps into a monstrous
cop-out of artifice.
     It is as though, in its last part, the film got the shakes,
worried that its unvarnished cynicism would alienate a part of the
audience, and tried to compensate with a three-stage, gloppy and
sentimentalized wrap-up:  the crippled kid, Nightengale's abrupt change
of heart and the end scene, which I won't reveal.
     Downplaying much of the glitz, smarm and high tech would have
improved the movie and enhanced many of its admittedly clever and
occasionally funny parts.  Had they let bad enough alone, the film
might have been a contender.
     The production values are excellent, the photography appropriately
slick and the direction by Richard Pearce is good, in keeping with his
high standards of THE LONG WALK HOME, COUNTRY, or the prize-winning
HEARTLAND.
     Yet the script, after a pretty good start, keeps bobbing up and
down in quality and interest, eventually declining and finishing lamely
(even though someone gets un-lamed).
     It is the film debut of the oddly named Janus Cercone who is the
wife of the co-producer.  Before this she was publicity director for
various bands, then a studio musician.  Pardon me, Ma'am but your
professional past shows in LEAP OF FAITH and your show keeps slipping.

Title
Review for Myth of Fingerprints, The (1997)
THE MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS (1997) ** Written & directed by Bart Freundlich.
Photography, Stephen Kazmierski, Editing, Kate Williams, Ken J. Sackheim.
Production design, Lucy W. Corrigan. Main cast (alphabetically): Arija
Bareiikis, Blythe Danner, Hope Davis,  Kelsey Gunn, Brian Kerwin, James
LeGros, Julianne Moore, Roy Scheider, Michael Vartan, Noah Wyle. A Sony
release. 90 min. Rated R (language, sex).
The title of this movie, cryptic and quite forced and precious, seems to
mean that while a person's fingerprints are always the same, people's
natures (psyches, characters) can change. The people in question are the
now grown children of Lena (Danner) and Hal (Scheidel).  For the first time
in three years, the brood join their parents for Thanksgiving, in a rather
luxurious farmhouse in Maine (the film was shot in Bethel and Andover).
Daughter Mia (Moore) brings along her male companion Elliot (Kerwin), a
psychotherapist. Jake brings his girl Margaret (Davis). Warren (Wyle) comes
alone, still brooding over the break, three years ago, with his great love
Daphne (Bareikis). The youngest child, a girl, is Leigh (Holloman).
Mother Lena is sweet. Father Hal is a near-silent, sullen, often unpleasant
patriarch. Mia and Elliot are not a good couple. Jake and Margaret are, and
make love vigorously and noisily, often in odd locations. Later on Warren
and Daphne are reunited. All the couples copulate.
The assembly is one of W.A.S.P.s who are often waspish, with the Pulitzer
Prize for unpleasantness going to Mia. She's lavish with insults, snide
remarks and complaints.
There is a general unease about this household, where spats and repartees
are frequent, where there are times when you think that everyone hates
everybody else. It's more complex than that, however. But the movie does a
peculiarly confusing job of editing at the expense of giving us information
about the characters, and at the detriment of dimensionality. This may be
compounded for some viewers by the plethora of blonde women (all
good-looking), awkward flashbacks, and minimalist dialogue scenes
(sometimes ponderous). You might get the impression that all are deranged,
save for the sensible and natural Leigh.
As per first-time director Freundlich (a product of New York University's
film and TV programs) "When you're an adult coming home, your parents look
at you as if you're still a child. Yet you've been out making your way in
the world, feeling like an adult." Etc.etc. But that's not really shown in
the movie.
Freundlich, about the age of the younger characters, seems to identify with
them, while making them identify with him. This results in a film that has
mature ambitions but an adolescent texture. Among several jejune matters
are the inter-relations of just about all; the basic lack of interest, for
us, of the characters, even though the performances are very good (for what
they are); the humorlessness of the whole thing, in spite of a few funny
lines and in spite of Freundlich's stating that the film is funny; odd
reactions, such as the grown-up children being revolted at the idea that
last night their parents made love; the peculiar affair (if there is one)
between Mia and a fellow kindergartener who now calls himself Cezanne (!).
The new director is promising, but his first feature is more like a
personal settling of family accounts. Been there, done that..
It is nice to get detailed pressbooks for new movies, but in this case, the
fact that the writer-director takes almost 10 pages to explain his film,
makes you wonder if he mistrusts the work speaking for itself. One the plus
side, some bits of the film and the dialogue are OK, and the production
values are most professional in the staging, framing and especially the
excellent photography.

Title
Review for Project X (1987)
PROJECT X (1987) *** Directed by Jonathan Kaplan. Written by Stanley 
Weiser. Story by Weiser.Photography, Dan Cundey. Editing, O. Nicholas 
Brown. Music, James Horner. Cast: Matthew Broderick (Jimmy Garrett), 
Helen Hunt (Teri), Bill Sadler (Dr. Carroll), Johnny Ray McGhee 
(Robertson) Jonathan Stark (Sergeant Krieger),  Robin Gammell 
(Colonel Niles), Stephen Lang (Watts), Jean Smart (Dr. Criswell) , et 
al,  Producers,  Walter F. Parkes ,  Lawrence Lasker. A 20th Century 
Fox film, 108 minutes, PG
This X is a PG that could entertain the entire alphabet of audiences.
It seems to be telling us that, statistically, films about apes are 
doing better than films about humans. In previous and recent years, 
there was Greystoke; The Legend Of Tarzan, Lord Of The Apes (1984), 
Link (1986) And Now Project X.  Greystoke is, in my opinion, an 
underrated, humanistic film, hurt in part by its shortening before 
release. Link is a clever, witty but un-smug movie with splendid 
simian effects and astute cross references to other films. Because of 
vagaries of  misdistribution it went practically unseen, but  was 
later re-released in New York where the reviews were very good.
Project X has much appeal. So, apes now stand at a perfect score of 3 
on 3 that no other movie subject can approach. Perhaps this is owed 
to the fact that the serious ape-movie makers are smarter, more 
intelligent and caring than their colleagues.
In the movie, Teri, (Helen Hunt),  a University of Wisconsin graduate 
student,  has been training for three years the Africa-born 
chimpanzee Virgil, teaching him sign language. It's nicely done, 
without cuteness or gratuitous picturesqueness or laughs. Teri looks 
like a real student. Virgil is smart  (it seems that chimps have the 
intelligence of a 5-year old.)  Less convincing is the fact that 
Teri's grant is not renewed --most universities know a good project 
when they see it. This arbitrariness is, of course, introduced for 
dramatic reasons, as Virgil is sent to a secret Air Force laboratory 
in Florida.
Jimmy (Matthew Broderick), a young flier with a record of messing up, 
is  let out of military jail , assigned as a last chance to that lab, 
and given charge of, natch,  Virgil --who, with nice parallelism is 
in a cage.
Inevitably it is love at third sight between the two. Broderick, at 
that time, came from that vast reservoir of anonymous-faced young 
actors. Both young and older,  generic non-stars are one of the banes 
of world (not just American) cinema today , unlike the days when a 
Clark Gable could never have been taken for a Spencer Tracy or a 
Robert Taylor, not a Charles Boyer for a  Jean Gabin.
Yet here, having Broderick play an ordinary , un-quirky fellow --and 
play him naturally and well -- you get the paradox that his Jimmy 
rapidly gets personalized.
The lab's hush-hush project is to teach apes to fly  simulators in 
lieu of human pilots. Jimmy senses there's more to it than this, but, 
fascinated by the chimps, busies himself with Virgil, even discovers 
(in a clever sequence) that monkey  speaks sign language.
The moment comes, though, when the X in Project X takes on its real 
and sinister significance... one that I will not reveal and spoil 
surprise and suspense. It is at this point that the film leaves the 
ground of scientific and humanistic  realism and plausibility, and 
soars into the fantasies of Movie Space. Teri reappears, high drama, 
pathos, action and the simian version of Spartacus follow one another 
with a speed that just might,  temporarily,  camouflage the 
silliness, especially since it is entertaining silliness. The ending 
is happy...and outlandish.
The introduction of monkeyshines and  shenanigans comes late enough 
for the movie to have already conditioned you through its leisurely, 
low-key, credible developments . The film-makers --the two producers 
were the co-writers of War Games) exercised restraint,  even made a 
modest, valid point about Jimmy's growth and new sense of values. 
Both in the early and later parts, the acting by the monkeys, Jimmy 
and his co-workers (in that order) is very good, while the  military 
higher-ups and scientists are ho-hum.
But the  film sets a solid sense of poignancy that builds up and 
could carry you through the frenetic wind-up.
The chimps are irresistibly interesting and entertaining. Credit the 
unseen studio trainers who are the real stars of the movie. Mind you, 
not everything is in the training. Many shots that look entirely 
spontaneous involve a very large amount of editing and trickery. Apes 
play multiple roles, reaction shots are painstakingly chosen among 
thousands to match whatever the apes are reacting to, and so on.
The movie does raise serious issues about the treatment of animals as 
guinea chimps, as well as more general  questions on man-and-beast 
relationships. More important yet is the unstated fact of the 
obscenity of war, the war that underlies military research and 
expenditures. There's finally the equally unspoken but  inescapable 
question of why we can teach apes but not human children?
  Project X certainly will not go down in history as a great movie, 
but it is one of those films (much fewer than one thinks), of which 
one can say that they give you your money's worth in charm, fun, and 
sentiment while you're watching. I took quite enthusiastic notes when 
I saw this film again. As the days went by, I modified my notes 
downward, because, in retrospect, less and less of the movie stayed 
with me . And thinking about it, its out-and-out Hollywoodisms tended 
to crowd out some of its better aspects. Even so, I'm keeping it on 
the recommended list of above-average flicks.
Jonathan  Kaplan was a low-budget film-maker until he directed the 
1983 sleeper Heart Like a Wheel. He has excellent control over 
Project X,  shows sensitivity and (too much) imagination.
Matthew Broderick, then fresh  from his title role in the delightful 
Ferris Bueller's Day Off (1986), was and still is one of our most 
likable young (and later, youthful) actors. In particular he was a 
joy in  Biloxi Blues (1988),  impressive in Glory (1989, a howl  in 
the relatively underrated The Freshman (1990),  and a key presence in 
the very underrated  Mrs. Parker and the Vicious Circle (1994) .
Constantly employed for close to thirty years, in TV (mostly) and 
movies, Helen Hunt is here in one of her earliest  "legit" features 
and shows clear promise. She had to wait until As Good as it Gets 
(1997) for her Oscar and her Golden Globe.
Production values are very good, from the  difficult photography and 
special effects  to the appropriately cold look of aseptic sets that 
contrast with the warmth of the chimps and their trainers. Only the 
music is annoyingly intrusive as it goes from strong beats of  break 
dancing and disco to a relentless, deja heard assemblage of 
audience-conditioning devices.  The apes' noises are much nicer.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Governess, The (1998)
THE GOVERNESS (UK) ***  Written and directed by Sandra Goldbacher.
Photography, Ashley Rowe. Editing, Isabel Lorente. Production design, Sarah
Greenwood. Music, Edward Shearmur. Produced by Sarah Curtis. Cast : Minnie
Driver (Rosina), Tom Wilkinson (Charles Cavendish), Florence Hoath
(Clementina), Jonathan Rhys Meyers (Henry Cavendish),  Harriet Walter (Mrs.
Cavendish), Arlene Cockburn (Lily Milk), Bruce Myers (Rosina's father),  et
al. A Sony Picture Classics release.114 minutes. R (sex)
Produced or sponsored in the UK by the British Broadcasting Corporation,
British Screen, the Arts Council of Britain, Pandora Cinema, and Parallax
Pictures, The Governess is directed by first-timer (in features) Sandra
Goldbacher, and the film's credits are for more women than men. No doubt
about it, the gender gap is closing steadily. In countries like France it
is a fait accompli; in the USA, it is felt more among Independents than in
mainstream Hollywood. Good news.
Set in the early 1840s, the start of the Victorian era (1837-1901), the
film revolves around Rosina Da Silva (Minnie Driver), one of the children
of a wealthy Jewish family in London. What is immediately striking is that
those Jews are members of the Sephardic Community in London, a large,
lively group that, to my knowledge, has hardly been featured in British
cinema, except indirectly and in the person of Benjamin Disraeli who was
of Sepharad Italian-Jewish  descent and became twice Prime Minister under
Queen Victoria.
The Sephardim (from the Hebrew word Sefarad, meaning Spain) were originally
Spanish or Portuguese Jews who were expelled from their countries in the
late 1400s, moved to North Africa and other areas of the then Ottoman
Empire (including the Balkans and Greece) on or near the Mediterranean,
also to countries such as Italy, France, Holland, England. They mostly
retained their Judeo-Spanish language (Ladino),and mostly, too, contributed
hugely to the culture and life of their new homes. They formed the
second-in-size diaspora, after the Ashkenazi , mostly Yiddish-speaking
Jews, who lived in Central and Eastern Europe. (In the U.S.A the Ashkenazim
have always been far more numerous than the Sephardim).
American movies show a wealth of Ashkenazi-descended characters, but hardly
any Sephardim.  For that matter, except, no doubt, in Israeli cinema, very
few films anywhere have dealt principally with Sephardic Jews. Offhand,
only two come to mind:  Every Time we Say Goodbye (Israel, 1986), a
charming WWII romance starring Tom Hanks; and Novia que te vea  (Mexico,
1993) in Ladino literally "would that I could see you becoming a bride,"
directed by a Mexican woman, Guita Schyfter who is no doubt Ashkenazi.
In The Governess, there's a fascinating, long opening of a synagogue, its
mass prayers and its socializing aftermath, reproduced, I would think, with
minute and colorful precision, and introducing Rosina who has a will of her
own and would like to be an actress. But soon after, her father dies and
the family is left debt-ridden. Rosina, a girl with gumption, refuses the
easy solution of marrying a rich and much older fishmonger (who smells of
his product). At a time when women's options for employment were
microscopic, just one venue is open to Rosina: to become a governess. So
she scours newspaper announcements, finds a "wanted" ad, applies under the
Gentile name of Mary
Blackchurch (sic!), forges a false background for herself, and gets hired.
Her employers live on an island off Scotland. The exteriors were filmed on
the Isle of Arran, which filmgoers could perhaps confuse with the Aran (one
r), which is in Ireland,  of Man of Aran, the superb 1934 documentary by
Robert Flaherty. Still, both films happen to have this in common: survival,
physical in Flaherty and social-psychological in the case of Rosina-Mary.
She enters a big house where the first sight is a wall festooned with
trophies of stag-heads, a sight that chills as much as the lack of heating.
Neither is made a point of, but we do feel both in the background. The lady
of the house, Mrs. Cavendish, is bored to extinction, misses the bright
lights and social life of London. Why she accepts this provincial exile is
not spelled out. We might assume that it is because Mr. Charles Cavendish
needs this isolation for his work. A cultivated man with insatiable
curiosity, he is one of those lay, amateur scientists and inventors who
devote their all to research and experiments and often come up with
discoveries. His current passion is for photography.
Rosina slowly adapts, or pretends to, in the somehow Gothic-Gentile milieu,
in spite of ham being served, occasional Christian prayers, and especially
her charge, the bratty child Clementina. Rosina, who has guts, slowly tames
the little shrew. Eventually some affection is born between them. She also
impresses her employers with her culture, knowledge, foreign languages,
even her singing of Schubert. We could have done without the latter. Above
all, she proves to be also scientifically inclined, which leads to her
assisting Mr. Cavendish.
The man's main problem is that while he can make photographs with his
camera obscura, he cannot fix them, that is, find a way to keep the images
from fading. There is no known process for this yet.
(But, to get technical, it seems to me that before 1840 , Talbot in England
and Daguerre in France had
achieved this with the use of "hypo," sodium hyposulphite. I won't quibble
however).
Accidentally, as Rosina is secretly performing a Jewish prayer --note the
symbolism--she stumbles on the answer to the problem. Until now, it was a
given that Charles and Rosina would, for obvious reasons, fall in love. Her
"invention" strengthens the bond, yet at the same time poses ego-problems
for Charles, some stemming from scientific macho-pride (he later has a
scientist visitor but he gives no credit to Rosina), some from a murky
feeling that Rosina is overwhelming his life (later too he tells her "you
consume me, I cannot be consumed").
In-between, the affair proceeds inevitably and predictably, except for
details which add color, especially as Rosina  abandons her fake
eyeglasses, becomes more sexily dressed, gets better-looking, daringly
poses for photographs au naturel (including a Salome dance of the seven
veils), even photographs Charles asleep and naked in the fullest monty -- a
big step beyond The Full Monty movie where Tom Wilkinson (Charles here)
played the foreman of the male strippers. Risque stuff indeed in a story
that marginally smacks of Bronte-Austen novels.
Predictably, when  Henry, the Cavendish's son, is sent down from Oxford,
the boy, at an age when the sap rises quickly, becomes passionate about
Rosina. Predictably, Rosina quits her job, returns to London during a
cholera epidemic. With an abrupt leap in time, we next find Rosina
established as a commercial photographer and a recorder of Jewish life.
Charles appears to have his portrait taken. "I'm in your hands" he tells
her in a symbolic double-entendre. Then, at the end of the posing "Are we
done?" She replies with another double-entendre "Yes, quite done."  She
becomes sought after. "They tell me I captured the beauty of my father's
people." The end.
The Governess has some weak points, among them the nearly total
predictability of the events. But then, lacking this, the film could not be
what it is. On the other hand, there is too much purple prose in the
lovers' dialogue. Also, several scenes are both slow and protracted, as if
the movie's makers wanted to squeeze out every drop of every setup. This
can be a become a bit dull especially since this is a work with few
characters, all supporting except for the Charles-Mary couple. I say Mary
rather than Rosina since we're positive that if he knew that she is a
Jewess --a word frequently used here--he would never have had an affair
with her.
More ambiguous (in her first starring role) is Minnie Driver's presence.
She is no beauty, she does not exude sexuality, she is not captivating. Yet
this serves the movie's feminist side subtly and well, since it tells us
that you don't have to have radiant appeal to be attractive. This also goes
with several scenes of love-making or sex which are quite realistically
awkward or naive.
Overall The Governess score many a good point. I find both the start and
the finish of the movie excellent, the former in its non-cliche nature and
length, the latter in its brusqueness. One also ought to appreciate the
metaphor, the notion that photography means possession which some want but
others do not. Think of New World Indians and others who don't want their
soul stolen by pictures. And fixing the image stands cleverly for the
fixing of relationships, feelings and attitudes.
Without insistence, the movie sketches out a latent anti-Semitism that's
familiar to the director: "at my primary school the only two other Jewish
girls and I felt completely alien, and that was only 20 years ago." There
is no attempt to spell out actions, reactions, states of mind, or to engage
into anachronistic psychology. The cinematography and use of light are
beautiful, with burnished colors, chiaroscuro, candle-light, diffraction of
images seen through pieces of glass or in reflections, etc. The whole is
without forced artiness, including the several occasions when Rosina has
dreams or perhaps sees apparitions of her late, beloved father.
The movie won as Best Film at the Karlovy Vary International Film Festival,
today the paramount festival in what used to be the Soviet bloc.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Jackal, The (1997)
THE JACKAL  (1997) * Directed by Michael Caton-Jones.Written by Chuck
Pfarrer, from the screenplay of "The Day of the Jackal" by Kenneth
Ross.Photography, Karl Walter Lindenlaub. Editing, Jim Clark. Production
design, Michael White. Music, Carter Burwell.  Produced by James Jacks,
Sean Daniels, Caton-Jones, Kevin Jarre. Cast: Bruce Willis (the Jackal),
Richard Gere (Declan Mulqueen), Sidney Poitier (Carter Preston), Diane
Venora (Valentina Koslova), Mathilda May (Isabella), J.K.Simmons
(Witherspoon),Jack Black (Lamont) et al. A Universal release.123 min. R
(much graphic violence)
A: I know. Sidney Poitier, who, in his 70s, looks great and is full of
authority. He's the FBI's Deputy Director Carter Preston, who is managing
(have the new Russians no pride?) raids against the post-Soviet Mafia.
Q: You mean Sicilian or Italian-American gangsters?
A: No, I mean post-Gorbachev Russians (alas, too true) who live in
decadent, vulgar luxury, and whose savagery makes the original Mafiosi look
like Quaker Oats.
Q: Is it possible for an American to command Russian officials?
A: I doubt it. Yet the movie invents a Politically and Feministically
Correct adjunct to Poitier. She is Colonel Valentina Koslova, a brilliant,
uniformed, gun-toting-and-shooting lady, a Scarface (wounded in action),
and as played by Diane Venora, the best thing in the film.
A: Army Intlligence,I guess --but she is now with the MVD. Or so I heard
from the very loud loudspeakers of the theater as they put out DTS sounds.
Q: What's MVD? Sounds like Music Video to me. Or a disease.
A: It stands for the Ministry for Internal Affairs .Not affairs of the
heart --but in the line of various secret and political polices. Under the
last Czars the secret services were called the Okhranka. With the 1917
Bolshevik Revolution the main secret police was the Cheka, run by Feliks
Dzerzhinsky. A few years later it was reorganized as OGPU (State Political
Administration) and led by the same man. In 1934 it   became the NKVD
(People's Commissariat for Internal Affairs) which, during WWII, begat the
MGB (not the car but the Ministry of State Security), which became the KGB
in 1954. And...
A: Sorry. I thought you might be interested....To proceed. A ruthless gang
boss whose brother was killed in an FBI-MVD raid, swears revenge, hires
lone gun super-killer the Jackal to terminate with extreme prejudice a VVIP
of the US Government. The fee is $70 million.
A: Not when you compare it to what the Willises, Schwartzeneggers,
Stallones and other plastic action puppets make per movie, or the cost of
disaster flicks, it's not all that much. To resume, the Good Guys and Gals
hear about this; Poitier recruits IRA terrorist Declan Mulqueen (Richard
Gere) by springing him from a murderous maximum security prison where the
Irishman has been for eight years, and promising a safer jail later on.
Q: What's has an IRA operative got to do with the Jackal?
A. Truth to tell, this is as fabricated as everything else in the movie and
as murky as most political debates. It gets eventually explained (sort of).
Since the Jackal is a mysterious man of a thousand faces (disguises which a
9-year old could spot); since Declan has worked with him; since Declan has
uncanny abilities to read the Jackal's mind; since he holds a grudge
against him, and so on ad absurdum, Declan must become part of the
Russian-US-Irish triumvirate of hunters.
Q: Quite a partnership. I bet you all three become friends, as they would
in any hack movie.
A: Right you are. No sweat. The real problem is for Gere to keep up his
mild Irish accent and add facial expressions -- about 4 or 5 throughout the
film. Willis has just one, plus a couple in the last minutes. Poitier is
limited by his role to about two Venora has several, plus a good accent.
Q: What next? I bet you that the climax is one of those "mano a mano"
fights between Gere and Willis?
A: The developments jump from one absurdity to the next. You're right about
the finale. But from the start no cliche goes unexploited. The film is a
big yawn.Much of it is like an ad for minivans.  Improbabilties and
impossibliities of character,timing, plot, quick changes of clothes or
uniforms, gadgetry, etc. are legion. About 720.
A: The film proper lasts around 120 minutes (7,200 seconds). With something
dumb and/or outrageous popping up every 10 seconds, we get 720.
A: Yes, and worse yet for those who know the original The Day of the
Jackal(1973), in which the killer was played with wonderful aplomb,
presence and credibility by Edward Fox. The source book, by Frederick
Forsyth, was a great thriller partly based on fact, the would-be
assassination of France's General De Gaulle. The movie version was a
beautifully constructed thriller made by a great director, Fred Zinnemann
whose films include The Wave, The Search, The Men (Marlon Brando's debut),
High Noon, The Member of theWedding, From Here to Eternity, A Hatful of
Rain, A Man for All Season, Julia.
Q: You mean it's dumb to remake a near-classic?
A: I do, especially with such a dumb script too. Director Michael
Caton-Jones (now 40) made a small splash with his first feature Scandal, on
the British Profumo/Christine Keeler sex and politics affair. He then
directed Memphis Belle, a docu-drama inspired by one of the greatest
documentaries ever made (by William Wyler, in 1944). It was about the US
airmen of the 8th Army Air Force, and their raids over Germany. Those
magnificent young flyers, their guts, the horrible losses of lives, their
talent and more made of them my personal heroes in a war that had so many.
I confess that I cannot see this masterpiece (named after one plane)
without tears swelling up. But Caton-Jones trivialized and Hollywoodized
the subject.
Then he made the ho-hum comedy Doc Hollywood. His other feature, This Boy's
Life, I couldn't bring myself to see. Now he repeats the remake mistake
with The Jackal.

Title
Review for Matewan (1987)
MATEWAN.(1987)  Written and directed by John Sayles. Produced by Peggy
Rajski, Maggie Renzi. Photographed by Haskell Wexler. Production design,
Nora Chavooshian.  Costumes, Cynthia Flynt. Music, Mason Daring. Editing,
Sonya Polonsky. Cast: Chris Cooper, Will Oldham, Mary McDonnell, Bob
Gunton, James Earl Jones, Kevin Tighe,Gordon Clapp, Josh Mostel, Ken
Jenkins, Jace Alexander, Nancy Motto, Gary McCleery, David Strathairn, Joe
Grifasi, James Kizar, Michael Preston, Joe Henderson, Ronnie Stapleton, Ida
Williams, Maggie Renzi, Hazel Dickens, John Sayles, et al. A Cinecom and
Film Gallery release. 132 minutes. Rated PG-13.
"You want to be treated like men? You want to be treated fair? Well, you
ain't men to the coal company, you're equipment. They'll use you till you
wear out or you break down or you're buried under a slate fall and they'll
get a new one, and they don't care what color it is or where it comes
from."
Thus spoke labor organizer Joe Kenehan  (Chris Cooper) to the coal miners
of    Matewan ,  in 1920, when he  came  there to form a union. Not a more
perfect union, but a patchwork  which could somehow stand up to the
merciless exploitation of the Stone Mountain Coal Company that  owned
everyone and everything in the tiny West Virginia town. Can the organized
miners refuse their bodies to the bosses and their souls to the Company
Store?
MATEWAN (pronounced MATE- WON)  chronicles  with power one of those
innumerable , tragic labor-capital confrontations that  dot the historical
map of the first part of our century.   The film is based on fact but
Sayles has  deliberately chosen to treat it both realistically and   in
naive-folkloric fashion, like the  unsophisticated laments by blue grass
balladeer Hazel Dickens which punctuate the movie with    piercing
simplicity.
The Company lowers the miners' pay while importing outside workers.  Joe
Kenehan --conceived as kissin' kin to the legendary Joe Hill - has
understanding, persistence and a sweet, dedicated idealism . Not only does
he unite his miners, he also  manages to override their suspiciousness and
racism . He forms a front of solidarity between the locals and the
imported outsiders, helpless  Southern Blacks and immigrant Italians who
join the West Virginians.  All this in spite of the  Company's   strong-arm
methods . Its  Pinkerton-like Agency   sends in two city-slick ,
strike-breaking goons ( Tighe and Clapp) who commandeer rooms at the home
of Elma, a miner's widow...
Writer-director Sayles has created  something that is unusual  these days:
a populist film on an adult subject, made in the  old-fashioned way of
straight good versus straight evil, but informed by modern sensibility and
filmmaking techniques. MATEWAN is fascinating because it is much like a
genre film, like a gangster movie or a western, while at the same time it
also harks back  to the movies of Frank Capra and their celebration of the
little people  --with two big differences: Sayles' vision is much darker
than Capra's, and , unlike Capra or genre movies, he stresses the
collective  more than the individual . It is the problem that counts more
than the people--though  , at the same time,  there is  no lack of single
portraits. The son of Elma (at whose home Joe stayed until the Agency goons
supplanted him)    is a precocious, eloquent, 15-year lay preacher as well
as a   miner who uses the Bible as a support for unionizing. The local cop
is a cleverly ambiguous figure whom one expects  to show venality and
side sooner or later with the Company , but who in fact turns out to be
like The Good Sheriff. The biggest name in the movie's cast, James Earl
Jones (as Few Clothes,)  sensitively sketches out a Black whose risk-taking
as a union man in a white-dominated society is infinitely greater than the
others'. The  two  Agency men are badness incarnate : their  gross, violent
and insulting sadism may remind you of Lee Marvin's portrayal of Liberty
Valance; in Elma's home they act  like those paranoid killers who take
hostages as well as in the way rabid  Nazis later would behave toward their
victims  when   occupying defeated countries. All the performers are
excellent in this film.
There may be manicheism at work here, but its astute of John Sayles to have
opted in part for the simplicity of early movies  in a work set in 1920. We
should not object either to  this stylization any more than we resist the
polarization between  good and bad guys in Westerns; in fact we have
infinitely better documented ,  historical proof of the  inhumanity and
greed of companies and of the savagery of strike-breakers than we do of
cowboy villains and heroes.
Sayles is a triple-threat artist: he writes, directs,  and acts. (He
appears briefly in MATEWAN , almost unrecognizably made up as a a preacher
who thunders against the Reds.) Sayles  brings superior credentials to his
film. He knows his America from experience and from minute  research. A
graduate of Williams College, he roamed this country as a meat packer, a
day laborer, and a hospital orderly. He wrote   prize-winning novels: from
his second one, UNION DUES, MATEWAN is partly derived. Sayles , as a
screenwriter, first worked for Roger Corman's factory of quickie pictures
before producing other scripts and later directing his own movies ,   all
of which deal with social problems:  THE RETURN OF THE SECAUCUS SEVEN,
LIANNA, BABY IT'S YOU, THE BROTHER FROM ANOTHER PLANET.  In MATEWAN he has
a formidable ally,  the socially committed cinematographer (and occasional
director) Haskell Wexler who shot this picture  in muted, natural hues,
naturally lit and imparted the right look to a low-budget film.
Parts of MATEWAN are left unspoken and unshown, until the film's progress
sorts them out for you. There are many good ellipses, which are in harmony
with the unloquacious nature of the West Virginians. When  Sayles uses the
old device of a purloined letter for  a  multi-level operation (a real
traitor presents Joe as an infiltrator and almost succeeds in having him
executed)  the melodrama of those sequences is balanced by  the exemplary
terseness of the aftermath.
The wonder of this movie is that it keeps up its edge-of-the-seat suspense
throughout its 132 minutes without   exhausting you , partly because there
are slow interludes, but even those are laden with tension. Anything could
happen at any moment. Near the end,   the Company brings in several armed
strike-breakers and the odds shift even more against the miners. You pray
that outside help might help the oppressed. Saviors , like The Magnificent
Seven, do not materialize, but there is a terrific, Western-style shootout
that   does  filmmakers like John Sturges  ,  Sam Peckinpah  or John Ford
proud.  At the same time, MATEWAN , directly or peripherally,  is in good
company: that of  STRIKE!,  HARLAN COUNTY, U.S.A.,  UNION MAIDS,  THE MOLLY
MAGUIRES and even parts of MODERN TIMES.  MATEWAN is certainly one of the
best  all-American movies of the year. To miss it is to turn one's back on
a crucial chapter of our history.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Liberty Heights (1999)
LIBERTY HEIGHTS  (1999)*** 1/2  Written and directed by Barry 
Levinson. Photography, Chris Doyle. Editing, Stu Linder. Production 
design, Vincent Peranio. Art direction, Alan E. Muraoka. Set 
decoration, William A. Cimino. Music, Andrea Morricone. Cast: Adrien 
Brody (Van Kurtzman), Bebe Neuwirth (the mother, Ada Kurtzman), Joe 
Mantegna (the father, Nate Kurtzman), Ben Foster (Ben Kurtzman), 
Orlando Jones (Little Melvin), Rebekah Johnson (Sylvia), David 
Krumholtz (Yussel), Richard Kline (Charlie), Vincent Guastaferro 
(Pete), Justin Chambers (Trey), Carolyn Murphy (Dubbie), Frania 
Rubinek (the Kurtzman's grandmother) James Pickens Jr ( Sylvias's 
father), et al. Produced by Levinson and Paula Weinstein. Released by 
Warners .134 minutes. R (language and suggestions of sex, neither too 
strong).
Never been to Baltimore. What I know about it comes from a sampling 
of TV's "Homicide: Life on the Street" (Barry Levinson was one of the 
executive producers as well as the director of some episodes), and 
mainly from Levinson's movies "Diner," "Tin Men," "Avalon" and now 
"Liberty Heights." But the shot of Baltimore that has stayed with me 
was in Hitchcock's "Marnie." When the kleptomaniac woman visits her 
mother, we get a sight of ships at the end of the street, a barefaced 
phony image (rear projection or whatever) of the kind the Master 
sometimes used to thumb his nose at us.
There are no such reality-defying tricks in "Liberty Heights," where 
Levinson blends both memories and imagination. Nor is the film a 
piece of nostalgia. If anything, it is a effort, and a most 
successful one at that, to evoke a certain time (1945-46), its 
Baltimore Jews, Gentiles and Blacks, anti-Semitism, racism , ethnic 
and class distinctions , and slowly changing attitudes. It's a big 
order, yet the movie may seem deceptively simple.
The film goes in several directions, all integrated  somewhat in the 
manner of a  "bildungsroman," a novel about growth. What does the 
trick is not only Levinson's talent but his strong familiarity with 
the subjects, his big-hearted approach and, within his seriousness, a 
sense of humor. He forsakes both broad comedy and mushiness.
The story centers on a middle-class family in a mostly Jewish suburb. 
Mom is sweet and traditional. Dad owns a burlesque house that by then 
was a vanishing institution. He supplements his income with the 
numbers racket. Younger son Ben is in high school, older son Van in 
college. There are major changes in the nation. TV is making its 
mark. Rock'n roll is in. More importantly, schools have just been 
desegregated.
In Ben's class there is now Sylvia, a charming black girl who must be 
the first Negro (in the parlance of the times) that Ben has ever 
noticed in an era when this big minority was of invisible men and 
women. Ben may have seen Claude Rains in a rerun of "The Invisible 
Man" movie, but he certainly had not read Ralph Ellison's "Invisible 
Man" of 1952. He immediately feels drawn to Sylvia. And he tells his 
mother that he finds her attractive. Mom's reaction "Kill me now!" is 
funny, pathetic and full of meaning.
The two youngsters make friends. The daughter of a wealthy surgeon, 
Sylvia  lives in a beautiful home. She borrows her mother's car to 
drive Ben around, but he must crouch down. Interesting how he has to 
become temporarily an invisible man.
The relationship betwen the two is chaste. In her room Sylvia 
initiates Ben to recordings of black performers. It's a revelation. 
But this comes to an end when her father the doctor catches them. 
Forcefully but calmly he makes plain that his child is not allowed to 
frequent white boys. The sequence is a small gem of acting, 
reactions,  revealing black attitudes, and turning the tables on 
whites.
(Later, there is another revelation for Ben, when, with one of his 
best buddies, he goes to most skillfully reconstructed rock 'n roll 
concert by James Brown. The boys are the only whites in the crowd, 
and they become just as delirious as the public).
In the meantime, when senior brother Van and pals go to an 
all-Gentile Halloween party, they run into anti-Semitism that 
culminates in pugilism. Van also runs into  blonde, high society 
goddess Dubbie. He is smitten as never before.
Levinson has directed his young men with acute realism and a reining 
in of theatrics. The brothers have very strong feelings but keep them 
well-controlled. It is even more notable in the case of Van. Actor 
Adrien Brody bears a strong resemblance to the late French actor 
Charles Denner ("Z," "The Two of Us, "'Landru," "The Man Who Loved 
Women"). Both performers are good at pent-up emotions, but Brody 
never explodes.
The film is one of taboos that were just beginning to go away -- and 
have not yet entirely vanished. It reminds one of the days of Civil 
Rights struggles and may make you feel sad that the then-alliance of 
blacks and Jews later came to an end. But that's a subtext of the 
movie. Its open text, while true to life, is steadily respectful of 
minorities. The Jews, for example, never refer to the blacks as 
"schwartze."  They don't badmouth them, even when the plot adds its 
third element, beyond the Ben-Sylvia and Van -Dubbie twosomes.
That element is the boys' father, Nate, a man who apparently buys a 
new Cadillac every Jewish New Year. Circumstances I will not describe 
lead him to a heavy, ruinous debt toward Little Melvin, a black 
hustler, subsequently to an odd partnership and later yet to some 
thrills. As Nate, Italian-American Joe Mantegna would, on paper, make 
an unlikely Jew, but it is not the case. Casting him may well be a 
sly political way towards integrating ethnicities.
"Liberty Heights" depicts it locales, times and segments of society 
with first-class cinematography, sets, costumes, atmosphere, period 
music and the rest.  If there are any anachronisms, they are minor. 
Its touch is light but not superficial. Its people, young and older, 
speak and act in genuine 50s  fashion. The tempo is a good balance 
between fast and leisurely sections. And the film's length is 
justified by an abundance of  very good touches.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Leaving Las Vegas (1995)
"I came here to drink myself to death " says Ben (Cage) to 
Sera (Shue). This may or may not reach the status of 
quotations like "Play it, Sam. Play 'As Time Goes By'"; "Go 
ahead, make my day";  "Here's looking at you, kid"; "Goodness 
had nothing to with it, dearie".But it is bound to find a 
place on lists and in movie-trivia games. 
Ben, arguably the heaviest drinker in movie history, is a 
gigaholic. Dismissed from his Hollywood job, he heads for 
Vegas.  There he has a strange love affair with hooker Sera. 
Contrary to the old film cliches, there is no mutual 
regeneration in this odd couple.  
The film,out for months,only recently made it to my town. By 
then I was aware of its unamimously enthusiastic (so far as I 
know) critical reception, and that Oscar nominations were 
almost guaranteed -- even though its subject does not make 
Cage and Shue shoo-ins for the big acting prizes. 
By coincidence, the day after I finally saw that movie, Dick 
F., a close friend, fine academic, actor and critic -- a man 
who understands movies -- asked for my reactions to it. Here 
they are, pell-mell, with mixed praise and reservations, the 
way I e-mailed them to him.
 1) Logically, what with Ben's daily bathtubful of alcohol, he 
should have arrived in Vegas in a hearse.
2) A drunk of his caliber and a prostitute of Sera's type are 
not intrinsically interesting. 
3) We never learn what drove Ben to the hooch, except that he 
now drinks because his wife has left him... because he drank. 
A vicious circle. We know that Sera seems proud of her talent 
for adapting to men's wishes and fantasies. "I turn on, I 
become who they want..." She is also rather smug about the 
money she makes. "I get $300 just to get in his room, and it's 
$500 after that." This does no make her "simpatica." 
4) I use the phrase "not interesting" but not "unappealing" or 
"depressing."  The last two are not drawbacks.  Many top 
movies are about human monsters. But "uninteresting" is a 
liability. 
5) Gertrude Stein said that the ordinary is more interesting 
than the extraordinary. She was right. Crazies or weirdos are 
not automatically interesting without deeper layers or 
sub-texts. 
6) Other mega-drunks can be more involving. As in John Ford's 
"The Fugitive," with Henry Fonda as the "whiskey priest," from 
Graham Greene's moving "The Power and the Glory." Or, from 
another Greene book, "The Honorary Consul," with its great 
turn by Michael Caine. Or Albert Finney in John Huston's 
neglected "Under the Volcano." Or the classic "The Lost 
Weekend" with its pathetic dipso. Or "Days of Wine and Roses" 
with its terrible slides into booze. Or the weird, nihilistic 
"Barfly," with Mickey Rourke and Faye Dunaway, both irritating 
actors -- which makes them all the more convincing as lushes.
7) Nicolas Cage is on my short list of the best performers 
around today. Again, his acting certainly is up to his 
standards. He squeezes every drop of his role with minimal 
expressions, has an odd type of politeness, gentleness and 
sincerity. His pores must ooze alcohol, but behind the skin he 
is a potentially likable fellow, which makes his tragedy all 
the sadder. Even so, his character is so limited by the script 
that he did not engage my attention sufficiently.
8) Ben is no liar, yet he states that he is great in bed. It 
is widely held that alcohol may increase desire but impedes 
performance. Go figure.
9) Sera's part is rather undeveloped. That she will fall 
incongruously for the drunk is telegraphed early on. That, 
with the rates she charges and at the rate she is going, she 
may well end up terminally diseased or even killed by someone 
(her profession has that risk) is also clear. The affair 
between two dregs is an old romantic cliche, but, I admit, 
carefully camouflaged by risque realism.  
10) Photography is excellent -- with hand-held shots and quick 
transitions -- and all the more remarkable as it was shot on 
Super-16mm stock. But why are the views of Vegas so lush, 
especially the night shots?  Why romanticize a place that is 
tawdry, Mafia-ridden and coarse, a place that, metaphorically, 
reeks of sex-for-pay and greenbacks?  This might have been 
justified if shown as the perception of romantic lovers, but 
this couple is beyond esthetic fantasies. 
(After writing the above I was told that in a TV interview 
director Figgis did address someone's complaint that night 
exteriors "looked too pretty." He replied that the 
camera-people shot handheld, with available or minimal light, 
and let the backgrounds just happen, so that the result was 
unintentional beauty. I'll have to think about this).
11) The photography as well as the story can become precious, 
as in  boozing underwater in a motel pool. I allow however 
that the vacation spot has a desolate ambiance that fits the 
mood, and that there was clever staging in the  way the motel 
owner, with contained rage, throws out the couple.
12) The odd name Sera is too obvious: it points to Que Sera, 
Sera (What Will Be, Will Be), which leads to the notion of 
fatality as well as to an anti-Doris Day image.
13) Sera's pimp sordidly sells her in Vegas. We learn nothing 
about where those two are coming from. Physically they come 
from Los Angeles, but their past is a mystery.  Ben too is 
from L.A., but at least he comes from the movie world which is 
its own kind of prostitution, a parallel to Sera's profession. 
(Note the opening of the movie in a restaurant where two 
bimbos are ready to do themselves some good by joining their 
Hollywood-executive male hosts on the casting couch).  
14) Sera gives Ben a hip flask, another obvious symbol. It 
stands for her complying with Ben's request after she had 
offered him to stay in her apartment : "I'll  do it but you 
must never ask me to stop drinking." The flask, however, is so 
ludicrously tiny for someone with superhuman imbibing powers 
that it becomes comical.  
15) The film, proceeds rather than progresses, which is OK. 
But the talk remains dull, the twosome, indifferent. Their 
speech may be natural, but it paints the movie into a corner. 
How much could one take of a "prehistoric" flick with people 
who just grunt, were it not for action (a saber-tooth tiger?) 
and Raquel Welch in a bikini? 
16) On the positive side, Shue is capable and visually 
intriguing: mow she looks now like a sleazy hooker, now like a 
sexy, rather elegant one, now like a college student, then 
like the girl-next-door or the young mother across the street.  
17) On the negative side. The abuse and violence visited on 
Sera feel like a "hey, let's have some action" afterthought.  
Experienced and streetwise as she is, she should have detected 
trouble instantly, and avoided it. 
18) On the confusing side. Sera provides a commentary by 
appearing somewhere periodically and talking to someone whom 
we don't see in what seem to be different times, places and 
people. Murky. Perhaps the filmmakers had planned to use a 
narration like those often found in films noirs, then thought 
better of it.  
19) On the irrelevant side. A TV is showing bits of actors 
Alida Valli and Joseph Cotten, in not just one but two 
different movies, "Walk Softly, Stranger," then "The Third 
Man." In the first film, Cotten is a crook redeemed by 
beautiful crippled Valli. In the second, he discovers that his 
pal Orson Welles is a crook and he (Cotten)is scorned by 
Valli. I cannot find any connections to "Vegas."  
20) The sexual climax is called "la petite mort" (the small 
death) in French and perhaps in other languages. Preciously, 
it is combined here with the big death. Ho-hum.
21) The acting is, I repeat, very good, in the grand manner 
(plus the Grand Marnier manner). At least Cage dies without 
saying "Rosebud." 
Sad footnote. The author of the source novel committed suicide 
a fortnight after the movie contract had been signed.
CREDITS.  Written & directed by Mike Figgis.  Based on the 
novel by John O'Brien. Photography, Declan Quinn. Editing, 
John Smith. Production design, Waldemar Kalinowski. Music, 
Mike Figgis.  Producers , Lila Cazes and Annie Stewart.  Cast: 
Nicolas Cage (Ben), Elisabeth Shue (Sera), Julian Sands 
(Yuri), Valeria Golino (Terri), et al.  A United Artists 
release.  112 minutes. Rated R (heavy sexual content, heavy 
drinking, violence, language).

Title
Review for Trainspotting (1996)
(UK, 1996)*** Directed by Danny Boyle. Written by John 
Hodge from the novel by Irvine Welsh.Photography, Brian
Tufano. Editing, Masahiro Hirakubo. Production design, Kave Quinn.  
Cast: Ewan McGregor (Renton), Ewen Bremner (Spud), Jonny
Lee Miller (Sick Boy), Kevin McKidd (Tommy), Robert
Carlyle (Begbie), Kelly Macdonald (Diane) and Shirley
Henderson (Gail). A Miramax release. 93 minutes. Rated R (everything you 
can imagine in a drug movie). At the Art.
"England and America are two countries divided by a common language."
Never has this been so true as in "Trainspotting," even though the US 
release is said to have been partly or fully redubbed. The film, set 
mostly among low-class to lower-middle class people in Edinburgh's 
suburb of Leith, is not spoken in the often colorful, singsong Scottish 
burr but in a slang that most of us will find from 50 to 75 percent 
impenetrable, although the almost constant voice-over by the main 
character, Mark, is relatively clear. The story, however, does come 
through in its essentials, especially as the younger people who do all 
the talking do not drop literary gems in the process. This is filmmaking 
at the opposite pole of Masterpiece Theatre. 
Still, I am sorry I didn't see the picture at the Cannes Festival, where 
it was a most sought-after film among the not competing titles. It was 
subtitled in French, which means that , ironically, a lot more French 
people than Americans have gotten the details of dialogues or 
monologues. There is a short subtitled  stretch in "Trainspotting," but 
that's in a conversation inside a dance-hall where the din is deafening.
The movie is about a group of mostly male friends and co-addicts. Not 
all, however shoot up. If I understood the goings-on correctly, one pal 
is clean, another (the violent Begbie) is addicted to drink. Overall 
though, and no matter what type of addiction, heroin reigns supreme, 
with its grunge, its glum, its filthy rooms populated mostly by syringes 
and needles--plus a baby who is neglected. 
But then everything else is neglected. The Big H has taken over, has 
made its victims victimize others (thefts and other crimes) to sustain 
the habit. A familiar story, rendered unfamiliar up to a point by 
merciless, harrowing depictions that have little or none of the 
sentimentality of many other drug movies. 
The movie has been a runaway hit in the UK, where it has been repeatedly 
compared to "A Clockwork Orange" and where it has caused controversies 
--one criticism being that it does not condemn drugs.
It does not, indeed, not in a preaching way, but it still is powerfully 
anti-drugs simply by showing what happens to its habituees. On the other 
hand, while it shows, abundantly, the symptoms, it does not go to the 
causes --something far more difficult to do and necessitating much more 
than a mere 93 minutes. There is even a cop-out when Mark says "Who 
needs reasons when you've got heroin?" -- dumb, dead-end reasoning. And 
Mark (or one of the group) comes up with the praise of heroin: "Take the 
best orgasm you ever had, multiply by a thousand, and you're still 
nowhere near." 
Reasons, however, are given. They are in the deja vu, 
rebel-without-a-cause tradition. Mark gives us the classic, ironic 
anti-bourgeois-life cause. "Choose life. Choose a job. Choose a career. 
Choose a family. Choose good health, low cholesterol and dental 
insurance. Choose fixed-interest mortgage repayments." 
The film is at its best when portraying the friends, their milieu, their 
drug and sexual adventures (there's an instant pickup of a too-young 
Catholic school girl that flashes right away to sex), and the surrealism 
of their hallucinations. The most notable one is when a  man goes to the 
"Worst Toilet in Scotland," drops in by mistake a couple of capsules, 
then plunges in after them in a nightmarish scene that takes him 
underwater. Next best (?) is when Mark, who has overdosed, is taken to 
Emergency then back to his parents' home, where, in his bed he gets 
frightening shakes, sweats, chills and visions. 
After a test for AIDS, he says "I'm the luckiest of men. I'm HIV 
negative in the middle of an epidemic." He then decides to stay clean. 
But wait...
Next, he looks for "something new" which is a respectable job in London. 
Here the movie fails in its intent. There's a rather sudden transition 
to Mark in London, walking about the City in a correct business suit, 
looking like a neat and healthy employee of whatever business it is, and 
saying in voice-over "For the first time in my life I was almost 
content." 
The way this was presented is so gauche that I thought it was another 
figment of Mark's imagination --but it was not. Then back in the saddle 
again, Mark and Co. get in n a deal to buy smack from some Russian 
sailors and resell it. They asked for 20,000 pounds, got 16,000. Pretty 
good, and pretty well filmed. So is the testing of the smack by Mark who 
gets hooked again, but, at the end, in a realistic illustration of "No 
honor among thieves"  sneaks away with the wherewithal to be voluntarily 
co-opted by the bourgeois life he had so despised.
There's more to this film than I can reveal but essentially, its 
strength is in the dispassionate way it documents the life of those 
"unfortunates" who, had they been alcoholics instead, I would have 
called them "sediment." There are some injections of humor that may or 
may not work for you.  
Within the plethora of "Addiction of the Month" theatrical and TV 
movies, "Trainspotting" stands as "Addiction of the Year." I wish,for 
comparison, that I had the time to see again a fierce competitor, the 
excellent "Panic in Needle Park" (USA, 1971) by Jerry Schatzberg, Al 
Pacino's second feature and his explosive entrance in the Great Actors 
class.
The movie's cryptic title refers to the British hobby of standing by 
passing trains and collecting the numbers on locomotives. This may be 
taken as an addiction, a useless habit. Stupid perhaps, but at 
least, benign.

Title
Review for Slacker (1991)
     Thanks to the festival circuit (Sundance, San Francisco, among
others) SLACKER was eventually picked up by a commercial distributor.
In the Pesaro (Italy) Festival's huge section on American Independent
Films, where I first saw it, this work was one of the very best
entries.
     In and around the West Campus of the University of Texas (Austin),
students, former students, drop-outs, academics and non-academics of
all types hang out.  They are "slackers", the latest breed and variant
of what used to be called beatniks, and, according to Linklater, "the
generation that would have been aborted; it just wasn't hip at the
time."
     There are 105 of them, mostly in their twenties but with older
people thrown in too.  Very few in the cast had any acting experience.
About 30% of the 105 were acquaintances.  The rest came off the street.
     SLACKER depicts a period of 24 hours in their lives.  Since the
movie deals with many types, all democratically given equal weight, it
cannot be an in-depth portrait of any one individual.  Rather, it is
the casual, off-the-wall and often very funny illustration of a
whole--not a collective but the sum of its parts.
     The camera starts on A who is a compulsive talker.  A meets meets B
(as a rule, also a compulsive talker).  B's path crosses that of equally
loquacious C who discusses life and things with D ... and so on.  By
the time we reach Z the daisy-chain stops.  There is no circle to
close, no plot or story to satisfy.  Instead, the zig-zags flow to an
end, as in real life.
     SLACKER is original, inventive and undjudgmentally ironic.  Its
approach is systematic but not at all monotonous.  Imagine a road novel
or movie, dense in characters but sparse in physical scope.  What we are
given is like fragments of a picaresque work, with routine events
devoid of high drama, and contained within one day and a few city
blocks.
     There is neither rush nor claustrophobia in this strategy.
Linklater's scripted yet candid semi-documentary does a great job of
its subculture , a subculture not one unified by purpose but rather by
aimlessness.  There is an odd passivity here, but it is not total:
there are active touches brought in by gentle freaks and semi-nuts.
     The transfer from person to person is done less through the camera
than through looking and eye contact.  The development is done through
talk.  This ranges from sophomoric profundities to mythomania, manias,
delusions or illusions.  And this talk can be hilarious, as when a
spaced-out girl tries to sell a phial of Madonna's Pap test.
     The place being Austin, where Charles Whitman shot people from the
Unversity's Tower, and the state, Texas, where John F.  Kennedy was
killed, it is no wonder that a lot of the slackers are obsessed with
murder--especially Presidential--and with conspiracy theories that
encompass politics as well as outer space.
     SLACKER is not an improvised movie.  Everything was tightly
scripted and rehearsed before the camera rolled.  Carefully planned too
was the style of the movie, a choreography based on long takes and
minimal use of montage. "This style would not fit an action film, but
it is perfect for a study of characters, since we wanted to avoid
distracting the viewer with an excessive use of the camera."
(Linklater).
     Richard Linklater, born in 1962 in Houston, briefly studied
English literature in college, dropped out, briefly worked on an
offshore oil rig in the Gulf of Mexico and briefly visited courses at
the University of Texas.  Disappointed by the way film was taught, he
quit and made his first movie, in Super-8, IT'S IMPOSSIBLE TO LEARN TO
PLOW BY READING BOOKS (1987).
     Linklater's passion for film (he was involved in the Austin Film
Society, a local operation by movie-buffs) shows in his work. "SLACKER"
he says "is an amalgamation of everything I've seen in the last five
years."  But whereas too many films use movie references gratuitously,
Linklater incorporates his organically, with freshness and creativity.
For example, the influence of Jean-Luc Godard in SLACKER's absurdist
gags is pleasantly obvious, as in the opening scenes with Linklater as
a cabbie's voluble fare, and the subsequent accident which has echoes
of BREATHLESS.
     Most of SLACKER's 97 minutes are varied, vastly entertaining,
perspicacious and sometimes touching.  College people should not miss
it, nor, for that matter, anyone else who needs the comfort of unusual,
non-commercial, imaginative film-making.

Title
Review for Ridicule (1996)
RIDICULE *** 1/2  Directed by Patrice Leconte.Written by Remi Waterhouse
with the collaboration of Michel Fessler and Eric Vicaut. Photography,
Thierry Arbogast. Production design, Ivan Maussion . Editing, Joelle Hache.
Music, Antoine Duhamel. Cast: Charles Berling (Baron Gregoire Ponceludon de
Malavoy), Jean Rochefort (Marquis de Bellegarde), Fanny Ardant (Madame de
Blayac), Judith Godreche (Mathilde de Bellegarde), Bernard Giraudeau (Abbot
de Vilecourt), Urbain Cancelier (Louis XVI) et al. A Miramax Zoe release.
In French with subtitles. 102 min. Rated R (sexual situations)
See this delightful movie and you'll be miles ahead in understanding the
French people.
Before an American lady of my acquaintance left for Paris, a French friend
in the USA gave her this advice: "In France you can say what you want, if
you say it cleverly."
This has not changed much in that land, although it has no longer the
sometimes paroxystic levels found in the chic salons during the second half
of the 17th century and all of the 18th.
In 1783 Baron Ponceludon de Malavoy lives in a southern area of swamplands
that breed mosquitoes that  have been killing hordes of people. He is an
engineer with a grand plan of draining the swamps. Lacking the wherewithal
, he gets on his horse and rides up to Versailles where the court lives its
dolce vita. The French Revolution is only six years away, but no aristocrat
shown seems conscious of its coming or of anything except entertainment and
being noticed by the King.
The King is Louis XVI, who will be guillotined in a few years, as will his
wife Marie-Antoinette and many of the courtiers. Ponceludon  naively hopes
to gain access to His Majesty and ask him for life-saving funds. He is
rapidly taken in hand by a protector, the Marquis de Bellegarde, who is
also a doctor (his talents are gently mocked by the movie) and a scientist.
His experiments have impoverished him, but he is nonetheless in good
standing at Versailles.
The Marquis opens the idealist visitor's eyes to the facts of life at the
court. One needs not only sponsors but wit in a high society where people
constantly play games and are deadly bored by anything approaching serious
issues. They only take seriously unseriousness, "legerete" (lightness)
superficiality. They practice  "esprit" (wit), "mots" (bons mots),  puns,
paradoxes, cutting remarks, rapier repartees, quotable quips or amusing
verse. The Marquis himself is strong along those lines. Nothing upsets him
more than when after a gathering he thinks of a witticism he could have
made earlier.
A clever quip and your fortune may be made. A bad one or one at your
expense, and you are covered with ridicule and disgraced. Luckily,
Ponceludon is not a titled bumpkin from the provinces, but is well read and
has a great gift for words. The Marquis introduces him to the nobility,
especially to a beautiful Countess, Madame de Blayac, one of many passing
mistresses of the king. She sleeps with her household clergyman, the Abbe
de Vilecourt.
Both the Countess and her Abbe have a fearful talent for "esprit." This
goes beyond games. Wit can be --and often is-- used cruelly, to put down
people and insult them, to exact private vengeance, sometimes to reduce
them to a form of dishonor through verbal dueling. Words are like swords
dipped in honey or perfume, but still lethal. It's all done with exquisite
elegance that never includes the use of vulgar epithets or even ordinary
insults. "Imbecile" and "idiot" are reserved for social  inferiors.
All this goes hand in hand with promiscuity, amorality and immorality --and
with highly amusing situations, among them a blase nobleman returning from
England where he has discovered "humour." A pity the film does not dig
deeper in comparisons between wit and  humour.
Ponceludon is a hit at Versailles, but must conform to the rules. In just
days he spends on clothes his income for a year. He starts using foppish
powder and lipstick. His mentor advises him not to laugh at his own jokes
and, whenever he laughs, not to do it with his mouth open. Yet if
Ponceludon meets with success, the King is still hard to reach. Among other
stumbling blocks is the necessity to prove to the court  genealogist that
his
nobility does go back to the year 1199!
Meanwhile back at the Marquis's country home the Baron has met, argued with
and predictably fallen in love with Mathilde, the daughter of the Marquis,
a scientist herself (she works on diving suits), a pure young woman who is
the opposite of the corrupt courtiers, a daughter whom her father brought
up by the precepts of Jean-Jacques Rousseau, with naturalness and freedom.
(She's really an anachronistic, late 20th Century young lady).
Matters get complicated. Mathilde, needing funds for her experiments, has
almost accepted to marry a rich old man who is looking forward to becoming
a widower. The scene of a cynical prenuptial contract is a howl. Ponceludon
is tempted by his new milieu, but he holds steady in his plans to rescue
his people back home. Finally, he does get into the King's good grace...
There's a surprising amount of plot, but it is subservient to the
minute-by-minute details. The developments include the main figures, a
duel, a touching sequence around the Abbe de l'Epee (a real figure) and his
school for deaf-mutes, in which the court's snobs get their comeuppance,
and more...
The movie was the opener at the 1996 Cannes Festival. It is beautifully
photographed and scored, with a profusion of beautiful interiors,
exteriors, costumes and artifacts. The casting is perfect, as are all the
delicious performances. Remarkably, the film has three newcomers to the
screen: Berling
(Ponceludon), Godreche (Mathilde) and scriptwriter Waterhouse.
Director Leconte, known in France for comedies not exported to the USA, has
a sense of humot that he sneaks  even into such films as the thriller
"Monsieur Hire," and the very offbeat love story "The  Hairdresser's Wife."
He has stated that he did not attempt to catch with total authenticity the
looks, moods, sounds or lifestyles of the period. Or to draw parallels
between that society and ours. No matter. His quirky recreation is
convincing, his subject is original and the film drips with Frenchness as
much as any I can think of.

Title
Review for Out of Sight (1998)
OUT OF SIGHT ** 1/2  Directed by Steven Soderbergh. Written by Scott Frank,
based on the novel by Elmore Leonard. Photography, Elliot Davis. Editing,
Ann V.Coates. Production design, Gary Frutkoff. Music, David Holmes. Cast:
George Clooney (Jack Foley), Jennifer Lopez (Karen Sisco), Ving Rhames
(Buddy Bragg), Don Cheadle (Maurice "Snoopy" Miller), Dennis Farina
(Marshall Sisco), Albert Brooks (Richard Ripley), Steve Zahn (Glenn
Michaels), Isaiah Washington (Kenneth), Luis Guzman (Chino),  Catherine
Keener (Adele), Keith Loneker (White Boy Bob), Nancy Allen (Midge), also
Michael Keaton & Samuel L. Jackson. Produced by Danny DeVito, Michael
Shamberg, Stacy Sher. Executive producers, Barry Sonnenfeld, John Hardy. A
Jersey film released by Universal. 120 minutes. R (language, violence,
sex).
Some movie titles have a facile built-in zinger that can be used by
reviewers who don't like the film. Here it would be "Out of Sight, Out of
Mind." But so far as I know, there are hardly any critical put-downs.The
picture is getting very good-to-excellent reactions. Yet so far as I am
concerned, the Out of Mind bit does apply--but not as a would-be-scathing
comment. Let me explain.
OOS is amusing and inventive, but at the same time, it moves in such a
here-and-there, this-and-that fashion that I find it hard to replay it in
my mind. Put it this way: it has not left in me any repercussions, the
feeling that it is both "rememberable" and memorable. Rather, it is instant
gratification. I do grant you that judgments on many a film become valid
only after a second screening, but I've had no time to do this. When it
does happen, the movie may go up a half-star, or down.
It opens with a tricky, clever and funny  flashback. Simpatico George
Clooney plays Jack Foley, an incorrigible bank robber. He works without
weapons and apparently gets caught  each time.Whether he is a dumb planner
or an unlucky heister, is none too clear. I am intrigued by the name Foley.
In the Beverly Hills Cop series, Eddie Murphy was Axel Foley. Except for
their sense of humor, in  many ways Jack the Robber is the opposite of Axel
the Lawman.
Cut to Jack's current prison. Laid-back Foley and his buddy Buddy (sic)
(Ving Rhames) break out. (The technicalities are not detailed as in
traditional  jailbreak flicks). In the process (don't ask) they kidnap US
Marshal  Karen Sisco (Jennifer Lopez). A reference to Siskel and Ebert? To
the Cisco Kid?
Buddy drives the getaway car, Karen and Jack, hidden in the trunk, have an
amusing but unlikely flirtatious conversation -- the beginning of a
beautiful affair in which Jack is after Karen romantically. She responds
but  is also professionally after Jack.
The source novel is by Elmore Leonard, whose idiosyncratic thrillers or
action tales have hordes of admirers. Many of his books were made into
films, including Jackie Brown, Get Shorty, Joe Kidd, Hombre, 52
Pick-up.Leonard has co-scripted some, also written original  scenarios.
This picture is a big change in subject and style for director Soderbergh.
After his first film ,Sex, Lies, and Videotape (1989) won the Golden Palm
at Cannes, he became an instant "auteur" icon, a star among the avant-garde
of the American New Wave cinema. Rather than go commercial, he went on to
more or less low-budget "art" films. These did badly at the box-office and
by many critics. Yet his Kafka is interesting, King of the Hill very good
(and rather mainstreamish). The Underneath, Schizopolis, Gray's Anatomy,
got him nowhere. Now, his decision to shift gears into full mainstream is
paying off handsomely.
Out of Sight is certainly a mass-appeal movie. The plot is convoluted in a
sometimes outlandish combination of Soderberghisms and Leonardisms. It
certainly requires suspension of disbelief. In two hours, so much is thrown
in that there's enough to feed two or three different films.The dialogue
and the banter can sound outrageous but I sensed the planning and planting
of colorfulness or cuteness in it.
It all  feels like a hybrid: a tall tale for the majority of viewers, along
with unexpected, even gratuitous, narrative and technical slants, sorties
and sallies by the experimentalist who lies in Soderbergh's psyche.
Absurdism, expressionism and filmic unorthodoxy may not be the film's main
traits, yet they're still very much present. At times, those are welcome
touches. At times they slow down the picture, interfere with its momentum,
as in a sequence of the couple doing goo-goo eyes by a picture window, way
up in a hotel bar. The rain outside is as phoney as any I've seen.  But the
excellent,entertaining acting of all involved is the movie's greatest asset.
Essentially OOS belongs to the familiar sub-genre of comedies about
fumbling thieves or outlaws. It could have been worse. Or better.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Tin Cup (1996)
TIN CUP (1996) ** 1/2  Directed by Ron Shelton. Written by John Norville 
and Shelton. Photography, Russell Boyd. Editing,  Paul Seydor, Kimberly 
Ray. Production design, James Bissell. Music, William Ross. Produced by 
Gary Foster, Ron Shelton.  Cast: Kevin Costner (Roy "Tin Cup" McAvoy ), 
Rene Russo (Dr. Molly Griswold), Cheech Marin (Romeo ), Don Johnson 
(David Simms), Linda Hart (Doreen), Dennis Bickley (Earl) et al. A 
Warners release. 135 min. Rated R (language). 
Readers who make a beeline for the ratings of reviews, please note that 
from a filmic point of view "Tin Cup" rates two stars but for golf 
enthusiasts three. Average: two-and-a-half.
Writer-director Ron Shelton's credentials are first-rate. He is a former 
minor league baseball player who knows his sports and their milieu.  He 
brings to his sports movies technical interest, human interest, humor and 
very good characterizations. He made  "Bull Durham" (with Costner), 
"White Men Can't Jump," "Blue Chips," the underrated "Cobb,"  the wildly 
amusing "The Best of Times,"(script) as well as two excellent but also 
somewhat underrated political films :"Under Fire" (writer, second unit 
director) and "Blaze."
"Tin Cup" is about  Roy "Tin Cup" McAvoy (Costner), the golf pro of a 
driving range in Salome, in West Texas. To call the place seedy, shabby 
or threadbare would be a compliment. Roy, a former golf champion at the 
University of Houston, has fallen into bad times because of his eccentric 
and extreme risk-taking in golf. Now he lives at the range in a decrepit 
Winnebago --outside of which is a child's plastic pool called "The Spa"--
with his friend-mentor-caddy Romeo (Cheech Marin). Roy is surrounded by a 
small coterie of boozing good ole' boys, whose own means of support are 
by and large mysterious.
It's a colorful, Tobacco Road-like setup, but this overlong movie's 
sluggish tempo did make me look at my watch more than once. Another debit 
is that  excessive picturesqueness strains credibility, especially as Roy 
seems to be entirely client-less. Who pays for the gas, beer and 
doughnuts? Until, that is, a Junoesque blonde shows up.  She is Molly 
Griswold (ex-supermodel Rene Russo), no, change this to Doctor Griswold, 
as Molly holds a degree in psycho-something. By coincidence, she's the 
new shrink in Selena. As things develop, especially in a later scene (one 
of the film's best) when she blurts out her own imperfections, she's a 
lousy shrink. By comparison, Ann Landers deserves a Pulitzer Prize in 
counseling.
Molly wants instruction to impress her boyfriend David Simms (Johnson), a 
rising-star pro golfer. By coincidence, David was Roy's colleague and 
competitor at the University of Houston, and apparently a man unburdened 
by ethics. By coincidence, David shows up at the range. Slick and 
self-possessed, he briefly reminisces to Roy about the school and the 
days "where we won all them titles together." The University must have 
done more good to David's golf than to his grammar.
He offers a job to Roy who thinks is as a player but  turns out to be  as 
a caddy. Thereby hang complications and escalations  leading to Roy 
playing in the U.S. Open. They also lead to the inevitable Roy-Molly 
affair, a weak side of the movie. The initial rapprochement is too cute 
and, like much else in the film, exaggerated. The contrast between 
unkempt Roy and perfectly groomed Molly in blindingly virginal white -- 
the stuff Hollywood movies love-- is all the more unlikely since even 
being way downwind from Roy must be an experience in redolence.
On the other hand, on a 1 to 10 scale of expressivity, Costner rates a 5,  
Russo a 2, so they are pretty well matched. They are also matched in age 
(both over 40), in brains (simplistic), in accents (vague). The 
intonations are certainly not Texan. (Both actors and the director are 
South Californians). Molly and Roy are, however, preciously mismatched in 
verbal expression. She is a no-nonsense pragmatist. He is a philosopher 
and mystic who delivers poetic paeans that sound like "Zen and the Art of 
Golfing."
"Tin Cup" is not free from cliches, but the culmination is a good, 
non-Hollywoodian twist. Predictably, it is at the U.S. Open where the big 
duel between Roy and David takes place. The Open is beautifully 
reproduced, edited and photographed, a dead ringer of the real thing, 
including genuine players and network sportscasters. 
There are a few surprises, yet on the whole the Roy-David contrast is 
unconvincing. Roy is a cuckoo idealist, while David, co-opted by society, 
plays not only the game of golf but The Game. But while supposed to be a 
sneaky meanie, he is not unlikable. Around mid-film, Roy challenges 
David, bets his old Cadillac convertible (Caddies for Caddies?), loses. 
Yet  within hours Molly delivers the chariot to Roy saying that David 
(who drives his own fancy ragtop) "has no use for it." It would seem that 
a true villain would love to deprive Roy of his wheels. 
Director Shelton can be very good with supporting characters. First prize 
here goes to Cheech Marin in an original, funny-warm role, cleverly 
exploited. Second prize to Linda Hart as a tough-but-sweet owner of the 
golf range, owner-performer of a thriving strip-joint and ex-amour of 
Roy's. No role however, major or minor, is really developed.
Rene Russo is a tentatively original creation. She is also a problem for 
my spell-checker. It insists that her given name should be "Renee," since 
with just one "e" it is a man's name. True, there is something masculine 
about her face as the camera annoyingly persists in showing it in 
close-up, which stresses a certain lack of charisma. The excess of 
adoring Costner close-ups compounds the trouble. So the best way to watch 
"Tin Cup" is not as a sports-plus-love story, but as a plain sports movie 
with some novelties.

Title
Review for Passion Fish (1992)
PASSION FISH (1992) *** Written, directed and edited by John Sayles. 
Cinematography, Roger Deakins. Production design, Dan Bishop. Music, 
Mason Daring. Cast: Mary McDonnell, Alfre Woodard, David Strathairn, 
Vondie Curtis-Hall, et al. A Miramax release. 134 min. Rated R 
(language). 
A New York cab accident paralyzes TV soap actress May-Alice Culhane 
(Mary McDonnell) from the waist down. Bitter, rebellious and given to 
corrosively black jokes on herself,  May-Alice makes a "difficult" 
paraplegic. She stays angry after she moves to her empty family home in 
rural Louisiana. Becoming something of a hermit, she swills wine, 
watches TV non-stop and keeps firing nurse-companions. May-Alice may be 
a royal pain, but the nurses, in a clever twist of the script, are 
themselves pains in sundry ways. 
The moment Chantelle (Alfre Woodard) shows up, any film or TV-watcher 
over age 9 knows that between the once spoiled, now hostile white woman 
and the pan-faced black graduate of the school of hard knocks, there 
will be bonding.  Predictable too are the sparks that will fly in the 
process of generating a rapport  between the two, as well as alleviation 
of the women's aches.  But writer-director Sayles has a way of taking 
the foreseeable and giving it, if not total originality, at least 
freshness. 
In a photographic darkroom of her house, May-Alice finds a Leica M-3 
camera. This is a model introduced several decades ago, a classic 
without the gadgetry and automation of no-think modern cameras. It still 
works beautifully, it is still used by photographers.  Like the Leica, 
"Passion Fish" is something of a classic movie story plot, one that  
generally works well, without  having to resort to audience manipulation 
or gimmickry.
>From the start to about the midpoint the film engrosses and captivates.  
McDonnell's acting, natural looks and appeal (even when she bitches), 
the script and the direction, make May-Alice's rage entirely 
understandable. There is self-pity here, of course, but not of the 
viewer-alienating kind. 
What is really a tour-de-force is that without fake sentimentality, 
without condescension, and without diminishing May-Alice's hurt, John 
Sayles's film entertains and makes you laugh. The writer-director also 
holds in reserve some minor surprises, mostly dealing with Chantelle's 
own problems.  
Sayles has a good stock of ingenious, inventive and funny touches or 
scenes, most of them plausible.  Among the best : three satirically 
treated visits to May-Alice :by former schoolmates; her soap opera 
colleagues; and her producer. All of them stress that no matter how sad 
May-Alice's situation is now, her former life was one of immense 
inanity. By "lfe" I mean her professional life, since, oddly, we learn  
almost nothing about her private existence before the accident. 
Also bizarre is the nature of new romances that develop for both women. 
It is no doubt unintended, but I have the feeling that Chantelle and 
May-Alice are slumming sentimentally.
Chantelle meets Sugar (Vondie Curtis-Hall), a local Don Juan, bon vivant 
and rake. As for May-Alice, there is a serious rekindling of attraction 
for Rennie (David Strathairn), erstwhile "wild boy" school chum, now a 
subdued gas-pumper, handyman and bayou guide, father of five and husband 
of a prudish, puritanical termagant. Like much else that is left to 
one's imagination in the film, Rennie's wife is heard about but not 
seen. 
Sayles, an independent and "different" filmmaker, has respect for his 
audience and does not spell out everything. But extending this 
sketchiness to the women's  new male relationships makes me rather 
uncomfortable.  
These are not matches made in Heaven. Sugar's past record and present 
attitudes do not bode well for the kind of steady, supportive rapport 
that Chantelle needs. Granted, too, that May-Alice is not presented as a 
thinker (the dialogues are naturalistic but of no particular depth or 
interest), she still towers, in appeal and sophistication, above Rennie 
the Redneck.  
The slow, deliberate tempo of the film works very well initially.  It is 
around the halfway mark that one starts becoming conscious of slowness 
-- and of some arbitrariness.  One example: when May-Alice starts 
shooting pictures,  this, we realize, will help her psyche. But 
photographers' eyebrows will go way up as May-Alice develops and prints 
her work with antique chemicals and paper that must be moldy by now -- 
and all this without assistance or special equipment.is she does. 
"Passion Fish" has the appeal of a solid subject done without 
Hollywodian preaching or moralizing.  All-around performances are good, 
Woodard's  and McDonnell's are excellent.  The movie feels like a 
"Kammerspiel " (a chamber play) opened up, with the best sections 
happening in and around the house.  May-Alice, for example, starts 
taking pictures. Whether she realizes it or not, the audience knows that 
this will help her psychological rehabilitation -- a plus point in the 
film.   
No matter how warmly you might feel about some of the characters, except 
for May-Alice's plight, there is nothing that's particularly strong or 
involving about the problems of the rest.  And neither the protagonists 
nor the supporting cast are given many dimensions. 
To put it differently, Sayle's script, especially when it is ironical, 
is more interesting than the creatures it contains. 

Title
Review for Seven Years in Tibet (1997)
SEVEN YEARS IN TIBET ***  Directed by Jean-Jacques Annaud. Written by Becky
Johnston, based on the book by Heinrich Harrer. Photography, Robert
Fraisse. Editing, Noelle Boisson. Production design, At Hoang. Music,John
Williams. Cello solos by Yo-Yo Ma.Produced by Annaud, John H. Williams and
Iain Smith. Cast: Brad Pitt (Heinrich Harrer), David Thewlis (Peter
Aufschnaiter), B.D. Wong (Ngawang Jigme), Mako (Kungo Tsarong), Danny
Denzongpa (Regent), Victor Wong (Chinese "Amban"), Ingeborga Dapkunaite
(Ingrid Harrer), Jamyang Jamtsho Wangchuk (Dalai Lama at 14), Lhakpa
Tsamchoe (Pema Lhaki) and Jetsun Pema (Great Mother). A Tri-Star release.
134 min. PG-13.
Tibet is where James Hilton set his famous, utopian novel "Lost Horizon"
(1933), later a most popular film  (1937) by Frank Capra. A plane carrying
a small group (motley, of course) of westerners crashes in the Himalayas.
The survivors end up in Shangri-La, a paradise in a hidden valley where
calm and wisdom reign, and some people just never age. The term Shangri-La
has entered most languages. Franklin Roosevelt established the presidential
retreat called Shangri-La in 1942. It became Camp David in 1953.
"Seven Years in Tibet" is based on the autobiographical 1953 best-seller by
Heinrich Harrer. The ghost of Shangri-La hovers over much of  the movie,
although this is no fantasy. The most visible symptom is that protagonist
Harrer, who spends 12 years in the region (seven of them in Tibet proper),
doesn't seem to age at all.
Brad Pitt plays Harrer, an Austrian champion alpinist. In the Fall of 1939
he is at the Vienna train station, leaving for the Himalayas, hoping to be
the first to climb Nanga Parbat, one of the highest peaks (26,660 feet ;
Everest rises to 29, 028).  By that time Austria had been annexed by
Hitler's Third Reich, to the great joy of far too many Austrians. This was
the notorious "Anschluss" (Union) that had been preceded in 1934 by
Austrian Nazis murdering the Chancellor, Engelbert Dollfuss.
The Nazis give Harrer a send-off with honors, complete with Nazi flag.
Harrer seems indifferent to the fuss --if not impatient. His marriage is
rocky as his pregnant wife feels abandoned. Heinrich also reacts dourly to
fellow Austrian guide Peter Aufschnaiter (David Thewlis) who may have been
appointed by the regime (but this, like other details, is unclear).
Next comes some spectacular climbing. The two Austrians do not get along
because Heinrich takes too many foolhardy (read also "ego-boosting")
chances and is arrogant. Soon however, in September 1939, Germany and
England are at war. The British intern the climbers in a POW camp.
Over the years, lone wolf Heinrich tries to escape four times. After
joining a group attempt he immediately leaves his companions to make his
way to northern India. Getting very close to Tibet, he runs into Peter. The
Wandering Aryans, ever bickering and antagonistic, trek for about two
years-- the time-frame is imprecise. The twosome are prevented by Tibetans
from entering the country but after more adventures they manage to sneak
into the holy city of Lhasa where they are exempted from the
"no-foreigners" rule.
All this has interest, suspense, unforced colorfulness and spectacular
landscapes. But time and space are so episodic that what we see feels like
excerpts from a 4-hour movie. We're left with many other questions too.
Among them: how did the men survive their horrible hardships in the
mountainous wilderness?  why hadn't their scavenger-type diet not given
them scurvy or vermin given them diseases?  how is it that when they reach
Lhasa, after their first baths and shaves in years, they can look so fresh,
hale and hearty?
The companions find an entirely new mode of life in Tibet, gradually blend
in as much as outsiders could. There is even a flirtation with a handsome
lady-tailor, whom Peter later marries. While the Austrians fit in, the
movie is careful not to indulge in travelogue picturesqueness or get
carried away by the spirituality of the Tibetan religion. Yet the people,
their ways of thinking and their beliefs certainly affect the Austrians.
A major influence on Heinrich will come later from his relationship with
the Dalai Lama, who is first shown as a child, then in various stages of
growth.  When the boy is about 12, his mother (played by the sister of the
real Dalai Lama!) asks Heinrich to tutor him. His Holiness is bright,
witty, enormously curious about Western ways and other matters, and utterly
charming.
In spite of much protocol, the growing friendship between Heinrich and his
pupil leads to warm informality when the two are alone, in what are
arguably the best sections of the movie, especially as these do not veer
into sentimentality. Weighing heavily too is the fact that while Heinrich
was a POW, he had received a letter from his wife, announcing that she had
had his baby, was divorcing him and remarrying. After the European war
ended, Heinrich kept sending letters to his son until the latter replied:
"You are not my father. Please stop writing me letters."
For the steadily mellowing Heinrich, the transition to considering the
young Dalai Lama as a kind of surrogate son was natural, but again this is
not Hollywoodishly underlined. The Austrian teaches his fast-learning
charge a great deal, from geography and English to the West in general.  In
wonderfully mundane touches, he even fixes an old car, an old radio,  and
since his pupil is a film fan and collector, he creates a movie-house for
the public. (I wonder where and how Heinrich acquired all those talents).
World War II comes to an end. The Chinese under Mao want to absorb Tibet.
Theirs is an enormous army, while the Tibetan forces are pathetically
minuscule. The rest is history. China invades, causes one million (if not
more) Tibetan deaths, destroys 6,000 lamaseries. Particularly interesting
is the parallel between the Nazis and the Communists, a connection probably
not lost on Heinrich but not hammered. The war scenes are impressive.
Finally Heinrich returns to Vienna in 1951, where he makes his peace with
his boy.
Throughout, without engaging in depth into character studies, the film
follows the changes in Heinrich. These were true changes, but it is
simplistic to speak of redemption. The script does not confuse the road to
Lhasa with the road to Damascus. The first part's Heinrich is
self-centered, vainglorious, not the most caring of husbands or comrades,
but the film does not make him a brute or a villain. The problem with
Heinrich actually came up after  the movie had been shot, when in the
summer of 1997, the German "Stern Magazine" revealed that he had been a
member of the Nazi Party, of the SA and the SS. This led to a quick
post-production addition. The evolving Heinrich does a brief voice-over of
"mea culpa" : "My bad deeds are purified. I've done so many things I
regret."
That he was in the Nazi party is to be expected. Hardly any major figures
(especially athletes) were not or could get out of being members. The SA/SS
business is far more disturbing, but then it could be argued that it makes
Harrer's transformation all the stronger.
To shoot the picture in Tibet was out of the question. To film in India (as
originally planned) turned out to be impossible for a variety of reasons.
But French director Annaud has tackled difficult, original and demanding
subjects such as the Oscar-winning colonialist satire "Black and White in
Color," the prehistoric "Quest for Fire," "The Bear," "The Lover," "The
Name of the Rose."
For "Seven Years" he and his people had to fake their locations in the
Argentinian Andes, of lower elevation and different nature. They achieved
this splendidly, and in the face of huge logistic problems. Real Tibetans
(and yaks) were imported in great numbers.
The French Vietnamese production designer At Hoang recreated Tibet
painstakingly and convincingly. The stand-in for Nanga Parbat was in
Canada's British Columbia. The film's look is so beautiful that one can
sense the painfulness of the editing process, where so much fine footage
has to be sacrificed, discarded.
Technically ambitious, the movie does not get artificially heavy with the
moral progress of its protagonists yet does sketches it out sufficiently
and tellingly. The Austrians and  especially most Tibetans are shown
without big epic touches but rather with affectionate,  realistic
understanding, There are many humorous bits too. The Tibetans' clapping of
hands does not mean applause but chasing away evil spirits; sticking out
their tongues means "welcome"; building must proceed without harming any
living beings, worms included; and more.
All performances are very good, with the Dalai Lamas, from ages 4 to 14,
stealing the show.  American heartthrob Brad Pit and British actor's actor
David Thewlis play soberly, do not engage in unnecessary theatrics. Their
well-rehearsed Teutonic accents are above-average in quality and
consistency, but they will not fool listeners who have an ear trained in
foreign languages.
About the vanquishing of the Himalayas. The British concentrated on
Everest, the Americans on K2, and the Germans on  Nanga Parbat and
Kanchenjunga. In 1953, Austrian climber Hermann Buhl, of the Austro-German
team led by Karl Maria Herrligkoffer, reached the summit of Nanga Parbat.

Title
Review for Walk on the Moon, A (1999)
A WALK ON THE MOON **1/2  Directed by Tony Goldwyn; written by Pamela
Gray; director of photography, Anthony Richmond; edited by Dana Congdon;
music by Mason Daring; production designer, Dan Leigh; produced by Dustin
Hoffman, Goldwyn, Jay Cohen, Neil Koenigsberg, Lee Gottsegen and Murray
Schisgal; released by Miramax Films.CAST: Diane Lane (Pearl Kantrowitz),
Viggo Mortensen (Walker Jerome), Liev Schreiber (Marty Kantrowitz), Anna
Paquin (Alison Kantrowitz), Tovah Feldshuh (Lilian Kantrowitz), Bobby
Boriello (Daniel Kantrowitz), et al. 107 minutes. R  (sex).
A nice movie, even though it is too slow, too long, has overly neat and
predictable developments, and is unsubtle (but then its people are
unsubtle, too).
It's the first directorial effort by actor Tony Goldwyn, the grandson of
the famous Sam Goldwyn who created MGM. It is also the first filmed script
by Pamela Gray. She wrote it as her thesis for the UCLA Film Department,
and the scenario attracted much attention.
The movie (shot in Canada's Laurentians standing in for the Catskills )
centers on Pearl Kantrowitz (Lane), a young and comely mother of two,
Alison (Paquin) 14, and much younger Daniel. Her husband Marty (Schreiber)
is a Brooklyn TV-repairman. The time is the summer of 1969. Marty drives
his family, including his mother Lilian (Feldshuh) to the low-end Jewish
resort of Dr.Fogler's bungalows. Marty, like many other, unretired men, has
to go back to work and gets to the bungalows only on weekends.
Pearl is a pretty woman with a beautiful figure -- often displayed. She is
vaguely dissatisfied with her life.  Married to Marty when she was a
teenager (and pregnant with Alison), she has known no other men (carnally,
that is) and is also aware of the hippie culture of the times, and the
"freedom" that goes with it.
While, at the resort, rather too neatly Alison gets her first period and
her first boyfriend, Pearl meets Walker (Mortensen), aka The Blouse Man. He
is a peddler of women's garments, an itinerant dweller of his bus
shop-plus-home. Pearl has an affair with him. Marty finds out. But there's
a probably (and certainly contrived) happy ending.
AWOTM does a good job in its observation of people, that is, its nucleus of
the five Kantowitzs plus Walker. The other characters are strictly an
uncluttering background, which is good -- even though contemporary
Jewish-American filmmakers (Gentiles would not dare !) including this
picture's, tend to overdo ethnic accents, manners and mannerisms. They add
to them touches of irony (granted this is often warm) that can border on
the tiresome.
However, the Kantowicz family is free of ethnic touches, except for old pro
Tovah Feldshuh who portraysa most original and sweet mother-in-law. All the
people in the film are real, even veristic, which amounts to their being
rather dull, as most terra-firmans are. But the main problem is not there.
It is in the construction.
First come the symbols, metaphors, parallels and improbabilities, starting
with the movie's title. The summer of 69 was the summer of the first man to
walk on the moon (Neil Armstrong on 20 July). While the gathered
bungalow-dwellers watch on TV the liberation of earthlings, and rejoice,
Pearl, inside Walker's bus, goes into sexual orbit and finds her own sexual
liberation. Too pat.
The coincidental mother-and-daughter newfound sexuality? Too pat. Later,
Walker and Pearl cavort and make love under a waterfall, but the camp's
denizens do not notice. Improbable. The Woodstock Rock Festival   (15-17
August), held not at Woodstock but in Bethel , N.Y., is too conveniently
close to  Dr. Fogler's Bungalows. Alison and new boyfriend Ross scoot  over
to the festival where she spots her Ma writhing with abandon with her
lover. Too much. When Pearl takes to the road, in the rain, the itinerant
Walker just happens to be driving by.   Young Daniel gets strung by bees
--at a providential time that triggers his dad's return to the resort. Too
pat. And so on.
I 'll  make an educated guess here. As a film student, script-writer Pamela
Gray must have most certainly seen several classic movies. Her scenario is
under the sign of at least three masterpieces of the 30s and 40s: The Rules
of the Game (France), Casablanca (US), Brief Encounter (UK).
In The Rules of the Game, Renoir went to some careful preparations before
the wife of the host, testing a small monocular, spies her husband
embracing his (now-ex) mistress.  In  AWOTM, Alison, using unexplained
binoculars, spots Pearl and Walker within a crowd of hundreds of thousands!
In Casablanca, Rick parting with Ilsa utters the famous "it doesn't take
much to see that the problems of three little people don't amount to a hill
of beans in this crazy world."  He is right, but such is the power of that
movie that, paradoxically, those problems do affect the audience. Which is
not the case in AWOTM, where, as in many more movies, private or domestic
problems affect the characters but not the public. Such  movies do not go
beyond their own borders.
Brief Encounter is a masterpiece among films in general and love stories in
particular. The short-lived affair, with no sex, between married Celia
Johnson and Trevor Howard is so achingly beautiful that it can haunt you
for years. What is important for the characters is certainly not trite for
us.
This said, the principals' performances are very good. For Diane Lane, Liev
Schreiber and to an extent, Anna Paquin, their roles are difficult yet
deliver the goods with great conviction. Lane's debut was as a ravishing
teen-ager in A Little Romance (1979). She made a lovely Paulette Goddard in
Chaplin (1992), but her career has had few memorable roles. Her Pearl feels
like a comeback.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Odd Couple II, The (1998)
THE ODD COUPLE II ** 1/4. Directed by Howard Deutch.Written by Neil Simon.
Photography, Jamie Anderson. Editing,Seth Flaum. Production design, Dan
Bishop.Music,Alan Silvestri.Produced by Simon, Robert W. Cort and David
Madden.Cast: Jack Lemmon (Felix Ungar), Walter Matthau (Oscar Madison),
Christine Baranski (Thelma), Jean Smart (Holly), et al. A Paramount
release. 90 minutes. PG-13.
Sequelitis is almost always a fatal disease in movies. A new film with an
old title followed by a "II" is like a red cloth waved before a bull, the
bulls being the cinephilic public and experienced film critics. It's hard
to think of exceptions, such as "The Godfather Part II." Or, in a far
lesser category, "Grumpier Old Men," which was also directed by "The Odd
Couple II"'s Howard Deutch and improved on the weak original "Grumpy Old
Men."
In 1967, "Barefoot in the Park," adapted by Neil Simon from his own play,
was the first collaboration of Simon and director Gene Saks. The two teamed
up again the following year with "The Odd Couple," in 1986 with "Brighton
Beach Memoirs," and now with "The Odd Couple II."
While the two Odd Couples are separated by 30 years, Part II plays with
time by being set  today yet reuniting for the first time in 17 years,
Felix, the much-divorced,obsessive neatnik, sinusoidal snorter and
hypochondriac who still dwells in New York, with Oscar, the sloppy slob,
more bloodhound-like than ever,who now lives in a Florida retirement
community. This conveniently  allows their respective son and daughter to
be young, to have (ah, coincidences!) met in California and to be getting
married. It's all news to F & O who get invited to the wedding at a
moment's notice. Suspension of disbelief is sorely needed in this movie,
but at least it's in a comedy, where making sense is not crucial.
>From the very instant incoming passengers Oscar and Felix meet again at a
California's LAX airport, things go wrong and keep escalating. Felix hurts
his leg. The men rent a car for the drive to San Malina, where the wedding
is. Felix's suitcase is left on the curb, the car burns up, the companions
are stranded, and, and, and.....Part II becomes straight away a comic road
movie with a series of unrelieved misfortunes, some mechanically plotted
but  not without laughs.
It's not exactly original, yet the dialogue, jokes, gags and repartees,
even when deja vu and deja heard have both the tired look and sound of
vaudeville acts and the comfortable feeling that goes with vaudeville. Neil
Simon and his stars, all septuagenerians now, are neither  charitable nor
complacent with old age. The film  opening's card-game (a regular affair
chez Matthau, with a short geezer and several old ladies) is a pretty
merciless blend of realistic and caricatural Jewish humor. The California
Odyssey. among other features, switches to dreams of sex when the men
encounter in a bar a couple of quite delightfully trashy ladies, Baranski
of TV's sadly discontinued "Cybill" and Smart. I regret however that Simon,
bending over backwards, makes our protagonists refer to them as "old
bikers" which is unfair to their appeal and youthfulness.
It is a propos of this encounter that Oscar and Felix engage in talk about
sex which in turn elicits  this clever Simonism from Oscar: "We use so many
metaphors that I forget what we're talking about."
The main thread is that O & F's final destination is the town of San
Malina, whose name is forgotten by both men except for the "San." This, in
turn, gives birth to the running (but still funny) jokes about California
being chockfull of places that start with San or Santa. In one of them, San
Menendez (cf. the Menendez Brothers), the cascading mix-ups have the odd
couple thrice arrested, and thrice let go by the bewildered local police
chief. This sequence of repeats gambles with the dangerous three-step
principle of gags: first comes the original gag, then it gets topped, then
another tops the topper. Step Three is risky business yet succeeds here and
produces another Simonism as Oscar (who has the best lines) tries to
explain the latest imbroglio to the Chief :"I'd hate to have to repeat all
this to a judge." In context, it's quite a funny remark.
The movie has its share of tedious,predictable or facile moments, but
geriatric it is not. Many of the flabbier scenes manage to come up with
reinforcements via  zingers or mini-novelties.Granted that it lacks the
freshness of the original "The Odd Couple," and that it  cannot hold a
candle to Neil Simon's great, hilarious and three-dimensional "The Sunshine
Boys" (1975, Matthau and George Burns), it is about as unsubstantial,
forgettable yet entertaining as that other trifle "Out to Sea," the
previous (1997) Lemmon-Matthau vehicle. Alan Silvestri's score is good and
appropriate.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Buffalo '66 (1998)
BUFFALO '66  ***  Written, directed, original story, music by Vincent
Gallo. Co-written by Alison Bagnall. Produced by Chris Hanley. Photography,
Lance Acord. Production design, Gideon Ponte. Editing, Curtiss Clayton.
Cast: Vincent Gallo, Christina Ricci, Anjelica Huston, Ben Gazzara, Kevin
Corrigan, Mickey Rourke, Rosanna Arquette, Jan-Michael Vincent. A Lions
Gate Films release. 112 minutes. Not Rated (vulgar language, strippers, but
no sex)
Vincent Gallo, born 1961 in Buffalo, N.Y., has been a painter, rock
musician, poster boy for Calvin Klein, and an actor in well over a dozen
movies, several of them European, most of them not widely seen in the USA
except perhaps for The Funeral and Palookaville (and Arizona Dream?). Most
of his roles were supporting. His latest appearances are in:  Goodbye,
Lover (by the esteemed Roland Joffe), a thriller with comedy starring
Patricia Arquette, Dermot Mulroney, Ellen DeGeneres, Mary-Louise Parker,
Don Johnson, in which Gallo's credit comes as No 10; and L.A. Without a Map
(by Finland's Aki Kaurismaki) where Gallo is the second male lead.
In some ways, Buffalo '66 is an ego-trip, but an arresting one and
excusable in someone who is seemingly as interesting as Gallo. This is his
first feature as director and almost everything else (se credits above).
He plays Billy Brown, who is released after five years in jail. A
nondescript, hirsute, dirty-haired, intense man in ill-fitting clothes, he
may look at first like someone you'd hate to meet in a dark night, but on
short acquaintance you realize that he is no true aggressor, and on longer
acquaintance you understand that he is a fellow with problems, a sad sack
whose worst enemy may well be his own self.
Billy leaves a Buffalo prison on a cold, snowy day. As he shivers, he acts
like someone who does not know what to do next, except for one crucial,
immediate aim: to empty his bladder. His several attempts to do this may
look comical, unless you've experienced them yourself. He even tries to
seek warmth and urinary relief by asking to enter the jail. Whether
invented by Gallo or unconsciously derivative, this is the first of several
references to older movies (cf. Chaplin's Modern Times) or stories (cf.
O'Henry's The Cop and the Anthem).
Billy's vain search for an unloading site culminates in a tacky tap-dancing
school where he meets tackily dressed student Layla (Christina Ricci), a
buxom petite who'll have to watch her diet as she grows up. With his
bladder still full, Billy improbably finds time to call his Ma. The call is
both funny and pathetic. Then he kidnaps an unresisting Layla, orders her
to accompany him to his parents' house, to pretend she is his adoring wife
and confirm that he, Billy, is a CIA operative who, for reasons of secrecy,
has remained incommunicado for the last five years!
By now, absurdism, comedy and sadness have taken over.Their amalgam works
very well.
The Browns make up an abysmally dysfunctional trio. The parents obviously
couldn't care less about their son. Dad's (Ben Gazzara) sullenness and
flashes of paranoid ire show perhaps where the manic Billy got his genes.
Mother (Angelica Huston) vague and empty-headed, has a sickly passion for
the Buffalo Bills team. She spends all of her time glued to the TV,
watching re-runs of games. She still resents Bill for her having missed the
only game in her life, the 1966 Superbowl, because the child chose to be
born on the day.
Bill's motivation for visiting parents he doesn't love or even like, is not
explained. We can guess, however, that he is trying to come to terms with
his past and that he has a futile, unrealistic hope of belatedly gaining a
family that he never had. Or to show them that he has become someone. The
long section in that tacky home (a copy of the last place where Gallo
himself lived with his parents) is a splendidly inventive buffet of
grunginess,  somberness, comedy and ultimate hopelessness.
While neither Billy or his folks can even begin to relate with each other,
Layla takes her play-acting to heart. The film tells us nothing about her,
except for what we see here and now. It says nothing about her past, her
present, her character, her background, her family. Yet the subtext is
there: Layla dreams of better things and of love. The unreluctant kidnapee
finds herself inventing stories about her "husband," romanticizing him,
charming the parents, and finally announcing that she is pregnant, to the
joy of Pop and Mom who lavish maudlin affection on her while ignoring Billy.
The quartet of actors is excellent. Note that Ben Gazzara was part of the
repertory troupe of the late John Cassavetes, whose style had quite a bit
in common with Buffalo 66's. (I absolutely must plug here Saint Jack
(1979), a masterful, way underrated film by Peter Bogdanovich, with a
terrific Gazzara as a pimp in South-East Asia).
Having failed to get a family, Billy turns his attention to revenge on the
Buffalo place-kicker who, he thinks, had sold out a crucial game, cost
Billy $10,000 and eventually sent him to jail.  Several episodes take place
after this point. They deal with the relationship of Billy and Layla who
gradually falls in love with him; encounters at a Denny's; the slow
rounding up of Billy's psychic portrait; the unorthodox sharing of a shabby
room in what we might call a Motel 3;  a reluctantly happy finale.
Buffalo 66 combines hyper-realism with imagined points of view, wishful
thinking and grim facts, the present  tense with the past. I can find
nothing about Gallo's educational experiences, but watching his movie, I
was increasingly certain that his foreign films, including three with
French director Claire Denis, directly or indirectly gave him European
perspectives which he artfully (instinctively perhaps, but not artsily)
blended with his background in American movies. Repeatedly I was reminded
of several techniques used by the French New Wave.
He shot with reversal film, the kind used in home movies. Here it results
in saturated colors that , among others, capture with power the lonely day
or night in sights of desolate areas within an industrial city. In
flashbacks, somewhat a la Godard or Truffaut, Gallo uses effectively
squarish picture-within-picture inserts which focus the eye while stressing
drama or humor.
A scene in which Layla, out of a blue sky, tap-dances amateurishly, recalls
the equally amateurish. would-be seductive dance of Anna Karina in Godard's
My Life to Live. Also very Godardian are the repeated images of Billy and
Layla taking their pictures inside an I.D. photo booth, the constant
telephoning (see Breathless) and more. There are New Wave-ish dialogues,
abrupt transitions, non-sequiturs and more, but neither cloned nor
copy-catted.
With much of it based on Gallo's own unhappy childhood, the film plays as a
work of revenge on parents by a loser, not so much a born loser but a made
loser. This goes a long way toward explaining its caricatural aspects,
grotesque characters, over-the-top acting, all exaggerations which in
theory could have been liabilities, but in fact make the movie memorable.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Michael Collins (1996)
MICHAEL COLLINS *** 1/2  Written and directed by Neil Jordan.
Photography, Chris Menges. Editing,J. Patrick Duffner & Tony Lawson.
Production design, Anthony Pratt. Music, Elliot Goldenthal.
Producer,Stephen Woolley . Cast: Liam Neeson (Michael Collins), Aidan
Quinn (Harry Boland), Stephen Rea (Ned Broy), Alan Rickman (Eamon de
Valera), Julia Roberts (Kitty Kiernan) et al. A Warner Brothers & Geffen
Pictures release. 131 minutes. Rated R (violence).
Good things, they say, come in threes. Well, not quite. In rapid
succession I saw the Irish-made "Michael Collins" (Best Film, Best Actor
at the Venice Festival), the English-made "Secrets and Lies" (Best Film,
Best Actress at the Cannes Festival), and the shot-in-Mexico by an
Australian director American-made "Romeo and Juliet." The first two were
fine. The third put me to sleep intermittently, which precludes a
review.
"Michael Collins" is an ambitious, successful reconstruction of the last
years of its eponymous hero (in movie terms), who is also a hero in
terms of Ireland's history. Not for every Irish person or faction
however. The picture has caused controversy in the United Kingdom and
Ireland, while in America it has been very well received, with no
flare-ups. Public and the critics, rightly shying away from past Irish
politics -- a maze for which very few outsiders are qualified to pass
judgment -- have looked at the film  qua  film, as the portrait of an
exceptional leader about whom little is generally known. Even Irish-born
Liam Neeson ("Schindler's List"), admits that before he got the part he
had only vague notions about Collins.  
If nothing else, this work introduces to the masses of filmgoers a
historical figure of capital importance. It does it in a controlled,
thoughtful and, for most of us, credible way, accurate within the bounds
of cinema's possibilities. That's no mean service. It reaches beyond its
many artistic or "entertainment" values into expanding one's knowledge
of history. 
That's what movies have often done, including the biographical ones
("biopics") that presented mostly schlocky, romanticized and dubious
screen lives that had little to do with realities. Still, to mention
only one country, it is through motion pictures that most people outside
Mexico got their first acquaintance with figures such as Pancho Villa,
Juarez or Zapata.
To help orient the viewer, here is a sketchy chronology of matters Irish
in the early 20th century.
1912. Third Home Rule bill introduced . Ulstermen resist.
1913. Irish Volunteers vs. Ulster Volunteers
1914 .World War I
1915. Sir Roger Casement goes to Germany for help, gets only antiquated
weapons.
1916. Casement arrested upon returning to Ireland. Monday April 24,
Easter Rising. Between 1,000  and 2,000 Republican fighters involved.
They are put down in under a week. Executions of their leaders Patrick
Pearse, Tom Clarke, and 13 others.  Sinn Fein formed, led by Eamon de
Valera. Republicans set up their provisional government. IRA organized
vs. British administration. Violence: IRA vs. Irish police and the
English soldiers (the Black and Tans).
1920. Britain passes the Government of Ireland Act, divides the country
between Northern and Southern Ireland, both self-governing up to a point
-but only the Northern Parliament functioned.
1921. British Prime Minister Lloyd George negotiates with de Valera.
Slow results. Cease-fire. Anglo-Irish Treaty signed:  for Great Britain
by  Lloyd George; for Ireland by Arthur Griffith, Michael Collins, et
al. Irish Free State becomes self-governing dominion with he British
Commonwealth. Pro-treaty faction (led by Michael Collins) and
anti-treaty faction (led by de Valera) fight civil war. Pro-treaty wins. 
1922. Collins, ambushed, is killed. He would have been 32 in two months.
Irish author and film director Neil Jordan has given us, among others,
such excellent pictures as "The Company of Wolves," "Mona Lisa," and
"The Crying Game."  "Michael Collins" was planned and nurtured for 13
years. It  follows its protagonist from the Easter Rising to his
assassination. 
The opening sets the tone of violent action, excellent production values
and superb camera work. Cinematographer Chris Menges (Oscars for"The
Mission" and "The Killing Fields")   films fluidly without calling
attention to his skills, lights the sets naturally, without artificial
fill-ins. The word "exquisite" comes to mind, paradoxically, since so
much drama and tragedy are shown. 
What is also very subtle is that in the early scenes of fighting,
surrender, brutality and executions we get our first but almost last
contrast between the British and the Irish accents. Only Irish tones
will be heard, until Churchill picks "the elite of the British Secret
Service" to fight the fighters. Even then, the most poignant  parts are
the fratricidal, Irish vs. Irish ones.
>From the Rising we cut to 1918. Collins and his best friend Harry Boland
(Aidan Quinn) have been released from prison. The eloquent Michael
renews his incitement to resistance. New action follows, supenseful,
vivid,energetic and free of false gung-ho heroics.
Collins was 28 then. Liam Neeson was 43 when the film was made. Some
suspension of disbelief is in order, and perhaps - granted that the
Irish have great facility with speech- it also applies to the
self-assured, quick-thinking and -planning Collins shown. No Method
hesitations, aahs and ahems here. Even so, one gets caught up in
Collins's humanity, struggles and toughness. He sends a message to the
Irish police :" Any collaborating with the Army of Occupation will be
punished by death. You have been warned."
Collins - it is historically true - was the inventor of a special kind
of guerrilla warfare. Neil Jordan says that his tactics were copied by
independence movements around the world, from Mao in China to Shamir in
Israel. Why not add Vietnam and the resistance (and collaboration) in
Nazi-occupied Europe too? 
The acting, a tad romanticized, is uniformly impressive. Collins-Neeson
towers over all the performers, he IS the film, with all the others as
supporting cast. Among them, two stand out. The ambiguous, manipulative
Eamon de Valera who became Sinn Fein's president in 1918, thrice prime
minister with short interruptions (1932-1959) and President (1959-73). 
This best known of Irish politicians is played with  marvelous, dour
shiftiness by Alan Rickman, as a near-villain. His thorn in Collins's
flesh is one of the main lines the plot follows. There is also Stephen
Rea ("The Crying Game") as the mole Ned Broy, perfect as the humble
"little man" who risks and loses his life to pass on information to
Collins. Broy is a composite figure of three characters.
Setting aside controversial aspects (one of them being a car bomb that
some say did not exist at the time), a minor lack in the movie is that
we see of Collins mostly the activist-politician-leader while we don't
really know what makes him tick as a person. Of course, this dimension
would have lengthened the film considerably. There's also a small
annoyance as the private Collins is limited to his affair with  Kitty
Kiernan and to this rivalry with  best friend Harry for the lady's love.
While Kitty did exist, the cutting to parenthetical sentimental scenes
is  intrusive and superfluous. Julia Roberts plays her with charm and a
good Irish accent at first. Later the accent disappears. Later yet it
becomes American.
The overall movie and the specific Collins role are strong enough to
resist small objections. Collins, as a warrior turned statesman and
peace-maker, becomes exponentially a likable, truly heroic figure who
affects us viscerally and intellectually. Perhaps he is best summed up
when he says of the British " I hate them not for their race [...} but
for what the've done to us by breeding hate in us."

Title
Review for Ice Storm, The (1997)
THE ICE STORM *** 1/4  Directed by Ang Lee. Written by James Schamus from
the novel by Rick Moody. Photography, Frederick Elmes. Editing, Tom
Squyres. Production design, Mark Friedberg.  Costumes, Carol Olditz. Music,
Mychael Danna. Cast: Kevin Kline (Ben Hood), Joan Allen (Elena Hood),
Sigourney Weaver (Janey Carver), Jamey Sheridan (Jim Carver), Christina
Ricci (Wendy Hood), Toney Maguire (Paul Hood), Elijah Wood (Mikey Carver),
Adam Hann-Byrd (Sandy Carver), et al. A Fox Searchlight release. 113
minutes. Rated R  (sexual content). At the Art Theater.
Ang Lee, (b. 1954) studied theater in his native Taiwan, came to the U.S.
in 1978 where he continued his theater studies at the University of
Illinois (Urbana), before going on to the Film Department at New York
University. During a recent Lee retrospective and visit at the University
of Illinois, some of his former teachers remembered both Lee's eagerness
and his then-opaque English. In one play production which Lee was anxious
to be in, the linguistic problem was solved by the Solomonic decision to
cast him as a spear carrier, a non-speaking role.
Five years after his arrival to the U.S. Lee was already directing
pictures. At first shorter ones: "Dim Lake" (Best Taiwanese Film Award),
"Fine Line" (NYU Festival, Best film and director).Then came three features
that Lee also scripted: "Pushing Hands" (Best film, Asian Film Festival);
"The Wedding Banquet" (US-Taiwan) (Golden Bear in Berlin, many other
awards); and the Oscar-nominated "Eat Drink Man Woman,"(Taiwan).
In a radical shift, Lee filmed with huge success the very British novel by
Jane Austen "Sense and Sensibility" which had seven Oscar nominations and a
win for the scenario by its star Emma Thompson. This confounded the notion
of directors being unable (or at least uncomfortable) with subjects on
"alien" cultures. But then people forget that hordes of very American
movies were made in Hollywood by Europeans who spoke with thick foreign
accents. Think (among many) of Ernst Lubitsch. Or of Billy Wilder whose
scripts are full of U.S. vernacular, including the linguistically-oriented
comedy "Ball of Fire."
There should be no surprise that Lee adds to his repertory as entirely
American-with-a-vengeance feature as "The Ice Storm." Or that the film
continues Lee's brilliant career.
"The Ice Storm" is set just before, during and after Thanksgiving (an
ironic choice) in 1973 (a year of transitions) in New Canaan, Connecticut,
among the affluent WASP bourgeoisie. It concentrates on two families of
friends and neighbors. Ben and Elena Hood, their children Wendy, 14 and
Paul, 16; Janey and Jim Carver, their boys Mikey and Sandy.
The early 1970s are the inheritors and often the extension of the 1960s
upheavals, sexual and political revolutions, hippie-ism, pot and drugs. But
the film's characters are not all alike in conforming to non-conformism.
The kids are of that in-between adolescent  age that in all decades has
known rebellion, confusion and sexual exploration. The most notable is
Wendy who tries to experiment  with both Carver brothers. She also has a
political conscience, which seems to lack in others. 1973 is a year of
national problems and of political corruption underlined by a defensive
Richard Nixon who is much in evidence on TV as he alternates with weather
reports.
If the young ones acts like adolescents, so do the children's parents and
other grown-ups. They are the embodiment of the 60's slogan "Never trust
people over 30," having settled for a materially "good life," have no
interest in ideals, politics or causes. But they have retained the sexual
sea-changes of the earlier years. Ben is having a "just sex" affair with
Janey, whose husband is often on business trips. Other "adults," must have
also opted for coveting their neighbor's wives (or husbands). While this is
not shown at first, it becomes explicit when, after Thanksgiving Day, a
dozen or more couples attend a "key party." For the uninitiated, that's
when the male guests throw their car keys in a bowl. At evening's end,
after some people leave, each woman fishes out a key and goes home with it
owner.  (Sign of the times: a hip, long-haired new clergyman leaves the
party early but with strong hints that he has his eye on Elena).
The night of the party is also that of the worst ice storm in memory.
Things happen, including a tragedy that sobers up many in several ways. The
storm is beautifully photographed (with artificial ice), and exceptionally
good too is the period reconstruction of sights and sounds, artifacts,
clothing, paraphernalia.
The film's tone is one of ice-cold observation of people and mores, with
several touches of humor and irony that illustrate how dysfunctional both
generations are. Without heavy underlining
how the uneasy relationships of adults and their essential egotism affect
the children, there is a lack of rapport that is pin-pointed by details and
by indirect symbolism. Ben has what he thinks is a heart-to-heart talk with
his son but is in reality ludicrous. Wendy coolly shoplifts candy in a
drugstore, and separately, her rich but disoriented  mother lifts lipsticks
there. In play, young Sandy, without understanding the causes, blows up toy
airplanes and whips a flowering bush.
The problem with the young people is the older people , at least in part.
The problem with the older people is that they are hollow men. The adults
may be salacious, but are unfeeling.  In "Something of Value," the Robert
Ruark novel set in troubled Kenya and in the 1957 film, the epigraph says,
more or less, "If a  people lose their gods, they must replace them with
something of value."
In Ang Lee's previous films about Taiwanese, old values and new values
coexisted or else some new ones replaced older ones. But among the "The Ice
Storm"'s characters there are no visible values of any sort. The people are
hollow men, dead souls, running on empty. Yet the movie does not look at
them in a reprimanding way but rather with a cool kind of pity. This makes
for an absence (I am not saying "a lack"--there's a difference) of the
dramatic tension that we have been conditioned to take for granted. It's no
defect. Nor is the fact that the adults are shown as unidimensional
stereotypes, since that's what they really are. And what they are is seen
with a sharp eye for descriptions within a rapid succession of episodes.
Many episodes.
The actual ice storm is a fine metaphor for the essential coldness of the
grownups and their actions, transparent and brittle like ice, ice that
breaks relationships as it breaks trees.  The tragedy that concludes the
movie is a bit too neat as divine punishment or nature's retribution, but
at least the film has the good sense not to wrap up with simple sadness
rather than fake, sentimental cliches of people forever changed for the
better.
I have seen "The Ice Storm" twice, at Cannes and here, just the other day.
Abroad, I worried about the viewers thinking that Yanks have it all over
the French in the casual sex department. In real life the Gallic attitude
is far more tolerant than in the States. The reaction to carnal sins by
politicians and celebrities elicits shrugging shoulders and no headlines.
As for French cinema, physical relations go more often than not with grand
passions. In the U.S. I worried lest the movie be taken as a wholesale
indictment of the 70s rather than what it is, a view of a given segment of
the population.
Both times I suspected that "Ice" is overloaded with sign-post scenes to
reinforce its themes of dysfunctionality, with too much cross-cutting
between the young and the older.  Another small  quibble is that for those
who stay (that is, almost no one) for the end credits, the overall very
good music concludes with a mood-cutting vocal.
In a film with unusually sparse dialogue, the acting bears a heavy burden.
It is superior, especially Kevin Kline's, Wendy Hood's, the other
youngsters' and Sigourney Weaver's. Ms Weaver, with less screen-time than I
wished for, looks gorgeous as an icy spider-lady and has the  movie's best
line. In bed with her, Kline post-coitally rambles on about being forced
for business reasons to play hated golf, and about a rival colleague taking
lessons. Sigourney turns to him coldly : " Ben, you are boring me. I have a
husband. I don't particularly feel the need for another."

Title
Review for Jakob the Liar (1999)
JAKOB THE LIAR (1999) **1/2  Directed by Peter Kassovitz. Written by 
Kassovitz and Didier Decoin, from the novel by Jurek Becker. 
Executive producer, RobinWilliams. Photography,  Elemer Ragalyi. 
Editing,
Claire Simpson. production designer, Luciana Arrighi. Art directors, 
Branimir Babic, Tibor Lazar, Grzegorz Piatkowski (Poland). Music, 
Edward Shearmur. Cast: Robin Williams (Jakob), Alan Arkin 
(Frankfurter), Bob Balaban (Kowalsky), Hannah Taylor Gordon (Lina), 
Michael Jeter (Avron), Armin Muller-Stahl (Kirschbaum), Liev 
Schreiber (Mischa), Nina Siemaszko (Rosa), Mathieu Kassovitz 
(Herschel), Justus von Dohnanyi (Preuss), Mark Margolis (Fajngold), 
Gregg Bello (Blumenthal) et al. A Sony/Columbia Pictures release. 
114 minutes. PG-13.
Jurek Becker (1937-1997) was a Polish Jew born in Lodz --where the 
famous fim school is. He died in Germany. As a child, he survived 
Nazi camps. As an adult, he wrote Jakob the Liar. When this was made 
into the East German movie Jakob der Luegner (1974) by the able 
German director Frank Beyer, Becker provided also the script. The 
film was a well-deserved international success --artistically and 
"humanitarianly" (I don't know about box-office).
The title character is a modest "little man" who, during the 
ruthless Nazi annihilation of the Jews ("The Final Solution") in 
death camps, is in the ghetto of a Polish town. One day, when taken 
outside the ghetto to a Nazi office, he hears accidentally a German 
news bulletin that mentions the advance of the Russian army to a 
town not far from the ghetto. One thing leads to another. The ghetto 
denizens learn of this. They believe, because they want to believe, 
that Jakob has a hidden radio, a strictly "verboten" item punishable 
by the execution of its listeners.
The news raises the spirit of the captive Jews. Jakob becomes 
willy-nilly their regular provider of upbeat items (from the BBC) 
which he invents. These   bring small rays of hope into the ghetto's 
miserable, tragic life.
The current Jakob the Liar is a remake of the older one.  Whether or 
not you know the original, Jakob II is a moving experience of 
suffering and hope. As someone says later in the film, there was not 
a single suicide in the entire ghetto after the "news" started 
coming in. The fake information even contributes to the "better" 
health of Lina, a charming 10-year old whose parents, on their way 
to a death camp, were able to move her out of the train. She becomes 
the housemate of widower Jakob.
The original Jakob, however, was so good that the remake suffers by 
comparison.
Jakob II was directed by Peter Kassovitz, born ca.1938 in Budapest. 
His father and mother survived the death camps. Peter left Hungary 
after the Soviets suppressed the 1956 Hungarian uprising, went to 
France where he worked as a director (mostly TV) and where his son 
Mathieu Kassovitz was born (1967).
Mathieu has acted in many movies and directed 7 features to date, of 
which the best-known (and very goodt) are the Metisse (aka Cafe au 
Lait), La Haine (Hate) and Assassin (s) (sic). The latter has not 
been shown in the USA to my knowledge. Father and son often employ 
each other in their movies. In Jakob II Mathieu plays Herschel, the 
prizefighter in love. And, by the way, the much-talented Armin 
Muller-Stahl (as the famous doctor here) had a small part in the 
1974 Jakob the Liar.
The film was shot entirely in Eastern Europe using good, 
near-genuine locations for its ghetto. Among the Holocaust films, 
Life is Beautiful came out before Jakob II. Making it became a 
reality when Kassovitz wrote to  Robin Williams who, he thought, was 
Jewish.
Williams was approached also because he could provide a combination 
of humor and tragedy. Both co-exist in the movie, with strong doses 
of typical, often black Jewish humor. It is tempting to see the same 
strain in Life Is Beautiful, but Benigni's humor is more Italian 
than "echt"-Jewish.
The thought of Robin Williams in the title role raises apprehensions 
of mugging and clowning, yet the actor controls his tendencies quite 
well, although one can never forget that it is Robin Williams up 
there on the screen. Name performers bring in the public but can 
take away much of the verisimilitude.
That's where the use, as characters, of a platoon of Jewish-American 
thespians. comes in--and where the shoe rubs. The "real" or 
near-real Poles of the earlier film have been replaced by a good 
but, in this context, not really convincing cast. Looks, accents, 
mannerisms are askew. There's an impression of "acting" rather than 
"being."  The thespians may, for some viewers, seem insincere or 
near-caricatural.  This was unintened, of course, so I wonder how 
much comes from the film-makers' lack of familiarity with American 
Jews.
The often self-deprecating Jewish humor includes some worn-out 
vaudeville lines like "If you kill yourself, I'll kill you." And 
overall, the film lacks that unbearable look that has been made so 
tragically familiar from documentary footage (much of it by German 
soldiers) or photographs (some amazingly, secretly made by the 
slaves themselves) of ghetto life, especially the Warsaw Ghetto.
I can't remember if, in the original movie, Jakob, as he does here, 
puts on a fake broadcast from London, with sound effects and a 
Winston Churchill imitation. It is inappropriate, silly, not funny. 
And when Jakob speaks to his friends of coded messages of the BBC, 
such as "the baby is in the bath," this is a major goof. The BBC did 
transmit surreal sentences which had a specific meaning for some 
members of the European Resistance, but there's no way that anyone 
in a Polish ghetto would have any idea that such coded sentences 
even existed.
Yet warts and all, Jakob II can, and even should, be seen.

Title
Review for Mrs. Brown (1997)
MRS. BROWN *** 1/4 (UK, 1997) Directed by John Madden. Written by Jeremy
Brock. Produced by Sarah Curtis. Photography, Richard Greatrex. Editing,
Robin Sales. Production design, Martin Childs. Music, Stephen Warbeck.
Cast: Judi Dench (Queen Victoria), Billy Connolly (John Brown), Geoffrey
Palmer (Sir Henry Ponsonby), Antony Sher (Disraeli), David Westhead
(Bertie, Prince of Wales), et al. A BBC production released by Miramax. 90
minutes. PG.
A made-for-TV American movie is, almost by definition, an inferior product,
although occasionally there are exceptions. In the UK however, films made
by and for the BBC, Channel Four and such, can be, and very often are
first-rate, and also get theatrical release.
Since among the co-producers of "Mrs.Brown"is "Masterpiece Theater," it
will no doubt turn up on PBS, but see it on a theater screen if possible.
Presented as a fascinating docu-drama, it deals with the special, warm
relationship of Queen Victoria (1819-1901) and commoner John Brown. It is
not a love story. The unquestioned love affair was between Victoria and
Albert. She became Queen  at 18, ruling over the Empire where the sun never
set for a record 64 years. In 1840, then not quite 21-years-old, she
married her cousin Albert. He died of what was then diagnosed as typhoid
fever in December 1861, leaving his 42-year old widow and their nine
children.
The Queen' was inconsolable. Her despair was of royal magnitude. The way it
is depicted, she went into total seclusion, feeding on her own misery,
never appearing in public. In her abodes, protocol made everything deadly
dull, stiff and formal and keeps the Queen away from human contacts.
In 1864, her worried, bothered entourage --particularly her Secretary Sir
Henry Ponsonby--had the bright notion of adding John Brown to the Royal
household. John Brown, a burly Highlander talented with horses, who had
been Prince Consort Albert's gillie (personal servant), hunting and riding
companion. Adding Brown to the Royal household was to have Victoria get
some fresh air and exercise.
Brown arrives with the Queen's favorite horse, starts out by committing
gaffes in etiquette: he addresses H.M. without being asked to do so, later
calls her "woman," reacts with cheeky directness. In delightful scenes, he
persuades her to ride (if 2 mph can be called riding). A bond born between
the Queen and the commoner blooms into a genuine rapport that makes the
Queen speak of him as her best friend. To the shock, disapproval and
discomfiture of the household's higher echelons (e.g. Ponsonby), Brown
becomes something like the Queen's factotum. In his gruff-ironic way he
immediately lords it over the servants He addresses the aristocracy without
subservience, the Queen with a gentle familiarity that to bystanders sounds
like criminal "lese-majeste." It is historically true that John Brown was
the only being in the Queen's household who ever spoke to her with
informality.
Dedicated to the Queen's physical health, Brown counsels swimming. This
gives the movie its chance to show the amazing (and for us, funny)
contraption from which bathers get in the water. Dedicated to her mental
health, he even takes her to a peasant cottage where the good cheer makes
Victoria laugh. Eventually his influence helps to make her attend social
functions.
The state of things may be serious but does not lack humor. At the Queen's
ludicrously retinue-laden picnic, stalking, hidden journalists observe
through binoculars. Sniffing them out, John roughhouses and menaces those
pre-paparazzi. He then delivers a dressing down to the staff "for
compromising H.M.'s security."
The Brown affair caused much gossip in its day, and later some unprovable
guesses or assertions by historians. It is shown however with tact and
delicacy, not as an affair but as what the French language, so rich with
terms of sentiments and feelings, calls "amitie amoureuse." This translates
as "loving friendship" but with a very special flavor.
(In support of the theory that there was no physical relationship, that the
Queen had a clean conscience,  is Victoria's project, after John's death,
to write his biography. She was dissuaded not for fear of revelations but
so that the Queen would not demean herself by writing about a servant).
Victoria is given the sobriquet of "Mrs.Brown." Cartoons appear in the
period's ancestors of our tabloids. These, however were far milder than
today's yellow press. The situation worsens by the Queen not appearing in
public, not making herself visible to the masses of her subjects, thus
losing popularity. Her family, Parliament, the country at large are upset.
There was even some talk (simplified in the film) about disestablishing the
monarchy.
Prime Minister Disraeli travels to Balmoral ("600 miles from civilization"
says he), to cajole the Queen and cannily enlist Brown's help against "the
threat posed by Republicanism." There is urgent need for Victoria's
physical presence among the people.  Finally the Queen asks Brown to
resign, which he flatly refuses in an amazing shouting match, in the
presence of others, to boot.
There is also a verbal duel between Albert ("Bertie") Prince of Wales --
the heir to the throne who is not especially liked by his mother -- and
Brown, whom he calls an "arriviste" (go-getter). Says the Prince "Do you
know who you address? " In a delicious invention that doubles as a dig at
today's sad state of grammar, John retorts :"WHOM you address! "
In 1872 the Prince of Wales is dangerously ill with typhoid -- the very
disease that presumably had killed his father ten years before -- but
recovers.  The Queen decrees the giving of thanks at St.Paul's Cathedral.
At long last she is seen by the masses, Riding  in an open carriage (her
stubborn choice against that of prudent statesmen), Victoria  regains her
popularity.
Brown remained the Queen's personal attendant in her travels. On at least
one occasion he saved her from an attempted assassination. He died in 1883.
Victoria continued to reign for another 18 glorious years.
The acting of all is irreproachable, from respected Judi Dench (who does
not look like Victoria) in her first major film-starring role, to stand-up
comic Bill Connolly, down to the awed house-maids. Antony Sher does his
Disraeli with relish and historical credibility. Geoffrey Palmer (Ponsonby)
may be familiar to us as Miss Dench's old flame in the TV series "As Time
Goes By" (on PBS). It took me some time to identify him, since TV's  Palmer
is a dour character whose jowls set something of a record -- but here these
are hidden by whiskers and beard.
Though "Mrs. Brown" was rapidly filmed and on a very modest budget, its
production values are excellent. The cinematography is particularly
skillful in interior scenes that retain realistically the look of
candle-lit spaces. Period visuals and feel are beautifully recreated.
Historians might cavil at some vaguenesses, misleading aspects and
inaccuracies. (I was enormously helped by Walter Arnstein, Jubilee
Professor at the University of Illinois, specialist in British history and
astute cinephile). Victoria and Albert spent four months of the year at
their country residences, Balmoral Castle in Scotland  (where Victoria was
happiest) and Osborne on the Isle of Wight. The movie is vague about which
is which, conveys the notion that the widowed Queen remained for years
hidden permanently away from London or Windsor, even after she recovered
from the depths of her depression.   One  is also given the impression that
Disraeli, whom Victoria favored,was the Prime Minister almost all that
time, when in fact "Dizzy" held that position for 10 months in 1868 and
through 1874-1880. The self-exiled Victoria may be perceived --wrongly-- as
a do-nothing Queen in affairs of state. Ponsonby was younger than is shown.
Anti-Catholic Victoria would never order a mass but would approve of a
Church of England service.
This said, the film's 90 minutes do a yeoman job of Queen Victoria and her
times (including a hunting scene where a poor stag is shot in a merciless
fusillade). It is one of the best historical movies made, dethrones the
once-wildly popular "Victoria the Great" and "Sixty Glorious Years," and
links clearly to the ceremonies of British royals and their essential
isolation --to this day.

Title
Review for Primal Fear (1996)
PRIMAL FEAR (1996) ** 1/4 . Directed by Gregory Hoblit. 
Written by Steve Shagan and Ann Biderman, from the novel by 
William Diehl. Photography, Michael Chapman. Editing,  David 
Rosenbloom. Production design, Jeannine Oppewall. Producer, 
GaryLucchesi.  Music, James Newton Howard. Cast : Richard Gere 
(Martin Vail), Laura Linney (Janet Venable), Andre Braugher 
(Tommy Goodman), John Mahoney (John Shaughnessy), Alfre 
Woodard (Judge Miriam Shoat), Frances McDormand (Dr. Molly 
Arrington), Steven Bauer (Joey Pinero), Stanley Anderson 
(Archbishop Rushman), Edward Norton (Aaron Stampler), et al. A 
Paramount release. 131 minutes. Rated R (graphic violence, 
sex,language). 
Alas poor Archbishop Rushman! Chicago knew him, Horatio: a 
fellow of infinite resources, of most excellent connections. 
But the Primate never had a chance to become a Prince of the 
Church. Someone gorily slashed him to death. 
Into the fray steps Martin Vail (Gere), a prosecutor turned 
opportunistic super-lawyer. Clever, cool, calculating, chic 
Vail--currently the cover boy of a glossy magazine--has 
attained fame and fortune. To get more media attention, he 
takes on "pro bono" (free services for the public good) the 
defense of Rushman's suspected murderer.
Blood-covered Aaron Stampler (Norton), fleeing the scene of 
the crime, is caught after a chase on foot. Everything points 
to him, everything that is, except motive. Aaron,  from rural 
Kentucky, may or may not be innocent but he certainly looks 
like an innocent, a simple-minded young man. He was devoted to 
the Archbishop who had rescued him from the big city's mean 
streets and made him an altar boy. Aaron tells Vail that he 
didn't do it, that he was at the prelate's place, that a third 
party did it. But he, Aaron, did not get a look at the 
murderer because he "lost time," which is how he describes his 
frequent blackouts, some of which Vail witnesses.
The script, co-written by Oscar-winner ("Save the Tiger") 
Steve Shagan, is convoluted. It involves Chicago politics, 
financial schemes, the Rushman Fund, Church-owned land, 
prosecuting attorney Janet Venable (Linney) who had been 
Vail's lover, her boss the State's Attorney, influential 
figures, an honest Alderman, an underworld figure, and more... 
Everyone wants to direct movies these days, even the clergy. 
"Primal Fear" is the first feature by TV's nine-Emmy winner 
Gregory Hoblit who some years ago was taken off the film "Sea 
of Love." Growing up in Berkeley, Hoblit did the usual Sixties 
thing, an irony as his father was an FBI man. He made his name 
mostly with series like "Hill Street Blues," "LA Law," "NYPD 
Blue." 
The influence of the jazzy, fast-cut, elliptical, multi-imaged 
TV style of such programs is evident in "Primal Fear." This 
does not hurt. What does is the murky tangle resulting from 
the subplots, allusions and implications. It is common for 
television series to place in certain episodes additional 
characters who may get developed in future segments. But in a 
single big-screen, detection-and-courtroom movie this clutter 
can distract and make the picture less interesting than 
Inspector Morse or Hercule Poirot whodunits. 
There are also contradictions, loose ends that dangle yet 
cannot be revealed without giving away too much. It doesn't 
help either that Vail and Venable are now conveniently on 
opposite sides; that the resumption of their affair is 
telegraphed with semaphores; that we get no information about, 
or a sense of those two, their earlier relationship, their 
private lives. The duo may be adequate to the task of their 
current legalisms, but they remain unidimensional. 
What you get is only what you see, and that is pretty 
interesting: Vail's and his staff's procedures, the 
strangeness of Aaron, the lawyer-client relationship. Best  of 
all is the acting by Norton and Gere. Edward Norton, in his 
film debut as the inarticulate, timid, bewildered and pathetic 
Aaron gives a rich, original performance with unexpected 
turns. His phone must be ringing with offers. Already we can 
expect to see him in Woody Allen and Milos Forman movies.
Norton steals the show, but Richard Gere is quite good doing 
his specialty, the man you cannot warm up to. His career is a 
puzzle. He's had some triumphs, like "Days of Heaven," "An 
Officer and a Gentleman," and many duds, like "Breathless" and 
"King David." Later two good films went unnoticed: "Miles from 
Home"  by Richard  Pearce (("A Family Thing"),and the flawed, 
nasty but effective "Internal Affairs" by Mike Figgis 
("Leaving La Vegas").
The hit "Pretty Woman" was Gere's box-office comeback. Yet 
after it, Akira Kurosawa's  excellent "Rhapsody in August" 
played only briefly in art houses and was under-appreciated. 
So was Gere's against-type sensitive performance as a 
Japanese-American. Five failures or mediocrities followed, the 
last one being "First Knight." 
Now "Primal Fear" (an irrelevant, forgettable title), does a 
repair job on the Gere image. It also boosts the talented 
Andre Braugher of TV's "Homicide" fame.(He was still an 
unknown when Hoblit directed him in the Spielberg-produced 
1993 pilot "Class of '61"). As the investigator who works for 
Vail, he has some good moments and one wonderful short scene 
testifying on the stand with  ironic answers. 
The movie is essentially old wine in new bottles, even though 
the product placement is not for wine but for Bud Light beer. 
Still, it is helped by surprises and revelations, a peculiar 
Jekyll and Hyde reprise, Oscar-winning ("Raging Bull") 
cinematographer Chapman, designer Oppewall, and an unobtrusive 
score. As courtroom drama, it breaks no new ground, but as 
momentary entertainment it is OK.  

Title
Review for Nobody's Fool (1994)
NOBODY'S FOOL (1994) *** 1/2 Written & directed by Robert 
Benton from the novel by Richard Russo. Photography, John 
Bailey. Editing, John Bloom. Production design, David Gropman. 
Music, Howard Shore. Produced by Scott Rudin and Arlene 
Donovan. Cast: Paul Newman, Jessica Tandy, Bruce Willis, 
Melanie Griffith, Dylan Walsh, Pruitt Taylor Vince, Josef 
Sommer, Gene Saks, Philip Bosco. A Paramount release. 110 
minutes. Rated R (severely so, for language and flash of 
nudity). 
"Nobody's Fool" deals with a group of people in a small, 
upstate New York town called North Bath. The movie is in some 
ways the many-times-removed cousin of "Our Town." Unlike that 
film however, it does not give equal stress to everyone, but 
keeps an emphatic focus on  Donald  ("Sully") Sullivan, who is 
60 but whom 70-year old Paul Newman plays without the least 
stretch.
Ages ago, Sully divorced his wife who still resides in North 
Bath with her second husband. Sully rents a room in the house 
of his grade-school teacher (the late Jessica Tandy in her 
last role) whom everyone calls Miss Beryl although she has a 
middle-aged son, a pinched banker.
Sully is a prole who has never lived a regular working stiff's 
life and probably has bummed around a little in North Bath, 
living from day to day. Now a bum leg keeps him unemployed 
after a fall from a scaffolding of the modest Tip Top 
Construction Company, whose boss Carl Roebuck (Bruce Willis) 
Sully keeps suing in vain.  
"Nobody's Fool" is a rare movie for these days, as it delves 
on characters and relationships rather than action or major 
plot turns. Sully, happy-go-lucky, occasionally hard-drinking, 
always ready with a wisecrack or repartee, is liked by all who 
know him: by the judge (Philip Bosco) who rules against his 
lawsuits and later sends him to jail for assailing a vexatious 
cop; by his ineffectual lawyer (stage director Gene Saks) who 
has an artificial leg; by Miss Beryl; by his friend, handyman 
Rub (Pruitt Taylor Vince) who is his partner-employee in odd 
construction jobs;  by the bar-lady of his regular haunt; by 
the police-chief...
Sully may be perpetually broke, but he is, as the old yet 
valid cliche goes, rich in friends, and quietly willing to 
help others and treat them decently. Behind Sully's surface 
simplicity lies a complex man. 
Cleverly, this two-way liking is not goofy, smarmy or 
sentimental, but natural,  subtle and taken for granted within 
an overall warm framework.
Better yet, in one of the script's many originalities, Carl 
and Sully, have been friends forever, and still are, in spite 
of trading disparaging remarks. They even belong to a regular 
group of poker playing that includes the chief of police. All 
the while Sully keeps stealing Carl's snow-blower which Carl 
keeps stealing back--all in good humor.
Carl is a Lothario who openly has affairs with his successive 
blonde secretaries. His wife Toby (Melanie Griffith) faces 
this with tolerant spunk and humor. To top it all, Toby and 
Sully have, quite openly too, a whimsical May-November mutual 
attraction that Carl jokes about.
Events take a new direction when Sully's son Peter (Dylan 
Walsh) appears with wife and boys for a reluctant Thanksgiving 
dinner at his mother's. Peter, an English  professor at the 
University of West Virginia, has professional troubles, 
marital woes, and a major grudge against his father whom he 
practically never saw. 
Much of the film from now on will be about the rapprochement 
between Sully and Peter, a connection catalyzed by a wildly 
funny re-theft of the snow-blower by those two (families that 
steal together stay together?) and by Sully's interest in one 
of the boys. This and other small events make Sully finally 
grow  up and discover that he is a father and a grandfather.
The movie's dialogue is splendid, witty and sharp. It fleshes 
out the characters beautifully. These are real people with 
real talk -- not necessarily real-life talk, since, if the 
dialogue were of the authentic, tape-recorded type, its wasted 
words and hesitations would bring yawns to the listeners. But 
it is first-rate movie-real dialogue, a convincing simulacrum 
that walks the wire between the spontaneous and the 
convicingly concocted.  
The acting is impeccable --and colorful -- throughout. 
Watching, in relatively small parts, Melanie Griffith ( not 
everyone's cup of tea) and Bruce Willis (unarmed for a 
change), is a joy, now touching, now amusing, now both. 
Watching Paul Newman (which means the entire movie) is vastly 
entertaining. Without copying himself, and in a 
semi-minimalist way, Newman is still the fellow who, though a 
loser in some respects, is sure of himself, brings to his 
roles a paradoxical touch of class and of purity, and can also 
do crazy things  -- as in "The Hustler," " Cool Hand Luke," 
"Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid," "The Sting" and 
elsewhere.  
All this is in a perfectly realistic setting of a depressed 
town that had known much better times, as witnessed by some 
nice old buildings. Now both interiors and exteriors look 
run-down and grungy. Nothing is prettified, and winter (the 
time is between Thanksgiving and Christmas) makes things even 
worse with dirty snow and lack of cheerful greenery that would 
hide ugliness.
The many qualities of the film range from its basic premises 
to a host of well observed details, from hilarious to moving. 
Like  a child afraid to approach the kindly lawyer who has an 
artificial leg. Like that leg being removed in a session of 
strip-poker. Like the near-total absence of touchy-feely 
scenes. Like the subtle correspondence of making Bruce Willis'  
secretaries akin to the dizzy dames portrayed by Melanie 
Griffith in several movies.
"Nobody's Fool" may fool some people into thinking of it as 
mainly a Paul Newman vehicle. That it is, but it is also a 
movie by Robert Benton, the writer of "Bonnie and Clyde," the 
writer-director of "Bad Company," "Kramer vs. Kramer," "Places 
in the Heart," and others--a man who has a wonderful eye and 
ear for ordinary people. And it is a film that also belongs to 
its technicians and to the great ensemble playing of its cast.  

Title
Review for Misérables, Les (1998)
LES MISERABLES (1998) ** 1/2  Directed by Bille August.  Screenplay, Rafael
Yglesias, based on the novel by Victor Hugo. Photography, Jorgen Persson.
Editing, Janus Billeskov-Jansen. Production design, Anna Asp. Music, Basil
Poledouris. Cast: Liam Neeson (Jean Valjean), Geoffrey Rush (inspector
Javert), Uma Thurman (Fantine), Claire Danes (Cosette), Reine Brynolfson
(Captain Beauvais), Mimi Newman (Cosette, age 8), Peter Vaughan (the
Bishop), Hans Matheson (Marius), et al. A Sony release. 131 minutes. PG-13.
What it means. How to say it.  Les Miserables means "the wretched ones, the
outcasts, those whose life is misery."  "Les" should not be pronounced  as
"lay" but as the short "Le" in Lenin. "Miserables" sounds like
"Mise-RABBLE," final "s" not pronounced.
Now, that was easy. It is harder to explain the ** 1/2 rating. I sometimes
run into people who pay me the compliment of taking my newspaper reviews
seriously, too seriously, and  say "we only see what you gave more than
three stars to."
This is disturbing. The whole system of ratings via stars is approximate,
does not allow for nuances. New movies are generally written up almost
immediately after they have been watched, so that there is no time for
delays that give reviewers to reconsider. First impressions can be tricky.
The most reliable opinions (and ratings) are after second or third
screenings, often years apart. Finally, lower ratings are not necessarily
dishonorable. Many a  **1/2  or even  **  movie can be interesting,
amusing, pleasant, entertaining, worth seeing.
"Les Miserables" has its ups and downs. It's neither really good nor really
bad. It's just OK. I'm glad I saw it;  I probably won't see it again soon;
I find it watchable though  unmemorable and not contributing anything to
the art of film.
This movie, like many others, carries the seed of its own frailties.
Pictures, including popular ones, from great books, very seldom make great
films, especially when the book is massive, like "War and Peace" or "Les
Miserables".
The protean, visionary Victor Hugo (1802-1885) wanted to be "the sonorous
echo" of his century. He did just that in his huge, sprawling, socially
conscious novel, which came out in 1862. Starting with the silent cinema,
it was made into films 15 or more times, in France, America, Mexico, Japan,
Italy, and elsewhere. All those works were essentially abbreviated
anthologies of various sections of the novel. None could do that tumultuous
book justice.
The closest any version came to this was the 1934 French  film directed by
Raymond Bernard from a script by him and Andre Lang. It was 305 minutes
long, made as a triptych : "A Tempest in a  Head," (120 minutes); "The
Thenardiers," (90 min) and "Liberty, Beloved Liberty" (95 min.). The
following year, the same two writers  plus an American colleague, condensed
the three films into the under-two-hours Hollywood "Les Miserables" (1935)
the best-known US version, starring Fredric March and Charles Laughton.
This year's picture was directed by  Denmark's Bille August, twice winner
of the Cannes Film Festival's Golden Palm, for "Pelle the Conqueror" and
the Ingmar Bergman-scripted "The Best Intentions." August 's earlier "Twist
and Shout" is also notable. I think that with the best intentions, the
filmmakers cannot conquer Victor Hugo's epic novel, no matter how they
twist it. But they did come up with a version acceptable by the public at
large.  Why? Because, whereas the novel was once read world-wide by
millions of students, literati, and non-literati, its public today is
minimal. (I had this confirmed by my poll of dozens of students and faculty
on a major campus). On the other hand, many --though still a tiny fraction
of the former masses of readers-- have seen the musical version of Les Miz.
It is impossible to summarize the original story, but many people know at
least the bare bones of it. A famished Jean Valjean  steals a loaf of
bread, for which he spends 19 years at inhuman forced labor. Released, he
robs a kindly bishop of silver forks and knives. He is brought before the
prelate by the police.The good man of God fibs, says he had made a gift of
the items to Valjean, and adds silver candlesticks.
The gesture redeems bitter Valjean who, with this capital, gradually
becomes a factory owner in a town, as well as its beloved mayor. To save a
half-wit con identified as Valjean, he (the real one) volunteers testimony
in court that he  is Valjean. Having come to the help of dismissed,
consumptive, dying factory girl Fantine, he flees, but saves Fantine's
child Cosette from the clutches of the nasty people who kept her (for
money). Under one of his many pseudonyms, he adopts her, cares for her,
later helps her and her suitor, the rebel Marius, and so on.
The constant in the book is Inspector Javert's merciless pursuit of
Valjean. This, the movie does well,  although it simplifies both the hunter
and the hunted. There is not enough footage to get into the heads and
hearts of those two, especially dour Javert, a clinical case who combines
pathologically cruelty, masochism, sadism, doggedness and a perverted sense
of values. Javert has an odd sense of duty and morality. He is what later
in that century would be called a "determinist" but without the
understanding of the determinist scientists.
Roughly, this goes: people are the products of their background and their
heredity. Hugo (and later, more pointedly even, Emile Zola) blamed society
and other exterior causes rather than the victims of this miserable state
of things. (Father Flanagan of Boys' Town was in their lineage with his
"There's no such thing as a bad boy").
Javert is convinced that once a thief, always a thief, that the sooner
criminals are punished, the better. In addition, Javert's father was a
thief, his mother a prostitute. The Inspector's own sense of guilt, his
hidden compulsion to make up for his progenitors, make him over-react, like
a puritan who goes to extremes, like a religious fanatic who has converted.
Like those extremists who are "more royalist than the King," Javert,
seeking his own redemption in twisted ways, becomes maniacal about
upholding the Law at any price..
He is a fascinating character, far and away the movie's most interesting,
even though there's a lack of screen-time to dig deeply into his psyche.
With the elimination of a host of persons and events, including main
character Eponine and most social and political conditions of the times,
the movie becomes primarily an old-fashioned melodrama in which we root for
the hero and hiss at the villain.
Each of the men is limited to two expressions: Liam Neeson's worry and
sympathy, Australia's Geoffrey Rush's (of "Shine" fame) nastiness and
monomania. They both get much mileage out of them. Oddly, they age
minimally over the years, something that did not happen in the marathon
French version. There, Harry Baur and Charles Vanel were the kind of burly
actors who looked older, as in all their films. Still, the current lead
players are convincing.
Thurman-Fantine is given all the stops of pathos to pull, and pull well,
through make-up and dribbling blood; young Cosette sounds far too American;
older Cosette-Danes fails to touch or interest us; Matheson-Marius is close
to a nonentity. The sketchiness of the Cosette-Marius "amours" helps
neither performer. But the smallish part of Beauvais, the small town's
Police Chief whom Javert outranks --and repels -- is excellent.
Missing too is the sociological canvas Hugo has painted. There's enough in
the film to show how miserable the existence of the poor was, but not
enough to hammer that point, or that following the French Revolution,
France became a  Republic but not a democracy in today's sense. The
historical canvas is vague. The press information speaks wrongly of the
1832 Revolution, when there was only a very short-lived uprising led mostly
by liberal young students. The viewers can have no notion that after the
1789 Revolution, came successively:  monarchy's fall, the First French
Republic, Napoleon, the return of royalty  (Louis XVIII), King Charles X,
the July Revolution (1830 's "Three Glorious Days") and Louis-Philippe, the
"Citizen King." The picture does not orient us about this, or such mundane
yet helpful matters as Valjean's fortune, his good deeds as Mayor, the
distances between places, the sewers of Paris, and much else.
Production values are good, with period reconstructions done in the Czech
Republic, Paris, and studios. The score misses its chance to use period
popular or folk music. It's generic, unnoticeable background stuff.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Insider, The (1999)
THE INSIDER (1999) ***1/2 Directed by Michael Mann; written by Eric 
Roth and Mann, based on an article by Marie Brenner, "The Man Who 
Knew Too Much"( in Vanity Fair, May 1996.) Photography, Dante 
Spinotti. Editing, William Goldenberg, Paul Rubell & David 
Rosenbloom. Production designer, Brian  Morris. Music, Lisa Gerrard 
& Pieter Bourke; Produced by Mann & Pieter Jan Brugge. Cast:  Cast: 
Al Pacino (Lowell Bergman), Russell Crowe (Jeffrey Wigand), 
Christopher Plummer (Mike Wallace), Michael Gambon (Thomas 
Sandefur), Diane Venora (Liane Wigand), Bruce McGill (Ron Motley), 
Philip Baker Hall (Don Hewitt), Lindsay Crouse (Sharon Tiller), Gina 
Gershon (Helen Caperelli).et al.  A Touchstone Pictures release.156 
minutes. R (language)
In 312 A.D. as the Roman Emperor Constantine's army was about to do 
battle with Maxentius, a Christian cross appeared in the sky, with 
the words "In hoc signum vinces" ("with this sign, you will win"). 
Constantine did win, had this inscription placed on his imperial 
standards and decreed that Christianity was the Empire's official 
religion.
"The Insider" is Michael Mann's best film to date, as well as one of 
the best of the year. Its subject is a factual, specific case, but 
even more importantly, the background and the obvious subtext are 
about capitalist greed, the kind whose emblem should be "with this 
sign, you will win" around the image of money, whether a dollar, a 
mark, a euro or whatever.
The film probably holds the all-time record for legal maneuvers, 
clearances, consultations and precautions, before and during its 
making. This, because it is a docudrama whose "docu" aspect could 
invite anything, from blocking its release to lawsuits.
The story is familiar to most of the American public. Biochemist 
Jeffrey Wigand, Ph.D, was an R & D vice-president at Brown & 
Williamson, the third largest tobacco company. He earned $300,000 a 
year plus perks. Suddenly he is fired, arbitrarily. By signing a 
confidentiality agreement he keeps such perks as health insurance. 
But when asked to sign another, far more stringent document, he 
refuses.
Worried, bitter, even scared of reprisals, Wigand contacted Lowell 
Bergman, .a "60 Minutes" producer at CBS,  An expose of B & W --and, 
by implication, the other cigarette-makers whom Wigand calls "the 
seven dwarfs"--  was to be telecast by Mike Wallace, with Wigand 
present. But several factors intervened, mainly the fear that a 
lawsuit against CBS by the nicotinizers could run into billions and 
result in the smoke-Godzilla obliterating the CBS Mothra.
Centering on the actions and reaction of Bergman and Wigand, the 
movie does a very good job of depicting the implications, 
complications, side-effects and ramifications of the case, and of 
taking the viewer through the dedalus of (mostly) genuine facts and 
events. This task is greatly helped by brilliant performances, a 
high budget put to (mostly) good use, a strong sense of dialogue and 
production values.
Michael Mann is widely known for his TV work, notably the "Miami 
Vice" series. Since 1981, he also directed the theatrical movies 
"Thief," "The Keep," "Manhunter," "The Last of the Mohicans," and 
"Heat." It is an honorable record, generally influenced by TV's 
techniques and larger-than-life tendencies.
Deliberately, the movie adopts a super-visual approach. Mann, with
cinematographer Dante Spinotti ("L.A. Confidential," "True Colors," 
"The Last of the Mohicans) and editor William Goldenberg ("Heat") go 
all out in this direction.
"The Insider" opens with a long prologue in which an American in 
some unnamed Middle Eastern country, is taken, blindfolded, on a 
mysterious ride (full of local color) to meet a mysterious Arab 
sheik, the leader of a terrorist group. The man from the West turns 
out to be Mike Wallace ( Christopher Plummer) there for a scoop, a 
hard-to-get interview. Why this hors d'oeuvre? To build up the 
powerful, take-no-prisoners persona of Wallace. To remind us of his 
tough style. To spell out his high standards.
The movie-Wallace will reappear many times in the course of the 
picture. Plummer is very good, yet it may be difficult to suspend 
one's disbelief since the real Wallace's face, so familiar and 
distinctive keeps coming to mind. So does Al Pacino's. That's the 
price of fame.
There are no such problems with the other performers. You watch with 
conviction the complex --and in the last analysis, mysterious-- 
Wigand, incarnated by the excellent, Australian-raised Russell Crowe 
("Proof," "L.A. Confidential")-- artfully made older and heavier. 
Yet even if Pacino remains Pacino, his intensity does help in making 
us accept him as Lowell Bergman. Tricky stuff.
Did I say tricky? The Middle East prologue (shot in Israel) is a 
harbinger of razzle-dazzle cinematography. Incessantly, every small 
or big filmmaking trick comes into play. Angles, slow motion, 
focusing, zooming, crawls, video footage, the steadicam, 
reflections, extreme close-ups, nightmares and daymares, color 
symbolism, you name it. Nothing was left out.
This both works and does not. Sometimes you think you're watching an 
avant-garde, experimental or "art" movie. Sometimes it might  give 
one sea-sickness. Sometimes it is like an honest-to-goodness 
documentary. Sometimes it looks like a solid "traditional" drama. 
What is certain is that Mann & Co. went for overkill, ignoring the 
"less is more" principle, adopting a "more is more" stance. The 
result is that your eyes get fatigued, that they may need 
stabilizers, that things can get muddled.
Even so I will not rain on Mann's parade. In spite of all those 
distractions, it does keep you in a state of concentration which 
demands of you not to miss anything. It is a peculiar situation 
which will doubtlessly require a second or third viewing before you 
come to a valid conclusion. More viewings at nearly two hours and 
forty minutes? Yes, since the film has its own, special fascination. 
Even confirmed addicts who normally yearn for a smoking break will 
stay put and not think of the weed.
Tobacco reigns here, satanically.  It is a clear-cut fact that the 
tobacco giants are proven liars. They cook the cigarettes' nicotine 
with chemicals which make the smokes even more addictive -- more so, 
it seems,  than many hard drugs. The corporations are worse than 
gangsters or mafiosi. They commit mass murders, from greed, for 
profit. It is capitalistic materialism at its worst and deadliest. 
They, and other mega-corporations run the country. And, while the 
techniques of the movie are exaggerated, its message does not seem 
to be.
We are a long way from Frank Capra's America I Love You or The 
Little People Win Over The Big Nasties. Or put it this way. This is 
all about the dark side of Capra, a side that he would play down. 
The fact that Wigand aided the lawsuits instigated by the Sovereign 
State of  Mississippi and joined by all the other States of the 
Union to force the tobacco industry onto a 246 billion (that's a 
"b") settlement, still is light years away from a Capraesque happy 
ending.
There are puzzling moments as well as privileged ones. Samples: 
Bruce McGill as a Mississippi lawyer shouting down and shutting up a 
B & W lawyer, in the best Southern style of forceful, colorful 
rhetoric. Gina Gerson's handsome, chic and cool CBS legal eagle 
bringing in bad news. A transitional section after the Pascagoula 
sequence in which strings and a male voice do a beautiful, 
mood-enhancing, dirge-like song. Cleverly too,  the script avoids 
simplistic black-and-white contrasts as it follows the twists of "60 
Minutes" painting itself into a corner.
Pointed digs are numerous. Samples: when referring to the armies of 
lawyers hired by the tobacco industry, Ken Starr's firm is among 
them. Or aging Mike Wallace speaking of his future: "I don't plan to 
spend the rest of my days wandering in the wilderness of PBS!"
The cast is of near-epic size, yet most appearances are short and to 
the point. Machinations and counter-plots, on both sides, are 
effective. The thriller aspect of the movie is powerful. The story 
is not especially easy to follow. In certain areas one will cavil at 
confusions which Alfred Hitchcock would scold. Yet credit the film 
for not spoon-feeding its audience.

Title
Review for Rushmore (1998)
RUSHMORE (1998) *** 1/2.  Directed by  Wes Anderson. Written by Anderson &
Owen Wilson. Photography, Robert Yeoman. Editing, David Moritz. Production
design, David Wasco. Music, Mark Mothersbaugh. Cast: Jason Schwartzman (Max
Fischer), Bill Murray (Herman Blume), Olivia Williams (Rosemarie Cross),
Brian Cox ( Dr. Guggenheim),  Seymour Cassel (Bert Fischer), Mason Gambl
(Dirk Calloway), Sara Tanaka (Margaret Yang), et al. A Touchstone  (Disney)
picture released by Buena Vista. 89 minutes plus end credits. Rated (too
severely) R for language.
In 1997's Good Will Hunting (a good film with an awful title), janitor Matt
Damon solved an almost impossible mathematical problem. Rushmore starts
this way too.
But this is no coincidence. It's got to be a spoof. The math genius,15-year
old Max Fischer, a 10th-grader at Rushmore Academy, triumphs at the
blackboard only in a daydream. Max, probably the sole student on
scholarship in that pricey school, is a disaster academically. But he's
also the BMOC, the Big (though short) Man on Campus when it comes to clubs
and activities. He runs, directs, presides over just about everything and
creates what's not already there.  The list includes the Rushmore
Beekepers, the Dodgeball Society, the French Club, the Debating Team, the
Fencing Team, the school's paper (as editor and writer),the yearbook... And
of course, the Max Fischer Players. He mounts, directs and acts in plays
written by --you guessed it-- Max Fischer. But you couldn't guess that the
bits of two of his plays that we see are "Serpico" (filmed with  Al Pacino
by Sidney Lumet, 1973) and "Heaven and Earth" (filmed by Oliver Stone,
1993), The latter with stage explosions and it version of the classic photo
of the raising of the Stars and Stripes on Iwo Jima 's Mt. Suribachi.
With delicious perversity, the makers of this movie saw to it that Max is
not necessarily an ace within those activities. Better yet, he is not
particularly liked by his schoolmates, except perhaps for much younger Dirk
who follows him around, acting as his secretary or factotum.
Max, with his thick-framed glasses, braces on his teeth, natty school
blazer and unexpectedly baggy khaki pants, is an original creation, too
complex to sum up by the vague terms of "nerd" or "geek." We don't really
ever get to know what makes Max tick, and that too, is a clever avoidance
of cliches and simplistic movie psychology.
He does have major problems. Sublimely disregarding his terrible grades, he
plans to go to Oxford. Instead, Rushmore's President Dr. Guggenheim (a name
that echoes those of Marx Brothers farces), tells him that because of his
academic record he's being dismissed.
Now Rushmore is the be-all for Max, his cocoon, his security blanket, his
whole life. Landing in a standard (read, inferior) public high school is a
horror. But I'm getting ahead of myself, trying not to give away too much
of a story that is full of surprises.
Rushmore was filmed at  St. John's School (in Houston) which director
Anderson graduated from before going to the University of Texas where he
met his collaborator Owen Wilson.
While at the Academy, Max meets chain-smoking steel tycoon Herman Blume
(Bill Murray), an alumnus, a benefactor, and the father of two jock sons he
doesn't like and who are now Rushmore students. His marriage is unraveling.
Like Max, he is an unorthodox maverick. Like Max he brings the art of
deadpan to new heights. The two males, one a child becoming a man, the
other a man wishing to be a child, bond. This without superfluous
elaboration.
In a book, Max finds a pen-written reader's quotation that impresses him.
>From library cards he tracks tracks down the writer. They become friends.
She is first-grade teacher Rosemary Cross (Olivia Williams) the 25-year old
widow of an alumnus. Ms Williams' only other film was The Postman  --not
the Italian gem but Kevin Costner's latest flop. She reminds me of another
English beauty (well, Anglo-Italian), her senior by 10 years Greta Scacchi.
Williams has that special kind of fresh looks and sweet naturalness that
makes it most understandable for schoolboy Max, whose sap is rising, to
fall in love with her. But then, Herman follows suit. He is Blume in Love,
to quote Paul Mazursky's 1973 movie. Can rivalry be far behind?
What has developed up to now, and what follows, is a marvelous comedy,
linear yet rich in content ane episodes. The film's surface is very funny
but some of its underpinnings are also serious, even sad. Its creators
never misses a chance to show absurdism in real life and real life in
absurdism. On the other hand, they pass up all kinds of gags and shticks
that could be included as gratuitous additions that would burden and dilute
the picture. It is sober filmmaking.
The performances are terrific. First-time performer Jason Schwartzman
(Max), is the son of Talia Shire and her late lawyer-producer husband Jack
Schwartzman (Lionheart, Never Say Never Again). Also the nephew of Francis
Ford Coppola, whose Apocalypse Now is partly parodied in one of Max's
plays. Jason was 17 when the film was shot. One thing that required my
suspension of disbelief was that his Max did look older than 15.
Jason's Max is charged with explosives. Like a land-mine: dynamite, but
without obvious external signs. So is Murray's Blume, perhaps his best
performance ever: restrained, intelligently minimalist, unrhetorical,
discreetly multi-leveled, amusing yet poignant. No clowning here. Even the
milking of some old gags of silent movies and screwball talkies takes a
fresh approach --as when the preoccupied Blume puts a second cigarette to
his lips; when he pulls a tiny branch off a tree, and the tree falls; when
retaliations involve a bicycle and a Bentley.
The filmmakers are in perfect tune with their subject and their cast. They
know exactly how not to insist, when to cut (most scenes are short),where
to place a camera, which lens to use, how to avoid the TV-type closeups
that infect so many features in attempts to add spurious intimacies. They
know how and when to involve us, how much and how little. They don't try to
make Max  really crazy or poignant or even likable.
Anderson's first feature was Bottle Rocket (1996) which he wrote with his
friend Owen Wilson. It was an expansion of an eponymous short (1994) by the
same duo. The 1996 movie was not a commercial hit but does have a strong
following. All of its collaborators (cinematographer, editor, production
designer, music director) have the same fuctions in Rushmore.
I mentioned earlier a number of older movies, and for good reason. The tone
and the strategies of Rushmore are original yet also have a "je ne sais
quoi," a "something" that's very much in the spirit of a certain American
cinema of the mid- 60s to the early 70s. Madness, irreverence, absurdism,
gently (or not) anarchism. Not only The Graduate (67) but several, among
which Dr. Strangelove (64), Mash (70), Brewster McLoud (70, with Bud Cort)
and especially Harold and Maude (71, also with Bud Cort), even some aspects
of films by Robert Downey, Sr., such as  Putney Swope or
Greaser's Palace. The older movie tactics are reinforced by the music,
mostly from the 1960s' British Invasion.
The picture did the 1998 festival circuit with great success. It joins the
pantheon of contemporary films that are on list of our BBNMM (the Bring
Back the Ninety Minute Movie Society). Next time there ought to be an Oscar
in a new category, "Best Retro Movie of the Year." Just for Rushmore.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Dangerous Moonlight (1941)
DANGEROUS MOONLIGHT (UK, 1941)  Directed by Brian Desmond
Hurst. Written by Shaun Terence Young (also story), Brian
Desmond Hurst, Rodney Ackland. Photography, Georges P'rinal.
Editing, Alan Jaggs. Art direction, John Bryan. Music, Richard
Addinsell. Music director, Muir Mathieson. Cast: Anton
Walbrook, Sally Gray, Derrick de Marney, Keneth Kent, Percy
Parsons, J.H. Roberts, Cecil Parker, Guy Middleton, et al. 83
min.
Minor but special film is little known outside Britain, though
its music, The Warsaw Concerto, became an instant radio staple
the world over and is still heard. While a lesser and
derivative score, it made the fame of composer Richard
Addinsell. He was obviously inspired by Rachmaninoff's Second
Piano Concerto, which, in 1945, came into its own in another
British film, David Lean's superb "Brief Encounter."
Addinsell's composition is nicely worked into the film, along
with the Polish national anthem, bits of Beethoven and Chopin.
The movie was a huge hit in beleaguered Britain and high in
the affection of audiences. When it was made and released in
1941, England was being blitzed by the Luftwaffe, Nazi forces
had spread from Norway to Crete, North Africa and Russia.
America had not joined the fray yet. The film was produced by
the British unit of RKO, which financed it. 
The main story, told in flashback, deals with the period of
the Nazi invasion of Poland (started September 1, 1939)
through the Battle of Britain (July-September 1940). As Warsaw
is about to fall, pianist Stefan Radetzky (Anton Walbrook),
now with a Polish bomber squadron, is ordered to fly to
Rumania. Interned, he escapes, comes to the USA to concertize
for the Polish Relief Fund. He meets again and marries
journalist Sally Gray, an American with whom he had a
lightning romance in Warsaw. Radetzky gives concerts, then 
joins a fighter squadron of the RAF in England and fights in
the Battle of Britain.
Made under difficult circumstances, the film is, of necessity,
un-fancy, though its early use of actual combat footage is
effectively presented. The very simplicity of the movie, the
absence of Hollywoodian polish, slickness and rah rah
patriotism, its reserve and  immediacy, give it a touching,
semi-documentary directness.
No doubt to boost morale and flesh out the story, there are a
few improbabilities. In one of them, handsome Derrick De
Marney plays a full-of-blarney Irish volunteer in Poland. One
wonders how the short time of the  Polish war (the blitzkrieg)
allowed this.
"Dangerous Moonlight" was not shown in the USA until after the
war. It was somewhat misleadingly rebaptized "Suicide
Squadron," as the original title itself was also  misleadingly
sentimental. In the UK it is the best known work of its
director, Hollywood-trained Irishman Brian Desmond Hurst.
The very interesting star is Vienna-born Adolf Wohlbruck
(later Anton Walbrook) who did well in German and Austrian
films and, after a stint in Hollywood, settled in England.
Distinctive, aristocratic, quietly effective, he became a
major figure in important movies, among them the two that
followed "Dangerous Moonlight" : "The Life and Death of
Colonel Blimp" and "The Red Shoes." In all he made a small
number of films, but these, plus two Max Ophuls French
pictures ("La Ronde" of 1950 and "Lola Montes" of 1955) place
him high among performers.
The main writer of "Dangerous Moonlight" was 25-year old Shaun
Terence Young, then in uniform. Later he became a director of
action movies, including James Bond pictures.  French
cinematographer Georges Perinal was one of Britain's aces of
the camera. Michael Rennie is listed near the bottom of the
credits. The supporting cast also includes the delightful
Cecil Parker who had one of the most distinctive voices in the
history of cinema. (Edwin Jahiel)

Title
Review for Traveller (1997)
TRAVELLER (1997) *** Directed and photographed by Jack Green. Written by
Jim McGlynn. Produced by Bill Paxton, Brian Swardstrom, Mickey Liddell and
David Blocker.Editing, Michael Ruscio. Production design, Michael Helmy.
Music,  Andy Paley. Cast:  Bill Paxton (Bokky), Mark Wahlberg (Pat),
Julianna Margulies (Jean), James Gammon (Double D), Luke Askew (Boss Jack),
et al.  An October Films release. 100 minutes. Rated R (violence).
One of the most exclusive private clubs in London is The Travellers. At the
opposite social pole, Travellers  are what Irish Tinkers call themselves.
They are like clans who for ages have had a single vocation and avocation:
scams, frauds, confidence games.
Like gypsies, they're always on the move --hence their name, -- live
together, marry exclusively within the clan, feel and keep apart from the
outside world. In the mid-19th Century, the Great Potato Famine brought
huge numbers of Irish to America, including Travellers who kept exercising
their scams (mostly horse trading) almost as a birthright, generally in the
rural South.
In the film, a tribe of such Irish-Americans live (temporarily?) in their
own trailer park in the woods of North Carolina. Twentyish Pat (Mark
Wahlberg) shows up for his father's funeral. As the deceased was persona
non grata  (he had committed the sin of marrying an outsider) Pat's request
to join the clan is rebuffed until Bokky (Bill Paxton), the star scam
artist, takes him on as an apprentice.
With implausible rapidity Pat becomes skilled at the tricks of the trade.
The frauds shown are the purchase of run-down trailers resold as good, and
the sealing of roofs and driveways with what is crankcase oil that runs
with the first rain. More imaginative is the fraud of a "lost and found"
family jewel. The victim is pretty waitress-in-the-sticks Jean (Julianna
Margulies), a divorced mother.
Before you can say "I'll Love You a Thousand Ways" (heard on the
soundtrack) Bokky gets second thoughts about, and first feelings for, Jean.
He makes restitution. Before you can say "Searching For Someone Like You,"
Jean and Bokky are in bed and in love. Later, when he finds out that Jean's
daughter needs expensive ear surgery, Bokky embarks on most ambitious plan
to get money.
This is perhaps a cliche situation, but it is nicely papered over by
Paxton's solid, likable presence. The deja vu is also mitigated by Ms.
Margulies being simpatica in a Sandra Bullock way and doing for her lover a
wickedly sexy striptease, strong on tease yet merely PG-rated on strip.
Colorful Double D, a grizzled, canny old-timer, becomes the duo's partner
in a mega-scam operation that takes them to Louisville. They go to work,
with and on, a sinister operator.  The mechanics of this plot are too
complex to be related without spoiling the surprises. These lead both to
success and to the only violence in the film.
Traveller is the directorial debut of Jack Green, the cinematographer for
many Clint Eastwood movies.  Recently he shot director Jan De Bont's
Twister, a vehicle for special effects. It starred Bill Paxton.
Here Mr. Green does double duty as cinematographer too. He gives the movie
the right realistic look, keeps photography and sets appropriately simple,
functional and un-gimmicky. He avoids excessive Hollywood sentimentality or
grunginess.
The script has some unclarities and holes but good touches predominate.
Among them, the casting. Irish-faced Luke Askew is  Boss Jack, the center
and anchor of operations. He gets his cut each time. Askew reminded me of
Limerick-born actor Richard Harris in his youthful years.
The Boss has a ravishingly Irish young daughter. Her quick-starting romance
with Pat is not elaborated. This is not a case of story underdevelopment
but rather a move to keep the main subject (the companions' modus operandi)
on track with minimal distractions.
The dialogue is credibly simple. One of the best bits has Jean asking
Bokky, back with his loot: "How did you do it?" His reply is a formula of
Method Acting for crooks: " You look someone right in the eyes, You lie to
yourself. You lie so good that you believe it."
That the players have no Southern accents might raise eyebrows, but I see
it as stressing that those Irish-Americans live their own, separate tribal
life in a society that comes into contact with outsiders only when
necessary.
The film has two novel aspects: our introduction to an unfamiliar
subculture within our homogenized nation; and the rather movie-neglected
subject of fraud. Traveller stakes its modest domain within the
multi-billion industry of scams with millions of victims, especially naive,
uneducated, gullible people symbolized by the little old ladies who lose
their life-savings.
Frauds are all around us, from boiler-room telephone operations to official
looking mail : "you have won this or that-- just verify by sending us $30."
" There's cheap land in Florida" (for sure, but in the swamps).
People all over the world get pleasure from films and books about con-men
and their clever ways. The majority of scam-movies allow us to enjoy them
not because we approve of dishonesty but because many scams are victimless
crimes (cf. "Paper Moon") or at the expense of other cheats: "The Sting"
stings a gangster. Hustler movies hustle hustlers. "The Grifters" shows
dishonor among thieves.
Better yet, most con-jobs are comedies: the screwball classic "The Lady
Eve," "The Flim-Flam Man," "Trading Places," "Dirty Rotten Scoundrels."
True, in Traveller we cannot feel sympathy for the cheats of little people.
But things change with the Big Plan which is both at the expense of a
dislikable character and fraught with danger for the protagonists.
The movie has an unusually good and rich (29) selection of songs, some
heard in toto, including the opener, King of the Road (sung by Randy
Travis) and the closer, "Young Love."

Title
Review for Ball of Fire (1941)
BALL OF FIRE (1941) A remarkable, funny screwball variant of łSnow White
and the Seven Dwarfs.˛  Linguist Gary Cooper and seven fuddy-duddy scholars
on a foundation grant, are cloistered in a mansion where they are preparing
an encyclopedia. Cooper ventures into the forbidding outside world to do
research on slang. He meets cabaret singer Sugarpuss OšShea (Barbara
Stanwyck) a gansgteršs moll. The mob stashes her in the professorsš house
and, to our great merriment, the outrageous follows the preposterous.
Little-known comedy was directed by the great Howard Hawks who worked in
all genres and who, like the flyers who flew by the seat of their pants in
so many of his aviation movies, had all the right instincts. Script by
Billy Wilder and Charles Brackett. It is uncanny that Wilder, who had come
from Germany a few years before, could write such American and such slangy
dialogues. Cooper, who was just as versatile as Hawks and could play
anything from a romantic lovers to strong, silent men of action, shows
again what a marvelous comedian he was. He sometimes even looks like Johnny
Carsonšs Floyd Turbo character. Hawks remade the movie in 1948 as łA Song
Is Born,˛ a musical version with Danny Kaye. (Edwin Jahiel)
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Kingpin (1996)
**(1996)   Directed by Peter Farrelly and Bobby Farrelly. 
Written by Barry Fanaro and Mort Nathan. Photography, Mark Irwin. 
Editing, Christopher Greenbury. Production design, Sidney Jackson 
Bartholomew, Jr. Music, Freedy Johnston. Cast: Woody Harrelson (Roy 
Munson), Randy Quaid (Ishmael), Vanessa Angel (Claudia), Bill Murray 
(Ernie McCracken) and Chris Elliott (the Gambler). An MGM release. 114 
min. Rated R (crude language, situations and sex, violence)
In 1979, young bowling prodigy Roy Munson of Ohio (Harrelson) defeats 
the reigning Odor Eaters Championship title-holder Ernie McCracken 
(Murray). Ernie, older, rotten and a con man, sneakily disables Roy's 
car with sugar in the gas, so as to "rescue" Roy and use him for bowling 
hustles. In the last scam, the "victims" (themselves scammers) catch on 
and grind up Roy's fingers as Ernie runs off.
In 1996 we meet again Roy, a broken man, subsisting in Scranton, 
Pennsylvania under pathetic conditions. One day, however, he gets bowled 
over by the bowling of Ishmael (Quaid) and offers to make him into a 
pro, with hopes of sharing with him one million dollars at a 
winner-takes-all tournament in Reno. Ishmael, who is Amish and practices 
his avocation secretly, will have none of it.
Persistent Roy, in Amish garb and fake beard, joins Ishmael at his Amish 
settlement, makes friends, finally succeeds as the community is hit by a 
debt of half-a-million. The two men take to the road, hustling their 
sport.. In one of their adventures, a wealthy, sinister bowling addict 
goes after them. They escape, joined by the man's mistress-accomplice 
Claudia (Angel). In Reno whom does Roy encounter after 17 years but 
still- champion and still hustler Ernie?  
Q: Wasn't this movie made by the "Dumb and Dumber" fellows?
A: Yes. "D & D" was the first feature by Peter Farrelly who also 
scripted with brother Bobby and Bennet Yellin. "Kingpin" is co-directed 
by the brothers. 
Q: They didn't write it this time?
A: No. The writers come from TV (it shows in a thousand ways, from 
stuck-in jokes to disconnections). One (Nathan) is a Chicagoan with a 
B.A. in TV production from the University of Illinois. 
Q: Is "Kingpin" another dumb-dumber comedy?
A: Not quite. Ishmael does qualify and is incredibly otherworldly. At 
the start Roy is just young, naive, not wise to manipulation by Ernie. 
Ernie is a monster of duplicitous and hypocritical nastiness, and the 
essence of vulgarity.
Q: Doesn't the plot remind you of "The Hustler" and its sequel "The 
Color of Money?"
A: Of course, plus several other movies about hustles. But you said 
"plot" and there really isn't one.  The whole film is put together as a 
string of episodes whose connections are either dubious or illogical.
Q: Yet it's a comedy?
A: It is, but a dark one, with black humor worked into many broad, 
slapstick, cartoonish gags, almost all gross.
Q: How broad, how gross?
A: Just a few examples. Item: Roy, owing money to his landlady, invents 
a scam which makes her grateful. But he is soon caught and the woman 
exacts sex -- after which Roy vomits. Item: Passing for Amish, Roy is 
told to milk a cow. He "milks" a bull. Item: Asked to take the shoes off 
a horse he saws off its hooves. Item: Apparently the Amish don't know 
about modern conveniences, so Ishmael sits on an urinal to defecate. 
Item: Claudia works her sexual charms on people, but not on a farmer, 
who brightens up when given a sheep for carnal purposes. Item: In Reno, 
Ishmael in drag, as an exotic dancer (Don't ask). Item: Roy has the 
vision of a gay gambler offering one million bucks for one night with 
Ishmael. (Remember "Indecent Proposal?" which co-starred Woody 
Harrelson?) Item: Ernie promotes on TV his Fund for Fatherless Children 
while fondling lasciviously their pretty mothers. Item: A line from The 
Good People at the Tobacco Industry who protest "If you're dead, you 
can't smoke." Item: Jokes about Roy's metal fingers and the rubber glove 
that covers his hand. At the end he will do publicity for Trojan 
condoms. 
Q: Well, some of this sounds funny.
A: Some yes, but in a depressing way. The street rumor (what reviewers 
said) was overall "Bad film but kept me laighing." I laughed only a few 
times, and against my better judgment. But mostly I was aghast.
Q: At what?
A: At the cheap shots. At the jaundiced view of all people; at the 
misogynism (women are shown and photographed unflatteringly, in 
character and body parts); at the semi-ridicule of the Amish (in a 
reverse sort of "Witness"); at Claudia's morals; at the repulsive 
bowlers and audiences; and so on...
Q: Are there no OK gags?
A: Very few, but still misanthropic. Early on, Ernie in a restaurant 
imperiously ordering a waitress to return after she has removed her 
perfume. Or making a visual pass at one of the girls at a nearby table. 
One girl smiles back. "Not you" he says cruelly. 
Q: So nothing is subtle?
A: Nothing, unless you go for in-jokes. Ishmael comes from "Moby Dick" 
with the Reno prize as the whale. Roy Munson sounds like Charles Manson 
(the mass murderer) and refers you to Harrelson in "Natural Born 
Killers." He tells the Amish that his name is Ezekiel Maltin (or so I 
remember), Maltin being a TV movie critic and film guidebook editor.
Q: Are the actors good?
A: For the improbable roles they play, yes, in a morose fashion.
Q: To see or not to see?
A: Depends on the tolerance of your budget and I.Q. I certainly did not 
think highly of the movie, but I neither did I feel trapped by it.

Title
Review for Make Way for Tomorrow (1937)
MAKE WAY FOR TOMORROW (1937) Directed and produced by Leo 
McCarey. A touching drama that Hollywood would not dream of 
making today. Impecunious old couple Beulah Bondi and Victor 
Moore lose their house and are not properly looked after by 
their five children, now grown-up and married. 
Since no one wants them as a couple, they have to separate. 
Bondi goes to the New York apartment of son Thomas Mitchell 
and his wife Fay Bainter. Moore stays in  a small town with  a 
daughter. Both feel unwanted, even as singles. 
Bondi volunteers to go to a home for aged women, under the 
pretext of frail health. Moore will be sent to another 
daughter yet, in California. The two oldsters get together one 
last time and have fun being driven in a car and revisiting 
their honeymoon hotel. 
The film has an appropriate old folks tempo, is quietly 
pathetic, affecting and gripping. It concentrates on Bondi and 
the unease of her stay with the weak-willed Mitchell,  the 
impatient Bainter, and their happy-go-lucky daughter. Yet it 
paints none of them as a villain. Their sin is more 
insensitivity than malice. Arguably, those characters and the 
particulars of their situation are not sufficiently explored, 
while the Bondi-Moore sweetness and naivete are a bit 
overstressed.  
Perhaps some viewers will think too that a bit mechanical 
--albeit very warm--is the small lineup of strangers who show 
kindness to the old couple: Maurice Moscovitch as a Jewish 
small-store owner; a car salesman who thinks he might make a 
sale; a hotel manager; a band leader who plays for the couple 
"Let Me Call You Sweetheart." But those are trifles, 
attributable to the period's studio cine-esthetics. In any 
case the everyday details are observed with precision and 
there's a welcome absence of forced effects or histrionics. 
At the 11th hour the old people's children realize how 
shabbily they had treated their parents, but the movie has the 
good sense of avoiding an artificial, last-minute shift to 
give us a  happy ending. In 1937 Moore was 60, Beulah Bondi, 
Thomas Mitchell and Fay Bainter were all 45. The excellent 
makeup job by Wally Westmore helped the very talented Bondi 
look convincingly old. So does her superb performance and body 
English. The casting is additionally interesting as Bainter 
for a change does not play a sunny,  sweet matron; as Mitchell 
is not his usual lovable type; and as Moore, a comedian, is 
cast against type in a serious role that he handles very well.  
The film was most popular the year of its release.  
Additional points of interest: The home for old women is 
called Idylwild; in the 1932 " If I Had A Million," also a 
Paramount film, such a home was Idylwood. The music is by two 
fascinating people, the melodious, prolific Victor Young, and 
the little-known George Antheil. Antheil was an American but 
has often been mistaken for a Frenchman, what with his family 
name and his work in France. There, he had written the score 
for the famous, experimental "Ballet Mecanique" ( 1924),  made 
by French painter Fernand Leger and the American Dudley 
Murphy. (Edwin Jahiel)

Title
Review for Besieged (1998)
Italian director Bernardo Bertolucci's films often unfold on a
sprawling canvas (the epic 1900 and the Oscar-winning The Last
Emperor, etc), while others court controversy (Last Tango In Paris).
While some of his works are visually lush, many are also interminably
dull (The Sheltering Sky and Little Buddha, etc).  Bertolucci's latest
film is a far more intimate and personal story, yet it still embraces
many of his favourite themes.
Set in contemporary Rome, Besieged is a poignant tale about
the coming together of two strangers, lonely and lost people, who are
held hostage to matters of the heart.  Shandurai (Thandie Newton, from
Flirting, etc) is a refugee from an African nation in turmoil.  Her
husband, a school teacher and political activist, has been arrested
and detained by the military regime.  Shandurai is studying medicine
at a Rome university hospital, and earns extra money by cleaning the
apartment block in which she resides.  It is while performing these
daily duties that she first meets Kinsky (David Thewlis, the
narcissistic anti-hero from Mike Leigh's Naked, etc), a musician who
eschews the public forum.
Kinsky is infatuated by the beguiling Shandurai, but she is
still haunted by the palpable presence of her husband.  "If you really
loved me, you would get my husband out of jail," she snaps at him one
day.  And slowly but surely, Kinsky proceeds to do just that.  He
begins to sell off his valuable possessions, including his beloved
piano, to secretly negotiate her husband's release.  Shandurai is
ignorant of Kinsky's intentions until the end, when she is ultimately
forced to choose between the two very different men who have become
important parts of her life.  However, Bertolucci cleverly ends the
film on a hauntingly ambiguous, enigmatic but optimistic note, that
forces the audience to draw their own conclusions as to what will
happen next.
Bertolucci directs with remarkable restraint and
understatement, making this allusive, meditative film a surprisingly
powerful and moving experience.  Like a great composer, he slowly
pulls the various elements together for a rewarding emotional
crescendo.  However, many within the audience may find the pacing
rather slow.  Others will be deeply involved in the emotional journey
of the two characters.
The film is held together by the moving, engaging and quite
sympathetic central performances.  In particular, Newton, whose
anguished and painful performance as a former slave was the best
feature of the dire Beloved, gives another wonderful performance of
great vulnerability and depth.  Thewlis is full of nervous mannerisms
and jittery movements that wonderfully capture the energy of a man
uncomfortable and unsure of his place in the world.  The peripheral
characters add colour to the film, although dramatically they add
little.
Besieged has been ravishingly shot by Fabio Cianchetti, whose
use of hand-held cameras gives the story a more intimate perspective.
Music plays an important part in underscoring the emotional heart of
the film, and Bertolucci weaves in everything from classical sonatas
to primitive African rhythms.
Besieged reaffirms Bertolucci's reputation as one of the great 
craftsmen of contemporary cinema.

Title
Review for Orgazmo (1997)
ORGAZMO (1997)  1/2 * Written, directed, edited by Trey Parker. Produced by
Fran Rubel Kuzui, Jason McHugh, Matt Stone. Photography,  Kenny Gioseffi.
Cast: Trey Parker (the Elder Joe Young), Matt Stone (the other Elder), Dian
Bachar (Choda-Boy), Michael Dean Jacobs (Maxxx Orbison), Robyn Raab (Lisa),
Ron Jeremy (Clark), Masao ``Maki'' San (G-Fresh), et al. An October
Pictures release. 90 minutes. Rated NC-17 (sex, language)
Whenever a multiplex schedules a 90-minute feature for just two shows a
day, it means that the film is either "art" that does not draw mainstream
audiences, or "dreck" that cannot even find an infantile public. Orgazmo is
the latter.
Comedy is the hardest genre to make. Within comedy, the subgenre of
parodies is even harder. Within that subgenre, spoofing films that are
themselves parodies, intentionally or not, is a lost cause. This applies to
a host of films, including pornographic, and especially cheap pornos.
Orgazmo's intent  to parody cheap porno-flicks falls pancake-flat, though
not cheesecake-flat.
Two young, clean-cut Mormon Elders are trying to spread the good word in
Los Angeles.
When they chance on the mansion-cum-studio of porn-maker Maxxx Orbison
(note the xxx) the reception is rough. One Elder flees, the other, Joe
Young, highly proficient in martial arts, fights Maxxx's goons. The
sequence, meant to be funny, is not. Nor is it choreographed a la Hong
Kong.
Maxxx, impressed by Joe, immediately offers him the title role in the
picture he is shooting, the part of Orgazmo, a superstud and superfighter
who has a diminutive side-kick, Choda-Boy. (A parody of Batman and Robin).
For two days' work in his quickie, Maxx goes from his usual fee of $300 to
$20,000. Joe refuses but then everyone has his price. He finally accepts
because he and his fiancee Lisa dream of a wedding in the pricey Salt Lake
City's Mormon Tabernacle. Joe's main stipulation is that there will be a
stand-in actor (or phallus) for the sex acts.
Joe's name is, of course, a reference to the King-Kongish ape in the film
"Mighty Joe Young." Maxxx rebaptizes him Joe Hung. Ain't all that funny?
The rest of the film is an aimless bore, clearly improvised from scene to
scene. The flick is a mega-hit  that Maxx wants to make sequel after
sequel. There's a kind of sub-plot about other henchmen of Maxxx's (he's a
kind of Mafioso on the side) who take over by force a sushi-bar;  a bit
more relevant is the relation of Joe and Lisa who regularly speak on the
phone starting with "Jesus love you and I love you."
Joe, who majored in theater from Brigham Young University ,sinfully lies to
Lisa by pretending he is extending his stay in L.A. to be in Death of a
Salesman. Naive Lisa eventually comes to visit and...and...
I knew nothing about filmmaker Troy Parker but  finally found out that he
is about 28, has been variously active in movies and is the co-maker of
TV's series South Park. Since, on TV, I mostly watch PBS, the History
Channel, old films and the better ones I have missed, I was unaware that
South Park was an animation about little kids who use vulgar language, and
that the shows have made Parker famous in some quarters.
Orgazmo does have a small sprinkling of jokes (the "best " ones verbal
rather than graphic) which could bring on some chuckles depending on the
viewer's standards for humor. But as an entity, this flick is plain Dumb
and Dumber, part II of which, yet unreleased, was written by, guess
who?....Trey Parker.
I suppose that the unusual rating of NC-17 was welcomed by Mr. Parker. It
promises raunchy audiovisual excitement to potential adult audiences and to
underage kids who'll sneak in. But in fact, the movie's sex scenes show no
real sex acts and are so broad and un-detailed that they are as inoffensive
as The Three Stooges, which the film does feel like.  The use of a
toy-like, orgasm-producing ray gun invented by Choda-Boy (he has two
scientific Ph.D. degrees from M.I.T.!) is also inoffensively shown. Nudity
exists minimally, mostly as the sight of men's hairy behinds.
The bottom (no pun meant) line is that the NC-17 must be the result of the
film's steady mockery of the Mormons. Otherwise, you can see infinitely
more sexually explicit films on cable, including Cinemaxxx.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Object of My Affection, The (1998)
THE OBJECT OF MY AFFECTION (1998) ** 1/2  Directed by Nicholas
Hytner.Written by Wendy Wasserstein, based on the novel by Stephen
McCauley. Photography, Oliver Stapleton. Editing, Tariq Anwar. Production
design, Jane Musky. Music, George Fenton. Cast: Paul Rudd (George Hanson),
Jennifer Aniston (Nina Borowski), Alan Alda (Sidney Miller), Allison Janney
(Constance Miller), Tim Daly (Dr. Robert Joley), John Pankow (Vince
McBride), Nigel Hawthorne (Rodney Fraser),Amo Gulinello (Paul James), Steve
Zahn (Frank Hanson), et al. A 20th Century Fox release. 110 minutes. R
(sex, language)
The title "The Object Of My Affection," is familiar to connoisseurs of old
pop music, from the eponymous song of long ago. The movie's sound-track,
pleasant and mercifully not as busy as most, includes a few nice oldies,
notably the 1929 "You Were Meant  for Me," performed twice, by Sting and by
Gene Kelly. But surprise! "The Object..." is, sadly, nowhere to be heard.
A good semi-surprise is that the film's several gay men are portrayed in
anti-"La Cage aux Folles"ways. The gays are treated in a straight fashion:
no special traits, intonations, mannerisms, flamboyance, queenly demeanor
and the like. Just people. In fact, ordinary beings. But then, ordinary
people can often be uninteresting too, and that's the main rub in this
movie.
George, a New Yorker like most others in the cast, teaches first grade in a
posh, private school. He gets dumped by college professor and would-be
writer Robert Joley, his companion for four years. Helpfully, Nina, who
counsels teen-age girls, places at George's disposal a room in her
apartment. The two become fast friends, "fast" meaning both quickly and
strongly.
Nina's boyfriend Vince, a civil rights lawyer and occasionally her
colleague, seems to be a decent fellow, but eventually the couple comes to
a parting of the ways, somehow catalyzed unwillingly by George's presence
and Nina's ever-growing affection for him, an acute state of mutual loving
friendship. This almost climaxes when Nina starts initiating sexual
relations. Perhaps, at this point, the story could become "A Bisexual is
Born," (or reborn) but the odd couple is saved by the bell, that of a
ringing telephone.
When Nina finds out that she pregnant by Vince, she decides to raise the
child with George. It looks like a good plan, until George, after a long
period of uninvolvement with other men, meets Paul, an actor who lives with
much older Rodney, a Brit in New York .
Rodney gets rather little screen time, but Nigel Hawthorne plays him
beautifully: as a theater critic with a bite, and as an aging man who loses
his lover.  He does it with admirable economy, wit, wisdom, contained
fatalism and pathos. After the movie is forgotten, Hawthorne will not be.
The actor is reunited here with director Nicholas Hytner, the British stage
person whose film debut was "The Madness of King George."
The other supporting roles, all very peripheral, range from tiny to
sub-sketchy, with semi-caricatures reserved for such as senior citizens
taking ballroom dancing lessons,  and especially for a funny Alan Alda
("the most powerful literary agent in the world") and his current wife. She
is also Nina's older stepsister and self-appointed matchmaker. Recurring
bits of a daft older lady on the ground floor of Nina's building are
blatant padding.
The main performances (Nina's and George's appealing duo; Vince's
uncertainly written part)  are pretty good, but missing in strong
personalities. There's a lack of energy all over, in characters and filmic
rhythm, in spite of some lively or colorful scenes. The film is slow. Not
that it drags, bores, or requires suspension of disbelief. Yet its approach
is scattershot as it touches on comedy, romance and downplayed drama,
without getting any strong mileage out of any of those.
A paradoxical curiosity. Those who know about the prudishness of the old
Hollywood Code are aware of how far movie frankness has come. In an early
scene, counselor Nina is discussing boys with her girls. Says one about a
new male acquaintance: "What he wants is to [verb deleted] me." Nina's calm
response: "The point is, do you want to [verb deleted] him?" It is odd how,
within in a film where the openly sexual premises are not a bit scabrous in
1998, this dialogue jars.
On the whole, "The Object of My Affection" is the object of your attention.
It holds it, but not your rapt attention. The viewer remains distanced and
uninvolved. To put it simply, the movie just does not excite. But it does
make for an agreeable, entertaining 110 minutes.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Men with Guns (1997/II)
MEN WITH GUNS (HOMBRES ARMADOS) (1997) *** 1/2.  Written, directed, and
edited by John Sayles. Photography, Slawomir Idziak. Production design,
Felipe Fernandez Del Paso. Costumes, Mayes C. Ribeo. Original music,Mason
Daring. Music supervision, Tom Schnabel. Cast: Federico Luppi (Dr.
Fuentes), Damian Delgado (Domingo, the soldier), Dan Rivera Gonzalez
(Conejo,the boy), Damian Alcazar (Padre Portillo,the priest), Mandy
Patinkin (Andrew), and Kathryn Grody (Harriet), et al. A Sony Pictures
Classics release.In Spanish, English and Indian languages. 128
minutes.Rated R (violence)
That prince of independent writer-directors, John Sayles, has created a
Latin American country. In cinema, imaginary lands are common and generally
located in central-to-eastern Europe. Like the kingdom of the much-remade
swashbuckling romance "The Prisoner of Zenda"; like the kingdom of
"Ruritania" in mostly operettas or comedies.
More rare, more important and far less fanciful are the anonymous countries
of reality-based political films. The master of this is the Greek-born
French director Costa Gavras. His powerful "Z" and "State of Siege" were,
respectively (and most transparently), Greece and Uruguay. The first was
filmed in Algeria, the second in Chile.
"Men with Guns" was made in Mexico, with a large majority of Latino crew
and cast, including some players who had never seen a movie. Unlike the
Ruritanian flicks, the unnamed country is all too believable. Sayles made a
composite of several Latin American countries, with a stress of Central
America -- El Salvador and Guatemala. But beyond the New World, the
substance of "MWG" can apply to other continents from Europe (e.g. Bosnia)
to Africa or Asia, to any land where there are men with guns.
In the capital, Dr. Fuentes, recently widowed and suffering from a tricky
heart, is thinking of retirement. Played by Argentinean star Federico
Luppi, the serious, distinguished, white-haired doctor kept reminding me of
John Thaw, the Inspector Morse of television.
Upper-class Fuentes is not too politically informed, partly, says the
subtext, because like many a good person, he did not go the extra mile of
wanting to know. What the aging man wanted is to leave a legacy. This took
the shape of training a select group of his students who have now gone to
bring health to remote, Indian-populated places.
The doctor toys with taking a vacation by visiting those students. His
decision is firmed up by a chance meeting, in the city, with one of his
alumni  who gives him bad news and calls him the smartest (read:
professionally) yet dumbest (read: politically) person he has ever known.
To find out what dire things happened (or may have happened) to his
protégés, Fuentes, exchanging his Mercedes for his son's four-wheel-drive,
takes off on a search that becomes one of shocking discoveries. One after
the other, he meets Indian people who survive in terrible conditions,
suffer from acute malnutrition, starvation, diseases -- and execution by
men with guns, the army. There are other men with guns, small groups of
guerrillas, who (for just reasons) fight the soldiers. It's as vicious and
deadly a circle as can be. The army will execute villagers who may have
aided the guerrillas, not necessarily by being sympathizers but, say,
merely for feeding them (one wonders, with what?), even at gun point. In
turn some guerillas can retaliate. There's no end to this.
Ironically, the bad guys in uniform, are also Indians, and they do the
dirty work of the white Establishment. Something here reminds me of North
American labor riots in the 1930s when companies such as Ford would pay
desperate, unemployed workers to become strike-breaking goons against
strikers, their "brothers."
Dr. Fuentes's journey is a road-movie of odd encounters  and unsuspected
revelations. It is an adventure in strange places where, to borrow the
title of another John Sayles movie, Fuentes is like a Brother from Another
Planet. Not that the Indians see him for what he is.
Each village has a specialty. They call themselves the Coffee People, the
Corn People, the Sugar or Banana or Salt People --which underlines their
awful plight and dependence on a single crop. This creates divisions which
the geographically isolated peasants are also separated other groups. Few
natives know Spanish. Four different local languages are spoken in the film.
English is limited to three encounters with a couple of American "Teflon
tourists," as Sayles calls them. Mandy Patinkin and his real-life wife are
enthusiastic about architectural ruins but deaf and blind to the plight of
the Indians. They are not Ugly Americans but very real samples of millions
of strangers in strange lands, whom Fuentes resembled before his Odyssey.
At each place the doctor is met by locals who hide when he shows up and who
will  not talk to him. Fuentes learns somehow of disasters, including the
killing of his students. He does not remain not alone,however. Conejo
("Rabbit") a Spanish-speaking boy of about 10, becomes his guide. The
product of a rape by a soldier, Conejo is a pariah.
The film is realistic, also symbolic, mystical and magical. Conejo becomes
like a version of Ovid leading Dante in his descent to Hell. He calmly
tells of catastrophes, takes Fuentes to a cemetery that doubled as a
killing field, helps open Fuentes's eyes to grim truths.
Those two are joined by other characters. First Domingo, a deserter who
initially robs Fuentes then joins him. Through flashbacks we learn
frightening things about Domingo as well about the second newcomer, Padre
Portillo, a priest who has defrocked himself and has terrible problems of
conscience. (His is the best portrait  of the kind since Graham Greene).
Then comes a girl, whose rape by the military has rendered her mute.
The saga of Dr. Fuentes is a most touching, vivid excursion into awareness
of others and into self-awareness. Both are inseparable from the
denunciation of a regime in which the Indians hardly count as humans, of
governments which fear that education of any kind will raise the
consciousness of the lowly and cause them to go against privileged
oligarchies.
Yet there is no accusatory rhetoric, no finger-pointing, no didacticism.
The images and events speak  louder than diatribes. Sayles is an
intelligent, socially-conscious, caring filmmaker. (He is also a much
praised writer of fiction and was the recipient of a MacArthur Foundation
"genius grant.') He is a liberal in the widest sense, not a bleeding heart.
There is no romanticizing of the Indians. But there is nobility allied with
fatalism, especially in a scene where villagers calmly vote to accept the
army's diabolical bargain: "Let a group of you accept to be executed and we
won't kill the whole village." The yes-voters include the doomed group.
Sayles makes pictures on tiny budgets. This one cost him an extravagant 2.5
million, about one-fortieth of a Hollywood blockbuster. The money was well
spent. The filming took the crew to some 40 or 50 locations. Professionals
and non-professional actors are perfect. The photography is by a Polish
master, the music is superb, whether composed for the film or from extant
Latin American tunes.
Rather than oblige his native performers to speak artificial English, Sails
used subtitles that are extremely clear, both in their look and because of
the sparse use of dialogue, something  natural among unloquacious people.
There are just two puzzles. When Fuentes drives around in the wilds without
touching the closest town, how does he get his gas? And about young Conejo
who acts so well, how is it that he is hungry yet looks healthy and wears
acceptable clothes rather than  ags? How did he, the pariah, survive? How
did he learn his fluent Spanish while the others around him can hardly
speak it?  The latter might just be because he was, for a while, the
soldiers's mascot. Anyway, I won't lose any sleep over it.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Medicine Man (1992)
MEDICINE MAN (1992) ** 1/4 Cast: Sean Connery, Lorraine Bracco, et al.
Directed by John McTiernan. Written by Tom Schulman and Sally Robinson.
Photography, Donald McAlpine. A Hollywood Pictures release. 104 min. Rated
PG-13.
Another entry in the ecological-rain forest sweepstakes, MEDICINE MAN is
also one of those movies that get trounced by the critics but supported by
the public. Both extremes are, well... extreme. The film is obvious and
so-so.  It is about as ambitious as a TV movie, except for its elaborate
production values and high budget. On the other hand, it is neither
pretentious nor irritating : at worst you can be bored, but without feeling
like pelting the screen with ripe tropical fruit ; at best you may get some
passing pleasure from watching it, especially at matinee prices.
For six years, biochemist Dr. Robert Campbell (Connery), has been living in
an Indian village of Venezuela's Amazonian rain forest. He has found a cure
for cancer -- but there are complications: a lost formula to be
reconstituted, healing flowers way up at treetop level, an Indian medicine
man upset at the competition, encroaching bulldozers that bring down the
trees, healing plants, and native culture.
In the movie's Stanley-Livingstone start, the pharmaceutical company
sponsoring  Dr. Campbell research dispatches Dr. Rae Crane (Bracco) to
check up on Campbell. Here come the formulas too!  Not only new, scientific
ones, but the old movie-movie Hollywood cliches,all phony : the odd
encounter, the initial antagonisms, the battle of the sexes, the taming of
the shrill, Bracco's gradual appreciation  of Connery and the  Amazonian
natives, the collaboration between the two doctors, the rise of  affection
and (need it be said?) the birth of love.
The script is by Tom Schulman (the writer of DEAD POETS SOCIETY) with many
rewrites by Sally Robinson and, 'tis said, an uncredited Tom Stoppard.  It
is a dumb, dull  scenario that is beyond the curative powers of script
doctors. And as it has no real shape or energy, it tries to make up for
this with bit, lots of bits: bits of likable natives; bits of Tarzan-Jane
swinging ; bits of levity (a caffeine-loaded plant gives Bracco a high);
bits of hysterics; bits of social consciousness (Stop the Bulldozers!).
Disjointed bits cannot a good mainstream movie make, but at least, they
vary, except for the many, tedious wisecracks during verbal fencing. (But
how come they missed a cheap gag about Connery's computer? It functions in
a humid, insect-ridden environment, yet nobody talks about computer bugs.)
It all adds up to a shaggy doctor story. That Connery is a great scientist
is guaranteed by movie road-signs: he is eccentric, white-bearded,  pony
tailed, curmudgeonly. Of course, this gruff exterior barely conceals a
huge, loving heart. An additional proof of his brilliance may be the fact
that his wife had left him --whether before the jungle stint or during it,
I forget.  ( Memo to students of sexism: In fiction, brainy, dedicated and
workaholic men often have wives who,  feeling neglected or bored, quit. But
we almost never get husbands leaving their genius spouses).
Dr. Campbell is so perfectly at home in the rain forest that had the movie
been made in the 1930s, it would have included the line :"He's gone
native." But this is a modern film. It avoids condescension toward the
Amazon Indians and dodges the opposite temptation of romanticizing or
mysticizing them.
That's OK. But the movie is also slow paced , has some pretty awful lines
of dialogue, and cannot escape the Hollywood corniness of the
white-couple-in-brown-land syndrome. Worse yet, there is no electricity
between Connery and Bracco. Connery, suffering from a recession in his
latest films (Family Business, The Russia House, Highlander 2) is still
good to watch but he seems more dutiful than convinced.
Bracco, who did so very well as the Mob wife in GoodFellas, is no great
shakes but still does not deserve the flailing she's getting from
reviewers. They reproach her character for her New York accent (Dr.
Campbell nicknames her "Bronx"), for abrasiveness, shrillness and griping.
Horrors ! they seem to say, that's  not what a "real" female scientist is
or ought to be! (Second Memo to students of sexism: have the critics have
ever seen a  woman scientist in the flesh or are they operating from movie
creations?)
To its mild credit, Medicine Man keeps the developing love affair verbal
and un-titillating.  Non-titillating too is the natural, careful dosage of
topless natives.  (The critics make cracks but note that the rating is
PG-13)
For the Venezuelan jungle Mexican locations were used. Some Indians were
imported from Brazil. Footage from other South American locations was
nserted. .Technically this is good, thorough and painstaking work. The
settings and their photography  are impressive .Jerry Goldsmith's score
sounds inauthentic, like a mix of Mexican and Peruvian music, but it is
pleasant.
Finally, a solid plus in this undistinguished but quite watchable movie is
that even though the protagonists are on the boring side, there is
something human and ordinary about them. They look their age and seem
neither glamorized nor heavily cosmeticized.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Mr. Saturday Night (1992)
MR. SATURDAY NIGHT (1992)  *** 1/2 Directed by Billy Crystal. Written by
Billy Crystal, Lowell Ganz, Babaloo Mandel. Editing, Ken Beyda. Music, Marc
Shaiman. Production Design, Albert Brenner. Produced by Billy Crystal and
Peter Schindler. Cast : Billy Crystal, David Paymer, Julie Warner, Helen
Hunt, Mary Mara, Jerry Orbach, Ron Silver, Sage Allen, Michael Weiner,
Jerry Lewis, et al. A Columbia Release. 110 min. Rated R (language).
Language is constantly inventing or reviving expressions. Two current ones
are illustrated by comedian Billy Crystal playing comedian Buddy Young, Jr.
and dedicating his life to in-your-face jokes that keep pushing the
envelope.
Created by Crystal in 1984 for HBO and repeated on "Saturday Night Live,"
Buddy now gets full, favorite-comic treatment in Crystal's excellent
directorial start.  The character is fine honed, assuming you can say this
about someone whose humor is not exactly Wildeian or Shavian.
"Mr. Saturday Night" is the biography of now-aged Buddy and his brother
Stan, told in alternating flashbacks and flashforwards, with nearly equal
time given to the present.
The two Yankelman boys are broad, in-house comics who keep their family in
stitches. At their first public appearance on Amateur Nite (sic), Stan, 18,
gets cold feet, but remains in the wings, encouraging Abie, 16, who, at the
last second, has taken on the name of Buddy Young, Jr.
Nice, quiet, sensitive Stan, stays on with the raucous Buddy as the latter
serves his apprenticeship and reaches specialized fame in the Borscht
Belt's circuit, culminating at Grossinger's in 1950.
While Buddy convulses his audiences, Stan, in the background, is a perfect
definition of "factotum." He is Figaro to Buddy's Count Almaviva, his
manager, gofer,soundboard, as well as the butt of his brother's whims and
ego. Occasionally too becomes an unwilling, resentful  pimp, as when he
brings to Buddy an admirer, Elaine (Julie Warner). Stan is attracted to her
but it is Buddy who marries the charming young woman.
Buddy rises to becoming  an increasingly important Las Vegas performer,
though always billed below the headliners. In a clever bit, his appearance
on the Ed Sullivan show is a catastrophe, since he follows the Beatles
before a frenzied, hysterical  audience of youths. Still, he does get TV
celebrity as "Mr. Saturday Night," though never attaining superstardom.
Actors never stop acting in real life, but this isn't always evident.  Most
comics are non-stop performers too, but the nature of their trade is such
that their off-stage jokes are always obvious.
Buddy, if not the ultimate, is the archetypical New York Jewish comedian,
conceived, written and played with great inside-track knowledge and much
affection, colossal warts and all. He is a monomaniacally compulsive
jokester 24 hours a day, to the point that only one-liners and gags count
for him.
Being so set in his tunnel-vision ways, he becomes self-destructive, flubs
his chances, loses sponsors and exploits even those who love him (brother,
wife, daughter), through neglect and jokes at their expense. Anything for a
laugh, any time.
Buddy's compulsive, incessant joking does not spare events such as his
wedding,  the birth of his child, his being at his dying mother's side,
even her funeral too. Yet on those occasions the film manages sometimes to
transcend the tacky and the crude, and can introduce bittersweet moments of
true pathos.
The movie is a two-hour homage to generations of ethnic jokemeisters and
their shticks.  It would take a computer to analyze all the ingredients,
the name comics who enter this amalgam. Yet, Crystal's Buddy is both a
composite and a comic in his own right.
But he is no human being by common norms. Like many one-track-mind
professionals, he is self-centered, has no personal dimensions, or, for
that matter, a meaningful private life. In vague terms which place much of
the onus on Buddy, we learn that his daughter's life has been a failure.
His wife, the lovely Elaine, was introduced in 1950 as the perfect mate:
witty, gutsy, lively with repartee... Later though, when we meet her
repeatedly, she has receded into the background. Her personality has
disappeared.
Whilst all those around Buddy fade into stooges or supporting characters,
the movie makes an exception by sketching with deft irony and much
affection Buddy's mother, thus salvaging some family values. Mostly though,
it shows with sharp realism the perpetual insecurity of showbiz people,
even at the height of their reputation.
Above all, the movie works in, as its second major, as well as most
original element, the Buddy-Stan relationship, ambiguous yet clear, built
on  narcissism and monstrous insensitivity on one side, antagonism,
devotion and frustration on the other, and a weird kind of love under the
surface.
As Stan, David Paymer quietly steals every scene he appears in.  When,
"tired of shlepwork," he retires, the film almost acquires a tragic tinge.
It is an Osca-caliber performance. Billy Crystal's supercharged acting is
striking too, as a monochord, more obvious tour-de-force.
The excellent playing extends to the supporting actors: young agent Helen
Hunt who tries, against the comic's own self-defeating nature, to give the
aged Buddy a second chance; Jerry Orbach as her boss ; or Ron Silver as a
big-time film director who used to idolize Buddy.
The gallery of characters is also reinforced by the precise physical
casting of two youngsters as the teen-age brothers, and by the  make-up of
Stan as an old man. Parchment-faced Buddy however, in spite of the
much-advertised, lengthy cosmetic sessions, made me uncomfortable. It felt
as though the eyes were peering from behind a plastic mask
The story's structure tends to be a bit systematically repetitious. It
hammers its points, especially the swinging pendulum between rapport and
alienation in the two brothers. In the last act you sense that the writers
are desperately seeking a wrap-up. And since movies cannot let go of the
odd notion that performers, whether young or old, deserve more pathos and
sympathy than anyone else, "Mr. Saturday Night" too oversentimentalizes the
actors and the showbiz profession.
As they should, the jokes run realistically from crude to indifferent, with
occasional fresh gems. Equally true-to-life is Buddy's repertory, strong on
insults but cautious on political issues.
A hilarious, lightning-fast scene with bread rolls would have made Charlie
Chaplin proud of Crystal. But there is much more than rib-tickling to this
suprisingly complex and ultimately affecting view of a lifetime in schlock.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Bian Lian (1996)
THE KING OF MASKS (Bian Lian, China, 1996)  *** 1/2  Directed by Wu 
Tianming. Written by Wei Minglung. Produced by  Mona Fong & Ho Titus. 
Photography, Mu Dayuan. Original Music, Zhao Jiping. Cast:  Zhu Xu 
(Wang), Zhou Ren-ying (Doggie), Zhao Zhigang (Master Liang), et al. 
A Shaw Brothers production (Hong Kong). A Samuel Goldwyn Co. release. 
In Mandarin, subtitled in English. 101 minutes. Not  rated (if so, G)
Don't blink, or you'll miss something. Something good, beautiful, 
funny, touching , affectionate. King of Masks is first-rate in every 
respect and a joy to watch whether you're a sophisticated cinephile, 
a casual filmgoer, or a child of any age.
The film has received a large number of awards, internationally, 
including, in China, Best Director, Best Child Actor, Best 
Co-Production. The setting is in Sichuan province of the early 1930s. 
(One can tell the period from many clues, including the sole 
automobile shown, and avoid some reviewers' mistaken dating to "the 
turn of the century")
Master Wang is an elderly street performer who does amazing sleight 
of hand. He turns his head around and, in a flash is wearing a mask, 
then another, then yet another... How he does it is a secret. How the 
film does it is no secret: clever editing. It is so quick that you 
may wonder whether such an impressive performance really did exist.
Wang's wife left him long ago. His male child died young.. In his 
less-than-modest houseboat he has been plying the rivers of Sichuan 
(the Yang-Tze and its tributaries)  alone save for "The General," his 
clever monkey who passes the hat around. Wang's performances attract 
crowds of admirers, yet bring in pitifully few coins, especially 
since these are times of floods, economic crises and hunger.
He is a lovable, beautifully mannered man who loves his profession 
passionately. His huge sorrow is that after he's gone, there will be 
no one to take over. A hard-to-find, first-rate pupil is needed. 
Young, suffering girls, flock to him to offer their services, for 
nothing. Mothers try to sell their daughters.  But it won't do. 
Wang's successor, by tradition and by divination has to be male.
A bright-looking boy, about 8, does catch Wang's eye and ear. His 
father (who will turn out to be his tyrannical owner) will sell him 
for ten silver dollars. Wang buys him at a discount, half price., and 
names him "Doggie."
The kid turns out to be the ideal choice. She calls the old man 
"Granpa," and happy Wang feels that the child is his grandson. But 
after a series of events and episodes, all of them intelligently, 
colorfully and appealingly done, Doggie turns out to be a girl. Past 
his initial irritation and disappointment, Wang makes his peace with 
Doggie, a mutual affection keeps growing touchingly. Intelligent, 
fast-learning, able, devoted and charming she becomes an invaluable 
companion, assistant and part of the show.
Of course things cannot keeping coming up roses. Doggie accidentally 
set fire to the boat, feels guilty and vanishes. But she resurfaces, 
sad, hungry, unkempt. Which leads to a series of believable 
complications, a kind of domino theory that results in Wang being 
jailed and accused of crimes -- falsely, and by corrupt  police 
authorities. We yearn for a happy ending and a reunion of the old man 
and the child -- and don't get disappointed.  But it is all done with 
such realism and imagination that we are very far from feel-good 
movie clichés.
There is, from the film's start, a third major character, also a 
performer. Master Liang (a role held by a star of Chinese Opera) who 
plays female roles in opera. (That's where this art form and 
Shakespeare meet, since men play women). He is an immensely admired 
celebrity. Huge audiences attend  over and over the operas he is in. 
Crowds mob him in the streets. Chauffeur-driven Liang is chic, 
wealthy, has a palatial home and fans among the rich, powerful and 
famous.
He is an admirer of Wang, whom he vainly tries to entice to the 
Opera, for sums that Wang has trouble imagining. But intelligently 
and with feeling, Liang accepts Wang's refusal. He also urges him to 
find a successor.
When Chang is facing execution, the coalition of Liang and Doggie 
save him. But not before Liang's initial efforts fail. That's when he 
states that actors (and artists) are adulated, "but don't really 
count"
This wonderful, splendidly acted movie has poignancy, seriousness as 
well as much humor.It is only lightly and discreetly political as it 
shows (in passing) the old days of haves and have-nots as well as the 
sexism which, presumably, is no longer part of today's China.
Above all it is a song of human warmth and dedication to art.  Its 
camera work is beautiful, with striking colors --and colorfulness. 
The sets, a feast for the eye, include temples, gigantic statues 
carved in hillsides, perfectly lit interiors and exteriors, 
fascinating (and exotic to Western eyes) scenes of Opera 
performances. A fine musical score is divided into fine "European" 
style music (strings predominate) and lovely Chinese.sounds
The pristine print I saw has crystal-clear sound and subtitles (fewer 
than usual are needed) which are exceptionally large and easy to read.
KOM's maker is non-conformist Wu Tianming. Already a director, he was 
given the headship of a studio (Xian) in the early 1980s, nurtured 
new talent, and raised his studio's income from last to first place, 
even though some of the films he produced (Red Sorghum, etc.) 
infuriated  conservative authorities.
At the time of the Tienanmen Square disaster (1989), he was visiting 
the United States. There, he strongly disapproved the Chinese 
Government's action. His criticism resulted in his staying, 
prudently,  in this country for close to five years, during which he 
taught film and lectured in several unversities. He also opened a 
video store in Los Angeles. Wu is back home again.

Title
Review for Kicking and Screaming (1995)
KICKING AND SCREAMING  **  Written and directed by Noah Baumbach. 
Photography, Steven Bernstein. Editing, J. Kathleen Gibson. Production 
design, Dan Whifler. Costumes, Mary Jane Fort. Music, Phil Marshall. 
Cast: Josh Hamilton, Olivia d'Abo, Carlos Jacott, Chris Eigeman, Eric 
Stoltz, Jason Wiles, Parker Posey, Cara Buono, Elliott Gould, et al.96 
min.  Rated R (language, sex). 
I can't decide whether "Kicking and Screaming" is the child of movies 
like  "Slacker," "Metropolitan," "Barcelona," "Clerks" and the like, or 
just a relative. The common ground and style are there.
The film is mainly about four preppyish men who have just graduated from 
college (school's name and location unspecified) and somehow still hang 
around. Since the cast also includes and involves a number of current 
students, it is sometimes confusing to tell who's still taking courses 
and who is not.
The quartet spend a great deal of time in conversations and 
bull-sessions. There are even scenes of a course in what I take is 
Creative Writing, an awful class treated with good irony. 
The film's start is auspicious. Then you wait and wait for interesting 
things to happen or to be said. They do not, unless you think that 
endless talk that tries to probe into hearts and minds is fascinating 
--dialogue that focuses on media trivia, pretentious and undigested 
cultural references, sex or  post-sophomoric sophomorisms,what one 
character later denounces as "Liberal Arts bull...t."   
The quartet , now  with diploma in hand, are still at the chrysalis 
stage, at some distance from the change to butterfly. They are still 
dazed and confused, to borrow the title of  Richard ("Slacker") 
Linklater's film on 1970s high-schoolers. Some of the graduates pose as 
sophisticates but know that they are not  yet ready for life outside the 
academic cocoon.
The movie tries to be of the mid-1990s, from references to Prague (where 
one man's girl has gone) to chat about nose rings, but with minor 
changes it could be any time since 1980. It is divided into chapters 
whose headings are "Graduation," " Four Months After Graduation," "Fall 
Semester," "Midterms,"  "One Month Before Christmas Vacation" and "Three 
Weeks Later." 
Unlike the steady or occasional lightheartedness of its  filmic 
relatives, this movie's tone feels rather downbeat. The mood is often 
underlined by a kind of morose under-lighting. The man-woman episodes 
are not exactly uplifting either.
A character who is  22 ("Wow! Old Man River!" exclaims a female 
undergraduate) and looks older, is gauchely paired off with a girl who 
is about to become 17, looks younger and, to put it politely, is not 
exactly refined.  When another student, bare-breasted, chain-smoking and 
gum-chewing, tells her new bedmate that she did it because "it seems 
like the college thing to do" this is more depressing than droll. 
There are some clever or sharp moments and bits and pieces that find "le 
mot juste" or the right situations. On the whole though, I wonder 
whether the film is a phony assemblage itself or the true depiction of  
phony characters. Assuming it is the latter, those people and their talk 
are not especially stimulating, just as their affairs are without  true 
sentiment --not to mention passion,-- just as replicating life is not  
in itself necessarily interesting. If this is a portrait of the age, it 
is a cheerless one. 
Credit however Noah Baumbach, the 25-year old writer-director, with a 
debut that, while low on originality and excitement, is promising and 
rather skillful. A huge number of  first films come  from personal 
experience, a common rite of passage in movies. Here, the director may 
be too close to subject, too involved in it, therefore hampered in the 
process of  selecting,  separating chaff from wheat, maintaining 
clarity, giving shape and tempo to his creation.  
At least one famous director has said that you make only one film in 
your life. This means, more or less, that an "auteur"'s 
psychological-social-intellectual nature results in dominant themes and 
treatments. Some of the best filmmakers have done this, but with 
variety, variations and quality. I suspect that Noah Baumbach, with more 
maturity and distancing will --unless he sells out to commercialism -- 
eventually come up with a more complex picture. 

Title
Review for Notting Hill (1999)
NOTTING HILL (U.K., 1999) **  Directed by Roger Michell. Written by Richard
Curtis. Produced by Duncan Kenworthy. Photography, Michael Coulter. Music,
Trevor Jones. Cast: Julia Roberts, Hugh Grant, Hugh Bonneville, Emma
Chambers, Rhys Ifans, James Dreyfus, Tim McInnerney, Gina McKee, Alec
Baldwin (cameo), et al. A Universal release. 124 minutes, PG-13.
For many an experienced critic or viewer, Notting Hill is nothing to shout
about. Just a passable movie. For the average non-infantile public it could
be pleasant entertainment.  I am not putting down the moviegoing masses,
but drawing a simple distinction between casual and non-casual publics.
In London's popular but now rather chic, fairly bohemian and pricey Notting
Hill neighborhood (colorfulized for American consumption),  William Thacker
(Hugh Grant) owns and runs a bookstore specializing in travel publications,
a small and modest shop that apparently is quite unprofitable. How it
escapes bankruptcy is an unelucidated mystery. William also owns a small,
highly messy house nearby. To make ends meet he has taken a tenant, Spike
(Rhys Ifans), a Welshman of no known profession, and a total slob whose
looks, appearance and ways are occasionally amusing but in fact way
overdone in the film. The quiet, almost mousy William and the flamboyant
Spike are pals, an odd couple whose relationship is underdone.
Anna Scott (Julia Roberts) is introduced by a blatant opening montage as
the world's most famous movie star. In London to promote her latest film (a
space opera), Anna, we vaguely sense, is taking a break from bodyguards,
entourage and febrile masses of press-hounds. She more or less goes
slumming on her own. When she enters William's store to browse, the owner
is boyishly stunned, stupefied and tongue-tied. So is his sole employee, a
gay fellow who, ignorant of film-buffness, lauds Anna for films in which
she did not appear. An amusing touch, as is that of a book-thief caught by
William.
So far, so fair. But predictability sets in, running 20 to 2 vs.
verisimilitude. Anna leaves the booksellers'. Shaky William, trying to
collect his spirits, goes out for orange juice --when a good stiff whiskey
is called for. The moment he takes his paper cup in hand, I bet to myself
"now he'll encounter Anna in the street and spill the o.j. on her." That's
exactly what happens. She then accepts the apologetic William's offer to
come to his house and clean up. Upon leaving, she--unpredictably--gives
William a passionate French kiss, thereby stunning him as well as us, the
viewers, and initiating a hesitant and improbable love affair.
Next comes a phone call from Anna (the message is garbled by Spike)
inviting William to the Ritz Hotel. In another entertaining bit, William
unwittingly crashes a press junket at the Ritz, is taken for a reporter
from Horse and Hound, "interviews" Anna. The sequences are funny. Yet there
comes a point where meeting cute, local color, British eccentricities, mild
caricatures of showbiz Americans, and such become formulaic and overdone.
Even more blatant is the feeling that Hugh Grant, his writer and his
producer --all from Four Weddings and a Funeral-- are cannily but without
much inspiration recycling that earlier film.
Anna is the third real love in William's life. The first, his wife,
eventually took off with someone who looked like Harrison Ford. Number two
was filched by his best friend, who married her. A year and a half before
the film's action her legs were paralyzed in a car accident. It is to the
house of that couple that William takes Anna to celebrate the birthday of
his kooky sister Honey. And it is the husband and the wife in a wheelchair
whose love gives the movie its only touching moments.
Meeting the hoi polloi, Anna tries to adjust to them and show her "human"
side.  The commingling of the celebrity and ordinary yet unusual people was
infinitely better done by Frank Capra in You Can't Take it With You.
Anna and William go on a "romantic" walk,  scale the walls of a private
garden as photography piles on sentimentality. Then, boom! The camera
starts moving upwards as it looks down on the lovers in the greenery. A
jolt and a technical error after so many sensible, eye-level shots. You
become aware that this is a movie, that there is a whole unseen crew
manning a huge crane.
What follows is another date, spoiled by the sudden arrival of Anna's
current (and fickle) boyfriend Alec Baldwin, who in a mildly funny fashion
mistakes William for a waiter.
Eventually Anna joins William in his house, for a night of love that
promises much but winds up as a morning-after catastrophe : thanks to
Spike's babbling in the pub, a regiment of reporters and paparazzi shows
up. A furious Anna leaves. This would be the end of the affair in real
life, but since a happy ending is a must, it occurs when the star reappears
in London a year later to hype her newest movie during a press conference
at the Hotel Savoy. ( Equal Opportunity publicity to balance out the Ritz
Hotel).  There's a mad, Hollywoodish car ride followed by a peppy but
fabricated reunion which, in the usual tacked-on style, culminates in a
never-never coda.
While there are a few good moments in the film, its essential structure
gets in the way, is needlessly stretched out, and rapidly becomes a dull
Nodding Hill. Worse yet there is no passion between the principals at any
time, indeed no electricity. Things move hesitantly. So do the script and
the protagonists. Julia Roberts plays as if on cruise control, as a
presence with little to do except being there. She reminds me of Dorothy
Parker's judgment of an actress: "Miss X... ran the gamut of emotions from
A to B."
Ms. Roberts's outrageously over-hype and salaries, the flood of publicity
and fabricated praise, have gotten tiresome. I am also reminded of ancient
Athens when the leader-statesman Aristides "The Just" was again running for
high office. The equivalent of one of today's pollsters asked an Athenian
commoner why the latter had voted against Aristides. "Do you have something
against him?" "No" came the reply "but I'm sick and tired of hearing him
referred to as The Just."
Droopy-eyed Hugh Grant, now 39, overkills his role by underplaying it with
the spinal cord and the personality of a marshmallow, as an ever diffident,
bumbler-fumbler who is also prone to agree with everything. Witness the
record number of times he replies, responds or concludes with "Right" -- a
word that does not even have an exclamation mark after it. Like everyone
else in the cast, with the small exception of the married couple, all roles
are sketchy, un-rounded and dimensionless.
The fault, dear Brutus, is not in our stars, but in our times which are at
odds with the romantic comedy genre. It has gone the way of black-and-white
westerns. True romance is on the skids in these decades of serial
relationships, marriages and divorces, including (and especially) those of
Hollywood stars. Ms. Roberts is also a star within this trend. Not that the
old Hollywood actors were monogamous saints, but in those days the studios
which "owned them" kept down the lid of secrecy, exercised damage control
over iffy activities. The latter did not become notorious, while today
there's nothing hidden and nothing sacred in the media's Niagara.
The film is neither romantic nor comedic. The comic genre is also at the
bottom of the totem pole. It has been eclipsed by TV, especially British
series aired on PBS. Think of the successors to Monty Python, with their
dominance of wit, farce, fine scripts and great acting:  Fawlty Towers,
Yes, Minister, Yes, Prime Minister,  Mr. Bean, Blackadder, Thin Blue Line
(the last three with Rowan Atkinson),  As Time Goes By, Keeping Up
Appearances, Waiting for God.
Or The Vicar of Dibley in which Emma Chambers is superb as the deliciously
dim Alice. In Notting Hill she appears as William's sister Honey, is a
grating presence, and proves again that performers are only as good as
their texts and direction. Along the same lines,, in the 1997 feature Bean,
is far inferior to his TV episodes.  The same goes for John Clues, in the
1999 remake of The Out-Of-Towners.
Television is not always the idiot box. Film is increasingly the idiot screen.

Title
Review for Plein soleil (1960)
PURPLE NOON (PLEIN SOLEIL) (France, 1960) *** Directed by Rene Clement.
Written by  Rene Clement and Paul Gegauff from the novel "The Talented Mr.
Ripley" by Patricia Highsmith. Photography, Henri  Decae. Art design, Paul
Bertrand. Opening credits, Maurice Binder. Choreography, Jean Guelis.
Music, Nino Rota. Produced by Raymond Hakin and Robert Hakim. Cast: Alain
Delon (Tom Ripley),Maurice Ronet(Philippe Greenleaf),Marie Laforet
(Marge),Elvire Popesco(Mme. Popova), Erno Crisa (Inspector Riccordi), Frank
Latimore(O'Brien), Billy Kearns(Freddy),Ave Ninchi(Signora Gianna),Viviane
Chantel( Belgian woman). In French with subtitles.116 min. PG-13.  25 and
33 yrs old
The French title means Full Sun, which admittedly wouldn't sound too good
in English. But at least "Full" has more implications than "Purple" which
baffles me. The reference is to the strong summer sun of Italy, which at
one point burns badly the back of one of the main characters (he recovers
overnight!) and, in general, like a full moon, makes people do unusual and
extreme things.
Essentially this is a two-and--half characters yarn. The two are Tom Ripley
and Philippe (sic) Greenleaf. The half is Marge, Philippe's girlfriend who
has no real personality -- or a last name, for that matter. The script is
faithfully based on "TheTalented Mr.Ripley," a novel by Patricia Highsmith
whose books were also adapted for Hitchcock's "Strangers on a Train"
(1951). Her "Ripley's Game" became the Wim Wenders movie "The American
Friend" (1977) in which Dennis Hopper plays Tom Ripley.(I cannot connect
the two cine-Ripleys with each another).
Tom is played by Alain Delon, then 25 and well on his way to becoming a
heartthrob and a mega-star. That same year(1960), he was Rocco in  "Rocco
and His Brothers," and in 1963, he had the second big part in "The
Leopard." Both films are classics by Luchino Visconti.
Philippe is played by Maurice Ronet, then 33. He was another hearthrob
whose career was shorter than Delon's. He made fewer movies and died in
1983.
The copy now playing in the US is a reissue whose colors are good in some
scenes, a bit faded in others. The photography and the compositions are
excellent, thanks to master cinematographer Henri Decae and no doubt
because director Clement had himself worked behind the camera.
Production values are very good. Nino Rota's music is unlike the splendidly
Italian, familiar scores he wrote for Italian movies (including many
Fellinis) and for all the "Godfather" films. It is interestingly "modern"
and jolting, with small incursions into Italianate passages.
We meet Philippe and Tom in a Rome cafe on the chic Via Veneto. They seem
to be best friends, look beautifully sun-tanned and fit (the actors' age
difference is hardly noticeable), yet there's something about their
relationship that is peculiar. Itmakes the viewer uncomfortable, as in the
way Philippe uses Tom as an errand boy, or the cavalier fashion with which
they speak about women or treat them.There is much to mine here for a
feminist analysis.
Philippe wonders what gift he can give Marge. "A book on  [painter] Fra
Angelico" says Tom. "But she is writing one." "So, all she's got to do is
to copy" retorts Tom, and he is sent to get the book. Both suggestion and
action are entirely in the spirit of the movie.
(In this sequence, when an acquaintance stops by, his barely
glimpsed,silent companion is,I am sure, the uncredited, Austrian-born movie
actress Romy Schneider. She had already been in many pictures, many of them
German-speaking, but did not become an international star and the darling
of the European public until the early 60s).
The men sound and behave like kinky playboys on the loose within a Dolce
Vita society. Philippe is the rich son of a wealthy American who has
offered penniless Tom $5,000 if he can deliver Philippe back to San
Francisco. The "boys" do much joking about this, followed by callousness
--indeed cruelty--as the men buy a white cane off a blind man, play tricks
on an easy-to-conquer lady, then drop her. Menacing, unhealthy undertones
are ever present.
When we meet Marge we also see the angels in the book on Fra Angelico.
Sharp eyes might notice the hint that the two male "friends" are devils who
play cat-and-mouse games with each other.Tom seems to covet Marge,
Philippe knows it. Entering his own bedroom, and finding Tom trying out his
clothes and imitating his voice, he rebukes him nastily. Tom, on the other
hand, bit by bit lets us understand that he would like to take Philippe's
place, girl, bank account and all--even to impersonate him.
The trio go on a trip on Philippe's sailboat "Marge." There, everyone lies
to everyone else. A current of crypto-homosexual tensions may be sensed.
Philippe first mistreatsTom, then, in one of his moods, he throws Marge's
manuscript in the sea. She leaves the boat. End of Part One.
In Part Two many much happens to keep you in merciless suspense. Violence
escalates along with major complications, unexpected developments,
changes,disguises,role-playing and surprises.
At no time do we feel any sympathy for any of the main characters. But then
morality is not our concern, while the thriller side of the film is, in
beautiful, warm Italy, skillfully treated with clinical coldness.
The thriller is strong and good, in part because of the time devoted to
building up the characters. That they remain ciphers to the end is no
defect.
Where the minuses come in is in the absence of leavening humor. The film
shares this characteristic with many Continental thrillers that have not
learned the advantage of using humor, as Alfred Hitchcock did.
Clement, however, chose, matched and directed his two male protagonists
very well. They both have a pretty-boy physique that only semi-masks their
potential for nastiness. (This is a trait of both Ronet and Delon in
several of their other movies). But for American audiences to accept them
as Americans requires more faith than is possible.
One flaw may affect only those viewers who like matters to be logical. The
plot has several improbabilities a well as much vagueness about time and
space, such as several instant, credibility-taxing changes of abodes.Yet
since the tempo is minutely calculated to keep picking up speed until it
reaches breathlessness, much of the audience is kept too busy to spot the
holes in the story.
Director Rene Clement died in March 1996. His obituary in the New York
Times rightly mentions his Oscar-winning, 1952 "Forbidden Games" as the
film that Clement will be mostly remembered for. It is about a little girl
orphaned when the Germans were invading France in World War II and strafing
fleeing civilians on country roads. The French critics would agree but also
call it a tie with "The Battle of the Rails," which dealt in documentary
fashion with the same war and railway workers sabotaging German trains
during the Occupation. The French would rate "Purple Noon" right after
those two.
Other than the above, among Clement's two dozen movies, few had an
unconditionally positive critical reception."Gervaise," "The Damned," "The
Walls of Malapaga" and " Monsieur Ripois" came closest. He also made the
too ambitious and too loose-jointed "Is Paris Burning?" with a huge number
of international stars.

Title
Review for Absolute Power (1997)
ABSOLUTE POWER ** Directed by Clint Eastwood. Written by William Goldman
from the novel of David Baldacci. Photography, Jack N. Green. Editing, Joel
Cox. Production design, Henry Bumstead. Music, Lennie Niehaus. Cast: Clint
Eastwood (Luther Whitney),Gene Hackman (President Alan Richmond), Ed Harris
(Detective Seth Frank), Laura Linney (Kate Whitney), Judy Davis (Gloria
Russell), Scott  Glenn (Bill Burton), Dennis Haysbert (Tim Collin), E.G.
Marshall (Walter Sullivan), Melora Hardin (Christy Sullivan). A Sony
release from Columbia Pictures of a Castle Rock presentation of a Malpaso
production. 120 min. R (violence)
The historian John Emerich Edward Dalberg Acton (1834-1902), who became
Lord Acton of Aldenham in 1869, was the first great modern philosopher of
resistance to the evil state. He stressed morality above all. Though known
mostly to specialists today, millions (mis)quote his aphorism, from a
letter he wrote to Bishop Mandell Creighton in 1887:  "Power tends to
corrupt, and absolute power corrupts absolutely."
In theory it is hard to resist a political thriller with the explicit title
"Absolute Power," especially when it is by and with Clint Eastwood in his
familiar persona as an enemy of misused and abusive authority. Enticing too
is that Clint plays an master cat burglar, an avocation beloved by readers
and moviegoers --vide Cary Grant in "To Catch a Thief" or The Saint.
Yet, except  for one dud ("The Rookie") the film is not in the league of
Eastwood-directed works since 1990: the shamefully neglected "White Hunter,
Black Heart," "Unforgiven," the acceptable "A Perfect World,""The Bridges
of Madison County."  In spite of changes by sometimes excellent
screenwriter William Goldman, "Absolute Power" does not raise the shabby
source novel to any heights, or add anything to the spate of pictures about
US. Presidents. Though the actors and techniques are very good and
polished, the plot is a salad of incoherences, disconnections and non
sequiturs, arbitrary moves, laughable incredibilities, improbabilities and
impossibilites, coincidences and plot craters. Over those ingredients is
poured a sauce of movie cliches.
The story centers around aging, much decorated Army veteran and veteran
thief Luther Whitney, played with the steely nerves, the cool, the
tongue-in-cheek humor expected of Eastwood. One night, he burglarizes a
mansion to end all mansions, defeating in ho-hum seconds state-of-the art
locks and security systems. (There's a dumb gag that Luther is unable to
program his VCR). As he moves carefully in semi-darkness, he glimpses
paintings by masters and other art treasures. The sequence has good tension
but is stretched out, as if the filmmakers wanted to get their money's
worth for their elaborate movie set.
Luther fills his bag with millions in jewelry, coins and cash. Sudden
noises force him to retreat behind a most convenient two-way mirror. He
watches a dissolute older man (Gene Hackman) and a trampish young woman
(Melora Hardin) both drunk and playing sexual games. These turn violent. As
the man seems ready to strangle his companion, she stabs his leg with a
letter-opener. In a flash,two men materialize and shoot her dead.They're
Secret Service men who guard U.S. President Alan Richmond.
The playmate turns out to be the young, openly and regularly unfaithful
second wife of widower Walter Sullivan (E.G.Marshall) a tycoon in his
eighties. His flushed complexion speaks of illness or alcohol. He is a
king-maker, a very good FOA (Friend Of Alan's).  "I gave him the
Presidency" he says later.
A cover-up follows, led by Chief of Staff Gloria Russell, played by Judy
Davis  with  campy black humor. The hunt for the killer is on. Luther is a
major suspect because, as per the old cliche "there are only seven men" who
can burglarize so well.
That Clint can be very likable is a given. But he allows his film to grow
exponentially  absurd. To flesh it out, newish widower Luther has an
estranged daughter, Kate. She is cute, unattached, and of all things, a
prosecutor. You can sniff instantly the reconciliation to come. Or the
mutual attraction between Kate and chief investigating detective Seth Frank
(Ed Harris). He too is conveniently unattached."I live by myself" is his
leitmotif to Kate. Frank is nice, decent, well-mannered, simpatico.
Eastwood and Harris have by far the best scene as they lunch together, play
wittily cat-and-mouse, and like each other.
In a baffling scene, Luther, about to catch a plane and disappear abroad,
is at the airport. He sees on  TV the President delivering a piously
hypocritical declaration concerning his "like-a-father-to-me" mentor
Sullivan. Instantly Luther decides to stick around and do the right thing.
Had he not realized that the man he had watched through the mirror was the
President? Go figure.
Try also to make sense of the many appearances of key people in places
where they couldn't possibly be. Or how they get to their desinations in
mere minutes. Or how quick-change artist Luther disguises himself so fast.
I have a weakness for disguises. My first publications, in a children's
magazine, were signed "Detective X" after my pulp fiction hero in stories
by Brand House. "X" had a stupendous ability for instant transformations
that made him a clone of anyone he wished to impersonate. Still, to quote
Corinthians: "When I was a child, I spake as child, I understood as a
child, I thought as child; but when I became a man, I put away childish
things." Like suspension of outrageous disbelief.
In another mega-silly sequence, for reasons hard to fathom, a cafe meeting
is set up between Kate and her dad. Dozens of Washington, D.C. cops,
sharpshooters and marked cars skulk around --but no Army tanks or rocket
launchers. Yet no one seems to notice. There's also a gunman hired by old
man Sullivan. How he knew eluded me.Clint appears in a beard, hat and
designer long coat. He escapes a fracas in a flash, because under the coat
he wore a policeman's uniform and a cop's cap.Try it. D.C. becomes DC
comics.
One more item among many. Kate is now in danger. "Good news," Harris tells
Eastwood on the phone "the Secret Service is taking over surveillance."
It's  like saying"Great, the foxes will protect the chickens." How much
better did Alfred Hitchcock's "The 39 Steps" manage when the hero tells his
new host in Scotland that the archvillain is unknown but has a finger
missing. "Like this?" says the host, showing his hand.
No character is dimensional, nothing is thoughtful or thought through or
cerebral. The  "exposes" of the Washington establishment are nullified by
caricature. In spite of occasional good moments, the film is merely a
tabloid, the screen equivalent of the National Enquirer.
===========================
 This review and others can be found at : http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Whatever (1998)
WHATEVER ** 1/4 Written and directed by Susan Skoog. Photography, Michael
Mayers and Michael Barrow. Editing, Sandy Guthrie. Cast: Liza Weil (Anna
Stockard), Chad Morgan (Brenda Talbot), Frederic Forrest (Mr. Chaminski),
Kathryn Rossiter (Carol Stockard), Marc Riffon (Martin), Dan Montano (Zak),
John G. Connolly (Woods), Gary Wolf (Eddie), Tony Torn (Mr.Stanley), Trey
Compton (Sam), et al. A Sony Pictures Classics release. 112 minutes. R
(Teen-age drugs, drinking, sex; non-graphic violence; neglect of school
work). At the Art Theater.
The information on this film quotes Susan Sontag addressing a Yale
University graduating class: "You may think you've just experienced the
most important phase of your life, but you're wrong. The most important
experience of your life was high school."
It this is true, it is very sad, assuming that high school in the U.S.A, as
seen on celluloid-- whether in Hollywood productions or, as in the case of
"Whatever," independent films-- is a time of no brains, no learning, and no
interest beyond physical gratification and self-absorption.
There has to be more to school than that, but it is not evident in this
first feature made by Susan Skoog, who was born in Red Bank, New Jersey,
graduated from New York University's Tisch School of the Arts in 1987, and
has since had quite a bit of experience writing, directing and producing
for TV.
"Whatever" is set in some anonymous town or suburb in New Jersey, in the
early 1980s. The filming actually took place in Wheeling, West Virginia. In
a low-budget way, it has the look of the times as well as its pop music
(the Pretenders, Jam, the Ramones, Blondie, and so on), but it is not a
piece of nostalgia. Far from that, it is a sad, dolorous variant of
coming-of-age pictures, and feels, if not partly autobiographical, at least
like first-hand knowledge of its subject.
The subject is young people who are at loose ends and come from families
(mostly lower middle class) upon which the filmmaker casts a jaundiced eye.
The focus is on Anna, who says "I'm almost eighteen," which means 17. She's
presumably bright, rather quiet and reserved, not a good student but
interested in going to art school, specifically to New York City's Cooper
Union. Her one "friend" on the school's staff is Mr. Chaminski, the art
teacher. A former New Yorker whose past is none too clear, he may well be a
failure as a painter and one of those cases of "those who can't, teach." In
any case, he encourages Anna.
He is played by Frederic Forrest, the only familiar face in the crowd.
Forrest has been in several indifferent movies as well  in some major ones,
notably Coppola's The Conversation, Apocalypse Now, One From the Heart,
Tucker. He was also the lead in Wim Wenders's Hammett. The last time I saw
him was in a colorful role in Falling Down (1993). In "Whatever" his role
is undistinguished, yet, if you look closely, Forrest adds clever touches
as someone who semi-consciously lusts after Anna.
Anna actively chain-smokes, semi-actively rebels against school,
semi-passively attends backyard or al fresco booze-busts-cum-substance
abuse. These are your familiar affairs, complete with gross-outs (for $20
would you drink beer with spit in it?), with the class nerd who wears
glasses, with the fattish wallflower who is by herself, with raucous kids,
seniors who philosophize sophomorically, and other cliches. Mercifully, the
camera spends little time on those particular deja vu shots. It
concentrates on Anna, who is dazed and confused.
With AIDS unknown though incubating around the corner, libido runs high,
everyone is ready to copulate, many do. Not Anna. She is a virgin, Brenda
is certainly not. She's Anna's  slutty, overpainted, best friend Brenda. To
a physiognomist, Brenda looks common and unintelligent, while Anna looks
sensitive. To anybody, Brenda is  a tramp, while Anna suggests some hidden
depths. The pair is mismatched. What they do have in common is attitude and
dysfunctional families.
"Whatever" does not have a "real" story. It is built episodically on
tableaux and situations, realistic, grungy, but often vague too. The
observation can be graphic and sharp but the factual, social and
psychological backgrounds are fuzzy. The adults either are caricatures or
verge on them.
Anna lives with her young brother and a mother. Why is there no father? Why
does Ma drink, neglect her kids and the house, and date a succession of
creeps, the current one being the affluent idiot "Fat Howard"? Why is
Brenda defying her father? Or is he her father? (No, he is her stepfather
and much younger than his wife). Is the English teacher a joke, a
semi-joke, a sadist or what? Who are those people?  It gets a bit clearer
by the end, but some audience fatigue has preceded it.
In the meantime, Anna and Brenda have met two somewhat older guys that had
done time for dealing dope; Anna loses her virginity to her best boyfriend
Martin, who later proves unworthy; the two girls make a wide-eyed visit to
the Big Apple and end up on some silly yuppies bed and sofa; they return to
Jersey where Brenda is abused (beaten and most likely raped) by her
stepfather; a group retaliation against the abuser ensues and is possible
but improbable; a temporary escapade that has Anna returning home is both
sad and inconclusive; the final scenes put a smile on Anna's face and a
happy way of riding her bicycle, but  this new found upbeat "balance" is
neither explained, justified or convincing.
The film is  overlong long and often gratuitous. It relies essentially on
the portrait of Anna. In spite of holes and loose ends, first-timer Liza
Weil's role, well-played and well-directed, can and ought to move you. The
best aspects of the movie deal with her reactions.The quiet scene,
un-graphic, un-shocking, unsensational (there is no frontal nudity with
Anna, anywhere) of her losing her virginity is striking for its observation
and sensitivity. In distant ways it reminds me a bit of the couple's visit
to a small island in the river in the 1930s film by Jean Renoir,  Une
Partie de Campagne (A Day in the Country).
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for That Old Feeling (1997)
THAT OLD FEELING 1/2 *. Directed by Carl Reiner. Written by Leslie Dixon.
Photography, Steve Mason. Editing, Richard Halsey. Production design, Sandy
Venetian. Music, Patrick Williams. Producers,Leslie Dixon & Bonnie
Bruckheimer. Cast: Bette Midler (Lilly), Dennis Farina (Dan), Paula
Marshall (Molly), Gail O'Grady (Rowena), David Rasche (Alan), Jamie Denton
(Keith), Danny Nucci (Joey) et al. A Universal Pictures Seagram release.103
minutes.PG-13.
Let's do grammatical justice to the memories of Marcello Mastroianni and
Federico Fellini. In "La Dolce Vita" (1960) Mastroianni was a tabloid's
reporter. His photographer was called Paparazzo, a name that spread
worldwide immediately as a common noun to designate tenacious snapshooters
of celebrities. Paparazzo is singular, paparazzi is plural. In "That Old
Feeling,"  Bette Midler refers to the young man whostalks her with his
camera as "a paparazzi," which is like saying "a men."
One does not expect culture from Hollywood, but one does expect quality
from Carl Reiner. As a jack-of-all-comedies (variously performer, gagman,
producer, etc.) he was a luminary of TV's "Your Show of Shows" and "The
Dick Van Dyke Show." He played in and wrote for movies, directed films that
include "Where's Poppa?,"" Oh, God!,"" The Jerk,"" Dead Men Don't Wear
Plaid,""The Man With Two Brains,"" All Of Me,"" Summer Rental,""Bert Rigby,
You're A Fool." As a father, he produced, with his wife's
help,writer-director Rob Reiner. Quite a record.
"That Old Feeling" is the worst movie Carl Reiner has directed, probably
the only bad one. With his writer he pathetically attempts to do a sort of
screwball comedy with old-fashioned tricks and modern morals, but keeps
driving in the wrong direction in a one-way street. And when streets
change, the turns are missed.
The picture tries to juggle three married pairs.Lilly (Midler) is a movie
star who can't stop acting. She divorced writer Dan (Farina) 14 years ago,
following his affair with Rowena (O'Grady), whom Dan then married. Lilly
remarried too, Alan (Rasche) a dimwit psychobabbling writer.The two women
loathe each other, keep referring to each other's abundant plastic
surgeries.At least Rowena tells Dan: "I'm not neurotic, I'm a bitch."
The "new" couples meet at the wedding of Lilly's and Dan's daughter Molly
(Marshall) and Keith (Denton) who is running for Congress. At the reception
Rowena and Lilly insult each other copiously. Then Lilly and Dan first make
a spectacle of themselves in a loud fight. But when  Molly exiles them to
the parking lot, they switch with irrational suddenness from curses to
desire and make love (mercifully off-screen) inside a car. Why a small auto
instead when so many large ones are available is another of the many
wet-firecracker jokes.
Tedious complications follow. Paparazzo Joey is added to the active list in
scenes which, even if you close your eyes, instantly telegraph that he will
replace Keith in Molly's affections. No surprises here or anywhere else.
In this terminally ill movie the cracks in the plot multiply and widen, the
verbal cracks are bloodless, unwitty and unmemorable. The pedestrian
dialogue goes, along with most situations and characterizations, from
vulgar to coarse. The slow action is unfunny, forced and colorless.
A romantic and/or screwball comedy cannot work without at least two
likable, charismatic, interesting or, at a minimum, amusing characters. No
one fills that bill.
There's one-half of a star worth  of nice oldies on the soundtrack. Among
them:  "Anything Goes, " "Our Love Is Here To Stay," "Call Me
Irresponsible," "That Old Feeling," "Where Or When," "At Last," "That Old
Feeling."
This film was not released, it escaped.

Title
Review for Snapper, The (1993) (TV)
THE SNAPPER (UK, 1993) *** 1/2  Directed by Stephen Frears. Screenplay by
Roddy Doyle, from his novel. Photography, Oliver Stapleton. Production
design, Mark Geraghty. Editing, Mick Audsley. Cast: Tina Kellegher, Colm
Meany, Ruth McCabe, Colm O'Byrne, Pat Laffan. A Miramax release. 90 min.
Not rated. (If so, R for language).
At the 1993 Cannes Film Festival, "The Snapper" came as a relaxing break
from often long, sometimes solemn --albeit good-- big films. A "small"
movie made for BBC-TV, it was an instant crowd-and-critics pleaser and
confirmed the saying that often "less is more."
The 1991 film "The Commitments", about  young working-class Dubliners who
form a band that plays older soul music, had been  scripted by
schoolteacher Roddy Doyle from his own novel, the first of his Barrytown (a
fictional Dublin area) trilogy.  The other two books were "The Snapper" and
"The Van." Published soon after "Snapper-the-novie" came out, Doyle's
"Paddy Clarke Ha Ha Ha" also got much attention.  The writer  is no longer
a teacher, but his loquacious texts and scripts continue  to educate us
about the  gifts of the Irish, including the gift of gab.
"The Snapper" gets down to brass tacks while  you're still trying to settle
in your seat. In the Curley  home, 20-year old Sharon (Tina Kellegher), a
supermarket clerk,  the senior of six children, still unmarried, announces
to her parents with no preamble that she's going to have a snapper (Irish
for baby, kid, squirt). What would usually call for horrified or moralistic
reactions, or turn into high drama, falls on exceptionally tolerant and
sympathetic ears.
Although Sharon stubbornly refuses to reveal who the father is, there is no
pressure, no coercion from Dad Dessie (Colm Meany) and Mom Kay
(RuthMcCabe). Right away they close protective ranks around Sharon. Within
minutes Dessie states that he needs a drink  to recover from the shock ...
and invites Sharon to join him at the pub.
The Curleys are a high-spirited,  tightly-knit family. They live piled up
in a small semi-detached house but put up with the congestion through
patience, humor and bits of eccentricity.  When Junior Sister practices
baton-twirling in a garish, cardboard uniform, Dad asks her about her white
beard. "Shaving foam" replies the child. "Ah" says Dessie, and lets it go
at that.
Dad's life seems to be one of trips between home and pub, with endless talk
in both. He imbibes generously with his companions, all regulars. Sharon
and  her girlfriends also have their table there. In times when, especially
in North America, younger and older people hardly ever mix, it is
wonderful, heart-warming to see different generations coming together!
Sharon and her pals come all tarted up in heavy makeup, coiffures and
outfits that are presumably sexy in the eyes of the males of their social
class. Their entertaining  gossip is, of course, mostly about men. Jolly,
caustic comments are delivered with gales of laughter, whinnies and
giggles. It is a perfect reproduction of a certain milieu.
Without missing a beat, Sharon announces her pregnancy to her companions,
as Dad does to his.  Everyone understands and sympathizes.
Language-consciousness being a quintessentially Irish trait --and treasure
--  the pubsters turn everything into a maelstrom of words generally
enhanced by expletives. In their mouths, the latter are not four-letter
vulgarities but linguistic elements of  style.
Not that the locals' vocabulary lacks standards. "Uterus" shocks Dessie;
Sharon ridicules the maternity nurse for asking about her menstrual history
("why couldn't she say period?") and for saying "movements" instead of
you-know-what.
Sharon has fleeting moments of despondence, but her plain, potatoish face
mostly reflects an indomitable joie de vivre. For good reason too. Greater
Dublin must have half a million inhabitants, but the Curleys are the
particular citizens of a few hundred square meters  where everyone knows
everyone else -- and initially almost all are friendly to Sharon.
When, however, the father of the snapper is tentatively revealed ( I will
not point him out and spoil your discovery) there is an abrupt reversal of
fortune. Sharon loses the outsiders' support, is mocked and called names.
As a red herring, she concocts a story  in  surreally absurd terms about a
one-night stand with a Spanish sailor. Few are inclined to believe it, but
a least the tall tale adds more humor to the situation.
All backing is not lost though.  Sharon's best friend, the stalwart Jackie,
stands by her and laughter goes on during outrageous moments.  Dad,
becoming increasingly closer to his pregnant daughter, shows far much more
interest in the coming snapper than in the six previous deliveries by his
sweet, wise and pretty wife.
The Curley  household being bare of print materials -- even newspapers--
Dessie goes out and gets one book, about chilbirth. Entranced by the
mysteries of sex and anatomy, he applies them with his bewildered spouse.
Stephen Frears is known for films like  "The Hit," "My Beautiful
Laundrette" (to which he winks as Dessie's truck passes by a large
Laundrette  sign),"Prick Up Your Ears," "Sammy and Rosie Get Laid,"
"Dangerous Liaisons," "The Drifters," "Hero." Those were bigger, fairly
complicated, sometimes glossy and/or wild pictures. "The Snapper" on the
other hand is a return to the incisive simplicity and the making of
forceful points with concision that were  found in the many Frears  BBC-TV
movies--excellent  but unknown in the U.S.A.
As in most Frears telefilms, "The Snapper" sets up a plain, even
simplistic milieu, zooms in on, and milks its colorful authenticity. With
upbeat  whimsy and humor, the director says a great deal about the people ,
their distinctive culture and life-views.
Cultivated, higher-class spectators may feel some depression or snobbery
vis-a-vis the simple-minded Curleys and their friends, but the film's
vibrant buoyancy sees to it that natural simplicity will overcome raised
eyebrows.
The most un-intellectual "Snapper" is full of funny stuff.  It goes
non-stop through daily events and quirks, idiosyncrasies and affections,
keeps adding good touches. Among them, the sad-sack yet comical
none-too-bright fellow who had impregnated Sharon. He goes from utter
insensitivity to maudliness --then becomes a pariah himself.
Dessie's evolution is a joy to behold. It is hard to  realize that he is
the same Colm Meany who plays  O'Brien in" Star Trek, The Next Generation"
and in" Deep Space Nine," which, pace  the Trekkies, do not exactly strain
expressivity.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Central do Brasil (1998)
CENTRAL STATION (Central do Brazil) (Brazil-France, 1998)  *** 1/2
Directed by Walter Salles, Jr. Written by Joao Emanuel Carneiro and Marcos
Bernstein, based on an idea by Salles. Photography,  Walter Carvalho.
Editing, Isabelle Rathery, Felipe Lacerda.Poduction design, Cassio
Amarante, Carla Caffe. Music, Antonio Pinto, Jaques Morelembaum. Producers,
Arthur Cohn, Martine de Clermont-Tonnerre. Cast:  Fernanda Montenegro
(Dora), Vinicius de Oliveira  (Josue), Mariela Pera (Irene), Othon Bastos
(Cesar the truck driver), et al. A Sony Classics release. In Portuguese,
subtitled. 110 MIN. R (language)
Mix the following ingredients: Brazil's own 1960's Cinema Novo's first wave
(political, socially conscious, realistic);  the road movies genre; early
Italian neorealist films; cinema-verite; and bits of epistolary films. Take
as your subject the undying category in which a tough (or just gruff) man
or woman gets somehow stuck with a kid (generally but not always sweet like
Shirley Temple or Freddie Bartholomew) that will mellow the adult; think of
the current remake of Cassavetes' "Gloria." And what do you get in Central
Station?
A hybrid? Not at all. You get an original, un-gimmicky, un-icky,
un-cliched, attention-holding, touching film that opens your eyes on major
aspects of the human condition in Brazil and on that country's people and
life.
Obviously, the movie has been appreciated, with awards and/or applause at
several festivals, including the top prize at the Berlin Festival. It is
also a contender in the best foreign film category at the 1999 Oscars.
Rio de Janeiro's Central train station where 300,000 people move about each
day, is a microcosm of urban society. The station looks to me (but I may be
wrong) like the hub of local  trains rather than long-distance travel.
Also, the majority of the people we see are working class, low income or no
income Cariocas, cheaply clad -- a far cry from the well-dressed crowds in
North American commuter trains. (To anticipate comments, I do know that, as
I write this in cold February, it is 90 degrees in Rio, and people are in
shirt-sleeves, but shabbiness prevails at the station by any standards).
The mobs are busy rushing into the trains. Many younger men jump into the
wagons through  open windows. The place is also a hive of makeshift stores
and stands. Early into the movie there's a  horrendous scene. A man who has
lifted something from a shop is pursued. Two cops catch up with him. They
take his loot, and, without thinking twice about it, one of the lawmen puts
a bullet in the fellow's head. Nothing is made of this. Life is cheap.
Dora, in her mid-to-late 60s, and no beauty --to put it mildly--is a
retired elementary school teacher. To make ends meet, in the cavernous
station she has a table on which she writes letters that many illiterates
dictate to her and gets also paid for putting on stamps later and mailing
the envelopes. But, tough, brusque and caustic, the scribe is also a scam
artist.
When she gets to her dismal apartment by the tracks, she brings along her
daily bag of letters that she's supposed to mail, and shows them to her
friend Irene. Irene may be her roommate or her neighbor, it's not clear.
Clearly though, she is the only friend in Dora's depressing life. Irene,
younger, jolly and a still nice-looking fading beauty, is probably a
prostitute, though this is not elaborated.
At home, Dora perhaps selects a few envelops that she mails. For sure, she
tears up many of them and puts the rest in drawers,where they probably
remain forever.
Among her customers is a woman with her 9-year old boy Josue.  Her husband,
a drunkard, left her long ago. She want him back, for herself and for their
fatherless child.
That woman is killed by a bus right outside the station. The plight of the
child is even more tragic if you are aware of the horrendous problem of
millions of street-children in Brazil. Their survival is a tragedy;  many
even get killed by the police for no reason.
Soon, hard-as-nails Dora takes streetwise and sullen Josue to her place.
Her unexpected kindness is undone when she sells the boy to a shabby
"agency" which supposedly supplies children to adoptive parents abroad.
Dora returns home with a new color TV set, on which, with subtle, symbolic,
irony, we see only black-and-white programs. But an aghast Irene tells her
that the agency is a fake, that the kids will be killed for their organs.
Dora rushes back, kidnaps Josue and in fear of retaliation, flees with him
to look for the missing father.
This is where the travels begin. It's more of a road movie than an odyssey
since the "adventures"  are on a small, intimate rather than a grand scale.
The grand scale is only in the vastness of Brazil, the world's fifth
largest nation.
The woman and the rebellious Josue take a lot of busses. When hardly
solvent or broke they hitch rides in  trucks.Most of this is in the
"sertao" of the North East, Brazil's thinly populated, often barren
outback. (It's a neat reversal of the poor of those areas trudging to the
promised land of big cities).
The trip, the landscape, the places seen are harsh. Nothing is paved in
this barrenness, except for the main highways. The viewers are given a tour
which, like the entire film, is extremely well photographed and
uncompromisnly realistic. We are light years  away from the commonly
pictured touristic Brazil with its fiestas and the thong-wearing beauties
of the Copcabana Beach. Credit director Salles's  experience as a
documentarist. He is objective but has a heart.
While the protagonists gradually, as expected, draw closer to each other,
Salles, with much naturalness, avoids sentimentalizing people or places.
Yet his eyes and ears are full of quiet sympathy for what, to use Bunuel's
title, are Los Olvidados, the forgotten ones who struggle to subsist. The
people whom the woman and the child come across, by and large are decent
folks who live in squalor. An episode with a nice, warm, older trucker, an
Evangelical who, for a brief spell, stirs the woman in Dora, is
effortlessly touching. And in a long, spectacular sequence, Dora and Josue
find themselves in a throng of pilgrims that go to revere Jesus in acts of
hope and of self-consolation.
(One should not, by the way, make too much of names such as Josue (Joshua)
and Jesus, the elusive father, nor the fact that Jesus is a sort of
carpenter. Symbolism may be present , but with a light touch. Curiously, in
the other main candidate for Best Foreign Film Oscar this year ( Life is
Beautiful) the woman is called Dora and the child is Josue
The humanity of the Dora-Josue twosome has enormous appeal. She is one of
Brazil's top stage actresses -- and light years away from the looks of
Sharon Stone in Gloria!)  He was a poor shoeshine boy whom the director
discovered in an airport. Their performances  are so real that the word
"acting" never comes into your mind.
What might come to mind is the great Italian film "Stolen Children," as
well as its contrast with Central Station, whose poverty makes even the
Italian South look relatively wealthy.
The most upsetting sight for me, one that encapsulates the movie, is the
the picture of a goat in a sertao village. The animal, trying to graze in
the barren dust, walks somehow with his two broken front legs. Yet the
total movie does not stress grimness. It has its natural quota of
positiveness, even unforced humor.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Every Time We Say Goodbye (1986)
EVERY TIME WE SAY GOODBYE (Israel, 1986) Directed by Moshe Mizrahi.
Written by Moshe Mizrahi,Rachel Fabien,Leah Appet from a story by
Mizrahi. Photography, Giuseppe Lanci. Editing, Mark Burns. Music,
Philippe Sarde. Producers, Jacob Kotzky & Sharon Harel. Cast : Tom
Hanks(David), Cristina Marsillach(Sarah), Benedict Taylor(Peter), Anat
Atzmon(Victoria), Gila Almagor(Lea), Moni Moshanov(Nessim) Avner
Hizkiyahu(Raphael), Caroline Goodall(Sally),Esther Parnass(Rosa), Daphne
Armony(Clara),Orit Weisman(Mathilda). 95 min. PG-13.
A fine small film about an inter-faith romance, with more than meets the
eye.  It was written  and directed by Moshe Mizrahi, one of the finest
Israeli filmmakers.   
During World War II,  before the U.S.A. joins the fray, American Tom
Hanks , the son of a  pacifist minister, joins the Royal Air Force. In
1942 Jerusalem, recuperating from a wound, he meets , through a British
fellow-officer who marries a Jewish girl,  the 19-year old daughter (
Cristina  Marsillach) of a large Sephardic family.  It's a Romeo and
Juliet romance (but with a happy ending) which runs afoul the
conservatism of the girl's people . These are not shown as particularly
intolerant or Orthodox, but they are still quite determined to prevent
this sort of alliance.  
Granted that this  basic theme has  been  explored before, this movie's
particular context is  original. Writer-director Mizrahi brings a great
deal of authenticity to his subject, his people and   his treatment.  He
has a sharp eye and ear in his observation --objective yet warm-- of 
the expanded family. Note how well staged, among other sequences, is the
Sabbath meal to which Hanks is invited. Mizrahi covers quite a bit of
territory: the people's  prejudices; the workings of patriarchy and
matriarchy; the  traditionalists who may  hurt others in their honest 
conviction that "they know what's best";  the affectionate yet
second-class treatment of women in pre-Israel days. 
The heroine's own hesitations are perfectly captured. In an
unspectacular (and, I wager, not costly) but intimate way, location
shooting, settings and period reconstruction add  truth and interest .
The background does not obtrude yet  it sketches in nicely some of the
life and mentalities of the times.  
The acting, mostly low-key, acting is  realistic, convincing  and helped
by the naturalness and ordinariness of the entire cast.  Nice British
and American pop tunes of the period, well sung, add to the period's
atmosphere. 
The work is unusual in another way: much of its  dialogue is in
Judeo-Spanish (a.k.a. Ladino or Spaniolit), with clear subtitles. This
is the only film use of this language I know of, though  Ladino surely
is present in other, but unexported or little distributed Israeli
productions. There is a rich variety of Ladino accents here. Linguists
should  enjoy this movie doubly and might detect  that some of the older
people have  intonations different from those of Miss Marsillach's,
which show the influence of standard, mainland Spanish. 
"Every Time..." has solid, international production credits. It was Tom
Hanks's first serious film, was underrated or dismissed in the few
reviews I have seen, went by and large unnoticed in the US  and moved
rapidly to television. I believe that even then it was only sporadically
shown until, later, the growing prestige of Hanks brought about frequent
shedulings on cable. This is understandable, but the film's appeal
extends to the rest of the overwhelmingly Israeli cast too. The actors
may be familiar to Israelis (especially Gila Almagor) but unknown to
most others. A pity, since some of the same performers, in a big
Hollywood production, would probably have advanced their career beyond
the modest boundaries of Israeli cinema. (Edwin Jahiel)

Title
Review for Wonderland (1999)
WONDERLAND (UK, 1999)  ** Directed by Michael Winterbottom. Written 
by Laurence Coriat. Photography, Sean Bobbitt. Editing, Trevor Waite. 
Production design, Mark Tildesley. Music,  Michael Nyman.  Cast: Kika 
Markham (Eileen), Jack Shepherd (Bill), Enzo Cilenti (Darren), 
Shirley Henderson (Debbie), Ian Hart (Dan), Peter Marfleet (Jack), 
Gina McKee (Nadia), Stuart Townsend (Tim), Molly Parker (Molly), John 
Simm (Eddie), David Fahm (Franklin).et al. Produced by Michele 
Camarda and Andrew Eaton. US  release by USA Films. In English 
without subtitles. 108 minutes.. R (language, sex). At the Art 
Theater.
Three sisters (pace Anton Chekhov) and their working-class South 
London milieu are the subject of a fictional cinema-verite (a 
contradiction in terms, but let it be) semi-plotless tale. There's 
Nadia who works in a coffee bar and is looking --through personals -- 
for a man with whom she'll have a relationship that may include --but 
would ideally go beyond -- a one-night stand. There's Molly who has a 
husband (common-law or official --it is never explained), Eddie. He 
has a dull job.  She seems happy enough with him; both are rather 
joyfully expecting a baby very soon. There's Debbie, a promiscuous 
hairdresser who has a young son and is divorced (or separated) from 
rather loutish Dan.
Add to this the parents of the girls. Eileen and Bill. Their marriage 
is loveless --we get no explanations. The movie's documentation 
informs as that both parents are, and I quote,  "hurt by the 
estrangement of their youngest child, Darren."  But neither I nor the 
companion I watched the film with had caught anything about Darren, 
who, to make matters worse, is hardly on screen.
The daughters and their progenitors live each in their own place, all 
of which seem to be in the same area. The film covers its characters 
over a period of four days, indicated by screen titles.
"Wonderland" is essentially a slice-of-life movie which takes place 
in a limited area and over four days. It was photographed with 
hand-held (mostly or only, I cannot tell) super-16 mm. cameras, in 
available light, to gain mobility and unobtrusiveness, to allow for 
improvisations and easy changes, to give the movie a spontaneous, 
para-documentary look and feel. Then it was blown up to 35mm, which 
allows its projection in movie theaters.
There is often a purplish or other cast to the images. Audiences 
unfamiliar with 16mm film may justifiably think that the whole thing 
was shot on video. It was certainly shot without regard to American 
ears. The working-class British accents, though not as pronounced as 
in some other movies from the UK, are unclear and could use 
subtitles. In its effort to show life as it is rather than staged, 
the film also disdains other traditional clarities. Who is who and 
what to whom remains murky for a long time. It is only  later that 
one understands that the three girls are sisters, foe example.
Among the oddities are speeches by Eddie, the very pregnant Molly's 
companion. More than once he is shown on some sort of bridge (or 
overpass?) speaking aloud to the unseen camera and microphone, which 
makes no sense. He is rehearsing what he will tell Molly, that is, 
that he quit (or lost?) his job and will look for another. But this, 
within a film that is keen on catching naturalness, is a most 
artificial process, a soliloquy-type situation, a la Hamlet --and 
Eddie is no Hamlet.
The various events take place in real locations, not studio sets. 
They include visits to Nadia's cafe, to a pub, fireworks watched by 
Debbie's son Jack, Jack's accident at the fireworks, the clinic where 
he is taken by the police and in which clinic Molly gives birth, etc. 
There's also the troubling fact that the girls' mother poisons a 
neighbor's dog whose barking kept her awake.
"Wonderland" does not judge, preach or moralize. It tells it the way 
it is. But structurally it is messy. And the unrelenting  misery of 
the tribe is overkill. There must be better ways to keep you 
interested --if not deeply involved-- in the unhappiness of the 
characters. It does not help either that the musical score  is 
over-the-top and irritating, the way it hammers sounds that are wrong 
for essentially simple people.
The performers are good at what they do but this does not suffice. 
Some of the players may be familiar to Britons or viewers with 
photographic memories. I only remembered  Jack Shepherd (the father). 
And I was surprised to read that Kika Markham (the mother) had her 
first major role in Francois Truffaut's "Two English Girls" back in 
1971.

Title
Review for Whole Wide World, The (1996)
[Note that the follow-up is set to rec.arts.sf.written rather than
rec.art.sf.movies.  This was done on purpose.  -Moderator]
THE WHOLE WIDE WORLD  ** to *** depending on viewer. Directed by Dan
Ireland.Written by Michael Scott Myers from the memoir "One Who Walked
Alone" by Novalyne Price Ellis. Photography, Claudio Rocha. Editing, Luis
Colina. Production design, John Frick. Music, Hans Zimmer and Harry
Gregson-Williams. Cast:  Vincent D'Onofrio (Robert E. Howard), Renee
Zellweger (Novalyne Price) Ann Wedgeworth (Mrs. Howard), et al.  A Sony
Pictures Classics release. 105 min. PG. At the Art.
While The Whole Wide World may or may not fascinate all audiences, it will
certainly intrigue those devotees of pulp fiction who revere writer Robert
E. Howard (1906-1936).
Texas-born Howard began to write at age 15. From the late 1920s to his
demise he was a hugely popular author of fantasy and sci-fi stories (he
called them yarns), mostly in the fanzine  Weird Tales. He created some
thirty lead characters who appeared in tale after tale. Conan, the most
famous of them, was in a record number of some 45 yarns.
In the 1970s pulp fiction became an object of study in American
universities for reasons that included breaks with and expansions of
established literary values, an interest in popular cultures, and in some
cases trend-seeking scholarly opportunism. Two Arnold Schwarzenegger
movies,  Conan the Barbarian  (significantly baptized  Conard le Barbare
in French) and  Conan the Destroyer  also contributed to a revival of
popular interest in Howard.
Novalyne Price, later Price Ellis, was from Cross Plains, in rural West
Texas, where Howard, his mother and his father (a respected M.D.) also
lived. Novalyne alternated between graduate studies and teaching to which
she was most dedicated. An aspiring writer, she was happy to meet Bob
Howard in 1934, when she was in her mid-20s. A curious relationship ensued.
It lasted under various permutations until Howard's end in 1936. She
continued college teaching, married William Ellis in 1947, was widowed in
1994 after 47 years of marriage.
The resurgence of interest in fantasy and science fiction caused Novalyne
to become indignant at the scholarly studies about Robert Howard and to set
out righting the wrongs with her memoir  One Who Walked Alone (1985). Her
version is the basis of the movie which was made by a first-time director
and a first-time scriptwriter.
The non-affair between Novalyne and Bob begins in a refreshingly un-cute
fashion which intimates that both people were originals. Soon however,
maverick Bob is revealed to be an authentic weirdo. While not a hermit, he
avoids the outside world in favor of shutting himself in his room to write
away. Material necessity does not explain this, since, even at half-cent a
word, Howard stretches out his texts, is prolific, financially well off and
lives very simply. The significant reason must be that Bob tends to escape
the real world and to sublimate his fantasies by working them into his
yarns. In a stentorian voice he reads his own fabulations and acts out his
creatures' parts.
He is exaggeratedly dedicated to his mother, a possessive, overly
protective woman with a life-threatening ailment. The relationship is
merely sketched out but clearly Oedipal, a tad incestuous and certainly
unhealthy.The father, out of the picture, is sad at his exclusion.
Novalyne and Bob have a slow-motion rapport that goes through a number of
minor adjustments that would take pages to relate. Its apex is when, many
months after their first date, they have their rather chaste first kiss.
Matters go no further. It is as if Bob's descriptions of his characters,
loaded with sexual references and often lurid, are all the sex he needs.
The virginal protagonists are well cast and played. Both have ordinary
faces and a sort of physical anonymity that makes Mr. D'Onofrio and Ms.
Zellwegger credible.  They are people, not actors, and they are a duo
rather than a couple.
My key to this odd relationship is "amitie amoureuse," (loving friendship),
an ambiguous, tricky concept that's quite common. Seen from another angle,
Bob is a mini-Pygmalion to the young woman. Surprisingly -- on the face of
it -- he gives her a book by the erotic writer Pierre Louys whose famous
The Woman and the Puppet (1898) was filmed as The Devil is a Woman,
starring Marlene Dietrich.  It would seem that Bob, in his spare time, is
trying to emancipate the lady.
Yet, for a progressive thinker, Bob often sounds sexist to the ears of the
1990s. I cannot remember a single instance of his calling his friend by her
first name, one that echoes futuristic fiction or medical products. He
always addresses her as "girl." "Listen, girl, "look here, girl, hey,
girl." This mode of address may grate today but was a Southern term of
endearment  for generations.
The depiction of Bob as neurotic, dysfunctional and a little mad occupies
center stage. To my ears, Brooklynite D'Onofrio's Texas twang sounded
authentic. Yet, setting aside the nasty cliche of some Southern accents
denoting hicks, the way Bob is written and performed does make him into
something of a bumpkin. This may not endear him to us but at least it
shatters preconceptions about what writers are like.
By mid-1936, the Bob and Novalyne had parted but without severing all
connections. The bad health of Bob's beloved mother had reached a point of
no return. When he heard that her end was near, he shot himself through the
head. He was 30.  Mother died 30 hours later.
Save for some awkward transitions, the film is a well-produced small slice
of Americana.  It must be one of the lowest low-budget  A  pictures ever
made given the tiny number of actors, locations, sets and props. Its rural
nature must have made it even cheaper than recent independent films set in
urban areas where "dressing" streets and controlling traffic add to costs.
I have the impression that the biggest expense in WWW went to recreating a
theater's marquee and renting some period automobiles.
To what extent the persona of Bob is genuine, or filtered by Novalyne's
memory (she was about 88 during the filming, living alone in Lafayette,
Louisiana), or fiddled with by the filmmakers, I cannot tell. The movie may
answer few questions about Robert Howard, yet it does present to us the
interesting case history of a one-of-a-kind individual.
This review and others can be found at : http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Naked (1993)
NAKED  (UK, 1993) *** 3/4  Directed and written by Mike Leigh. Photography,
Dick Pope. Production design, Allison Chitty. Editing, John Gregory. Music,
Andrew Dickson. Cast: David Thewlis, Lesley Sharp, Katrin Cartlidge, Peter
Wight, Greg Cruttwell, Claire Skinner, Ewen Bremner, Susan Vidler, Deborah
Maclaren, Gina McKee. 126 min. Rated R (language, violent sexual situations)
My  high rating comes with a warning.  "Naked" is terrific  but not to
everyone's taste. It is sleazy, unsettling, foul-mouthed and definitely not
uplifting. At  last year's Cannes Festival, it received two top prizes:
Best Director to Mike Leigh ("High Hopes," "Life Is Sweet,")  and Best
Actor to  David Thewlis, whose unforgettable performance outshines that of
any male  in the recent Oscar race. The  critics and cinephiles were also
very high on the film but some of the locals who saw it reacted with the
Gallic equivalent of "yuk."
Thewlis plays Johnny, a drifter who comes in from the cold -- or tries to
and fails, because he keeps undermining his own self. A grungy,  marginal
nihilist, he is also an intellectual and round-the-clock philosopher who
throws around words like "solipsism" within his scatological rhetoric.
He is first shown in  a dark  street of his native Manchester, raping a
woman (or more likely, having  brutal sex), then stealing a car and driving
to the London flat of ex-girlfriend Louise (Sharp) . She's out. He engages
in casual, violent and demeaning sex with spaced-out  house mate Sophie
(Cartlidge). All this goes comes with a  before, during and after stream of
talk :  insults, apothegms, incisive notions, the whole shebang.
Johnny is a fascinating 1990s anti-hero, brilliant but dysfunctional--
easily a borderline psycho. Though self-assured he also seeks ( in his
peculiar way)  truths and values.  He is cold, cynical and contemptuous
,yet understanding at times. He is a loner but one in need of human
contact.
He meets several characters, all distinctive for better or for worse, some
sleazy, all desperately lonely and  maladjusted, all powerfully drawn, all
of them naked -- naked meaning here not just bodies but minds and hearts.
There's something Russian about this "The Lower Depths" meeting "Dead
Souls", and there's something most British too: a blend of a certain
English life today and throwbacks to the 50s and 60s anger of British
cinema.
Johnny deals with those oddities with a mixture of sadism, contempt and
occasional flashes of sympathy.  He befriends briefly an inarticulate young
Scot and his girl, then  finds a kindred soul in a night watchman. Visiting
an older woman, her  pathetic offer of sex elicits a cruel refusal from
Johnny. A waitress provides a bath then turns him out. And there's more in
this semi-picaresque tale.
Some of these characters  do not reappear, others do, like Jeremy (who also
poses as Sebastian Hawkes), a wealthy, supercilious, vicious playboy who is
the flat's landlord, treats women like dirt and gets away with it, and
plans to kill himself at age 40.  Jeremy ( Cruttwell) is an uncanny Dirk
Bogarde look-  and sound-alike, with touches of Laurence Harvey.
Brian the watchman( Wight),  a calmly warm and likable older man with "the
most tedious boring job in England," symbolically guards an empty building
that Johnny calls "this post-modernist gas chamber."  Both men are the two
faces of the same coin and suffer from malaise.  Both are cultivated
readers, know the Bible inside out, have unfulfilled possibilities,
understand each other and engage in  talks full of metaphors, paradoxes,
Nostradamus prophecies, the Mark of the Beast, Revelations, the Apocalypse,
evolution ... It is a rambling session of sometimes delirious, sometimes
astute arguments on philosophy, sociology, metaphysics and theology.  It is
a like a medieval "disputatio, " the ancestor of debating societies.
You might want to meet Brian, but none of the others, including the often
sadistic Johnny. Yet whatever your reactions to him, he has undeniable
presence and his intoxication with words and ideas has life. Johnny makes
us question the intellectual complacency of most people.
"Naked" has no plot strictly speaking. Mike Leigh's method is to have his
actors repeatedly improvise and come up with dialogues and situations out
of which the final script emerges, a non high-concept scenario that defies
description, not to mention summing up.
Leigh himself said: " My feelings about "Naked" are as ambivalent as my
feelings about our chaotic late-20th century world, and probably as
ambivalent as the film itself, which is, I hope, as funny as it is sad, as
beautiful as it is anarchic. But I really don't want to pontificate about
the film. I'd rather let it speak for itself." It does that, loudly,
inchoately  and mesmerizingly.
[Publ. April 1, 1994, by Edwin Jahiel]
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Io speriamo che me la cavo (1993)
     With some nine movies between 1963 and 1976, director Lina
Wertmuller became a cult figure, admired for her caustic humor, social
criticism, excesses, farcical or steamy sexuality, absurdism and
maverick filmmaking.
     SEVEN BEAUTIES (1976) made her the first woman to be
Oscar-nominated as a director.  But her next film (1978), starring
starring Giancarlo Gianini and Candice Bergen, THE END OF THE WORLD IN
OUR USUAL BED IN A NIGHT FULL OF RAIN failed.  The dozen pictures that
followed, for sundry reasons, made no more than a ripple.  Wertmuller
almost disappeared from the international scene.
     With CIAO, PROFESSORE! she is back at the head of the class.
The film is much more mainstream, toned-down and warm than previous
ones by Wertmuller..  At the same time, she uses her sharpness and
irony in unpretentious, un-showy ways that protect the movie from
facile sentimentalism.
     The picture is based on "Me, Let's Hope I Make It," a book which I
suppose was written by a teacher about his experiences.  That was also
the movie's title at the 1993 Toronto Film Festival, after which it
became CIAO, PROFESSORE!
     The basic story -- new teacher conquers, and is conquered by, a
difficult class -- is not new, but its specific context, details and
variations on a familiar theme, make it fresh and original.
     Marco Tullio Sperelli had asked to be transferred to the northern
town of Corsano but was mistakenly assigned to Corzano in the south, a
grimy, dilapidated, impoverished, lawless disaster area in the region
of Naples.
     At school, three-fourths of Sperelli's third-grade students are
no-shows, but many can be located, at work around the mean streets of
Corzano as a waiter, a hawker of stolen cigarettes, an ice-cream
seller, a barber's assistant, a flegdling racketeer.
     Corruption reigns, from the Mayor (a party to breaking child-labor
and school-attendance laws), to the school's black-marketeer janitor
(he sells cakes as well as chalk and toilet-paper to teachers and
pupils), to his do-nothing janitress/cleaning lady wife, to the
absentee, perpetually pregnant school director who accepts everything
-- and everything is wrong -- with a shrug and a smile.
     Corpulent Sperelli, who looks somewhat like a kindly Luciano
Pavarotti, corrals his pupils and soon finds out what a miserable
existence most of them lead.  With patience, tolerance and humor (much
of it at his own expense) he treats the youths like humans, disciplines
them with wit and imagination, teaches them some academic things and
some values -- while he himself learns about life in the area.  We may
be in recognizable territory, but it is light-years away from The
Blackboard Jungle type of movies.
     One assignment to the kids is to write parables.  This is
particularly relevant as the movie itself is also a parable of Italy's
North vs. South.  The North is industrial, affluent, developed and
"cultivated."  Northerners often looks down upon a South (the
"Mezzogiorno") perceived as foreign and backward.  They can be repaid
with suspiciousness and defensiveness born of inferiority complexes.
     The North-South gap is cunningly symbolized by the Southerners'
peculiar pronunciation of De Amicis -- the school being named after
Edmondo De Amicis, the writer whose "Cuore" (Hearts), a book about
school-children, may well be the most read classic in Italy.
     Sperelli is a Northerner, but a friendly one, with minimal
prejudices and maximum good will.  He appreciates nature's beauty and
some aspects of southern hospitality.  He accepts peculiarities,
superstitions, and soon he understands a great deal : the conditions
that make the locals take the Camorra and its drug traffic for
granted. (The subtitles call it Mafia, but the Mafia is Sicilian, the
Ndragheta is Calabrian and the Camorra is Neapolitan); the bright kid
whose dream is "to be a man" (read "above the law") and "feel nothing";
the proliferation of births; the prematurely wise little girl who is
the head of a wretched household; the sleepy boy who has to stay up
nights helping his father to collect discarded cardboard in the
streets; the fat boy who takes refuge in overeating.
     Sperelli is not merely a routine teacher, but a self-appointed
social worker.  Knowledge comes to him in little shock waves mixed with
a constant flow of comic moments.
     The kids are street-wise.  One of the movie's charms is the
amusing-sad way they talk like grown-ups, with adult gestures, body
language and a rich scatological vocabulary.  Appealing too is the fact
that in spite of little schooling, the kids know a surprising (albeit
oddly interpreted) amount of things academic, from anthropology to
geography.  They are fast learners and fast thinkers, and the bond that
grows between them and their teacher is a delight.
     This bond is predictable, but the uninhibited give-and-take of the
dialogue, the succession of clever, believable events, their details,
the acute, specific observations of the ethos and lifestyles of
Neapolitan culture, take you from small surprises to larger
revelations.
     CIAO, PROFESSORE! is a very serious funny movie, excellently
written, directed and played.  A picture that has five writers spells
catastrophe in Hollywood, but in Italy many of the very best films have
had several scenarists.
     When Sperelli leaves for good, neither he nor we, the viewers,
harbor illusions.  What the Professore has contributed may be no more
than band-aid treatment.  Yet, as he goes away, the two-way affection
will remain with him and in the hearts of Corzano.
[published  4 Sept. 1994.  Minor cosmetic changes 25 Dec. 1995]

Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)
PLEASANTVILLE *** 1/2 . Written and directed by Gary Ross. Photography,
John Lindley. Editing, William Goldenberg.Production designer, Jeannine
Oppewall. Art director, Dianne Wager. Set decorator, Jay Hart.Costumes,
Judianna Makovsky. Music director, Randy Newman. Produced by Ross, Jon
Kilik, Robert J. Degus, Steven Soderbergh.Cast: Tobey Maguire (David/Bud),
Jeff Daniels (Johnson), Joan Allen (Betty), William H. Macy (George), J.T.
Walsh (Big Bob), Don Knotts (TV Repairman), Marley Shelton (Margaret), Jane
Kaczmarek (David's Mom), Reese Witherspoon (Jennifer/Mary Sue).A New Line
release. 116 minutes. PG-13.
Simplify, simplify! Exaggerate, exaggerate!  Combine those strategies with
skill and imagination and you can get immediate, public-pleasing results in
comedy and satire. That's what happens in the case of "Pleasantville," the
aptly and ironically named first feature by Gary Ross, the co-writer of the
fantasy "Big," and the writer of the fanciful, political "Dave."
It is crystal-clear that Pleasantville is going to become a popular
mega-hit and that just about all regular filmgoers know what to expect.
Even so:
Siblings David and Jennifer are high-school seniors in 1998 and in an
unnamed town They share the problem of an unhappily divorced mother and the
problem of people their age. At a school assembly, the students are given a
pessimistic report on the future: unemployment, AIDS, environmental
disasters, etc. (This is not a gratuitous announcement, since its aim is to
incite good grades that can make the difference in an increasingly
competitive society).
Dave and Jennifer may be twins but have different personalities. The girl
is what, way back when, used to be called "boy-crazy." Her brother takes
refuge from the (presumed) unpleasantnesses of life by watching cable
reruns of old, 1950s family-type sitcoms. An expert in the series
"Pleasantville," he is about to enter and undoubtedly win  the $1.000 first
prize in a contest  about "Pleasantville."
The two kids, following a nicely planned succession of events, and via a
mysteriously appearing TV repairman, find themselves transported to and
inside the "Pleasantville" sitcom, as the characters Dave and Mary Sue, the
children of the impossibly neat and idealized (by 1950's standards pushed
beyond their outer limits) household of Betty and George.
We are now in a Twilight Zone territory, but without that program's
darkness -- at least not overtly. Getting from reality to fantasy also
reminds me of the way Orpheus (in Jean Cocteau's eponymous film) goes to
another world by entering a mirror.
"Pleasantville" reflects mores and manners of many a 50's sitcom, only
taken to the limit. The opening, establishing scenes of the movie proper
are in color. Set in April 1958, the program's world is, unsurprisingly,
shown in black and white and shades of gray. What is surprising is that its
world is strictly limited to the falsely "ideal," town of Pleasantville.
There is nothing beyond its Main Street, which, reaching its end, loops
back to its beginning. It is like those images of a coiled snake  biting
its own tail.
There is no history. There are no books, or rather, there are book covers
of some major works but the pages inside are blank. The high school has a
winning basketball team where everyone scores baskets. One may wonder which
other teams they play. Or where anything --no, make this everything else,
from clothes to cars to meat --you-name it, comes from. But then
"Pleasantville" requires blind, and willing, suspension of disbelief!
The sitcom is sanitized to the nth power. This goes beyond pristine picked
fences, manicured lawns and perfectly surfaced streets, streets that you
could fry the proverbial eggs on, except that the year-round temperature is
72 high, 72 low and never a cloud in sight. (How do they know what clouds
are? Never mind). Not only are there no bathrooms mentioned, but Mary Sue's
attempt to find one results in an room tiled and empty.
At a good clip, Mary Sue and Bud affect the place from A to Z. Since they
"belong" in the sitcom, no one sees them, as we do, like those wiser
extra-terrestrials of sci-fi flicks. So what they say and do is not
questioned. Mary Sue gradually makes the sexual education of the youths,
and, indeed, her own mother, in a neat reversal of the child teaching her
mom the facts of life. Bud opens new doors, to art, to books (that have a
content now), to feelings.
Among other transformations there is that of Mr. Johnson (Jeff Daniels),
who seems to be a dimwit soda jerk until Bud, aware that Johnson has the
repressed soul of an artist, releases it by opening his eyes with the gift
of a coffee-table art book. If you use logic, you'll wonder where the book
came from; and how its reproductions of paintings, from old to very modern,
can affect so strongly a total visual illiterate. But the name of the game
with this film is never to ask questions!
In another reversal, the local firemen do not put out fires, since these do
not exist. Nor do they set fires, as they did in Ray Bradbury's (and
Francois Tuffaut's) cautionary "Fahrenheit 451." They only know how to
rescue cats from high branches.
Gradually, as the people of Pleasantville begin to change, feel and see new
things, humans, objects, and nature go from black-and-white to beautiful
colors. The colorizing does not, as a rule, affect the entire image but is
applied to one item within it while the main view of the screen remains in
black and white. Color shows up in often unexpected, symbolic places. The
process is beautifully thought out and timed, superbly executed with
digital techniques taken farther than in any film I can remember. Along
with the invasions of color, natural phenomena such as rain also appear.
The first half of the movie is a delight, especially if you bear in mind
that what it spoofs to the max is not really the life of the 1950s but life
in certain 1950's TV programs. There is, however, a limit to one- or
two-joke stories. The film's second part becomes increasingly like a view
of 1950's society seen by militant eyes of the 1960s. The development  revs
up its parables, takes us into matters concerning reactionary
socio-politics, the mistrust of "the other" and of non-conformism, racism,
suppression of ideas (down to a Nazi-ish book burning), fear of
differences, and so on.
Things become a bit laborious. The underlying idea that change is good and
inevitable, is a good one. Potshots at the 50s icons are supplemented by
sometimes overt, sometimes subtler ironies about the 1990's. They imply
that today trends, fads and above all conformism are, under various guises,
not unlike those of 40 years ago. It is a sound notion to suggest that in
the 90s we can be as self-centered or obscurantist as the Pleasantvillers.
But the movie might have condensed all this and made its points in under
116 minutes.
Still, I cannot give too much weight to this objection since this
elaboration, dotting of the i's and crossing of the t's, is better than the
ponderously encapsulated didacticism that opens and closes the Twilight
Zone's episodes. Pleasantville-the-movie has well-meaning allegorical
ambitions, as well as a very tricky and a highly imaginative structure
surrounding its exaggerations and simplifications.
It also has, with no exceptions, a splendid cast that can be touching
(especially the characters played by Joan Allen and Jeff Daniels),
serio-comic (the siblings), oddly pathetic (William H. Macy, and the
smartly conceived heavy, J.T. Walsh in his last role).
Above all, it is infinitely more original and inventive than the
pedestrian, copycat movies that make up the great majority of what goes on
screens small and large, in this our time.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for House of Mirth, The (2000)
In "The House of Mirth" no character is three-dimensional, therefore 
convincing. Not the irritatingly vague Lily, not the hazy male or 
the incomplete supporting female roles. Not even Eleanor Bron, one 
of the movie's rare non-American performers. She plays the 
disapproving, rich aunt whose speech, enunciation and pauses feel 
amateurish in a role that in bygone days would have featured Dame 
May Whitty or Edna May Oliver. (She's unrecognizable from the 
charming parts she used to play in the 60s, as in "Bedazzled.")
I like writer-director Terence Davies's modest output, especially 
his "Distant Voices, Still Lives" (two separate but interconnected 
films in one) and "The Long Day Closes." These are all based on his 
dreary life and working-class family in wartime and post-war 
England. The films are splendid downers in which the only solace for 
their denizens seemed to be lavishly sampled, mostly American pop 
songs and Hollywood flicks. Well worth renting.
Movie reviews by Edwin Jahiel are at : http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel 

Title
Review for Mercury Rising (1998)
MERCURY RISING (1998) *  Directed by Harold Becker. Written by Lawrence Konner
and Mark Rosenthal, based on the novel "Simple Simon" by Ryne Douglas
Peardon. Photography, Michael Seresin. Editing, Peter Honess. Production
design, Patrizia von Brandenstein. Music,John Barry. Cast: Bruce Willis
(Art Jeffries), Alec Baldwin (Nicholas Kudrow), Miko Hughes (Simon), Chi
McBride (Tommy B. Jordan), Kim Dickens (Stacey), et al. A Universal
release. 131 minutes. Rated R (violence)
There were two previews for summer 1998 movies at the screening of "Mercury
Rising" : for "Lethal Weapon 4" and for "Black Dog," both depressingly
familiar with their ever-lasting, dumbing-the-public scenes of supercops,
blazing guns, bloodshed, spectacular (ugh!) car crashes, in short, Men With
Guns and Wheels. Then, adding to this hopeless state of things, came the
feature, an inferior Bruce Willis vehicle.
In search of at least one new twist, "Mercury Rising" invents Simon, a
9-year old autistic kid in Chicago. He is played by Miko Hughes who must be
12, since, debuting at age 2, he has been in 10 movies (plus TV) in the
last 10 years.
Knowing too little about autism I cannot judge the realism of Simon's
portrayal. No matter. Although given a very limited range of things to do
-- mostly sadly peculiar facial expressions and body-language, and minimal
speech-- young Miko does better than anyone else in the cast. But he can't
steal the show, because there is nothing to steal.
Art Jeffries (Willis) is an undercover FBI agent who has infiltrated some
South Dakota fundamentalists. He's with them during a bank robbery. A small
army of lawmen surrounds them, and kill them all by not following
Jeffries's instructions that would lead to a bloodless surrender.Seething
with rage Willis roughs up the FBI leader. All this is plotted
unconvincingly.
The result is two-fold. Jeffries, now deemed unusable as an undercover
specialist, is stuck with more ordinary duties; and he will be pursued by
visions of the youngest of the dead Dakotans.
A kindly therapist gives autistic Simon a book of puzzles. Glancing at a
page of letters, numbers and symbols, he discovers in a flash a hidden
telephone number, calls it and contacts two nerdy fellows in a
computer/communications room. The guys panic.
Explained as muddily and stupidly as possible, it turns out that they are
employees of the NSA (National Security Agency), and are somehow involved
(don't ask) with a state of the art new code ("Mercury"), which they had
decided to test by including it in a puzzle book. (It all makes no sense,
whether in broad lines or specifics).The nerds, terrified as Big Boss Lt.
Colonel Kudrow.gives them hell, come up with streams of reasons and excuses
in 80 mph technobabble that is impossible to understand.
The code is the project of NSA's Kudrow. He is livid. Deciphering the
cryptographed messages will result in the death of hordes of American (and
friendly foreign)  operatives throughout the known universe. Without a
second thought he orders the execution of Simon. A killer pumps bullets
into Simon's father and mother, but no one can find the boy. Yet when
Jeffries, called in as a matter of routine, arrives on the scene of the
murders, he locates the kid (don't ask) hiding in the house.
Somehow (again, don't ask) aware of the hunt for Simon, Jeffries becomes
his rescuer, savior and protector as he drags the child through
mega-improbable action-adventures about which the least said, the better.
The movie must have been written by a bank of computers on automatic pilot.
If it is about  secret intelligence, it sure shows no human brains, hidden
or in plain sight. Its high tech is high dreck. Willis uses about three of
his habitual six expressions; Baldwin follows suit. Both men are getting
plumpish. But while Willis is always hot and dressed in sweaty t-shirts and
jeans, Baldwin is cool and fashionably dressed.
If you do not understand or accept the plot and its details, do not worry.
But if you do, you might wish to undergo a brain-scan. Do not worry either
about the alphabet soup of Government or other organizations (NSA, FBI,
CIA, CBS, NRA, UF0, STP, TBA, PTA, etc.) There's a kernel here of what
might have been shaped into a different movie, about rivalries, mutual
undercutting and the like, but it is not exploited.
At a Washington, D.C, reception "chez" Kudrow,  his popularity with the
Establishment is established. During that same party comes the first
encounter between hero and villain in the latter's dream-cellar. Grungy
Willis guzzles from a bottle of Chateau Petrus, a great French wine, then
vengefully brings down racks of liquid gold. It's in the Hollywood
tradition of the good plebeian rising against the nasty upper-class fellow.
I rate "MR" as one-star rather than zero for these reasons. My pity for
poor Miko Hughes having to act in a role hard on his face and body; the
pretty good production values in Chicago, albeit in cliches ; the small
female roles are not given to gorgeous dames; and especially because that
with all the high tech premise, the solution comes from a low tech sheet of
carbon paper.
Otherwise, "MR" is a yawner, dumb, uninvolving and worst of all, unpleasant.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Music of the Heart (1999)
MUSIC OF THE HEART (1999) ***1/2. Directed by Wes Craven. Written by 
Pamela Gray, based on the life story of Roberta Guaspari and inspired 
by the documentary "Small Wonders." Photography, Peter Deming. 
Editing, Patrick Lussier. Production design, Bruce Miller. Music, 
Mason Daring. Produced by Marianne Maddalena,Walter Scheuer, Allan 
Miller and Susan Kaplan. Cast: Meryl Streep (Roberta Guaspari), Aidan 
Quinn (Brian Sinclair), Gloria Estefan (Isabel Vasquez), Angela 
Bassett (Janet Williams), Jane Leeves (Dorothea von Haeften), Cloris 
Leachman (Assunta Guaspari), Kieran Culkin (Teen-age Lexi), Charlie 
Hofheimer (Teen-age Nick), Josh Pais(Dennis Rausch) et al. A Miramax 
release 110 minutes. PG
Wonders will never cease, said Sophocles.(Not the ancient Greek but a 
friend who speaks in cliches). Wes Craven, a shockmeister( plus 
schlockmeister for some), the creator of Freddy Krueger (Nightmare on 
Elm Street), is synonymous with horror flicks such as Scream, The 
People Under the Stairs, Shocker, The Swamp Thing, The Hills Have 
Eyes, Vampire in Brooklyn, etc.
The 77-minute documentary Small Wonders, released in 1996, made by 
Allen and Lana Miller, and Oscar-nominated, dealt with East Harlem 
violin teacher Roberta Guaspari-Tzavaras, whose sheer dedication, 
persistence and missionary-like zeal succeeded in educating hundreds 
of kids in the face of lack of funds and equipment, elimination of 
music and arts programs in the city's budget, and personal 
difficulties.
Craven, a professorial-looking, classical music lover, now 
middle-aged,  saw the documentary, was enthusiastic about making a 
theatrical feature of it, pursued his project with fervor. Overcoming 
raised eyebrows and  several stumbling blocks, (Madonna was to be his 
star), he was at long last able to enlist Meryl Streep who had never 
seen any of his films, to come up with a first-rate writer, other 
good performers, an amazing array of children, and finally a movie 
that looks, sounds and plays beautifully.
The film caught me by surprise. Its previews don't do it justice. The 
title is sentimental, old-fashioned. (It was originally 50 Violins, 
which suggested a musical film, hence a probable loss of public). 
Every sign pointed to a feelgood, inspirational picture, of which too 
many are schlock without shock. But watching the finished product I 
realized that I, too, had fallen into the trap of preconceptions and 
generalizations about films with dedicated teachers. I had forgotten 
Mr.Holland's Opus; or the marvelous ancestor of them all, Goodbye Mr. 
Chips (1939); or the sweet-and-sour gem The Blackboard Jungle (1955), 
the British To Sir, with Love (1967), the less-known The Corn is 
Green (with Bette Davis, 1945) and others.
I suspect that my suspiciousness came from too many films made for 
teen tastes in the last two decades. They were school comedies 
--often funny for adults too --in which students did everything but 
study and their teachers were gamekeepers or ridiculous figures or 
ineffectual wall paper.
In any case, Music of the Heart is a first-class movie. I have not 
seen Small Wonders, so I cannot tell how faithfully MOTH develops it 
-- but I have the feeling that scriptwriter Pamela Gray and the 
director have stuck close to the documentary, with a few changes. 
(From a tiny picture I located the real Roberta is definitely a 
brunette). The feature is convincing throughout, with warmth and 
sentiment not exploited to the hilt.
In my audience no one wept audibly, but eighty-one percent of the 
viewers had moist eyes. (The margin of error is 3 %). My only 
criticism is that there is just a tiny bit of background given for 
Roberta. Her presence is alive and lively; her past is nebulous..
Roberta Guaspari, a mother of two boys, is ditched by her husband for 
one of the couple's close female friends. Roberta takes on a dumb 
store job, meets old school chum Brian who sends her to his friend 
Janet, a school principal. I'll omit general developments as well as 
details so as not to undo the pleasures of discovery --except that 
the movie wraps up with a large group of Roberta's kids playing in 
Carnegie Hall along with such fiddle greats as Itzhak Perlman, Isaac 
Stern, Arnold Steinhardt and several others.
All the actors are exceptionally good. Angela Bassett, who shared top 
billing with Eddie Murphy is Wes Craven's Vampire in Brooklyn is, 
additionally, gorgeous at 41. Gloria Estefan whom I knew only as a 
singer, has a perfectly performed supporting role.
On the screen, Aidan Quinn has always had a most likable persona. He 
can also be differentiated from others, an exception today when too 
many faces are interchangeable and semi-anonymous. It was a good move 
not to make too big a deal of his relationship with Roberta, and to 
have Quinn vanish for a couple of big stretches. The same 
non-hammering of several supporting characters is also a clever 
decision. It allows concentration on Roberta, her pupils and her 
struggles -- time well spent and never dull.
And Merryl Streep? Now 50 yet entirely credible as a woman in her 
late 30s, she is a marvel.  Let me mention an apocryphal story. In 
the 19th century, a famous Polish actress came to Paris. She was 
received like a queen. Appearing on the Opera's stage, she declaimed 
some things in Polish. The Who's Who audience did not know this 
language, but the lady was so great that she had them all moved to 
tears and applauding wildly. Later it was disclosed that the actress 
had recited the Polish alphabet, and La Marseillaise, the French 
National anthem. Streep could do the same.
For this movie she also learned to play the violin, from scratch (an 
apt expression in this case). Add this to her past feats, and you get 
not merely the Woman with a Thousand Faces, and Accents, but of a 
thousand capabilities too.
MOTH, on top of its other plusses, quietly yet firmly stands as a 
social triumph for race relations. The children, young and older, 
their parents, the overall milieu in Black and Hispanic Harlem, and 
so on, come in all sizes, flavors and ethnic backgrounds. Yet there 
are no sides formed, no racial conflicts, no mentions of prejudice. 
Striking a realistic note is the mother of black child who first 
rebels at the incursion of a Whitey teacher who does irrelevant white 
music. But Roberta wins her over.
The commonplace element of drugs and violence is played way down too. 
There is no X-rated language. Not that the film has been bowdlerized. 
Roberta has ex-cons working on the dilapidated house she bought, but 
furious at their methods, incapacity, and drinking, she fires them 
all. A student simply tells of her dad hitting her mother. Otherwise, 
there are no goody-goody passages in this early contender for the 
next set of Oscars.
This is indeed a feelgood movie, but with natural, realistic 
feelgoodness. We can use this in these rather cynical movie-days.

Title
Review for Bandit Queen (1994)
     On the face of it at least, and for filmgoers who are not truly
familiar with Indian film, BANDIT QUEEN is as far as can be from the
West's impression of what Indian movies are, assuming of course that
there are impressions, since the huge Indian production is "terra
incognita" to the non-Indian public or at best something merely
glimpsed.
     For those who have some familiarity with Indian film, there is, on
the one hand the huge output of pop-commercial, formulaic works,
romances and adventures punctuated by songs and dances.  On the other,
a much smaller number of comparatively "elitist" works.  Yet there was
never merely "an Indian Cinema" but various "Indian Cinemas." These
developed in eleven major languages and some twenty others, including
dialects.
     Bengali cinema, though in quantity about one-fourth of the
dominating Hindi films, has been the most prestigious.  It was Satyajit
Ray's 1955 PATHER PANCHALI and his other two works of the great "Apu
Trilogy" (APARAJITO and THE WORLD OF APU) that put India on the
international map.  Ray was much influenced by the Frenchman Jean
Renoir.
     This is not too unlike the case of the once-famous Swedish cinema
which fell into bad times, underwent a small renaissance in the 1940s
under the influence of French poetic realism, and re-entered the world
scene in the 1940s thanks to the works of Ingmar Bergman.
     Ray practiced what strikes me as thoughtful, poetic neo-realism.
He ushered in the New Wave of directors' cinema, much of it Bengali but
also from many states, such as enlightened Kerala which had a policy of
aid to quality films.  Even then, this production, though deserving a
wide Western exposure, is principally seen in film festivals and little
known to outside India.
     BANDIT QUEEN does not fall into familiar categories.  It is based
on the story of Phoolan Devi (Seema Biswas) who was the leader of a
dacoit (brigand, outlaw, etc.) band for about five years.  She became a
major media figure as well as a pop-icon because she was low caste
while her attacks were against upper caste people.  In 1983, she
surrendered to the authorities.  She was charged with four dozen major
crimes, including kidnapping and murder, notably the February 1981 raid
on the town of Behmai where between 22 and 30 (figures vary) people
were massacred.  Phoolan was released after 8, 11 or 12 years in prison
(figures vary) and now is either in politics or planning to be.
     BANDIT QUEEN purports to be a filmization of Phoolan's biography
as written by Mala Sen whose book was based on information gathered
from co-prisoners of Phoolan, who in turn related what Phoolan had told
them.  Historiography needs more than that, but let it pass...
     In the movie, Phoolan is introduced as short, homely,
foul-mouthed, lower caste eleven-year old who is sold as a wife to a
higher caste "old" (make it early 20s).  His mother is getting old and
needs a housekeeper-slave.  He pays with a rusty bicycle and a skeletal
cow.  This is already a form of rape.
     At her husband's place Phoolan is discriminated against for her
caste and ill-treated.  Immediately after giving her a beating, the
husband, while saying that she "is still not ripe" rapes her.  The rape
motif seems to be Ariadne's thread in the entire story.
     Phoolan runs away to her family.  Several years later the grown-up
woman also escapes from her village where the higher caste headman's
son tried to rape her, beat her up and lied to the village elders.  One
thing leading to another, she comes in contact with the dacoits who
first mock her then accept her.  She becomes the leader's mistress, her
status grows, eventually she is chief.
     Actor-director Kapur has taken many liberties (some of which he
defends on artistic grounds) with the life of Phoolan, including a
marriage which was very different in real life.  Phoolan, now married
to an upper caste man, brought suit against Kapur and tried to have the
film boycotted by festivals.  She settled for a generous (for India)
sum.
     No doubt, much of the film deals with acute discrimination and
ill-treatment of lower castes and of women in general.  But much of
that gets vaporized by the movie's artiness, effective at first, then
becoming artificial.  While it skips songs and dances  BANDIT QUEEN
seems to slow down past the early parts and to get lost in looseness
and vagueness.
     The action, relationships, the passage of time, the geography of
the place, the situations and the characters' purposes are often
unclear, confused and confusing.  You may wonder about the double-faced
high caste fellow who is both in with the bandits but plans their
destruction.  Or, later, about Baba Mustaquim who is apparently a local
Godfather to whom the gang goes for approval of plans.
     The rapes continue.  Phoolan is stripped naked in public.
Violence escalates.  But the movie does not master the building of
tension or suspense.  It lacks tightness and selectivity.  Nor does the
often fine photography avoid excesses, as when some of the agitation at
the Behmai Massacre is shot in dreamy, washed out, slow motion.  Or
when Phoolan in a red bandana recalls Geronimo flicks.  You'd think
that the director had seen too much Sam Peckinpah but was unable to
emulate him.
     Had the film been more neatly made, even as a kind of mythological
Joan of Arc or Robin Hood story--or generally on discrimination and
abuses of human rights--it would have been more convincing.  As it is,
though Phoolan is not really romanticized, we still don't know who she
is, what motivates her, what she thinks, what makes her tick.  The
movie is promising at the start and remains quite watchable, but it
affects you far less than the better, often quiet, intimate,
politically and sociologically committed works of the Indian New Wave.

Title
Review for Chčvre, La (1981)
     The accident-prone daughter of a Parisian tycoon disappears in
Mexico.  Police investigations and those of private eye Gerard
Depardieu fail.  The psychologist of the father's firm suggests sending
back Depardieu with Pierre Richard, a bumbling, klutzy accountant even
more accident-prone than the missing girl.
     The kooky theory is the variant of "set a thief to catch a thief."
It works, but not before a steady series of gags and incidents, some
hilarious and imaginative, all well-timed.  The teaming of the
searchers is inspired.  Richard, in top form, is comically insufferable
as he believes that he is Depardieu's boss.  His stubborn,
absent-minded naivete gets him into impossible situations.  Suffering
Depardieu shows again a genuine talent for farce, but in a different
vein, infinitely more restrained than his outrageous playing in
provocative sex comedies.
     Although comic French cinema does not have the standing of the Big
Three productions (America, England and Italy), for a commercial
product by a non-auteur filmmaker this film is inventive and
fast-paced enough to stand comparison with non-French "comedies
loufoques"(crewball comedies).
     The title means "the goat," like a goat set as wolf-bait.  The
film has excellent subtitles.  It was also written by Francis Veber
who holds a record for Hollywood remakes of his movies.  The remakes
are all inferior to the originals.  Among them Veber's THE TALL BLONDE
MAN WITH ONE BLACK SHOE (also starring Pierre Richard) remade into a
weak comedy with Tom Hanks, THE MAN WITH ONE RED SHOE.  Ten years
after LE CHEVRE came out it was redone as PURE LUCK.  The picture
was directed by Australian Nadia Tass, starred Martin Short and Danny
Glover.  It was awful.

Title
Review for Edtv (1999)
EDtv (1999) ** Directed by Ron Howard. Written by Lowell Ganz and Babaloo
Mandel, based on the Quebecois movie  "Louis XIX: Roi Des Ondes," written
by Emile Gaudreault and Sylvie Bouchard and directed by Michel
Poulette.Photography, John Schwartzman. Editing, Mike Hill  & Dan Hanley.
Production design, Michael Corenblith. Music,  Randy Edelman. Produced by
Brian Grazer and Ron Howard.  Cast: Matthew McConaughey (Ed), Jenna Elfman
(Shari), Woody Harrelson (Ray), Sally  Kirkland (Jeanette), Martin Landau
(Al), Ellen DeGeneres (Cynthia), Rob Reiner (Whitaker), Dennis Hopper
(Hank), Elizabeth Hurley (Jill) et al. A Universal/Imagine release. 120
minutes. PG-13.
There is a temptation to say that EDtv is the poor man's The Truman Show.
But this would be a simplification, except in the sense that Truman was a
more complex and ambitious idea. One might also say that Pleasantville or
the earlier Mad City have some marginal bearing on EDtv, yet the
connections are even more tenuous. And, in case EDtv is thought to be
either an original movie or a derivative film, remember that it is a
remake.
In 1994, Canada (with a big infusion of French funds), released a comedy
whose title, in English, would be Louis the 19th: King of the Airwaves-- a
pun on the kings of France, the last of those named Louis being number18
(reigned 1814-1824).
In the Montreal-shot production, Louis, an employee with a tedious job in a
TV shop, has a   a passion for being in the audiences of TV shows, games
and the like. He wins a contest and is chosen to spend three months being
stalked by cameras night and day --and shown on live TV. This makes of a
nonentity an overnight celebrity. But there is a price to pay, in lack of
privacy and interference by the medium, especially since television and
other people try to spice up   Louis's dull life and run it. So, Louis
retaliates...
The film was a major hit in Canada and, in the Genie awards received the
Calude Jutra Prize. So it is not really "an obscure movie" as the studio
claims. It was re-written with its major premises intact by the team of
Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel. They have done very well on films such as
City Slickers, Mr. Saturday Night, or  A League of their Own. Also in
entertainments directed by Ron Howard: Night Shift, Splash, Gung Ho
(underrated), Parenthood.
I like much of the work of those writers and that director, and I love the
name Babaloo which was, in the 1940s I believe, a very popular song, either
Latin American or a good imitation of the Latino style. (Mr. Mandel's
parents, assuming they chose the name, ought to have received a medal for
courage and for making people smile each time they hear that name!)
In EDtv, the protagonist is Ed, played by Matthew McConaughey with long
facial stubble, as if he couldn't decide whether to shave it or to grow a
real beard. It's rather typical of his other indecisions. Ed, who works in
a San Francisco video store, is a nice, pleasant loser, neither strongly
conscious of this nor noticeably unhappy.
True TV, a two-year old Bay Area cable channel owned by a Mr.Whitaker (Ron
Howard), is going downhill, badly.  Its program director Cynthia Topping
(Ellen DeGeneres) comes up with the plan of following a perfectly ordinary
person's life, on live TV, around the clock, as things happen  or don't
happen. "It's not the Louds. It's not MTV's Real World. There will be no
cript, no editing, no performers."
In the search for a candidate, True Tv films people at random. In a bar,
Ed's older brother Ray (Woody Harrelson) mugs for the cameras, but it is Ed
who gets elected. (Ed sports a beer bottle attached to his neck by a
string. You see the type).
There are minor technical complications as Ed is always followed by three
teams, plus a director inside a large TV truck. Shades of Big Brother,
fixed cameras are all over his house --with one exception, the Sanctum
Sanctorum bathroom. More importantly, loud-mouthed brother Ray who plays
the field, has just cheated on his current girl  Shari (Jenna Elfman), who
delivers for UPS and is also a loser, that is, in her affairs with men.
But now Ed and Shari fall in love --and it's all on millions of TV screen
across the USA.
The plot thickens. The movie alternates between, or combines the actual
EDtv program. This.  of course involves Ed's family and all others around
him; the cameramen, the sound-people, he crowds watching and reacting to
the TV screens, the producers at Real TV... Technically, it's  cleverly
done.
There are good bits and pieces throughout. Amusing television talk-shows
are like Chinese boxes since they are within television which is within the
movie we watch. In the shows  pundits make comments on the EDtv phenomenon.
Among them are Michael Moore, George Plimpton and Bill Maher who make fun
of themselves, and Arianna Huffington who does not. Yet in the medium run,
if not before, some medium-tedium sets in. Those audiences who are like me
and the friends I saw the film with become listless. And even the better
parts get often lost in the overall morass.
A major episode involves ambitious actress Jill (model Elizabeth Hurley)
who puts the make on Ed in order to advance her career. She disappears,
then is hired by True TV to seduce Ed. Throngs jam Jill's street. Ed
succumb and sex begins (but no nudity, no consumation) as the cameras look
on. For all practical purposes, the couple are porno stars, in what may be
the climax (pardon the expression) of the story.
What surfaces sure as shootin' is that we all have our secrets. Ed lives at
home with his brother (who seems to have additional digs), his sister (who
has a funny affair), mama Jeanette (Sally  Kirkland) and his loving, ailing
stepfather Al (Martin Landau) who married Jeanette after the boys'
biological father, no-goodnik  Hank,  ran out. Hank, presumed dead,
suddenly reappears.  Dennis Hopper plays him as a sad sack in a touching,
stretched-out cameo.  This leads to more complications of a farcical or
black-humorous type, with quid pro quos, and secrets and lies revealed,
down to the finish line.
The moral of the film is stridently simple and painfully familiar . No
matter who and what you are, if you get on the tube, you become famous.
Famous means popular.  Popular means admired.
I remember some cases that go back several years. Certain individual had
become famous because of their infamies, and whe later they became
candidates for office (in the Southwest, I believe) they were elected over
normally decent folks.
That the media are corrupt is old news, or that they act as an Invasion of
Body Sntachers. But what the movie tells us too is that the public's taste
is zilch, that the Jerry Springer ethos prevails, that the I.Q. of the
masses is even lower than a sloth's or a lemur's. Since scientists may
dispute this comparison, perhaps I should say a chicken's.
For all its comedic intentions, the picture boils down to illustrating the
triumph of sub-mediocrity . The kind you see when Jay Leno (whose show is
included in the picture) interviews strangers on the street. The kind that
in talk-shows, when the "Applause" sign comes on, makes studio audiences
knee-jerkily obey it.
A positive note. All  performances are first-rate. My favorite
show-stealers are Dennis Hopper and, in his small but ever so ingeniously
humorous part, and Martin Landau who seems to laugh at his own character as
he makes cracks about his impending death.  Ellen DeGeneres is now much
better off out of the closet. She can have roles that mean something.
I would not discourage anyone from seeing this picture, even though its
gratification is merely instant. There's no residue, no aftertaste. You
don't go home thinking about the film. And I doubt that it's among the
pictures you'll want to see again. After all, what EDtv says to us is :
"Hey, movie audiences, you laugh at the idiot public, but this public is
you!"
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Celluloid Closet, The (1995)
THE CELLULOID CLOSET *** 1/2 Produced & directed by Rob Epstein & 
Jeffrey Friedman. Based on the book by Vito Russo. Narration written by 
Armistead Maupin, spoken by Lily Tomlin. Story, Epstein, Friedman & 
Sharon Wood. Editing, Friedman & Arnold Glassman. Photography, Nancy 
Schreiber. Music, Carter Burwell. Produced by HBO, Channel 4, ZDF/arte, 
Brillstein-Gray Entertainment, Hugh Hefner, James C. Hormel & Steve 
Tisch. Released by  Sony Pictures Classics. 102 minutes. Not rated.
"The Celluloid Closet, Homosexuality in the Movies," published in 1981 
and revised in 1987, is still THE book on that huge subject. Its author 
Vito Russo died in 1991, but I feel certain that other specialists will 
pick up the torch, update and expand this seminal work.
The film cannot reproduce the full book, yet it is a most satisfying, 
comprehensive primer, with many interviewees who all have something 
interesting to say, and with clips from 100-plus films.
Thoughtfully, sensitively and quietly --though it certainly would have 
the right to be polemical -- the documentary follows the inclusion, 
exclusion and depiction of gays in cinema.  
In the history of the movies (now 101 years old), homosexuality was for 
a long time rarely seen on the screen. When it was it came either as a 
source of mocking laughter or as an affliction. TCC ("The Celluloid 
Closet"), does a fine job of avoiding procrustean principles, the kind 
that, in works with a cause, often modify facts to make them fit the 
theories.
Oddly, it is only at the beginning of the film that one finds some 
generalizations. In brief 1895 footage by the Edison studios, two men 
are dancing together to the music of a third. (This gets repeated at the 
end of TCC). But the dancing of two same-sex persons does not 
necessarily mean gayness. It is done in boys' and girls' schools, in 
ballrooms, in countryside dances.
Also,"Rebecca's" sinister Mrs. Danvers  did not necessarily feel a 
lesbian attraction to the first Mrs. de Winter. And in "Rebel Without a 
Cause," Sal Mineo clearly play a (perhaps unconsciously) gay kid with a 
crush on James Dean, but the fact that he had Alan Ladd's photo in his 
locker may be stretching the burden of proof. Many a super-straight 
schoolboy has had pictures of male celebrities.
Be it as it may, TCC has ample illustrations of the mockery of gays as 
flamboyant and effeminate, in early films, followed by surrogate gays 
who were shown as sissies, stock characters as offensive today as Stepin 
Fetchit caricatures of blacks or even Eddie "Rochester" Anderson types 
of eye-rolling frightened supporting cast. The sissies included prissy, 
fussbudgetty types, seldom perceived as gay by their public then, but 
now often seen as such by viewers of old movies.
In the 1930s, from Greta Garbo to Marlene Dietrich, lesbianism (or the 
provocative pretense of it) are convincingly shown. Then come the forces 
of Morality attempting to regiment movies -- first in theory only (the 
Hays Office) then through Hollywood's timorous self-censorship, via the 
now infamous Production Code ruled over by its czar Joseph Breen. When 
the new standards classify homosexuality as a sex perversion, gays go, 
so to speak, underground. There are still on the screen, but in 
camouflaged, coded ways. They also become villains, whether as vampires 
or as humans.
Not so oddly, I find that film crypto-gayness has a parallel in the 
movies made in Central Europe in the days of harsh Communist government 
censorship. Many filmmakers managed to skirt restrictions by avoiding 
overt criticism of the State, through the use of allusions, serpentine 
plots, allegories, semi-secret dialogues with knowing audiences. This 
resulted in a Golden Age of Polish, Czech, Hungarian and Yugoslav 
cinemas. 
In the USA the "gay thing" became a battle of wits in which films like 
"Rope" put over homosexual characters that the censors were unaware of. 
As delicious a case as any is related by Gore Vidal who, having a hand 
in the 1959 "Ben-Hur," wanted to improve drama and veracity by making 
Messala (Stephen Boyd) and Ben Hur (Charlton Heston) childhood lovers.  
Director William Wyler balked until it was decided to confide this 
information to Boyd but hide it from prudish Heston. Armed with this 
knowledge, when we now watch the two actors' reunion as adults, the 
scenes become wonderfully funny.
Equally diverting are the scenes from "Pillow Talk" in which Lothario 
Rock Hudson wants to reassure his skittish prey Doris Day by pretending 
to be gay. We have here a gay man impersonating a straight man 
impersonating a gay. 
More serious is the "desperate need" (in the words of gay writer Arthur 
Laurents and others) of the gay audiences of overwhelmingly straight 
movies to find something of themselves, somewhere. "Crumbs" says gay 
author Susie Bright. These were rare, yet supplemented by codes that 
bamboozled producers and censors but were understood by the gays. The 
problem is like those of all minority audiences who have been exposed 
for decades to overwhelmingly Caucasian, Anglo-mainstream, WASP or 
Catholic cinema and saw nothing of themselves on the silver screen. 
Examples abound, some covert, others not, as in "Suddenly Last Summer," 
that overheated and hysterical film. Gays did appear in 1950s and 1960s 
movies, but mostly as tragic, guilt-ridden characters who as often as 
not were fated to die. And even in the more sophisticated 60s and 70s, 
gays continued to be shown as unpalatable, to put it mildly--with some 
exceptions like the British "Sunday, Bloody Sunday."
With relaxation of rules, eventually homosexuality became the last 
screen taboo. This was broken by the 1961 British film "The Victim," 
and, in America, by the landmark "The Boys in the Band" of 1970. The 
breakthrough was followed by "Cabaret" (1972) and more pictures, but 
there was backlash: mostly bad movies in which the gays were grotesquely 
shown, reviled (as "fag, faggot, queer"), roughed up and sometimes 
gunned down with relish.
TCC goes on to the scandalous "Cruising" of 1980, with its gays now 
being victimizing killers and brutes instead of victims. Unless I missed 
it, the film does not mention that the same William Friedkin who had 
directed "The Boys in the Band" ten years earlier was also the director 
of "Cruising." This speaks volumes about "progress" and conscience. TCC 
also omits the fact that by and large gays have been far gentler people 
than straights. At least this is definitely my own take.
Another milestone came in 1982 with the cards-on-the-table "Making Love" 
which, however, made straight audiences extremely uncomfortable as well 
as inimical. Prejudices die hard. They even show when one of the two 
male leads of that film manages, in an interview, to make sure that the 
viewers know that he is straight.
A flashback here. Arguably, after the Code, the first Hollywood film 
with a major, once-gay character (and a gay bar) was Otto Preminger's 
"Advise and Consent" of 1962. Preminger was Mr. Code-Buster. In his  
1944 "Laura" Clifton Webb (as "Waldo Lydecker") is of a peculiar sexual 
nature.  In the 1953 "The Moon is Blue" the forbidden words "seduction" 
and "virginity" were uttered. In the 1955 "The Man With The Golden Arm" 
Preminger introduced drug addiction. In the 1959 "Anatomy of a Murder" 
detailed talk of sex and panties as courtroom evidence broke more 
taboos.
Near the end of TCC, Susie Bright and Susan Sarandon make cogent remarks 
about the non-menacing nature of female couples as opposed to male 
twosomes. They and others also discuss the bowdlerization of films to 
this day. And gay filmmaker Jan Oxenberg, analyzing "Philadelphia" says 
that it was "still a story about a gay hero who dies, who's a tragic 
figure. It remains to be seen whether Hollywood or the general public 
will embrace a film with a gay hero who lives."
It is true that the doors of the celluloid closet have mostly opened in 
films by independent filmmakers rather than from studios. Even so, TCC 
overwhelmingly relies for its examples on studio movies and Hollywood 
ones at that. Yet it is a documentary of major importance. Its subject 
is so compelling and encompassing that I wish the film had been much 
longer than its 102 minutes; that it had also the time to survey the 
experimental movie scene ("Lot in Sodom" 1933, "Scorpio Rising" 1963) 
and the international one. Examples:  "Madchen in Uniform" 1931, and its 
French successor "Olivia," 1951, both by female directors. The British 
"A Taste of Honey" 1961, "Beckett " 1964, The Dresser" 1983. The films 
of the German Fassbinder and the Spaniard Almodovar. The Italian "The 
Damned" 1969, "Death in Venice" 1971, "The Conformist" 1971,  "A Special 
Day" 1977. The French "Going Places" 1974 and "Menage" 1986. The 
Hungarian "Another Way" 1982 and "Colonel  Redl" 1984. The Canadian 
"I've Heard the Mermaids Singing" 1987. The Mexican films by Jaime 
Humberto Hermosillo ("Dona Herlinda and Her Son" 1986). 
Anyone listening? TCC Part II ought to be another winner.

Title
Review for Devil's Own, The (1997)
THE DEVIL'S OWN ** 1/4  Directed by Alan J. Pakula. Written by David Aaron
Cohen, Vincent Patrick, Kevin Jarre. Story by Jarre, Photography, Gordon
Willis. Editing, Tom Rolf, Dennis Wirkler. Production design, Jane Musky.
Music,James Horner. Cast: Harrison Ford, Brad Pitt, Margaret Colin, Ruben
Blades, Treat Williams, George Hearn, Mitchell Ryan, Natascha McElhone,
Paul Ronan, Simon Jones, et al. A Columbia release. 112 min. Rated R
(violence).
How pretty the Irish countryside, how sad Belfast, how cruel the troubles
of Northern Ireland, how disappointing this movie! Yet it begins with one
catchy bang then a sequence with a host of bang bangs.
First, Brad Pitt, as 8-year old Frankie sitting at the dinner table with
his loving family, right after grace witnesses a masked man shooting the
boy's father dead. Years later, in the early 1990s, there's a battle royal
between now grownup Pitt plus other IRA activists -- soldiers  or
terrorists depending on who is speaking-- and British forces in civvies and
uniforms,  armored cars, tanks and helicopters. It's kinetic carnage, deja
vu but well shot (no pun). Pitt escapes through a back door of the housing
area's warren.
Frankie, with almost two dozen killings to his credit, is sent on a mission
to the US where a big sum raised by Irish-American IRA sympathizers  awaits
him. He is to buy missiles and take them back home to blow up British
helicopters.
Bearing a counterfeit passport, Frankie lands at the Newark airport and
goes on by car through cityscapes. These are cold and dreary compared to
the green of Ireland, though the New York skyline impresses the young man.
Posing as "Rory," an immigrant construction worker, Frankie is housed in
the home of Irish-American police Sergeant Tom O'Meara (Harrison Ford) who
has a pretty wife and three pretty daughters. Ford, 54 when the film was
made, may be too long in the tooth for such a young family. That's a minor
point. What his Tom is, is a) a model cop; b) a sweet, non-violent family
man; c) a pacifist; d) not an IRA lover; e) entirely unsuspecting of
"Rory"'s identity; e) as honest as the day is long; f) Harrison Ford who
can still be something of an Indiana Jones when duty calls.
Notes. (a) and (b) are also underlined by Tom's nice behavior when after a
chase on foot he releases a temporary catch. Also by his disgust at
partner-buddy Edwin Diaz (Ruben Blades) for a shooting that was not called
for.  (e) is partly explained by Mrs.Meara being a working mother, and by
the house whose modesty spells Tom's honesty. Had he been a taker of bribes
or "mordidas," Mrs.M might have been a full-time mother and the house
fancier.
We're not talking out and out cliches here, but the next thing to them.
Hollywoodian ideas are floating around: 1) to pair two popular icons,
heroes and hearthrobs, one young,one older,thus spanning all male and
female audience ages; 2) to have the two men bond, the fatherless terrorist
and the son-less cop; 3) to keep Frankie's deception going until the
already bonded men have their confrontation. This begins at minute 77 of
the film.
What we get is three movies in one, coexisting in discomfort: a thriller, a
bond-film (not James) and an anti-violence picture. The latter is rather
heavily stressed in a confirmation sequence where the priest asks youths to
renounce the Devil. Too pat.
The movie had gotten a negative rap in the press, especially when, while it
was shooting, Brad Pitt griped in print about the incoherent, formless
script. He then called it  "the most irresponsible bit of film making -- if
you can even call it that -- that I've ever seen."  Although the PR people
played this down, along with the reported bad blood between Pitt and
Harrison, the fact remains that the movie was being written and rewritten
while it was being shot. This might sometimes be an asset in the hands of
certain independent filmmakers but it is seldom a good sign for studio
pictures
Ah, Hitchcock. Why is it that on a thousand topics discussed, he regularly
comes to mind because of his mastery, and specifically in this case,
because he had his films precisely mapped out before the cameras started
rolling?
"The Devil's Own" ("own" what?) may have good intentions, may have wished
to get into moral and psychological problems. It merely skims them. Its
obligatory elements keep it a prisoner of itself. A short list, not in
chronological order so as not to give away the plot too much:
1) There are several pretty women around. At least they are natural lookers
rather than model-beautiful.
2) There's an awkardly sketched out love affair between Pitt and little--
known Natascha McElhone. Her looks remind  me of Meryl Streep's.
3) There is a mano a mano fight, as in typical Westerns.
4) The obligatory villain is Treat Williams,the seller of the missiles. A
smoothie, he owns three bars. His villainy is telegraphed. By Irish
standards pub owners may be respectable, but by Hollywood standards, bar
owners are often fronts for the underworld -- another cliche.
5) Frankie, who had never been out of Ireland, knows from the start his way
around New York and vicinity better than residents of 20 years know their
way around Kalamazoo.
6) The American shooting scenes (and I mean real firepower) have Pitt most
improbably outgun and vanquish the villain and his henchmen.
7) Even more outrageously, when he does this, Pitt is already on the run,
has managed to get rid of his handcuffs  in a jiffy, to keep an appointment
on time and to make a money-bag explode! If America were to import a bunch
of Frankies, they could cut down our crime rate 50%.
8) Extreme outrageousness. The Stinger missiles are to go to Ireland on a
near-wreck of a tugboat that Sean, Frankie's childhood friend, already in
New York, has been somehow fixing.The two fellows continue to scrape,
restore and refit it. The boat,  the Sean character  and the passage of
time are not explained. Apparently only the two men will be the boat's
crew. With my limited nautical knowledge I can't swear that crossing duo or
solo the Atlantic on a tugboat is out of the question, especially after
Frankie finds himself Sean-less. Yet my feeling is like what Sam Goldwyn
used to say: "This is not only impossible, it cannot be done."
Does all this amount to a bad movie? Oddly, no--just a forgettable one.
Between the charm of Harrison Ford, the appeal (to many) of Brad Pitt, good
performances, fine production values and photography, a nice Irish score
(but when non-Irishy it gets characterless-generic), a few good scenes and
the overall camouflage of defects, this is not a dull, irritating film. But
it isn't good either.

Title
Review for Chacun cherche son chat (1996)
WHEN THE CAT'S AWAY (CHACUN CHERCHE SON CHAT) (France, 1996) *** 1/2
Written and directed by Cedric Klapisch. Photography, Benoit
Delhomme.Editing,Francine Sandberg. Production design, Francois Emmanuelli.
Producers, Aissa Djabri, Farid Lahouassa ,Manuel Munz.Cast: Garance Clavel
(Chloe),  Zinedine Soualem (Jamel), Renee Le Calm (Madame Renee), Olivier
Py (Michel), Rambo (Rambo),  Arapimou (Gris-Gris, the cat), et al .  A Sony
Pictures Classics release. In French with subtitles. 95 minutes. R (sex).
Although it has some suspense, especially for cat devotees, and moments of
sadness, "When the Cat's Away" is first and foremost a Gallic Delight. In
1983-85, writer-director Eric Klapisch, a Parisian, was in New York
University's film school, also worked on short films in the Big Apple. Back
in Paris he was involved in industrial films, documentaries, shorts, made
his own TV documentary on the Masai of Kenya. Four features followed of
which "When the Cat..." is Number Three. It has won several prizes
including the International Critics' Award at the Berlin Film Festival.
"Cat" was planned as a short, the genuine story of a friend who before
leaving on vacation left her cat with an old lady, Madame Renee. When the
young woman returned to Paris, the cat had disappeared. Madame Renee
enlisted many senior citizen friends to help the girl find her feline.
During preliminary work on the short, Klapisch, having "discovered all
these wonderful people" decided to expand the movie into a feature. The
result is a wonderful picture, much of it improvised yet  showing no signs
of the original project having been stretched by force. It is like a short
story that is turned into a really good novel.
Protagonist Chloe is played by Garance Clavel. She had been in just one TV
movie before this. I think that whoever chose her uncommon given name was
propitiating the Gods of Cinema. The magnificent actress known simply as
Arletty had played the unforgettable role of Garance in that classic of
classics, "Children of Paradise" (1945).
Chloe, in her early twenties, is a make-up artist for fashion models being
photographed. The work  is demanding, the bosses are hard task master. She
badly needs a vacation, her first in three years. She lives in the Bastille
neighborhood, a popular area (in the sense of many working class dwellers)
that has been undergoing major upgrades in the last decades. She saves on
rent by sharing a small apartment in a big old building with Michel, a gay
friend.
Any family she may have is not mentioned. Her only relative is her furry
cat Gris-Gris (literally Gray-Gray in French). When someone asks why that
name for a black cat, Chloe does not explain that  Gris-Gris means an
African amulet or fetish. (The film has several connections to Africa, but
like all else, nothing is underlined).
There are no men either in Chloe's private life. The movie does not go into
explanations, such as timidity or lack of opportunities. It's a common fact
that many a person is caught inside singleness which brings solitude and
sadness. Among the many nice aspects of the movie is that Chloe is just an
ordinary person, not especially beautiful though appealing, quiet and very
much alone.
Before she leaves for the sea, she must find someone to take care of the
cat. Her roommate flatly refuses (He's also irritated because he just split
with his current boyfriend). Chloe asks around. In a very French way
everyone has a suggestion. She ends up by leaving Gris-Gris with a neighbor
she did not know existed, a hoarse-voiced little old lady with her own
mini-zoo of cats.
Cut to a single picture of Chloe, alone by the sea, in a flash that
compresses all of the vacation. It is a humorous bit with a melancholy
subtext. It is also a vivid example of skillful, no-nonsense, economical
film editing. All of "Cat"'s techniques are intelligently simple and
ungimmicky. In a later sequence the movie cuts from someone dangling from a
roof to is being safe on the ground. The intervening rescue by firemen is
skipped. This saves production money and eliminates unwanted suspense and
dramatics.
When  Chloe goes to pick up Gris-Gris, a desolate Madame Renee tells her
"Your cat has vanished. Believe me, it's never happened to me before. I
looked all over." The search begins. Some acquaintances and some
strangers-until-now help Chloe with Lost  Kitty posters. She meets Jamel
(Dzhah-MEL), a nice, slow-witted handyman of Arabic parentage. He becomes
her assistant.
Diminutive Madame Renee mobilizes a fascinating, real-life network of older
women. They flood Chloe with advice and suggestions, often make hilarious
phone calls or subject her to solemn, "important" questionnaires.
To say that the search involves picaresque adventures would be hyperbolic.
Mr.Klapisch is working in realistic, not Hollywood-fictional style. To
begin with, the movie's Madame Renee is real. She is the very same person
who had lost the real cat of the real Chloe. Most other characters  are
real people too, not professional actors. The neighborhood is real, the
streets, cafes, shops are real as is the battalion of lady-searchers, all
friends of Madame Renee. So is the commotion about Gris-Gris, Paris being
Cat City. You can't push realism much farther. (Yes, kitty is finally
located).
The movie's catchy English title is misleading, as one might expect it to
develop into a "The Mice Will Play" situation.The French title literally
means "Everyone Is Looking for her/his Cat" but at a deeper level implies
that all people are after something. It could anything: money, love, sex,
the pursuit of happiness and its bluebird. Jamel, for example, though not
ill-treated, can be the butt of some jokes. He needs a friend and finds one
in Chloe.
In her wanderings, Chloe herself meets and discovers new people and places.
It's not always positive, but the possibility of friendships or
relationships is in the air. In the process, along with the young woman we
see and feel the ever-changing face of Paris and society. A giant crane is
demolishing a church. Old buildings are about to be torn down for more
upscale edifices. Tenants are being evicted. Old people are being replaced
by modern, often swinging youth. Familiar pop-and-mom shops are giving way
to impersonal modern facilities. Nostalgic Madame Renee and her cronies
treat us with sweet, often humorous running commentary on the unsettling
changes.
Director Klapisch has assimilated beautifully the populist French cinema of
the 1930s (minus its romantic, fate-driven darkness), the
film-rules-breaking New Wave, the naturalism of today's Young European or
American Cinema. He communicates feelings with sympathy but without
militancy, theatrics, drama, overt sentimentality, or the touristy
picturesqueness of romantic views of Paris. The.local color is unforced.
Klapisch subtly and unraucously evokes the past and the changing times. He
also shows us today's racial mixture in a working class that may not always
live in total harmony but does practice peaceful -- sometimes friendly
--coexistence.
(Note a pun that may reflect the mentality of the filmmakers. The real name
of the cat who plays Gris-Gris is Arapimou. The widely-traveled French
easily pick up foreign words. In Greek, Agapi means Love so that the
expression Agapimou means My Love. Arapi means a black African, which makes
Arapimou mean My Black).
Per a French saying, misfortune has its good side. In this well balanced
movie, a misfortune (the temporary absence of Gris-Gris) leads to a search
that expands Chloe's horizons and will lead to positive changes. On the
street she even eyes repeatedly an unknown young man. By chance, she later
has a quick, happy fling with him. It turns immediately into a downer but
still, the bottom line for Chloe is in her been meeting other people too.
Among them is a previously anonymous neighbor now being evicted. At the
end, Chloe, getting involved in local life, is among those who help the man
move his belongings. Earlier, he had been a sad widower. Now there's a
sudden, discreet yet promising spark between him and Chloe. The last scene
is one of hope as she runs along the streets with a beaming smile on her
face.
"Cat" has excellent English subtitles. Although I find no credits for the
music's organizer, the soundtrack is one of the best, a rich mixture of
genres popular among the French:  U.S. and French rap, salsa, African
songs, rock, a street band, oldies and more. Plus Chopin.

Title
Review for Sling Blade (1996)
SLING BLADE (1996) *** 1/4. Written & directed by Billy Bob Thornton.
Photography, Barry Markowitz. Editing, Hughes Winborne. Production design,
Clark Hunter. Music, Daniel Lanois. Produced by Brandon Rosser & David L.
Bushell. Cast: Billy Bob Thornton, Dwight Yoakam, J.T. Walsh, John Ritter,
Lucas Black, Natalie Canerday, et al. A Miramax release. 135 minutes. Rated
R (language). At the Art.
With a name like Billy Bob as writer, director and star of a movie, you may
expect a bubba picture about good ol' boys. Instead you get something
decidedly anti-drive-in, serious, somber, excellent in concept, direction
and the protagonist's performance. All this was shot for peanuts.
With a title like "Sling Blade," you may expect theater of blood which
could keep many away from the movie-house. Violence, however, is either
recounted in sedate terms or takes place off-screen. Even so, the
suggestive title was a miscalculation.
Thornton, from Malvern, Arkansas, has had supporting roles in several
films. With his childhood friend Tom Epperson he also scripted the
underrated "A Family Thing" and Carl Franklin's superior and quite bloody
"One False Move" in which he has a major part.
"Sling Blade," set and made in Arkansas, is Thornton's debut as director as
well as star. He plays Karl Childers, who, after a 25-year stay at the
Arkansas Hospital for the criminally insane, is released. The opening -- a
two-part introduction admirable in its simplicity --sets the mood.
First we meet Karl, sitting impassively silent and staring into the
distance, as a fellow inmate (J.T.Walsh) babbles on about his sexual
obsessions. Then Karl, the only thing lit in a darkened room (it's like a
parody of a police interrogation) relates for a journalist how, at age 12
he was the mistreated child of a fundamentalist couple. One day, thinking
that his mother was being raped, he killed a man with a sling blade, a sort
of scythe; then realizing that the act was consensual, he dispatched the
woman.
Now asked if he thinks he can kill again, Karl answers in a masterful set
of triple negatives: "I don't reckon I have no reason to kill nobody."
Leaving the hospital with a bundle of books (all he owns -- he had spent
years re-reading the Bible), he returns to his hometown, a wide spot on the
road.
Karl is not all there mentally, but certainly does not deserve to be called
jeeringly "a retard" by the film's heavy. There's sharpness and intuition
about him, along with kindness and strong feelings. All this does not jump
out at you but keeps coming bit by bit.
Karl stands like a figure S, with his head and stomach thrust forward and
his back hunched up. He has the shuffling walk we associate with old movies
where convicts step out of weeks in The Hole (solitary). His jaw juts out,
his lower lip covers the upper one. He speaks little, slowly and
hesitatingly, breathes heavily, grunts and concludes his phrases with
"hmms" and"mmms."
Yet that strange man is a likable being that one might wish to adopt, like
a stray. That's what happens, in a sense. Most people are kind to him. On
his first night of "freedom," Karl, having nowhere to sleep, returns to the
hospital. Regulations forbid his staying there now, so the director takes
him to his own home for a family dinner and a room. The local rurals are
un-fussily decent too. It helps that Karl is a whiz at fixing small
engines, like lawn mowers. This gets him a modest job in a garage and gains
the respect of many.
Frank makes friends with young Frankie (Lucas Black). The boy's widowed
mother, Linda (Natalie Canerday), works at the local Dollar Store whose
discreetly gay manager is Linda and Frank's best friend.(He is played with
economy by John Ritter, in the most sensitive part I can remember him in).
The cast of dramatis personae is small. The principal ones are essentially
supporting characters to Karl. They are rounded up by  Doyle (country
singer Dwight Yoakam, impressively loutish), Linda's lover. A heavy
drinker, he is constantly and disgustingly abusive of the fatherless Frank
and nasty to Linda, yet he spends most his time in Linda's small house
where he acts in insufferably dictatorial ways. A local fellow is right
when he warns Karl that Doyle is a monster. Why the nice woman puts up with
the monster is inexplicable, unless this indicates a major shortage of
males in the area.
Young Frank soon talks his mother into letting Karl sleep in their garage.
Soon he becomes something like a member of his hosts' small circle --which
does not include Doyle. Only near the end of the film  it became clear to
me that Doyle was a construction worker. A nice bit of irony, since he is
such a destructive man.
>From the start Doyle insults, and jibes at, Karl. He does the same,
however, for his pals. Later, after a fit of violence that resulted in
Linda kicking him out, Doyle returns with apologies. "Well, he's trying,
but God knows for how long" she declares. Frank is more clear-eyed : "He's
lying. I'm not stupid." Sure enough, Doyle proposes marriage  but sets to
Frank conditions worthy of a savage prison guard -- and he wants Karl out
too.
The movie's pace is slow, but none of its scenes is protracted. Whether or
not it would gain by getting trimmed down is something that I cannot decide
on a single viewing. It seems to me, though, that since this is no
ordinary, plot-and-action film but a character driven work, its emphasis on
Karl does make the tempo fit the man's slowness.What is needed from the
audience is that they adopt the old rhythm of a rural South.
Slowness does not mean boredom. There are enough bits of local color and
people's traits to supply threads of realism and unforced humor. Like Karl
diagnosing a sick engine as lacking gasoline. Like Karl and his passion for
french fries. Like the rapport between the two outcasts, the gay man in a
tiny town and Karl. Like a rotund colleague of Linda's, the  Employee of
the Month,who complains about all shoes and brings Karl a bunch of
flowers:"They're not fresh, they're a special at $2.99 plus my 10 %
employee discount."
There is much I will not detail about this film, most of it positive. (Look
for Jim Jarmusch and Robert Duvall in unexpected short appearances).
While the outcome is rather predictable, Karl's part is especially well
done, all the more so since Mr.Thornton had the very difficult task of
directing the movie, directing himself and probably doing daily rewrites.
Inevitably, Thornton-the-actor will bring up the acting of Geoffrey Rush,
the mature David Helfgott in "Shine." It is a pity, especially at
Oscar-time, to have to compare two tour-de-force performances at the
extremes of the spectrum -- apples and oranges: one minimalist, the other
wildly eccentric.
Noticeable in "Sling Blade" is the strategy to keep the visuals underlit,
plain and not colorful. This may be taken too far, too systematically. It
applies to sunny outdoor shots where the characters are often in the shady
part of the image, yet not even lit by reflectors.
The photography uses mostly natural light,but there are times when the
crypt-like darkness of interiors made me think that electricity was
rationed in that part of Arkansas. This causes problems, such as hardly
ever allowing us to get a good look at Linda's face. But no matter.In
ambience, description and speech the film feels authentic. And the last
line is a classic, on a par with the last words of Paul Muni ( "I steal")
in the 1932 "I Am A Fugitive From A Chain Gang." Here, back at the
hospital, asked by his pal how he found the outside world, Karl
replies:"It's too big."
In "The Autobiography of Gertrude Stein" by Alice B. Toklas,  Ms. Stein
says (and I quote from memory) "I always prefer the normal to the abnormal;
it is so much more complex and interesting." Right she is, yet  what  films
like "Sling Blade" and "Shine" have achieved is to make the abnormal as
interesting as the normal.

Title
Review for Experiment Perilous (1944)
EXPERIMENT PERILOUS (1944) Directed by Jacques Tourneur.
Screenplay by Warren Duff from a novel by Margaret Carpenter.
Photography by Tony Gaudio. Sets by Darrel Silvera & Claude
Carpenter. Music by Roy Webb. Produced by Warren Duff for RKO.
Cast: Hedy Lamarr, George Brent, Paul Lukas, Albert Dekker,
Carl Esmond, Olive Blakeney, George N. Neise, Margaret
Wycherly, et al. 91 minutes.
A mix of thrills, psychology and pathology. In 1903, Doctor
George Brent meets a friendly older lady in train. She tells
him that she is going to visit her brother Lukas and his
lovely young wife Lamarr. In New York Brent hears that his
train companion suddenly died. He meets Lamarr-Lukas, gets
suspicious of Lukas's treatment of his wife and his trying to
pass her for crazy. A mixup in bags reveals the diary of the
deceased lady, confirms Brent's doubts. He tries to save
Lamarr, whom he now loves.
Semi-oddly, Lukas had married the young girl knowing she was
not in love with him. Before this, he improbably took her to
Europe to educate her and place her in social whirl. Now, in
New York he becomes obsessed with jealousy for Lamarr and a
young writer who is openly crazy about her, kills the young
man and would do the same to Brent and Lamarr were it not for
Brent's sleuthing.
Albert Dekker, as Brent's bohemian artist pal, and other
supporting roles, are well played. The film is solidly
directed by Jacques Tourneur who graduated from B movies (most
of them much admired today) to A features with this picture.
The movie is nicely atmospheric, with fine, moody photography
and production design, as well as a good "haunted place" music
score It is none too convincing however. The execution is
superior to the plot, which  includes improbabilities and 
holes.
Paul Lukas, who played, sometimes with commendable reserve,
sometimes with obvious dramatics, both heroes and sinister
types, is over-villainous here. Hedy Lamarr, as gorgeous an
actress as ever graced the silver screen, was never very
talented, had very limited expressions. The casting of Lamarr
with relatively inexpressive George Brent (who, however, was
talented, likable and did well in his many roles) is peculiar.
The result is that Lukas overplays, Lamarr underplays but
Brent is just right. This neo-gothic drama reminds one many
movie melodramas, in particular "Gaslight", made in England in
1939 and remade in the U.S. in 1944.  (Edwin Jahiel)

Title
Review for Fearless (1993)
FEARLESS  (1993) ** 3/4  Directed by Peter Weir. Screenplay by Rafael
Yglesias, based on his novel. Photography, Allen Daviau. Production design,
John Stoddart. Editing, William Anderson. Music, Maurice Jarre. Cast: Jeff
Bridges, Isabella Rossellini, Rosie Perez, Tom Hulce, John Turturro, et al.
A Warner Bros. release. 121 minutes. Rated R (Language, violent accidents).
"Fear no more the heat o' th' sun,/ Nor the furious winter rages;/Thou thy
wordly task has done,/Home art gone, and ta'en thy wages./Golden lads and
girls all must,/As chimney-sweepers, come to dust."
Did that song from Shakespeare's "Cymbeline" lurk in the mind of  Rafael
Yglesias when he wrote the novel "Fearless" and later the movie's script
(his first)?
Max Klein (Jeff Bridges), the protagonist (and literally, hero) of
Yglesias, undergoes a  sea-change in the air. In a plane that is about to
crash, Max who normally suffers from fear of flying, suddenly thinks of his
death, becomes strangely detached, and in a state of quasi-Nirvana helps a
young boy.
This is shown later in the film, as one of its flashbacks. "Fearless"
actually begins with the wrecked plane on the ground, rescue operations and
Max calmly saving a number of passengers. One of the desperate victims is
Carla (Rosie Perez) whose baby was killed.
Mission accomplished, Max walks away and rents a car. Experiencing euphoria
he finds joie de vivre in the machine, the road, the flamenco music on the
radio, the fresh air.
He stops by the house of a friend not seen for 20 years. He takes her to a
pancake restaurant, bites with rapture and impunity into strawberries, a
fruit deadly to his allergies but now a blissful symbol of Max's rebirth. .
The tone shifts to shrewd irony when the vanished Max is tracked down by
the F.B.I. A lady from the airline, using euphemisms that avoid the C-word
("crash") nervously offers Max a train ticket to his home in San Francisco.
But the smiling man wants to fly back, first class.
Up to this point all the sequences are brilliantly conceived and conducted.
But when Max "The Good Samaritan" returns to his city, the tone becomes
increasingly solemn and soulful. Max, having in his mind gone through
death, has acquired a sense of immortality and invulnerability.  As in
Shakespeare's song he fears nothing any more. But unlike it, he has not
come to dust.
As played by Jeff Bridges, Max is both a strong physical presence and
someone who isn't there. In a sort of trance that new to the movies, he is
weirdly detached from his wife Laura (Isabella Rossellini), his son and
from life as he, Max, once knew it.  Yet now he knows "the taste, the joy,
the feeling of life."
Is he crazy? Is he like one of those medieval "illuminati"? Is he a holy
innocent? Is he in a state of grace?
Max will pay no heed to the airline psychiatrist (the oddly cast John
Turturro) who wants to help him get well, or to an ambulance-chasing lawyer
(the amusing Tom Hulce) who wants to help him get rich through lawsuits.
Yet when three months later Turturro tries novel therapy by bringing
together Max and near-catatonic Carla, it works.
Charismatic Max slowly overcomes Carla's resistance to consolation. There
is powerful love between this overly disparate duo, he a chic architect,
she lower-class with a vengeance. But this love is not as in "to fall in
love" --which is how Laura interprets it. It is love in an ineffable,
mystical sense.
There's a great deal more, which I will not attempt to describe. And which,
for me,  does not live up to the great expectations of the start, or to the
hope that director Peter Weir would recapture the magic, mystery and
mysticism of his early Australian films "Picnic At Hanging Rock" and "The
Last Wave."
What bothers me in "Fearless" is that rather than form following  function,
too often form seems to mold function, By form I mean the performances and
the visuals, and by function, the meaning of Bridges's peculiar behavior.
This strategy leads to conceits, preciosity and mannerisms. It leads to
some silliness which we are supposed to read as "existential" depth, as in
the Christmas shopping sequence and later the speeding Volvo. It also leads
to our getting nudged by an oversupply of symbols.
Max's being an architect is a cliche for building and rebuilding anything
from souls to societies. The symbol can be used delicately (Eiji Okada in
"Hiroshima, Mon Amour") or heavily (Gary Cooper in the pretentious "The
Fountainhead").  The very name Max Klein pointedly combines "maximum" and
"small" ("klein" in German). Max comes out of the wreck unscathed save for
a Christ-on-the-Cross wound, which matches some Christ-like declarations.
The name-tag on the waitress who serves him strawberries says "Faith."
Laura teaches ballet to children, welcomes visiting Turturro as the kids
dance around "flying." And on and on.
One twist of the movie is to present us with the sad and familiar
survivor's guilt (Carla) and its counterforce, survivor's non-guilt (Max).
But this is murkily developed, as is the oversimplified rapport between
Carla and Max.
Rosie Perez also grates while her speech is often incomprehensible . As for
Max's state of grace, it cannot hold a candle to the classic "A Condemned
Man Escaped" the utterly simple gem by "transcendental" Catholic director
Robert Bresson, a film that ends with an immensely moving "All is Grace."
"Fearless" stays too much on the same level. There are striking parts in
it, but the whole did not involve me emotionally or intellectually. The
film works well pictorially. It has the best shot and edited plane crash
since   1992's "Hero," a movie which curiously enough, used another Good
Samaritan, but to satirical ends. Even more impressive, because it is so
subtle, is the image of Max on a roof-terrace photographed like an Edward
Hopper painting.

Title
Review for Where the Money Is (2000)
WHERE THE MONEY IS ***  Directed by Marek Kanievska. Written by E.Max 
Frye, Topper Lilien and Carroll Cartwright, based on a story by Frye. 
Photography, Thomas Burstyn. Editing,  Sam Craven, Garth Craven and 
Dan Lebental. Production design, Andre Chamberland. Music, Mark 
Isham. Produced by Ridley Scott, Charles Weinstock, Chris Zarpas and 
Christopher Dorr. Cast: Paul Newman (Henry), Linda Fiorentino 
(Carol), Dermot Mulroney (Wayne), Susan Barnes ( Foster),  Anne 
Pitoniak ( Tetlow), et al. A USA Films/Grammercy release. 89 minutes. 
PG-13 (language, hints of sex)
Points earned. For likelihood of plot *1/2  For interest of subject 
** For unpretentiousness ***. For Linda Fiorentino *** 1/2.  For Paul 
Newman ****  Bonus points: we at BBNMM (Bring Back the Ninety Minute 
Movie) commend the film.
Its title is the famous quote attributed to robber Willie Sutton 
(1901-1980) when he was asked why he robbed banks. "Because that's 
where the money is." In reality, Willie (also known as Willie the 
Actor for his disguises) never said it. Unlike Yogi Bera, he did not 
leave a legacy of other quotes. But the apocryphal reply has been 
used time and again in wildly different cicumstances.
London-born director Marek Kanievska , has just two previously 
released features. "Another Country "(UK, 1984) comes from a 
prize-winning London play about with public schools (private schools 
in American parlance) in the 1930s, homosexuality, non-conformism, 
the real-life defection of Brits to the USSR. It was nominated for 
Best Picture at the 1984 Cannes Film Festival.
"Less Than Zero" (USA, 1987) was very distantly adapted from the 
Brett Easton Ellis novel on golden youths and their dissipation. A 
peculiar coincidence: The film of Ellis's controversial novel 
"American Psycho" came out the same week as "Where the Money Is."
The skeleton of the story. Carol (Fiorentino) is a nurse in an old 
people's home in the Oregon sticks. (The town is played by areas of 
Montreal). She is sharp, lively and by now somehow aware that there's 
more to life than her job and that there ought to be more in her 
marriage with her high school sweetheart , unambitious Wayne 
(Mulrooney)
A prison bus delivers to the sanitarium chronic bank robber Henry 
(Newman) who has had a stroke. In his wheelchair, he is like a 
near-paralyzed vegetable. Carol, however, instinctively suspects that 
he is a fraud. She tries all sorts of tricks --including sexual ones 
-- to unmask him. In vain.
Eventually though,  she succeeds. Shakespeare wrote "Out of this 
nettle, danger, we pluck this flower, safety" (Henry IV). Carol, out 
of Henry's catatonia plucks a vigorous, smart, still glamorous and 
sexy man. The purpose of his tour-de-force act as the total invalid 
is a transfer to a place which is easy to escape from.
Now being himself and laying his cards on the table, Henry, 
authoritative. suave and charming flirts and dances with Carol. She 
is not unaffected. He regales the couple with the theory and practice 
of heists. Inevitably, the patient, his nurse, and the reluctant 
husband plan a Brinks-type robbery. It nets them an armored vehicle 
and guard uniforms. The two men impersonate the money-collectors. 
Carol operates the communications system with admirable presence of 
mind.
The first part of the film is cool, laid back like Newman, and most 
unhurried. It is pleasant for the viewers to have time to watch 
developments, catch nuances and not be pushed around by the story
The second part is a savory cocktail of comedy, near-farce and 
suspense. In "their" armored car, the trio follow the scheduled 
route. Improbabilites are numerous, but the sleight-of-hand of 
script, direction and production make you forget all about disbelief 
and the suspension thereof. The suspense  comes from the steady 
changes of venues, each with its own problems and solutions. There 
are echoes of some earlier Paul Newman roles.. There might also be a 
tongue-in-cheek homage to such heist movies as Stanley Kubrick's 
early "The Killing." The genre has longevity. So do several 
pleasantly immoral films which make us root for likable rogues and 
thieves.
Paul Newman is the colorful, masterful glue that keeps things 
sticking together. By the way, he is 73 and not 75  here.The picture 
was made in  1998. Why its release was delayed for two years baffles 
me.
Newman is astonishing. Any signs of the occasional callowness of his 
youth have disppeared of course. He is, however, vibrant with 
youthfulness, energy, humor, self-control, self-confidence and 
wisdom. Still a four-star charmer.
Linda Fiorentino is also an umitigated source of joy. I cannot tell 
why exactly, but at least twice I felt that she looked like Lauren 
Bacall, perhaps because of a combination of gutsiness, initiative 
and.smarts. She is such a fast learner that anyone who has ever 
taught a class would give anything to have students like her.
The plot's movie-movie dialogue snaps and crackles. Carol cuts her 
robber teeth on her own. She gets from a small bank a bonus 
toaster-oven without opening the necessary account. Disapproving 
Henry throws it in a lake. The imperturbable lady's reaction: "It 
says you're not supposed to immerse it in water!"  Or Henry to Wayne 
who will case a joint: "Look at them in the eye. But not like you're 
going to remember their faces."
There are more small pearls of this order. They help raise the film 
from light entertainment to a solid "divertimento."
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Exorcist, The (1973)
THE EXORCIST  (1973) (new cut, 2000) ** 3/4 . Directed by William 
Friedkin. Written and produced by William Peter Blatty, from his 
novel. Photography, Owen Roizman. Editing, Norman Gay, Jordan 
Leondopoulos, Evan Lottman, Bud Smith. Production design, Bill
Malley. Music, Jack Nitzsche, Mike Oldfield ("Tubular Bells").  Cast: 
Ellen Burstyn (Chris McNeil), Jason Miller (Father Karras), Max Von 
Sydow (Father Merrin), Linda Blair (Regan McNeil),  Lee J. Cobb (Lt. 
Kinderman), Kitty Winn (Sharon), Jack MacGowran (Burke), Vasiliki 
Maliaros (Karras's mother), Mercedes McCambridge (Regan's satanic 
voice), et al.  A Warners release. 132 minutes. R (obscenities, 
upsetting images.)
The film was a mega-hit in 1973, and is no doubt the best of the 
Exorcist films that followed. Now it is reissued with some extra 
11-12 minutes taken from footage that was not included in the 1973 
release. (The never-shown preliminary version ran about 139 minutes.) 
Primarily, restores some extremely coarse language by Regan (Blair) 
who was already plenty foulmouthed in the 1973 release. It also 
contains a gratuitous, wrong, mood-killing, "humorous" scene at the 
very end.
The mono soundtrack of this 27-year old work has been skillfully 
turned into stereo --which adds something to the movie. But the 
sounds of at least one scene (Burstyn and Miller talk while unseen 
kids make noises) come out of the side speakers artificially.
The film's admirers were and still are legion. I was not a big fan 
then, I am not now. Yet, though I realize that this "enhanced" 
reissue is caused by filthy lucre, I am glad to see revivals on the 
big screen finding a new public. There's another bonus too. Alongside 
awful movies for cable TV, the proliferation of multiplexes also 
encourages much junk to be shown in theaters. So, we may assume that 
whenever an oldie significant for any reasons  is resuscitated on the 
big screen, it takes the place of some lamentable new item.
Except for older persons, too many vintage picturesare "terra 
incognita." For those titles, videos, laser disks or DVDs do fill a 
gap, but this is not as important as having  "true" projection.
Most film-viewers know that "The Exorcist" is about 12-year old 
Regan, the daughter of divorced movie actress Chris.  The girl 
becomes possessed by the (or a) devil, does horrible things and looks 
horrible too. Tentative medical diagnoses settle on a lesion of the 
temporal lobe. Surgeries (most graphic!) do not help. Matters go from 
bad to worse. Exorcism is suggested. It is performed by youngish 
Catholic priest Father Karras (Jason Miller in his film debut) and 
the experienced, older Father Merrin (Max Von Sydow).
The opening, set in Northern Iraq, is splendid.  From a minaret, a 
muezzin calls the faithful to their hourly prayers. In a large 
archaeological dig, discoveries are made. Father Merrin ( in 
civvies), frail of health and serious of mien, is involved. Iraqi 
places and people are shown  creatively, not as touristic sights but 
as atmospheric sites. This footage,   shot on location in Iraq, sets 
a very special mood.
The story shifts to the USA where it becomes a novel type of horror 
movie. To this day, a great many spectators claim that it is the 
scariest film ever made. That's where I part ways with them --no 
doubt because I do not scare easily in most movies of that genre.
I am affected by well-made "horror" films that suggest rather than 
depict, where the horror is more implicit than explicit. Of course, 
sometimes a literal kind of horror does work but it leaves no residue 
as a general rule. Let me me put it this way, with some examples off 
the top of my head.
"The Cat People," "The Invasion of the Body-Snatchers" (both 
versions,),"The Night of the Hunter," "Rosemary's Baby," and such, 
are much more chilling than any "Alien" or "Aliens" or most special 
effects movies. "Psycho" and "Blade Runner, so different from each 
other, in spite of some explicitnessfactual get their main impact 
from powerful atmospheres. And so on.
Even more frightening are movies in other categories that are not 
specifically labeled as horror. These range from  sociological works 
to political fictions, semi-fictions or documentaries. And they can 
show super-horror, as in the factual "Night and Fog" which deals with 
WWII deportations and extermination (genocide) camps. There are so 
many true horror works that fiction pales before reality. Man's 
inhumanity to man, the abomination of wars, terrorism, neglected or 
forgotten humans, injustices, inequities, and much else grip you in 
(at random) "The Grapes of Wrath," " I Am a Fugitive From a Chain 
Gang," and many more.
Two recent examples I caught on TV. A new German documentary on how 
the Nazis brainwashed Hitler Youths, then turned them into 
kid-soldiers (as young as 12) whom they sacrificed in vain. That's 
true horror. I also saw for the fifth time "Memphis Belle," that 
heart-rending documentary about true heroes, young airmen of the 8th 
US Army Air Force who, in WWII, bombed Germany over and over, and had 
a horrendous rate of attrition.
Of course, there are exceptions to the exceptions, meaning literal 
scenes that horrify. In my own case, this goes back to the the very 
first feature I ever saw.  It was a scene in a reissue of the old 
"Trader Horn," one of the first movies ever shot mostly in Darkest 
Africa. A native porter falls off a liana bridge to the river below 
and is killed by a crocodile. I had nightmares for months.
Back to "The Exorcist."  I am tepid about it not only because every 
horror is spelled out but because the story is unconvincing, 
arbitrary and has weak connections between its component parts. I 
don't believe in devils either--other than human -- or in 
telekinesis, levitation, etc. But I do confess that after its 1973 
screening I avoide green pea soup for weeks. And, to be fair, the 
special effects, while seeking sensationalism and cheap thrills, 
remain impressive.
In 1973, Pauline Kael, the then monarch of reviewers,  wrote: "The 
demonic possession of a child is treated with shallow seriousness. 
The picture is designed to scare people and does so by mechanical 
means." I add to this that there seems to be no real pity for Regan's 
giga-predicament, while there was for King Kong, for the victims of 
Dr. Moreau or Count Dracula.
Lastly, there are too many unexplained matters and loose ends. A 
minor case occurs when Chris, hearing weird noises, explores her 
attic by the light of a candle. (This goes against my belief that 
everyone involved incertain situations should carry a lighter, a 
flashlight and a Swiss Army knife.) Or else the peculiar fact that 
movie actress Chris seems to be living permanently in Georgetown 
rather than in Los Angeles or New York. I may have missed something.
A major puzzle concerns Father Karras, this "sacerdote de la triste 
figura." He is very clearly of Greek descent. His mother speaks 
perfect Greek, with a genuine accent.  She is played by Vasiliki 
Maliaros, a totally Greek name. (I have found no other credit for 
her). But then, how and why did Karras get into Roman Catholicism, 
since  practically all Greeks are hard-core Orthodox Christians?
All things and flaws considered however, the film is worth seeing, 
but more for its sensationalism rather than its logic or feelings.

Title
Review for Apostle, The (1997)
THE APOSTLE (1997) *** Written, directed, executive produced by Robert
Duvall. Photography, Barry Markowitz. Production design, Linda Burton,
Editing, Steve Mack. Music, David Mansfield. Cast: Robert Duvall, Farrah
Fawcett, Miranda Richardson, Tod Allen, John Beasley, June Carter Cash,
Walter Goggins, Billy Joe Shaver, Billy Bob Thornton, Rick Dial, Mary
Lynette Braxton, Zelma Lloyd, Sister Jewell Jernigan. Released by October
Films. 133 minutes. Rated R (some violence, marital unfaithfulness).
Robert Duvall tried for 13 years to pitch his creation, "The Apostle." In
vain. Hollywood not being Holy Wood, cautiously stays away from "deep"
movies about religion, except for many Biblical epics, the life of Jesus
(such as the underrated 1961 King of Kings) and "safe" historical movies
(e.g. A Man for All Seasons). Babylon-on-the Pacific has produced a few,
also safe films, about phony evangelists (Elmer Gantry, Marjoe and Leap of
Faith come to mind) and the classic The Night of the Hunter with its
demented killer-thief fake preacher.
Abroad, meaningful films that deal with faith, its problems, crises and
quandaries, do not abound but do exist --by Ingmar Bergman (several),
Robert Bresson (Diary of a Country Priest, A Man Escaped).Carl-Theodor
Dreyer (The Passion of Joan of Arc, Ordet). Or the "political" A Man for
All Seasons, or else Becket, taken from the Jean Anouilh play Becket or The
Honor of God.
Finally, Duvall had to finance The Apostle himself. There's a catch with
this film. Religion is not its soul. The film is a showpiece for Robert
Duvall, at about age  66. Does he need this? He is an all-time great. In
34 years (his debut was as Boo Radley in To Kill a Mockingbird) and in all
of his 75 movies, he showed extraordinary talent  and versatility. At a
rock-bottom minimum he should be remembered for THX 1138, Mash, the
Godfather, the Great Santini, Apocalypse Now, True Confessions, Tender
Mercies, Lonesome Dove, Wrestling Ernest Hemingway, Sling Blade.
In The Apostle he plays (and plays, and plays) "Sonny" Dewey, a wild and
woolly Texas Pentecostal evangelist (since childhood), with wife and
children. He has genuine faith, devotion, love for God and His creatures,
but he is flawed by his temper and his womanizing.
Duvall's affection for his subject leads him into mysterious paths. In the
opening sequence Sonny and his mother stumble onto a terrible car accident.
With amazing eloquence the preacher proceeds to "save" willy-nilly a
still-alive victim, then  prides himself for scoring points with the
Almighty. Soon after come "then" --colorful preaching when Sonny was a boy
-- and "now": spectacles of revivalism, crowds, testimonials from the
stage, people (including Sonny) shouting, singing, dancing, prancing,
bouncing. Whether  planned that way or not, this comes out  as ambiguous
(is Sonny a faker?) and as an ironic look at a certain slice of Americana.
There is even a shot of mass arm-raisings by the faithful that recalls Nazi
or Soviet salutes.
Confusing too is the status of Sonny and his wife Jessie (Farrah Fawcett).
He loves yet neglects her as he puts his preaching first. He makes no bones
about his infidelities. Jessie has taken a lover, Horace (Todd Allen) a
young preacher junior in rank to Sonny. Jessie leaves Sonny. She is seen in
bed with Horace -- openly?  in a small town? there's something implausible
here. (Some fellow-viewers thought that Jessie had divorced Sonny, others
that she was already married to Horace, etc.)
In another bitter pill, Sonny learns that he has been deposed as leader of
his church by the trickery of Jessie and Horace. He becomes violent. Soon
after, when he finds "his beauties" (his boy and girl), playing softball
with other kids, plus Jessie and Horace, he totally loses control, smashes
Horace's head with a bat, leaves him moribund.
Suddenly, keeping a oddly cool composure, Sonny leaves town in his car. He
ditches it in a stream and eventually makes his way to the small,
predominantly black town  of Bayou Boutte, Louisiana. His energy is
literally incredible. He makes quick decisions, gets an instant job as  a
mechanic (he knows everything about cars), contacts aged black preacher
Brother Blackwell (John Beasley) who had retired after two heart attacks,
talks him into reopening a derelict church that belongs to the Brother,
renovates it with the help of others  (you expect him to say :"I coulda
been a contractor"), restores a wreck of a school bus, does regular
programs on the local radio, baptizes the cleaned up church "One Way Road
to Heaven," gets an increasingly large (considering the small population)
congregation,  fires away with his preaching. Whew!
In Louisiana, Sonny changes his name to The Apostle E.F.,  which is pretty
immodest and hubristic. The point of all  this is supposed to be that
fugitive Sonny is seeking redemption, but  seemingly only for his attack on
Horace, since other sins are not mentioned. Certainly not promiscuity, as
the Apostle also starts fascinating and seducing Toosie, the radio
station's secretary. She is played by Briton Miranda Richardson sporting a
credible accent and looking rather anorexically thin (The affair-to-be is
not consummated).
What motivates Sonny must really be powerful compulsion to preach and
organize. The sin that only whispers its name, yet of which Sonny seems
unconscious, is megalomania, ego-tripping. It is also the sin of actor
Duvall who is  so taken with his own performance and with he character he
plays that he does not know (as a writer-director) where to draw the line.
The movie is Duvall/Sonny from A to Z  for  its long duration, 133 minutes
( 7,980 seconds). There is so much of Sonny that it robs the picture of
opportunities to flesh out any other character.
Duvall's performance is anti-Consigliere. I refer to his famous role of
advisor (Consigliere) to Marlon Brando in The Godfather. As Tom Hagen, the
single non-Sicilian-American of the "family," he was a strong, quiet
presence. Here, as a strong but voluble presence, Duvall gives himself the
only role that matters while letting some other elements of the movie,
including continuity and editing,  fall where they may.
In Apocalypse Now, Duvall's  Lt. Col. Kilgore had the unforgettable line "I
love the smell of napalm in the morning! "  In The Apostle it feels as
though he's thinking "I love the sound of me around the clock!"  That he is
superb at whatever he does is a given. But enough is enough.
On the other hand, this work that drips with colorful Americana, by virtue
of its nature and locations is gratifyingly color blind and not class
conscious. There is no racism  except when redneck Billy Bob Thornton gets
into a fight with Duvall. But soon Duvall' s powers of persuasion will tame
Billly Bob. Bibles used physically, plus Gandhian non-violent exhortations,
make him end up lacrymously embracing Duvall. This is a strong sequence --
but it does smack of Hollywoodist theatricality.
The overall concentration on religiosity (not religion) and on Sonny go on
and on to the point of making some viewers count the minutes. Still, the
tour-de-force performance by the master actor does sustain the film and is
undeniably impressive.

Title
Review for Home for the Holidays (1995)
*
Directed and co-produced by Jodie Foster.
Written by W.  D.  Richter.
Cast: Holly Hunter, Robert Downey, Jr., Anne Bancroft, Dylan McDermott,
      Charles Durning, Geraldine Chaplin, Steve Guttenberg, Claire Danes,
      Cynthia Stevenson.
Distributed by Paramount and Polygram.
     The title "Home for the Holidays" suggests either a feel-good
story, a family drama or a comedy, but guesses can be wrong.  There was
a made-for-TV movie with that title in 1972 which turned out to be a
Christmastime thriller.  Now, the current film's distributors have
announced it as a comedy, but this description will do only if you
stretch it.
     Claudia (Holly Hunter) just lost her job as an art restorer at a
museum.  (You wait a long time to find out that the museum is in
Chicago.)  With some trepidation, Claudia leaves behind her
sixteen-year old daughter (we later learn in passing that Hunter is
unmarried) and flies to another state to spend Thanksgiving with her
parents. (You wait a long time to find out that it is Maryland.  If
your eyes are peeled, you might catch the sign "Maryland Lottery.")
     The opening sequence tries for screwball comedy style, but it is
only slightly weird and far from hilarious.  Soon the film goes into
fast decline, in a structure that is a succession of sections, each
with its title.
     "Flying" is followed by "Mom and Dad."  Mom is Anne Bancroft, nee
Anna Maria Luisa Italiano, one of the very few Catholics who can do a
Jewish Mother turn, which she sort of does here.  Perhaps husband Mel
Brooks is of help.
     Dad (Charles Durning) is a retired something or other employee of
an airline or of the Baltimore airport. (This is made clear only at the
end.)  He is a kind of putterer now.
     Pa and Ma are eccentrics, sort of, but uninteresting as
individuals and as a couple.  If you remember Bancroft as the famously
seductive Mrs. Robinson in 1967 THE GRADUATE, you can now see her in
bra and slip.  She may be showing us how well kept she is at 64, but
her talent does not show in HOME FOR THE HOLIDAYS.
     The next chapter, "Company," centers mostly around Claudia's
brother Tommy (Robert Downey, Jr.).  Tommy is gay, but you can't tell.
You learn it only when you hear that "he has broken with Jack."  On the
other hand, Tommy is relentlessly gay in the old sense, ebullient,
bouncy and far, far too cute.  You feel right away that Downey is
uncomfortable in, and unconvinced by his role.  He arrives from Boston
with Leo Fish (Dylan McDermott) whom everybody takes for a new lover.
     Each section has Claudia in it but is normally focused on one or
two additional characters.  In "Relatives" we meet Mom's unmarried
sister, retired schoolteacher Geraldine Chaplin.  She too is an
eccentric, unconvincing and unconvinced.  Her closeups are cruel.
Someone flatulates.  There's an in-joke: a furnace repairman works for
"The Big Heat" Company, a reference to a classic film noir.
     In "More Relatives," we meet Claudia's younger sister Joanna, her
sententious husband Walter (Steve Guttenberg) and their two kids.  The
house becomes a zoo of agitation and hyperactivity, forced and seldom
funny.  Only the cat is normal.
     Next, "The Dinner" reveals that Tommy had married Jack some time
ago.  Joanna calls Tommy a freak.  He keeps his good mood but overacts
again.  By accident, Joanna gets a plateful spilled on her dress.  It
turns out that Leo Fish is heterosexual.  Geraldine Chaplin
passionately kisses Dad--on the mouth.
     Watching the slicing of the turkey, it dawned on me that this film
was trying to be a slice of life.  But it is also a turkey that Jodie
Foster directed--her second effort, after LITTLE MAN TATE.  Just as
responsible is the uneven writer W. D. Richter, whose biggest hit was
the dubious BUCKAROO BANZAI.  His best works were SLITHER, NICKELODEON,
and the excellent remake of INVASION OF THE BODY SNATCHERS.  The Stephen
King story he scripted before HOME FOR THE HOLIDAYS was the disastrous
NEEDFUL THINGS.
     In "Cleanup" Claudia's daughter calls, tells mom that she is
disgusted with her boyfriend and is still a virgin.  Tommy and Walter
have a fight.  Jack telephones Tommy.  Tommy is happy.  The marriage is
on again.  The movie turns "sensitive."
     "Now What?"  follows.  Here, this mish-mashy, misguided,
mis-written film predictably brings together Leo Fish and Claudia.
Earlier, Leo was passable as a quiet observer.  Now that he emotes, he
is artificial.  The couple have a too-cute impromptu date and kiss.
Taking leftovers to Joanna's house, the sisters have a heart-to-heart
talk.  Says Claudia:  "We don't have to like each other.  We're a
family."  This, I guess, is the moral of the story.
     Viewer Liberation comes with "The Point."  Claudia and Leo, by
mutual consent, will not have sex as they are going in different
geographic (and other) directions.  Dad watches home movies.  More
sentiment.  The real point is that this movie is pointless.  That not a
single performer is explored, seems to believe in his part, plays well,
is involving, That no one uses more than two basic expressions.
     Claudia takes the return plane.  Who comes in but Leo, with a
ridiculous lamp (don't ask)?  He proposes that they spend the two-hour
flight sitting together.  Perhaps they'll go to sleep.  That's what the
film's audience ought to do too.

Title
Review for In Love and War (1997)
IN LOVE AND WAR (1996) **. Directed by Richard Attenborough. Written by
Allan Scott, Clancy Sigal and Anna Hamilton Phelan, based on a screen story
by Scott and Dimitri Villard and the book "Hemingway in Love and War" by
Henry S. Villard and James Nagel.  Photography, Roger Pratt. Editing,Lesley
Walker.Production design, Stuart Craig. Music, George Fenton. Cast:  Sandra
Bullock (Agnes von Kurowsky),  Chris O'Donnell (Ernest Hemingway),
Mackenzie Astin (Harry  Villard),Emilio Bonucci  (Domenico Caracciolo)
Ingrid Lacey ( Elsie ``Mac'' MacDonald), et al. A New Line Cinema release.
115 minutes. PG-13.
"In Love and War" is a movie on tranquilizers.
When the U.S. entered World War I, Ernest  Hemingway, then a cub reporter,
wanted to join the fight in Europe but was rejected because of a bad eye.
He succeeded however  to be sent to Italy as an American Red Cross
ambulance driver. Soon after his arrival at the front where Austrians and
Italians were fighting, on July 18, 1918, just three days short of  his
19th birthday, he was seriously wounded in the leg. At the hospital he fell
in love with 26-year old nurse Agnes von Kurowsky. When he proposed to her,
first he was accepted, then Agnes changed her mind. They met just once in
Michigan and parted forever. Later Hemingway claimed that the two had made
love, while Agnes denied it.
Those adventures were later transformed into the classic Hemingway novel "A
Farewell to Arms." The book was touchingly filmed in 1932 with Gary Cooper
and Helen Hayes. The 1957 remake with Rock Hudson and Jennifer Jones is not
a particularly good movie but it does get partly redeemed by the supporting
cast, including talented Italian performers like  including Vittorio De
Sica and Alberto Sordi. In retrospect, it also gets redeemed by the
comparison with "In Love and War" which is based on  published research on
the actual Ernest-Agnes relationship.
After war's end, in the film  Agnes and her former patient Harry, meet in
New York. Says he: "It feels like one hundred years, not the eight months
since we left Italy."  The film too feels longer than its running time,
though the start is promising.
There are excellent war-scenes drawings behind the opening titles. The
arrival of American nurses in a small town has some humor. A marching band
delivers a raucous "Beer Barrel Polka," which most people think is a World
War II British song, whereas it was a Czech composition.  Apparently it
already existed in the Great War. That's one of this film's  contributions
to knowledge.
Soon matters go flat. As young Hemingway eagerly walks to the front lines
we hear the music of "The caissons keep rolling along." Yes,we get the
message: gung ho Ernest is earnest. Some hospital scenes are rather good,
even though certain points could have used greater stress --like the fact
that in wartime it was simpler to amputate a leg rather than painstakingly
try to avoid gangrene.
The Ernest-Agnes affair proceeds sluggishly. The the entire cast is low in
the personality department. Sandra Bullock can be a charmer, but  here her
appeal is below that of her other roles, and her acting is minimalistic.
Ditto, in spades, for  Chris O'Donnell. He is painfully young, an
end-of-century kid rather than a 1918 youth. He never hints at the
writer-to-be, at the macho figure that will become the Lost Generation
novelist, or at the older Papa Hemingway.  During what Mrs. Bucket would
call  "a riparian entertainment," -- a picnic by a river -- Ernest's
callowness causes Agnes to slap his face. You know that love-making cannot
be far behind.
Some episodes have the beauty of Italy as a pleasant distraction, but this
does not add anything to the story. Most scenes, too,are burdened by
persistent, characterless background music. Often praised composer George
Fenton must have been following misguided specifications.
First kiss--the music swells romantically. Ernest reads a letter--to
plaintive, unseen  strings. Ernest revisits the front --and more caissons
roll along. The couple's one and only sexual encounter just before Ernest
leaves for home, takes place in a bordello's rented room. It  comes with a
sentimental accordion melody ( a cliche usually reserved for shots of
Paris), before reverting to more strings. Finally, the sounds, now from
woodwinds and piano, become downright intrusive when Agnes visits Ernest in
Michigan.
Among the bits that may have been true but feel false, we have Agnes,
invited by an Italian surgeon and suitor to his house in Venice,
predictably finding out that it is a luxurious palazzo. Back in the USA,
Ernest reads Agnes's Dear John letter, has a fit, breaks everything in
sight. It's unconvincing, especially after Orson Welles had done so
smashingly better in his "Citizen Kane" bust-it-all scene.
Earlier, a letter from Ernest  to Agnes described future bliss: "You'll be
keeping the place spic and span while I write." The audience I saw it with
must not  have included feminists. No one giggled, gasped or howled.

Title
Review for My Fellow Americans (1996)
MY FELLOW AMERICANS *** 1/4. Directed by Peter Segal. Produced by Jon
Peters. Written by E. Jack Kaplan,Richard Chapman,Peter Tolan. Story by
Kaplan & Chapman. Photography,Julio Macat. Production design,James Bissell.
Editing,William Kerr. Music,William Ross. Costumes,Betsy Cox. Casting,
Karen Rea. Cast: Jack Lemmon(Russell P. Kramer),James Garner (Matt
Douglas),Dan Aykroyd(William Haney),John Heard(Ted Matthews),Wilford
Brimley(Joe Hollis),Lauren Bacall(Margaret Kramer),Sela Ward(Kaye Griffin),
Everett McGill(Col. Paul Tanner),Bradley Whitford(Carl Witnaur),James
Rebhorn(Charlie Reynolds),Esther Rolle(Rita),Conchata Ferrell(Woman Truck
Driver), Jach Kehler(Wayne),and many others. A Warners release. 101 min.
PG-13 (language).
No, it's not the Holidays spirit that makes me give "My Fellow Americans"
three and a quarter stars, a rating higher than those of other reviewers.
It's simply because the movie is more funny and entertaining than anything
else I have seen this season.
Its brio never flags."MFA" opens with the acceptance speech of G.O.P.
President-elect Kramer (Jack Lemmon), a silly peroration that includes his
trademark "Dreams are like children..." speech. Standing behind him are his
wife (Lauren Bacall) and his Vice-President Haney (Dan Aykroyd). Cut to the
next elections, won by Democrat Matt Douglas (James Garner), and the
following ones which elect the Republican ticket of Haney and Matthews
(John Heard).
Kramer and Douglas are still alive and well. Kramer is a tightwad who helps
himself to the vodka of hotel-room minibars, then fills the miniature
bottles with water, as his spouse delivers mordant comments. He adds to his
income with speechmaking that invariably includes his "Dreams are like
children..." refrain, no matter what the public is. His hilarious
appearance before a crowd of Japanese insurance people is crowned by an
unwilling dance with a man in a giant panda suit. Kramer also writes books,
probably not as money-makers but,we learn later in a slightly touching
confession, as reminders to others that he is still around.
Douglas looks considerably younger, more fit and smarter than Kramer, but
like him, during his tenure, he went for expediency rather than ideals and
principles. The hallmark of now divorcing Douglas is total dedication to
womanizing. Listlessly, he is now writing his biography... and sleeping
with his blonde editor, truly a President's Choice beauty. I bet you that
among the 90% politically incorrect male audiences, her looks will
exonerate the mega-philandering of Douglas. Within the White House, he
knows too about the "Kennedy Door," a secret escape for Presidents in
compromising situations.
A possible scandal (code-named Olympia) surfaces. It's about Presidential
kickbacks to current President Aykroyd, when years ago he was Lemmon's
Vice-Prexy. To cover his tracks and save his skin ( stronger words are
actually used), Aykroyd and cohorts dream up a cover-up that will put the
blame on Lemmon, then Garner. Yet both men, whatever their many faults, are
innocent of this Olympiagate.
Complications result in an assassination and a plot whereby the National
Security Agency is charged with killing both ex-Presidents. Not to reveal
the ever-inventive twists, the two men, while loathing each other and
constantly waging a war of insults, somehow find themselves stranded,
penniless and hunted down.
The film becomes a sort of road-movie as the odd couple flee from danger.
Hitherto insulated from real life (even former Presidents are shadowed by
the Secret Service), they encounter a little bit of the "Real America."
These glimpses include getting involved with celebrity impersonators;
meeting a traveling, jobless family (an update of "The Grapes of Wrath"?);
stumbling on a Gay Parade complete with "Over the Rainbow" played in
march-time; getting helped by "Dykes on Bikes"; sharing a truckload of
illegal immigrants; stealing into Lemmon's  Presidental Library, and much
more. All the while, killers under wonderfully diabolical Colonel Tanner
(he of the scary, impassive face) are after them.
Those peripatetic conditions may remind you of "Sullivan's Travels" by the
great satirist Preston Sturges. Or of Frank Capra's beloved "little people
who speak out" --the masses that those in power know nothing about. Wisely,
both satirical and pathetic elements are kept down to fit both the film's
lightness and its awareness that today's public has a much more jaundiced,
unromantic and cynical perception of politicians.
Instead, the concentration is on Lemmon and Garner. No matter whom they
play, they are two of the most likable actors in the history of American
cinema. The script and direction do not  sentimentalize them, in fact they
keep a certain distance from them. Yet there is a kind of sympathy for the
bumbling Lemmon, who gets to look so much like a hungry bum that a kindly
African-American cafe owner offers him free pie --and addresses him as
"old man." There is separate and equal sympathy for the fast-talking,
fast-thinking Garner who at age 68 is still a charmer.
The ill-assorted duo make beautifully ironic music together.It is
preordained that some variant of friendship will eventually emerge,
somewhat along the lines of the Lemmon-Walter Matthau comedies or the
ever-funny Matthau-GeorgeBurns "The Sunshine Boys."  Yet cleverly, when at
one point Lemmon says "Let's stop talking. We're about to bond. I hate
this," he defuses the bond issue.
Among the joys of the film is the smart casting and use of supporting
roles. Quality counts, not the length of onscreen time. No performer is
wasted. All are good:  Bacall's  ex-First Lady;  Wilford Brimley's
political mover and shaker;  Sela Ward as a witty, influential TV
personality; a Marilyn Monroe-ish girl who,believing that Garner is a
President Douglas look-alike, tells him she had slept with the real Douglas
(her report is not flattering).The  other performers too are just right.
John Hurt as the current Vice-President is a howl. Whether or not you read
Nixonian, Bushian,Clintonian,even Johnsonian allusions in the main
characters (LBJ was the most vivid utterer of "My Fellow Amurrricans"),
Hurt's Dan Quayle impersonation is such a four-star, true imitation that it
goes well beyond the spoofing stage.
At a droll Presidential golf game, Hurt's hits an African -American man
with a ball. He solicitously tenders several gauche, unconsciously
insulting apologies. One is about "Your people" who can't play golf because
they don't belong to the good clubs. He tops this with  "You people are so
good at so many sports that you should leave one [golf] for us whites."
Technically,the studio reconstructions of Washington and the uses of
location shooting are impeccable. They could fool you. What does not fool
you are the several improbabilities -- but then this is neither a
sentimental nor a serious film with a message. There is no need to apply
rationality and logic to a movie-movie that is overall a comedy plus
part-mystery, part-thriller, part-slapstick, part-expose. And part-fantasy,
except for its full-time raunchy (and most amusing) language which those in
the know will tell you was and is quite realistic among most of our elected
leaders and their subalterns.

Title
Review for Kolya (1996)
KOLYA (Czech Republic, France, UK, 1996) *** 1/2. Directed by Jan Sverak.
Written by Zdenek Sverak. Story, Pavel Taussig. Photography,Vladimir
Smutny. Editing, Alois Fisarek. Production design, Karel Vasanek. Costumes,
Katerina Hollak. Music, Ondrej Soukup.Produced by Eric Abraham & Jan
Sverak. Cast: Zdenek Sverak (Louka),  Andrej Chalimon (Kolya), Libuse
Safrankova (Klara), Ondrez Vetchy (gravedigger Mr. Broz), Stella Zazvorkova
(Louka's mother), Ladislav Smoljak (Mr. Houdek), Irena Livanova (Nadezda),
Lilian Mankina (Aunt Tamara), et al. A Miramax release. 105 min. In Czech
and bits of Russian. Subtitled. Rated PG-13. Oscar for Best Foreign Film,
also of the Golden Globe Award.
"Kolya" deserves its Oscar for Best Foreign Film as well as its Golden
Globe . Its closest contender this year was the French "Ridicule" (shown at
the Art months ago), for its wit, originality, lavish images and clever
ironies. I had seen both films at the 1996 Cannes Festival. Both were even
better on second viewing. "Kolya" was the best Film Market ( i.e.
non-official or competing) movie I watched at Cannes '96.
It also deserves a clean print, which is not always the case with foreign
movies that, no matter how praised, play mostly in art houses.And since
such theaters are not big producers of income for distributors, the latter
only too often send them battered copies. In "Kolya," much good classical
music is tied to the story and very well played, so that the sound is just
as important as the images.
It also belongs in the tiny category of Best  All-time Father-and-Son
movies. Jan Sverak directed it. His father Zdenek Sverak wrote the script
AND plays the top role of Louka.
Virtuoso cellist Frantisek Louka (Franta to his family and friends, Maestro
Louka for others) was dismissed from the Czech  Philharmonic Orchestra by
order of the apparatchiks who collaborated with the Soviets. The reason was
so ludicrous that it makes good sense within the absurd context of the
times.
The place is Prague, the year, 1988, the last one of the Soviet  presence
that will end with the  final liberation of the country, the Velvet
Revolution of 1989 (shown near the film's end) and the retreat of the
"115,000 heavily armed Soviet soldiers that occupy our homeland" as per a
Radio Free Europe broadcast heard in the movie.
The specific reason of Louka's fall comes out in bits. I won't reveal it in
the body of this review, but I will do so after the end, for those who burn
with curiosity.
Riddled with debts even after selling his car, the cellist can hardly
survive by playing in a small ensemble at funerals in the Prague
Crematorium, which the musicians call The Bakery.  He also re-gilds ("with
real gold") inscriptions on tombstones.
Maestro Louka is 55, has thinning hair, a beard with more salt than pepper,
but he is a handsome, youthful figure a la Sean Connery in certain hirsute
roles. Always worried by lack of money, he normally wears a serious
expression.
Don't let this fool you. He is a bachelor who took his late father's advice
that a professional musical career is incompatible with marriage. But Dad
said "marriage" and not "women." Louka is a Don Juan, a womanizer whom the
opposite sex finds irresistible. There is a large line-up of ladies, all
professionals, all attractive in looks and personality.
If the man is politically incorrect by Government standards, as a
lady-killer he is even more feministically incorrect .He cannot resist
making passes at Klara, the group's singer, as they perform. An
incorrigible voyeur, he lifts her skirt with his bow. On the street, his
eyes rove. He still has his beautiful apartment with a view ("my tower") at
the top of a lovely old building. He keep his phone busy as he calls old,
recent or new conquests, married or into relationships. Just about all are
willing to come and spend the night. Louka's little black book and his
memory are so full that he often mistakes one invitee for another.
The movie paints a full, colorful portrait of Louka before getting into its
other, big topic. This starts out with the musician's need for a car. He
cannot even afford an outrageously priced, second-hand Trabant, that
famous/infamous, hardy but primitive, uncomfortable polluter from East
Germany. A grave-digger friend (another likable fellow, and with a
picturesque family) comes up with a scheme: a hefty sum if Mr.Louka weds --
in name only --a Russian woman who wants Czech papers and the benefits
thereof, mainly not having to go back to Russia.  Reluctantly, Louka
yields. This aspect is what, in the U,S. would be called the Green Card
side of the picture.
Nadezda, the bride-on-paper, is ravishing, speaks no Czech, has a 5-year
old boy called Kolya. Soon after the wedding she skips to West Germany
where she has a married lover, leaving Kolya with Aunt Tamara. But when the
older woman is hospitalized, Frantisek Louka gets stuck with the kid.
The child speaks no Czech, Louka remembers only bit of school-Russian.
Problems of  communication, legalities, and "fatherhood" arise. If you
can't guess the rest, you haven't been going to the movies enough. But how
can you help seeing things coming? The gradual bonding between Louka and
Kolya, the changes in both, the growing "Dad" and "Son" relationship.
This has been a genre of films of all periods and nations. Yet if the
tale's skeleton is familiar, the flesh that covers it in "Kolya" is
wonderfully original. Yes, "Kolya" manipulates its public, but sometimes we
love to be manipulated, especially when this is done with such charming,
colorful, picturesque events and details. The movie has a way of keeping
our interest without dead moments or breaks. It places whatever deja vu
components it contains within a fresh-feeling context (and a quickly
decipherable subtext) of Czech society, culture and life under the Soviets.
No one likes the Russians, least of all Louka's mother who lives at the
family home along a beautiful provincial square. Inventive Louka first
tells her the child is a Yugoslav, but this won't wash. The few Russians
seen are soldiers, not ogres but nice young men, as we glimpse them in a
terrific sequence where Kolya meets them.
The film is the production of a finally independent Czech Republic that no
longers fears censorship and can say things that were taboo for decades.
Nonetheless, what really gives it its fascination is that it remains
faithful to the unique nature of films, the bittersweet irony, the
distinctive humor, a feeling for absurdism, of films made mostly during the
artistic boom of the Spring of Prague, that hiatus which began with
liberalization in 1963 and ended with the Soviet invasion of 1968.
There is also that lovely thread of Czech literature that has little people
fox, or get even with, unreasonable authority -- although this is
attenuated here first because the Maestro is not an ordinary man and second
because the Velvet Revolution is what brings a closure to his problems with
the Establishment.
The basic scheme of Louka-Kolya rapport may be sweetly predictable, but the
details and the presentation are consistently clever and novel. Among them
is the fact that through thick and thin, Louka 's sexual adventures are
unabated. In one, a beautiful blonde violinist comes to the Maestro because
she wants to switch to the cello. It is a collector's item of eroticizing
musical talk and instruments. In contrast, on another occasion Louka calls
a different girlfriend, a teacher of Russian, not with an invitation to
spend the night but for her to read to Kolya over the phone a fairy tale in
the boy's native language.
The actors are superb, down to the smallest of supporting roles.  Prague's
great beauty is used of course, but functionally and discreetly, not in
exploitative travel-poster fashion. Always in the background, the politics
of the country are given a mocking or caustic rather a melodramatic
treatment. Sentiment, leavened by wit, is ever-present, but not
sentimentality in the pejorative sense of the word.
In an unassuming way "Kolya" covers a wide territory with warmth and
deftness. It does not bang, it glides.  Its production values are
first-class, especially the imaginative and unpretentious photography and
editing.

Louka's brother had emigrated to the West and done well. Louka was allowed
to visit the West. On his return he was grilled by the Czech police.
That did it. That was the impertinent answer that cost Louka his job.

Title
Review for Apt Pupil (1998)
APT  PUPIL *  Directed by Bryan Singer.Written by Brandon Boyce,based on
the novella by Stephen King. Photography, Newton Thomas Sigel. Editing,John
Ottman. Production design, Richard Hoover. Music, Ottman. Produced by Jane
Hamsher, Don Murphy and Singer. Cast: Ian McKellen (Kurt Dussander, aka Mr.
Denker ), Brad Renfro (Todd Bowden), Bruce Davison (Richard Bowden), Elias
Koteas (Archie), Joe Morton (Dan Richler) and David Schwimmer (Edward
French). A Phoenix Pictures and Tri-Star Pictures release. 100 minutes. R
(violence, language)
Stephen King is the Bill Gates of contemporary fright fiction, the
Microsoft of text-to-screen adaptations --some 50 of them, counting TV
items.
The features have ranged from good (Carrie, Christine, The Shining, Cujo,
Stand by Me, Misery, Dolores Claiborne) to quite bad. The last of the
turkeys I remember seeing was Needful Things. Apt Pupil is just as
objectionable. Attempting to be a Holocaust Horror movie, it results in an
offensively dumb exploitation of the Holocaust (in Hebrew, Shoah).
In a small California town, 16-year old senior Todd Bowden is the shining
light of his class. After a History unit at school he becomes fascinated by
the Holocaust. He scours the improbably well-stocked (including old
photographs) public library. He also uses the Internet database of the
University of California at Irvine. (I have spent hours trying to locate
those files. Still trying.)
Unlikelihoods and impossibilities of the size of Titanic's fatal iceberg
accumulate without respite. On a city bus, Todd spots in a flash (!) a
heavily bearded, glass-wearing septuagenarian (Ian McKellen) as  Kurt
Dussander, a war-criminal SS officer of two death camps. That's 40-plus
years after the fact, but Todd remembers sharply the photographs of a
young, minor Nazi who did not even have especially memorable features!!!
The boy sleuths, learns that the old fellow is a Mr. Arthur Denker, a sort
of recluse whose ramshackle house is (how convenient!)  not far from
Todd's. Todd, has confirmed his identification by dusting the fingerprints
on the old man's mailbox. (That UC-Irvine database must be something!) He
forces his way in, and blackmails Denker-Dussander. In exchange for his
silence, the boy wants the still-wanted Nazi killer to go into the gory
details of death-camps: " "I want to hear about everything they're afraid
to show us in school."
Long tete-a-tete sessions follow, with the German gradually satisfying
Todd's morbid, sick, pathological curiosity for horrid details. If all this
could still be acceptable as a clinical case, the factual details of the
tale are pushed to the limits of fabrication. How did Denker subsist for
years in America? Why he is using an antique Victrola to play music? (Movie
Nazis, of course, all love grandiose music, especially Wagner's). Where
does Todd find a pristine SS uniform and cap as a Christmas gift to Denker?
He forces Denker to don the outfit and strut around as Todd barks orders.
The unsubtle point here is twofold. Denker, who just mayhave shown  (it's
all too vague) to Todd a smidgen of humanity, now gets a nostalgic taste
for his old Master Race, uniformed self. Traces of evil resurface. More to
the film's half-baked point, Todd himself is rapidly becoming corrupted.
That's  the bottom line of the movie: evil begets evil; the banality of
evil. So, what else is new?
More. Todd has told his family that, charitably, he reads for an old
fellow. Mr. Denker is invited to dinner. No longer unkempt, he looks and
sounds not like an aged Nazi but like a courtly, hand-kissing Jewish
gentleman. He states that during World War II his bad eyesight kept him
from active military duty. Yet even in old age he wears thin glasses. To
add cuteness to goofs, we later see Denker chortling at the nearsighted Mr.
Magoo on TV. Even the names "Todd" and "Dussander" may be in-"jokes" about
the German words for "death" and "other."
The plot gets exponentially creepy, unpleasant and dumb. Denker turns the
blackmail table around by telling Todd that he now has a bank box with
papers telling all about Todd. In way overdone resurgent cruelty Denker
throws a wandering cat into a lit gas-stove. That's  a pretty disgusting
reference to Jews in camp crematoria. Separately but equally Todd smashes a
bird that has a bad wing, This has to refer to the Nazis' "euthanasia"
program that predated the Holocaust:  killing people with physical or
mental defects.
Ugliness  mounts in irritating, obscure and arbitrary ways. Example: a film
projection is attended by laughing young students, and by Mr. Denker. The
movie is not shown but the German song "This is Berlin" is sung on the
soundtrack. Makes no sense.
Just as outrageously artificial is the appearance of a smelly bum (Elias
Koteas) who might also blackmail Denker. This (don't ask) leads to graphic
violence and murder, to knife stabbing, head-smashing by shovel, etc. It
involve the homeless fellow, Denker, Todd as well as a heart-attack --then
somehow leads to a hospital, to the FBI and the Mossad (the Israeli Secret
Services), to a providential hospital roommate of Denker's who just happens
to be a Jewish death-camp survivor, and enough more nonsense and cliches,
like the old favorite of the presumed dead rising up again.
There is just one semi-valid subplot. Todd's obsession and neglect of
schoolwork have brought his grades way down. Mr. French, the school's
guidance counselor, sends a notice to the boy's parents. It is swiped, but
Denker, unbeknownst to Todd posing as the kid's grandpa, makes a deal with
French, who has Todd cram,  get back to his straight A level in the last
three weeks of school and -would you believe it? --deliver the Commencement
speech!
At least, in the finale, the blatant fantasy of this ridiculous situation
manages to crown the distateful movie's mess with a show of Todd's
disturbing transformation.
Brad Renfro plays his feminine-looking Todd as an unpleasant type with aan
almost  imperturbable face. Britain's Ian McKellen does his part with
over-the-top theatricality. But his German accent seems pretty good.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Two Family House (2000)
TWO FAMILY HOUSE (2000) *** Directed and written by Raymond De 
Felitta. Photography, Michael Mayers. Editing, David Leonard. 
Production design, Teresa Mastropierro. Cast: Michael Rispoli (Buddy 
Visalo), Kelly Macdonald (Mary O'Neary), Katherine Narducci (Estelle 
Visalo), Kevin Conway (Jim O'Neary), et al. A Lions Gate release. 
104 minutes. PG-13. At the Art.
I know little about writer/director Raymond De Felitta except that: 
his first film was a short, Bronx Cheers, which had an Oscar 
nomination. His second film was the feature Cafe Society which 
debuted at the 1995 Cannes Festival in the Directors' Fortnight 
series. Its US release was super-minimal  as RDF distributed the 
film himself. He co-wrote the 1998 Shadow of a Doubt, then came Two 
Family House which received the Audience Award at Sundance 2000.
What I do know is that RDF had a beloved uncle called Buddy; that 
Buddy is the inspiration for Two Family House, not in every fact and 
detail but enough to make this into a veristic movie, verismo being 
an Italian term for everyday realism in life applied to art. And 
that Uncle Buddy would be proud of his nephew.
The setting is Staten Island in 1956 (and a bit beyond), among 
Italian-Americans. There is an Irish community too but the two 
groups keep apart, have no kind words for each other. 
Buddy, says RDF, was "a lovable  loser in pursuit of an elusive 
dream." His first dream was in the Navy, where he once sang nicely 
O Sole Mio before the famous Arthur Godfrey. Buddy was hoping to 
make it on  Godfrey's TV program. But his wife Estelle discouraged 
his venturing outside the more modest Italian lifestyle and 
occupations. Buddy, a factory worker, went on to more schemes that 
failed, then to his final dream: to buy a two-story house where he 
and Estelle would live upstairs, while he would transform the 
downstairs into Buddy's Bar.
He finds a dilapidated old place, but before he can begin to give it 
shape he discovers that upstairs live Jim, an older, foul-mouthed 
Irish-American drunkard and his far younger,  pretty and most 
pregnant Irish-Irish wife Mary. There's no way to get rid of Jim who 
has refused to pay rent for years yet can defy eviction thanks to a 
peculiar local law.
When Buddy and his buddies menace eviction by force, the hubbub 
precipitates the birth of Mary's child. It is a special case which I 
cannot disclose, but which results in Jim's disappearance. This is 
soon followed by Mary's eviction. Yet soft-hearted Buddy arranges 
for her to leave the tawdry hotel she moved to with the baby. He 
rents better quarters for them, and gradually he and the lass 
becomes friends, to say the least. 
What follows is a relationship and a string of events which are at 
the same time simple but also complicated, even complex 
developments. All this is redolent of Italian-American working class 
realism, types, valiant drinks at the local bar which is like a club 
for Buddy's friends, and of enough cigarette smoke to induce global 
warming.
I will not dwell on the march of time within the plot and spoil the 
viewer's fun. However I should mention that several of the actors 
are familiar to many from TV's The Sopranos; that the actress who 
plays the Irish Mary is, in fact a Scotswoman; that Estelle is a 
Class C termagant;  and that there are no Mafiosi, gangsters and 
others of that ilk around, not even in mentions or allusions.
The last point is refreshing. I remember when Frank Sinatra (whose 
ties with the underworld were blatant) went to bat accusing the 
media of caricaturing Italian-Americans as members of organized 
crime, and --I believe-- as screen clichés even if they were 
ordinary people. I am afraid that Sinatra had a point. Movies still 
used to stereotype  minorities until some years ago. Especially 
Italians.
For comic purposes some stereotyping was innocuous, but then the 
films made it clear that these were blatantly farcical exaggerations.
Think of Sig Ruman who played  outrageous Teutonic characters, 
always the butt of jokes:  Herman Gotlieb (A Night at the Opera), 
Dr. Steinberg (A Day at the Races), Dr. Wuthering (Love Crazy), 
Heinrich Stubel (A Night in Casablanca), Dr. Eggelhoffer (Nothing 
Sacred), Colonel Ehrhardt (To Be or Not to be), Schultz (Stalag 17) 
and more. Then think of the plethora of Italian-Americans over the 
full spectrum of Hollywood films, as often nice but always 
"realistically amusing" types.
The backlash nowadays is political correctness which tends to 
eliminate colorfulness, even when it is justified. I think Sinatra 
would have approved how Two Family House tells its tale "like it is" 
and with genuine warmth. 

Title
Review for First Wives Club, The (1996)
THE FIRST WIVES CLUB * Directed by Hugh Wilson.Written by Robert Harling
fromthe novel by Olivia Goldsmith. Photography, Donald Thorin. Editing,
John Bloom. Production design, Peter Larkin. Music
Marc Shaiman. Producer, Scott Rudin. Cast: Bette Midler (Brenda), Goldie
Hawn (Elise), Diane Keaton (Annie), Dan Hedaya (Morty), Stockard Channing
(Cynthia), James Naughton (Gil), Heather Locklear (Gil's new wife), Sarah
Jessica Parker (Shelly), Stephen Collins (Aaron), Marcia Gay Harden (Dr.
Leslie Rosen), Maggie Smith (Gunilla), Victor Garber (Bill Atchison),
Elizabeth Berkley (Phoebe LaVelle), Bronson Pinchot (Duarto Feliz),
Jennifer Dundas (Chris). A Paramount release. 105 minutes. Rated PG.
There are three opening moves to this movie. The comic-book design of the
opening credits; in her palatial penthouse, Cynthia who jumps to her death
from the balcony; a flashback to four young women, close friends who are
happily graduating from Middlebury College in 1969.
Cynthia's tiny sequence is the only serious one and arguably the best in a
movie botched by its comic-book treatment of a major subject.
In the first of a string of improbabilities, the Middlebury graduates,
while  so close to each other, have not met in ages, even though they all
lived in New York City.  It takes Cynthia's funeral services to reunite the
surviving three , Keaton, Midler and Hawn. They are now 45 or 46. If  you
believe their official birthdates, the three actresses are nearing 51.
In another forced ploy (it's in the book) all of them were abandoned by
their husbands for younger chicks. This is what had happened to Cynthia
too. In additional inventions, all three women had helped their husbands
attain wealth and status;  all three men are creeps; all their new
patooties are flawed. Sarah Jessica Parker is a dumb ,vulgar, uncultured
bimbo ; Elizabeth Berkley ("Showgirls") is a naive aspiring actress, who
much later turns out to be only 16 ; Marcia Gay Harden, is a shrink who
breaks ethics monstrously as, in another outlandish arrangement, she is
both Keaton's therapist and the lover of  Keaton's husband.
Keaton is in a trial separation. She hopes matters will improve after her
husband has unexpected sex with her ... and then announces that he wants a
divorce. Hawn's ex has the cheek to ask her for alimony.
To this coarse, too-much-is-too-much mess are added, for no really valid
reason, Midler's son and his Bar Mitzvah, and Keaton's daughter who
proudly announces that she is lesbian. Neither embellishment helps the
Jewish or the gay causes.
The ladies are seething. When each receives a letter from the grave
(Cynthia's),the trio decide to exact revenge. In ways too unlikely to
analyze, they succeed.
The actresses do what they can with their parts, but none of them is
likable in a movie where nobody is. With the minor exceptions of  friends
recruited to help the wives: Maggie Smith as a sly "grande dame" and
Bronson Pinchot, "one of the nine worst decorators in Manhattan" who also
lends a hand. With the exception of tongue-in-cheek Smith, the  acting
ranges from broad to very broad, the latter fitting best Pinchot and Sarah
Jessica Parker. There is not even token dimensionality to the three
husbands, with Victor Garber (as Hawn's ex) being icomprehensively passive.
The film's subject is no joke but is treated as such yet there are few
successful one-liners or gags --save for a funny scam sequence at
Christie's auction house.  While conceived as a farce, the film is not
handled as a farce. Sluggish, dull, doing nothing for feminism, it limits
it would-be message by limiting its arena to a moneyed milieu. In the
wrap-up the ladies use their new wealth to open (in an artificial attempt
to flatter female audiences) a women's crisis center. They throw a high
society party which is like the opening of a ritzy restaurant or a fashion
show. There's a dumb, cop-out reconciliation of one couple. The last scene
has the three women doing an embarrassingly silly musical comedy song and
dance number.
Director Hugh Wilson has made "Police Academy," (hmm), "Rustler's Rhapsody"
(ugh), "Burglar" (ugh), "Guarding Tess" (good). Scripter Robert Harling
wrote "Steel Magnolias" from his play, co-wrote the funny "Soapdish" and
was one 7 writers on "Sister Act."
If you want to see a delightful film about three women who revolt against
male oppression, try the 1980 "9 to 5."

Title
Review for Mr. Holland's Opus (1995)
MR. HOLLAND'S OPUS *** 1/2  Directed by Stephen Herek. Written 
by Patrick Sheane Duncan (also co-executive producer). 
Photography, Oliver Wood. Production design, David Nichols. 
Editing, Trudy Ship. Costumes, Aggie Guerard Rodgers. Music, 
Michael Kamen. R. Dreyfuss's make-up, Ken Chase. Cast: Richard 
Dreyfuss (Glen Holland), Glenne Headley (Iris Holland), Jay 
Thomas (Bill Meister), Olympia Dukakis (Principal Jacobs), 
Terrence Howard (Vice Principal Wolters), Terrence Howard 
(Luis Russ), Damon Whitaker (Bobby Tidd), Jean Luisa Kelly 
(Rowena Morgan), Alexandra Boyd (Sarah Olmstead), Nicholas 
John Renner (Cole at 6 years old), Joseph Anderson (Cole, 15), 
Anthony Natale (Cole, 28), et al.  Distributed by Buena Vista. 
143 mins. Rated PG.
"Mr. Holland's Opus" is a "biopic"(biographical picture), a 
genre common in the 1930s and generally reserved for famous 
figures. Mr. Holland is not famous. He is a well-trained 
performer-composer who, tired of dragging himself and his wife 
from odd job to odd job, decides to try teaching near 
Portland,  Oregon, in the newly named John F. Kennedy High 
School. He plans to stay only for a short while and devote 
himself to composing. He remains for at least 30 years, 
through 1995. devoting himself to young people.
The biopic, smoothly combined with a school picture with a 
difference, becomes a triple whammy paean to music, education 
and the teaching profession.  While there have been hundreds 
of movies involving schools, very few reach the seriousness 
and depth of this film. Fewer yet depict so well a teacher's 
dedication. 
Arguably, the first classic school picture was Jean Vigo's 
"Zero for Conduct," in which all the teachers but one (a 
younger newcomer who clowns like Charlie Chaplin) were 
miserable creatures  loathed by the students.  Schools were 
present in the pleasantly corny Andy Hardy series. Later,  
American high schools (Ridgemont, Cooley, Rock 'n' Roll, 
Central, et al.) were venues for student sheenanigans. So were 
the comic British "St. Trinian's" series.  Hardly any students 
ever seem  to study in those movies.  
In a  handful of fine, non-comedic foreign works l("Pocket 
Money,"  "Au Revoir les Enfants,"  "Heavenly Creatures")  the 
actual educational process in them was secondary to other, 
serious themes. 
A few schools were the settings for personal dramas ("The 
Browning Version"),  dark deeds ("Diabolique," "Unman, 
Wittering and Zigo," "Pretty Maids All in a Row") or armed 
revolts (the British "If" that derived from "Zero for 
Conduct").  Two notable films centered on girls' crushes on 
their female teachers, the German classic "Maedchen in 
Uniform" and the little-known French  "Olivia."
"Lean on Me" was about a disciplinarian principal. "Madame 
Sousatzka," where the teacher gives private lessons, stresses 
eccentricity, as does "Dead Poets Society. " There is, of 
course, Frederick Wiseman's epoch-making "High School," but 
that's a documentary. And so on...
Among the movies that focus strongly on truly dedicated 
schoolteachers, the more familiar titles include a classic 
"Goodbye Mr. Chips," as well as "The Blackboard Jungle," "To 
Sir, with Love," "Conrack," "Ciao Professore!," and the 
wonderfully quirky "The Prime of Miss Jean Brodie." I would 
also recommend the odd but successful casting of Bette Davis 
in an older movie, "The Corn Is Green." 
"Mr. Holland" joins this small, select group, in a different 
context and with a new approach. Glenn Holland at first feels 
and fumbles his way to teach musically inept and cacophonous 
kids and to put up with a fine but demanding principal 
(Dukakis, with a delicious wink in her eyes) and her 
semi-martinet, crew-cut assistant principal.  Gradually, 
Holland learns how to teach, and does so superbly. Slowly, he 
gets caught up in the passion for teaching. He also reaches a 
persuasive level of eloquence without ever becoming a 
goodie-goodie speech-maker. 
A natural, what with his original methods, warmth, love of 
music and the arts, Mr. Holland forms students who are almost 
too accomplished to be true. He must face the killing schedule 
of so many teachers, a the low pay that must be supplemented 
by odds and ends , like driving lessons. Obliged to form a 
marching band, he manages it only through the friendship of 
the gym teacher --for a change, not an uncouth or comical type 
-- and a quid pro quo: Holland will teach an instrument to a 
black wrestler who needs the credit. In one scene, Mr. H.  
improvises tricks that inculcate rhythm to the kid. This could 
be a subtle attack on the old cliche " blacks are born with 
rhythm." There are several more excellent scenes in the film, 
but let the viewer discover them.  
When a son is born to the Hollands he turns out to be deaf.  
The shock to Mr. Holland is not followed by the expected 
sentimentality but by complex, believable reactions which over 
the years include difficulties, frustrations and 
misunderstandings as well as love. 
As Mr. H gets older, there is also a nicely handled bit of 
temptation. Typically, script and direction do not make a 
mountain of this or of a mid-life crisis. In general the movie 
skirts schmaltz, feel-good saccharine or feverish drama. It is 
also mercifully free of the usual school bullies, toughs or 
clowning figures. 
Perforce episodic, the movie is intercut with documentary 
footage to show the passage of the years and to orient us, a 
procedure that reminds me of Olympia Dukakis addressing 
Holland about his "compass." (See the film and you'll get the 
point). Viewers should be ready for several moments when it 
seems that the movie is about to end.  
The music, classical and popular, is beautiful. The aging of 
the actors (makeup, hair, movements) is most skillful, as is 
the dosage of routine, solemn, funny and sad elements.  
Richard Dreyfuss, in an Oscar-worthy,  sober performance is 
entirely convincing. With luck, some of us had someone like 
Mr. H in our school days. 
Many moments are touching and could be eye-wetting, yet all 
done without pulling out all the stops as  "Mr. Holland's 
Opus" remains steadfastly sweet but never becomes cloying, 
never departs from realism. The characters, their lines and 
behavior feel genuine. Even the deaf people are really deaf.  
One small flaw in the movie is the finale's improbably 
well-organized homage to the music teacher. It happens just 
after the school is forced to cut 10 percent of its budget.  
Of course this gets done by eliminating programs in music and 
other arts. 
By coincidence, just before seeing the film I had caught 
documentarist Ken Burns on C-Span where, rationally, lucidly 
and passionately he made a case for not cutting federal 
subsidies to the arts. Mr. Holland is not alone in trying to 
send us a message.  

Title
Review for Independence Day (1996)
INDEPENDENCE DAY ** 1/2  Directed by Roland Emmerich. Written by Dean 
Devlin & Emmerich. Photograhy, Karl Walter Lindenlaub. Editing, David 
Brenner. Production design,  Oliver Scholl, Patrick Tatopoulos. Music, 
David Arnold. Cast: Will Smith, Bill Pullman, Jeff Goldblum, Mary 
McDonnell, Judd Hirsch, Margaret Colin, Randy Quaid, Robert Loggia, 
James Rebhorn, Vivica A. Fox, et al. A TCF release. 145 minutes. Rated 
PG-13. 
With the absence of the Soviet Evil Empire, Hollywood is searching for 
arch-enemies. An old one has resurfaced in "Independence Day" : the 
Nasties from Outer Space.
The action take place on a very near future's July 2,3 and 4, when 
Earth is attacked by alien machines. The enemy follows the principle 
of those nested Russian dolls, only limited to three. A mothership 
one-fourth the size of the moon contains mega-saucers (about 15 miles 
wide) that contain critters. The mothership (it looks sometimes like a 
megamongous manhole cover), travels to Earth, releases its ominous 
saucers that position themselves over major Earth cities, casting 
giant shadows. They shoot rays that destroy totally New York, Los 
Angeles and Washington. You wonder why they use the ray-by-ray method 
instead of a single H-Bomb equivalent. But then this is a kid-flick of 
the "You who enter here abandon all logic" persuasion.
It is also, among a host of deja vu things, a return to the 50s and 
60s Cold War fears that sometimes appeared in the guise of space 
invaders; a monster/horror movie; 70s and 80s space movies; and a 
countdown flick.  
There are lots of American heroes around. Highest ranking is President 
Bill Pullman, a former fighter-plane hero of the Gulf war, but with 
most of the prowess done by fighter top gun Captain Will Smith. (He 
has a charming girlfriend, stripper Vivica Fox. She has a kid and a 
great dog).  The brains are supplied by Jeff Goldblum, a 
computer/communications nerd/genius, whose ex-wife Margaret Colin just 
happens to be the President's Chief of Staff. (Needless to say the 
couple are still in love). 
Many people and vehicles populate IP, which is a no-brains, special 
effects film, and a fun movie. But  at some point after the 
destruction of the cities (impressive), the film gets increasingly 
comic-bookish and begins to bore --in my case around minute 80. After 
this one gets  a surfeit of effects at the expense of plot and 
characters. Some of the effects in the final battle are downright 
cheap and cheesy composites, like video games.
Matters slide down after the Freak Show of an alien critter saved in a 
secret laboratory years ago, with its craft, after it crash-landed in 
New Mexico. The alien is straight out of "Alien" movies -- a  
disgusting, slimy, gooey, oozy affair with tentacles. My interest kept 
waning,  except for worrying about Ms. Fox's lovely big dog. It 
survived unharmed. 
ID is as synthetic as they get. The final solution against the aliens 
is a twist of the 1953 "War of the Worlds" where Martians were 
destroyed by germs. Here the germs are updated to computer germs or 
viruses.  While I'm at it, let me tell you that I'm writing this on a 
computer on which I have lavished days of work to get out of a glitch, 
while Goldblum's laptop does wonders in seconds even after the 
destruction of the cities.  
The characters are by and large  cardboard creations in whom cliches 
extend to everything: actions, reactions, facial expressions, gestures 
--and dialogue with lines like:"All we can do now is pray" or "What 
your father did was very brave. You should be proud of him." 
The father in question is another cliche. Vietnam veteran Randy Quaid, 
who claimed to have been abducted, abused and release by aliens is a 
subject of mockery and an alcoholic crop-duster pilot. But can't we 
guess right away that at the end he'll be sober, and a hero? Can't we 
also guess that the President will join the other brave pilots to 
attack the outer-spacers? OK, but I draw the line at the crash session 
where civilians (older former pilots) get instructed in flying the 
latest US planes --and Captain Smith figures out how to operate the 
old alien craft!
ID tries to a be Politically Correct, but I am not sure that stressing 
the Jewishness of Goldblum's father (Judd Hirsch) in caricatural 
fashion, or, similarly, the gayness of a Government scientist 
(gravel-voiced Harvey Fierstein), were thought through by the film's 
German writer-director. There are no Asian-Americans, by the way.

Title
Review for Limey, The (1999)
THE LIMEY (1999) ***  Directed by Steven Soderbergh. Written by Lem 
Dobbs. Photography, Ed Lachman. Editing, Sarah Flack. Production 
design, Gary Frutkoff. Music,  Cliff Martinez. Produced by John Hardy 
and Scott Kramer. Cast: Terence Stamp (Wilson), Lesley Ann Warren 
(Elaine), Luis Guzman (Ed), Barry Newman (Avery), Joe Dallesandro 
(Uncle John), Nicky Katt (Stacy), Peter Fonda (Terry Valentine), 
Amelia Heinle (Adhara), Melissa George (Jennifer), et al. An Artisan 
Entertainment release. 89 minutes. R ( violence, language)
Last May I saw "The Limey" at its world premiere in Cannes. I watched 
it again locally seven months later. Now, I have always believed that 
the better understanding and the value or non-value of many a film, 
require a second screening, if possible much later. A major problem 
with most critics is that deadlines allow them to give only their 
first, quick  impressions. With some movies, even more than two 
screenings are called for. Lacking this, my evaluation of "The Limey" 
is still somewhat guarded.
Terence Stamp is Wilson (no first name), a Limey (slang for British) 
petty career criminal just released from his latest, 9-year prison 
stay for armed robbery. He flies from England to Los Angeles to 
investigate the suspicious death (nominally in a car accident) of his 
estranged daughter Jenny.--and to avenge her.
This leads to sleuthing and extreme violence, and to record 
producer/drug dealer tycoon Valentine (Peter Fonda) and his henchmen. 
Jenny was Valentine's girl.
On the face of it, "The Limey" falls in the most familiar sub-genre 
of revenge/retaliation movies which can be found among crime films, 
westerns, war movies and tutti quanti. However, behind this deja vu 
are the novel approach and stylistics of the movie.
>From the very beginning and through the finale, Wilson is a special 
character. Taciturn, unconfiding in others, he speaks economically 
with a Cockney accent and pronunciation (e.g. "I was finking about 
this") yet on at least one occasion he showers his listener (a 
puzzled DEA agent) with a long, vivacious speech in Cockney rhymes.
All along too, the movie bathes in an ocean of flasbacks in every 
possible direction and of every possible type. These include the 
leitmotif of Wilson playing in his head home-movies of Jenny as a 
child, visions of Wilson as a young man, visions of what was, what 
could have been, might have been, may not have been, and so on. It is 
a large puzzle plus non-puzzle of genre deconstruction which may or 
may not confuse the viewer (hence one reason for a third screening of 
the movie).
Throughout, and among all characters, the dialogue is terse,. The 
exceptions involve Valentine rather than Wilson.
Flashes as a stylistic device are the most obvious aspect of the 
film's techniques, yet other procedures are used so that what we 
learn of Wilson (and others) is based on the iceberg principle -- you 
really see or perceive only the tip.
The procedures have been compared to those of the French New Wave and 
to the non-French films they influenced in the 1960s. Indeed, the 
1960s and their ethos, updated  to the late 1990s, are another 
constant here. In clear terms, the two major roles of this movie are 
held by movie icons of the hippie years, with clever twists. Peter 
Fonda (Valentine) was once Wyatt (aka   Captain America), the biker 
(with his pal Dennis Hopper) in the landmark  "Easy Rider" (1969) 
where doing drugs was within a state of strange innocence. Decades 
later, Valentine's drugs then are a savage by-product of capitalism 
at all costs, including human.
A good touch Terence Stamp, in "Billy Budd" (1962)  was a revelation 
as the sweet-faced innocent victim in the eponymous movie. Four films 
later, he had a smallish role as a thief called Wilson in the first 
feature by Ken Loach, "Poor Cow" (1967).
In what may be a first in film history, the flashbacks of "The Limey" 
repeatedly go to the young Stamp-Wilson without any need of faking, 
special effects or a digitally created Stamp.
Both actors, born in 1939, are sexagenerians now. Stamp looks younger 
than his age. Fonda could pass for a young 40-something. He is 
fashionably garbed, is face is unlined, he is seriously preoccupied 
with his looks, checks them (and his gums) with near-obsessive 
frequency. He is also a near-Lolita fancier, but without prurience. 
Jenny has been replaced by Adhara, a young, live-in beauty. We know 
nothing about her beyond her bare minimum, in a bathtub.
We know very little about anyone else, including the interesting 
Avery. He is Valentine's lieutenant, middle-aged, chic and "soigné," 
has authority, delegates the dirty work and looks more like  a 
"consigliere" than a killer. It is characteristic of the movie that 
while, in principle, treading familiar ground, it avoids stereotypes. 
Clichés too but not all.
There is more subtlety around than meets the eye initially. In 
devious, insouciant-seeming ways, Valentine tries to hold on to the 
decorative Adhara by courting and admiring her openly. Beneath his 
sophistication there are crypto-pathetic efforts to impress a lover 
who is a fraction of his age. The girl is impressed --in  fashion 
corresponding to that of young cinephiles today discovering great 
older films-- by the mythical 60s. Yet in a debunking, anti-cliché 
Valentine tells her that the whole 60s thing happened only in 1966 
and the early 1967.
Where the movie does not resist clichés is in its action scenes. 
Wilson is tinged by Superman-ness a la Charles Bronson or Dirty 
Harry. He survives a horrible beating by lowlifes nearly unscathed. 
He then gets his improbably hidden revolver and kills them dead. 
Wilson disposes of a Valentine guard with ease and no witnesses 
during a reception. A car chase gets his pursuer vanquished. A major 
fusillade has the few good guys eliminate the many bad 'uns. The 
finale employs the far too familiar mano a mano between hero and 
arch-villain.

Title
Review for Tous les matins du monde (1991)
TOUS LES MATINS DU MONDE (ALL THE MORNINGS OF THE WORLD) 
(France, 1991) *** 3/4 . Directed by Alain Corneau. Screenplay 
by Pascal Guignard and Corneau, from Guignard's novel. Music 
arranger and performer,  Jordi Savall. Cinematography, Yves 
Angelo. Sets, Bernard Vezat. Costumes, Corrine Jorry. Editing, 
Marie-Joseph Yoyotte.  Cast: Jean-Pierre Marielle, Gerard 
Depardieu, Anne Brochet, Guillaume Depardieu, et al. An 
October Films release. In French with subtitles. 113 min. 
Rated PG. At the Savoy Theaters. 
C'est magnifique ! The musical sounds are magnificent. 
Lighting and photography are magnificent. Editing and just 
about everything else is magnificent.  
Gerard Depardieu must be Lon Chaney's successor as The Man of 
a Thousand Faces. Grotesquely puffy, rouged, bewigged,  he 
opens the film as the musician-courtier, composer and viol 
virtuoso Marin Marais (1656-1728)] 
In a fit of dark despair and humbling himself, the aging 
Marais tells his students that he is nothing compared to his 
teacher. His voice-over starts the flashbacks about Monsieur 
de Sainte-Colombe, a musical genius about whom little is 
known, not even his first name. 
Sainte-Colombe did exist. He was a composer-performer who did 
marvels for the viol (the viola de gamba that became the 
cello), added a seventh string, found new fingerings, and had 
Marais as his most direct disciple.
The story begins with the death of Sainte-Colombe's young wife 
in the 1660s. The disconsolate musician  (Jean-Pierre 
Marielle) becomes a recluse in his large country house, builds 
a cabin --a wooden shack to practice in -- in his garden. He 
practices endlessly and also teaches his two daughters the 
rudiments of literacy and the techniques and secrets of great 
viol playing. 
Solo or together they make stunning music. Years later, father 
and grown-up children give a rare salon   trio performance. 
The court's foppish first violist acknowledges 
Sainte-Colombe's superiority, soon after offers him to play 
for His Majesty Louis XIV, the Sun King in whose reign France 
was the cultural and artistic center of the world. 
The vile-tempered Sainte-Colombe was a purist's purist and a 
Jansenist to boot -- these were breakaway Catholics who, among 
other matters, disapproved of the Jesuits' worldliness and 
ostentation. He kicks out the envoy. Playing the Palace is not 
for him.  
He resumes his rustic, eremitic life, with a vengeance. Having 
attained musical perfection he will not share it. 
17-year old Marin Marais (Guillaume Depardieu, Gerard's only 
son) asks the Master to teach him. In vain, until the two 
girls come to the rescue.  But in this un-Hollywoodian tale 
the teacher keeps reminding the young man that he may have 
virtuosity but lacks soul. "You're not a musician," he says, a 
term that the uncompromising Sainte-Colombe seems to equate 
with an ineffable state of grace.
French movie narrations can often be superb.  Here, Gerard 
Depardieu relates the past with perfect voice and tone, in 
literary yet beautifully simple, un-pedantic terms. His 
technical discourses on musical techniques are fascinating.  
"Tous les Matins ... " is a glorious musical story. It is also 
a moving story of marital love. Sainte-Colombe's adoration of 
his wife is recompensed by a series of her apparitions. " It 
seemed to him that his rage was leaving him." He mellows 
perceptibly. We even discover that the Maestro did have one 
friend, painter Baugin, also a purist and a real-life person 
about whom little is known.
The film drips with Frenchness, from small details to the face 
of senior daughter Madeleine. Curiously, Anne Brochet played 
Roxanne in "Cyrano de Bergerac" where, without realizing it, 
she was in love with Cyrano, played by Gerard Depardieu. Here 
she loves Depardieu Junior. 
There is an affair that turns sad when young Marais yields to 
the temptations of fame and fortune. Much later, he realizes 
that his ties to the Sainte-Colombe family were more powerful 
than he had thought. 
The music, string and vocal , is a feast for the ears, with 
compositions by Sainte-Colombe, Marais, Lully, Couperin, and 
arrangements and performances by contemporary, Barcelona-born 
master of the bass viol, Jordi Savall.  The faking of 
viol-playing by the actors is entirely convincing. 
The look of the film is a  feast for the eyes. The interiors 
remind you (but not pointedly) of paintings by Georges de La 
Tour, Dutch masters and others.  The secret is exquisite 
lighting, one of the most beautiful and precise I can 
remember. It reproduces perfectly the period's commonly used 
single or weak light sources, as opposed to artificial 
movie-lighting and the lightening of shadows or duskiness.  
The acting by Gerard Depardieu and Anne Brochet is impeccable.  
Jean-Pierre Marielle ho generally has comic or cynical roles, 
is cast again type and gives an unforgettably taciturn 
performance. Depardieu Jr. makes a good debut.   
French director Bertrand Tavernier had made" Round Midnight," 
in 1986. With the help of Dexter Gordon and Herbie Hancock, 
this was the best and most loving film ever about jazz 
musicians. Now Alain Corneau's ninth film in 18 years does the 
same for baroque music. Nominated for 11 Cesars (the French 
Oscars), it won 7, including Best Film, Director, Supporting 
Actress and Music. There were other awards too, such as the 
prestigious Louis Delluc Prize for Best French Film. 
TOUS LES MATINS DU MONDE (ALL THE MORNINGS OF THE WORLD) 
(France, 1991) *** 3/4 . Directed by Alain Corneau. Screenplay 
by Pascal Guignard and Corneau, from Guignard's novel. Music 
arranger and performer,  Jordi Savall. Cinematography, Yves 
Angelo. Sets, Bernard Vezat. Costumes, Corrine Jorry. Editing, 
Marie-Joseph Yoyotte.  Cast: Jean-Pierre Marielle, Gerard 
Depardieu, Anne Brochet, Guillaume Depardieu, et al. An 
October Films release. In French with subtitles. 113 min. 
Rated PG. At the Savoy Theaters. 
C'est magnifique ! The musical sounds are magnificent. 
Lighting and photography are magnificent. Editing and just 
about everything else is magnificent.  
Gerard Depardieu must be Lon Chaney's successor as The Man of 
a Thousand Faces. Grotesquely puffy, rouged, bewigged,  he 
opens the film as the musician-courtier, composer and viol 
virtuoso Marin Marais (1656-1728)] 
In a fit of dark despair and humbling himself, the aging 
Marais tells his students that he is nothing compared to his 
teacher. His voice-over starts the flashbacks about Monsieur 
de Sainte-Colombe, a musical genius about whom little is 
known, not even his first name. 
Sainte-Colombe did exist. He was a composer-performer who did 
marvels for the viol (the viola de gamba that became the 
cello), added a seventh string, found new fingerings, and had 
Marais as his most direct disciple.
The story begins with the death of Sainte-Colombe's young wife 
in the 1660s. The disconsolate musician  (Jean-Pierre 
Marielle) becomes a recluse in his large country house, builds 
a cabin --a wooden shack to practice in -- in his garden. He 
practices endlessly and also teaches his two daughters the 
rudiments of literacy and the techniques and secrets of great 
viol playing. 
Solo or together they make stunning music. Years later, father 
and grown-up children give a rare salon   trio performance. 
The court's foppish first violist acknowledges 
Sainte-Colombe's superiority, soon after offers him to play 
for His Majesty Louis XIV, the Sun King in whose reign France 
was the cultural and artistic center of the world. 
The vile-tempered Sainte-Colombe was a purist's purist and a 
Jansenist to boot -- these were breakaway Catholics who, among 
other matters, disapproved of the Jesuits' worldliness and 
ostentation. He kicks out the envoy. Playing the Palace is not 
for him.  
He resumes his rustic, eremitic life, with a vengeance. Having 
attained musical perfection he will not share it. 
17-year old Marin Marais (Guillaume Depardieu, Gerard's only 
son) asks the Master to teach him. In vain, until the two 
girls come to the rescue.  But in this un-Hollywoodian tale 
the teacher keeps reminding the young man that he may have 
virtuosity but lacks soul. "You're not a musician," he says, a 
term that the uncompromising Sainte-Colombe seems to equate 
with an ineffable state of grace.
French movie narrations can often be superb.  Here, Gerard 
Depardieu relates the past with perfect voice and tone, in 
literary yet beautifully simple, un-pedantic terms. His 
technical discourses on musical techniques are fascinating.  
"Tous les Matins ... " is a glorious musical story. It is also 
a moving story of marital love. Sainte-Colombe's adoration of 
his wife is recompensed by a series of her apparitions. " It 
seemed to him that his rage was leaving him." He mellows 
perceptibly. We even discover that the Maestro did have one 
friend, painter Baugin, also a purist and a real-life person 
about whom little is known.
The film drips with Frenchness, from small details to the face 
of senior daughter Madeleine. Curiously, Anne Brochet played 
Roxanne in "Cyrano de Bergerac" where, without realizing it, 
she was in love with Cyrano, played by Gerard Depardieu. Here 
she loves Depardieu Junior. 
There is an affair that turns sad when young Marais yields to 
the temptations of fame and fortune. Much later, he realizes 
that his ties to the Sainte-Colombe family were more powerful 
than he had thought. 
The music, string and vocal , is a feast for the ears, with 
compositions by Sainte-Colombe, Marais, Lully, Couperin, and 
arrangements and performances by contemporary, Barcelona-born 
master of the bass viol, Jordi Savall.  The faking of 
viol-playing by the actors is entirely convincing. 
The look of the film is a  feast for the eyes. The interiors 
remind you (but not pointedly) of paintings by Georges de La 
Tour, Dutch masters and others.  The secret is exquisite 
lighting, one of the most beautiful and precise I can 
remember. It reproduces perfectly the period's commonly used 
single or weak light sources, as opposed to artificial 
movie-lighting and the lightening of shadows or duskiness.  
The acting by Gerard Depardieu and Anne Brochet is impeccable.  
Jean-Pierre Marielle ho generally has comic or cynical roles, 
is cast again type and gives an unforgettably taciturn 
performance. Depardieu Jr. makes a good debut.   
French director Bertrand Tavernier had made" Round Midnight," 
in 1986. With the help of Dexter Gordon and Herbie Hancock, 
this was the best and most loving film ever about jazz 
musicians. Now Alain Corneau's ninth film in 18 years does the 
same for baroque music. Nominated for 11 Cesars (the French 
Oscars), it won 7, including Best Film, Director, Supporting 
Actress and Music. There were other awards too, such as the 
prestigious Louis Delluc Prize for Best French Film. 

Title
Review for Big Night (1996)
BIG NIGHT *** 1/2  Directed by Campbell Scott and Stanley Tucci. Written
by Tucci and Joseph Tropiano. Photography, Ken Kelsch. Editing,Suzy
Elmiger.; Production design, Andrew Jackness.  Music, Gary DeMichele.
Producer,  Jonathan Filley. Cast:  Tony Shalhoub (Primo), Stanley Tucci
(Secondo), Minnie Driver (Phyllis),  Isabella Rossellini (Gabriella),
Ian Holm (Pascal), Allison Janney (Ann), Campbell Scott (Bob).  A Rysher
Entertainment release. Some Italian with subtitles. 107 min. Rated R
(language). 
The review by a respected critic of a major weekly newsmagazine, had the
following dumdum headline :
"A Movie To Dine For. Big Night Makes Babette's Feast Look Like Pizza
Hut". 
There's nothing in the critic's text that corresponds to that headline
--or to facts for that matter. Since writers almost never write their
headlines, this must have been put in by some kid at the copy-desk, some
new hiree who needs to see more films, to learn about cusine and to read
more Dave Barry.
The only connection between the superb "Babette" and the excellent --but
awkwardly and flatly titled -- "Big Night" is the gastronomic feast that
crowns both movies. 
Scott and Tucci's film is set in the 1950's (when Cadillacs grew fins)
by the Jersey shore. It deals with two brothers who have been in the
States for a short time and are trying to make a go of their restaurant,
"Paradise." 
Primo is the gifted chef who, in spite of the establishment's precarious
situation is a purist. He will not tolerate barbaric requests or
compromises in his authentic Italian cuisine. Played by an actor with an
Arabic-sounding name, Primo  looks and sounds entirely Italian, down to
the hot temper. 
A funny opening scene (with a sad subtext) sets the tone.  One of the
rare customers does not understand the basics of risotto, wants a side
order of spaghetti (another pasta!) and, horrors, wants it with
meatballs, which is an American invention.
Younger brother Secondo, is the practical one, the manager who helps in
the kitchen (a primitive place that produces wonders) but whose main
task is to avoid losing the restaurant to the bank. He's pure of heart
yet also a realist who tries to reason with Primo. But the chef sticks
to his guns:"If you give people time, they learn." Secondo: " I don't
HAVE time." Yet, during the constant, affectionate tension between the
two, Primo insists: "If you comp[rpmise with my work, it dies." 
Nearby is "The Grotto," one of those Italian eateries where waiters and
customers sing, where indifferent, inauthentic food is served, where
phony local color prevails, where (as per Primo) food gets raped
nightly... and where the cash register keeps ringing. The owner, cynical
friend Pascal, is played by that most British actor Ian Holm
convincingly transformed into an Italian.
The single real Italian in the film, Isabella Rosselini, plays
Gabriella, vaguely the hostess and not vaguely Pascal's mistress.
The brothers are handsome and molto simpatici, Primo in his unloquacious
way, Secondo in his natural elegance. They succeed (with, of course, the
filmmakers) in making "Big Night" into a genuine Italian movie set in
the land of plenty, "plenty" that is, if you conform, adapt and leave
ideals behind you. 
Secondo goes to Pascal to search for a solution. It's not forthcoming --
until Pascal mentions that the popular band-leader Louis Prima (yes,
Virginia, there was such a person) is his pal and that he, Pascal, will
arrange for him to come to a special dinner at the Paradise. The
resulting PR and publicity will surely bring more customers.
With the brothers investing their last pennies and immense labor, the
feast does take place. It's a gathering of friends and new
acquaintances, from Pascal to Gabriella, from a nice Cadillac salesman
(just met by Secondo under slyly warm circumstances), to a florist lady
whom Primo is to shy to court, and so on, down to (or up to) the U.K.'s
Minnie Driver ("Circle of Friends") who, as Phyllis, Secondo's girl
friend, is amazingly genuine as a Yank. I say "up to" because the ladies
all tower above the men, not just the diminutive Ian Holm.
There are two surprises in store. One, I cannot mention without spoiling
things.  The other is the meal itself, a repast greeted by oohs and aahs
by the guests as well as the audience.
The menu, gargantuan and sumptuously delicious, starts with La  Zuppa
(Soup), goes on to I Primi (First Courses, in the plural), then I
Secondi (Second Courses, also plural) and I Dolci (The Sweets).  Even if
you find a top Italian restaurant you will not encounter the likes of
those dishes again, recipes of the pre-cholesterol, pre-fat calories
era, all under the sign of the stomach pump. (The brothers are also
chain-smokers). 
We get to the meal well after one hour of film. It lasts no more than 10
to 15 minutes. Before all this, the movie followed the brothers in their
mini-odyssey, especially Secondo. He had taken us for a walk (plus a
ride in a Caddy) that, while sometimes a bit unfocused and slow, gave
his character dimensionality.  Among the asides was an almost hilarious
reversal of sex attitudes. Phyllis wants to cuddle, and much more,
Secondo reacts like a shy virgin. "I want the time to be right. It is
not right for you." Phyllis doesn't get it, while next --surprise!-- we
see Secondo in bed with Gabriella.
"Big Night" is studded with nostalgic Italian and Italian-American
period music in the background and with  sensitive, intelligent touches
in the foreground. The dialogue proceeds in shifts, indirections and
allusions. Almost incredibly for an "Italian" movie, this one has more
pregnant silences than talk and goes easy on loudness and theatricalism.
There are also some visuals of Phyllis and others by the sea, which may
remind you of Fellini or Antonioni yet are not copycat scenes. 
The naturalist tone of the movie seldom abates. It is cannily recorded
and splendidly performed, although some bits do push verisimilitude to
its limits, notably Secondo's fluid command of the American language,
far too unlikely for a recent immigrant.  Some of the wines on the
banquet table look like Bordeaux bottles. But several other absurdisms
are humorous, such as Secondo's linguistic, didactic argument: "You
can't say 'It is raining outside,' since rain always falls outside.." 
Some gastronomes may find food for thought in the comparative
celebrations of Italian cooking and Europe's champion cuisine, the
French, that was glorified in "Babette's Feast." 
Filmically speaking, "BN"'s dialogue-less ending is a little gem as, the
morning after, Secondo makes a simple omelet for himself, his brother
and their assistant. The dish, like the mood, is in touching contrast
with the earlier, intricate relations, preparations and dreams. 
The film won the Sundance Festival's script writing prize. Score another
win for  Sundance,  by now incontestably the breeding and launching
grounds for the New Independent America Cinema.

Title
Review for Harvey Girls, The (1946)
THE HARVEY GIRLS ** 1/4 (1946) Directed by George Sidney. Produced by
Arthur Freed. Written by Edmund Beloin, Nathaniel Curtis, Harry Crane,
James O'Hanlon, Samson Raphaelson based on a story by Eleanore Griffin and
William Rankin, from the novel by Samuel Hopkins Adams. Photography, George
Folsey. Editing, Albert Akst. Art design, Cedric Gibbons. Set design, Edwin
B. Willis, Mildred Griffiths. Music by Lennie Hayton, Harry Warren. Music
director Lennie Hayton.  Choreography, Robert Alton. Costumes, Helen Rose
Valles. Cast: Judy Garland, John Hodiak, Ray Bolger, Angela
Lansbury,Preston Foster,Virginia O'Brien, Kenny Baker,Cyd Charisse, et al.
An MGM film. 101 min.
Mid-budget, undemanding MGM movie about young ladies who are sent West, ca
1870, to waitress in  a railroad restaurant of the huge Fred Harvey chain,
and who also help civilize the uncouth..Very slim stuff in every respect,
including the act-by-numbers performances.
There are pleasant bits here and there no doubt, but the movie lacks the
kind of unity and concentration that give such productions strength and
lift them from the episodic to a whole with character.
I can only guess that the main reason for this is the large number of
writers -- too many cooks spoiling the broth, screenplay by committee,  and
all that. In fact, the only writer's name that stands out is Samson
Raphaelson's, the playwright (some of whose stage works became movies,
notably the landmark "The Jazz Singer") and class A screenwriter who worked
much with the great Ernst Lubitsch and shared with him a sense of irony,
wit and naughtiness. I would bet that had Raphaelson been "The Harvey
Girls" sole scribe the movie would have gained significantly.
This musical's  best feature is the Oscar-winning  "On the Atchison, Topeka
and the Santa Fe"  by Johnny Mercer and Harry Warren, one of the classic
choo-choo songs. Its vigorous nature and imaginative staging make of it  an
interesting break with the typical numbers of earlier musicals, including
movies with Garland. It announces a new style, especially that of musical
"Westerns" like "Oklahoma !" or "Seven Brides For Seven Brothers ."
This number occurs very early in the picture. After that, it's downhill
most of the way, including  much feeble music, though some people  may like
"In the Valley When the Evening Sun Goes Down," sung by Judy Garland.
Note that Angela Lansbury's fine singing voice is her own (as it is in
other pictures) but Cyd Charisse's is dubbed.
[Written December 1988 with 1997 additions]

Title
Review for Harvey Girls, The (1946)
THE HARVEY GIRLS ** 1/4 (1946) Directed by George Sidney. Produced by
Arthur Freed. Written by Edmund Beloin, Nathaniel Curtis, Harry Crane,
James O'Hanlon, Samson Raphaelson based on a story by Eleanore Griffin and
William Rankin, from the novel by Samuel Hopkins Adams. Photography, George
Folsey. Editing, Albert Akst. Art design, Cedric Gibbons. Set design, Edwin
B. Willis, Mildred Griffiths. Music by Lennie Hayton, Harry Warren. Music
director Lennie Hayton.  Choreography, Robert Alton. Costumes, Helen Rose
Valles. Cast: Judy Garland, John Hodiak, Ray Bolger, Angela
Lansbury,Preston Foster,Virginia O'Brien, Kenny Baker,Cyd Charisse, et al.
An MGM film. 101 min.
Mid-budget, undemanding MGM movie about young ladies who are sent West, ca
1870, to waitress in  a railroad restaurant of the huge Fred Harvey chain,
and who also help civilize the uncouth..Very slim stuff in every respect,
including the act-by-numbers performances.
There are pleasant bits here and there no doubt, but the movie lacks the
kind of unity and concentration that give such productions strength and
lift them from the episodic to a whole with character.
I can only guess that the main reason for this is the large number of
writers -- too many cooks spoiling the broth, screenplay by committee,  and
all that. In fact, the only writer's name that stands out is Samson
Raphaelson's, the playwright (some of whose stage works became movies,
notably the landmark "The Jazz Singer") and class A screenwriter who worked
much with the great Ernst Lubitsch and shared with him a sense of irony,
wit and naughtiness. I would bet that had Raphaelson been "The Harvey
Girls" sole scribe the movie would have gained significantly.
This musical's  best feature is the Oscar-winning  "On the Atchison, Topeka
and the Santa Fe"  by Johnny Mercer and Harry Warren, one of the classic
choo-choo songs. Its vigorous nature and imaginative staging make of it  an
interesting break with the typical numbers of earlier musicals, including
movies with Garland. It announces a new style, especially that of musical
"Westerns" like "Oklahoma !" or "Seven Brides For Seven Brothers ."
This number occurs very early in the picture. After that, it's downhill
most of the way, including  much feeble music, though some people  may like
"In the Valley When the Evening Sun Goes Down," sung by Judy Garland.
Note that Angela Lansbury's fine singing voice is her own (as it is in
other pictures) but Cyd Charisse's is dubbed.
[Written December 1988 with 1997 additions]

Title
Review for Last Days of Disco, The (1998)
THE LAST DAYS OF DISCO (1998) *** Written, produced and directed by Whit
Stillman. Photography, John Thomas. Editing, Andrew Hafitz & Jay
Pires.Production design, Ginger Tougas.Costumes, Sarah Edwards.  Music,
Mark Suozzo.Cast: Chloe Sevigny (Alice), Kate Beckinsale (Charlotte), Chris
Eigeman (Des), Mackenzie Astin (Jimmy), Matt Keeslar (Josh), Robert Sean
Leonard (Tom), Jennifer Beals (Nina), Matthew Ross (Dan), Tara Subkoff
(Holly), David Thornton (Bernie) et al. A Castle Rock release. 112 minutes.
R (sex, drugs)
In 1990, first-time director Whit Stillman gave us one of the best films of
the year, Metropolitan. For those who pay attention to the occasional wheat
of independent filmmakers over and above the  regular chaff of Hollywood,
Metropolitan was a revelation. It received one  Oscar nomination, for
writing.(The Best Movie nominees for that year were Awakenings, Ghost, The
Godfather III, Goodfellas, and the winner, Dances With Wolves).
Metropolitan made instantly of Stillman not only a maverick but also an
"auteur."
His film was about Manhattanite preppies and debutantes, a sharp but
affectionate satire whose motor was talk, talk, talk. Then, in his second
movie, Barcelona (1994), took on former preppies and such, older yet still
young, and pursuing careers in Catalonia in the early 1980s. The Last Days
of Disco, set in the Manhattan of the "very early 80s," in time and
characters inserts itself between the two earlier films. Its main people
are preppies turned yuppies-- although someone in the film splits hairs
about that definition and adds that yuppies are always "the other." Not a
silly statement since the focus group correctly see themselves as still
struggling to attain upward mobility.
The motleycrowd centers on Alice and Charlotte, twenty-something Eastern
college graduates working as lowly editorial assistants in a publishing
firm. More companions than real friends, they make a mismatched duo that
labors by day and boogies by night at the same disco. Alice is the
(presumably) sensitive and shy. She is supposed to be brainy, but I was
far from convinced and would trust neither assistant editor with a
manuscript. Charlotte is hard and manipulative. The film's end proves that
there is divine justice as it finds her pairing off with someone she
deserves.
The trendy, unnamed dance club's main Cerberus at the door decides who can
get in and who cannot. We're talking here of inclusion and exclusion that
go beyond the disco and can involve mini-subplots. Acceptance, in the
widest sense is  emblematic  of the characters' lives and mentalities. The
men whom the two girls meet at the club are mostly Harvard graduates. Chief
among them is Des, a sort of assistant manager who snorts coke (he
protests: "I am not an addict, but a habitual user") and pretends that he's
just discovered he is gay whenever he wants to dump a girlfriend.
Admission to the disco is about as hard as entering Fort Knox, yet the
standards, vestimentary to start with, are otherwise vague and capricious.
Some clients are bare-chested, and an older habituee, the Tiger Lady, is
bare-breasted. There are no color- or sexual preference- lines. It's a
strange microcosm of semi-hedonism, mating rituals, and social contacts.
The non-plot's main focus is on Alice. She apparently has no bad hair days,
but did have a bad social life in college, is still self-doubting and
insecure, politely sleeps around and pays the price -- an easily curable
one compared to other aspects of the early 80s. The first year of the
Reagan presidency was when herpes was common and AIDS was identified
Writer-director Stillman has wickedly good eyes and ears for his creatures.
These make up an un-detailable criss-cross of relationships. Males and
females are all Closely Watched Yuppies who talk pretty incessantly --about
anything. Stillman knows those people inside-out. He comes from a
high-caste family, went to Harvard, and before making films he held various
jobs that added to his perceptions of the human comedy. He makes his
characters jump through hoops, feeds them lines, yet this is no artifice
since his movie is like a "fictional documentary" of real-life, a stalking
of people who might as well be wearing lapel mikes.
Jumping from subject to subject  Alice, Charlotte, Des and Co. engage in
conversations -- some can be outlandishly funny-- that overwhelmingly have
in common pretentiousness, false intellectualism, forced wir, smugness,
dumb paradoxes, or analyses that ape the ponderous jargon of a certain
academic criticism. Those people think they're all so smart, but don't
realize that a little learning is not only a dangerous thing but that it
can change literacy into sub-literacy.
The result is that Stillman's devastating reproduction of shallowness and
all-around insecurities may score a perfect 10 but can leave one royally
uninterested in those people, if not downright bored and irritated by them.
The basic mold from which so many of the characters are cast is a good,
anti-Hollywood move by the director, although the several males, unlike the
two girls, can  take some time to sort out.  Add to this that the dialogues
are not always clear to the audience, while, oddly, the characters can make
their interlocutors hear everything over the disco's din. Not to mention
that hardly any dancer sweats.
With his films Whit Stillman has broken new ground but there are limits.
Unlike some genres, Westerns for example, this specialty is not too
repeatable. I hope those are the last days of Stillman's pursuit of
immature pre-thirties types, and that he will come up with his own takes on
thirty-somethings and beyond.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Crew, The (2000)
THE CREW (2000)  *  Directed by Michael Dinner. Written by Barry 
Fanaro. Photography, Juan Ruiz-Anchia. Editing, Nicholas C. Smith.. 
Production designr, Peter Larkin.Music,  Steve Bartek. Cast: Richard 
Dreyfuss (Bobby Bartellemeo),Burt Reynolds ("Bats" Pistella), Dan 
Hedaya ("the Brick" Donatelli), Seymour Cassel ("Mouth" Donato), 
Carrie-Anne Moss (Detective Olivia Neal), Jennifer Tilly (Ferris 
Lowenstein),Lainie Kazan (Pepper Lowenstein), Miguel Sandoval (Raul 
Ventana) and Jeremy Piven (Detective Steve Menteer). PG-13.
Fact. American cinema is increasingly youth-oriented as well as 
youth-depicting. Fact. The increase of independent films keeps adding 
to "youthism" in subjects, characters and film-makers.  Fact. Mature 
characters are getting more and more rare. Fact. Older characters are 
even rarer. Fact. Among the summer flicks of 2000 A.D. "Space 
Cowboys" was a relative rarity for its starring a bunch of old (and 
well-known) actors.
Fact.  On slim evidence, the addition of "The Crew" and its senior 
citizens has caused many to speak of a tendency-- which is a non-fact.
Though not too numerous, movies starring old people have always 
existed. Think of geezer films (several with George Burns or Walter 
Matthau, whether together or not) such as Kotch, The Sunshine Boys, 
Going in Style, Where's Poppa?, Wrestling Ernest Hemingway (with 
Robert Duvall and Richard Harris), Going in Style, Grumpy Old Men, 
the recent (1999) The Straight Story, etc.. plus action movies --from 
cop stories to classic, elegiac westerns like The Man Who Shot 
Liberty Valance, Ride the High Country or John Wayne's swan-song The 
Shootist.
In conclusion, "The Crew" is not as noticeable for its cast's age as 
it is for being a truly bad film about old fellows. These are a 
quartet of four wiseguys (gangsters) from New Jersey, old pals and 
collaborators whom the too- lengthy opening sequences (with other 
players) first depict as they were in their prime.
Those scenes make the mistake of trying to show them both as jolly 
goodfellows and as ruthless killers,  two ingredients that simply do 
not blend. Then the  film jumps ahead to today. The foursome, oddly 
still together,  is in unhappy retirement at Miami's South Beach. 
They all have physical and pecuniary problems aggravated by the 
contrasts with the swinging, shapely and moneyed youths of the place. 
Dreyfuss (whose real age is 52) is somehow the unelected leader of 
the group, where the others' ages run from 60 to 65.
Their day-to-day life includes touches often lifted from other movies 
and, in the new context, not especially funny. (Yes, I forgot to 
mention that "The Crew" is , in theory, a comedy). When the shabby 
hotel they inhabit becomes a candidate for going upscale --disastrous 
news for the four --the group takes measures which escalate and 
involve quid pro quo. These, in turn, lead to Latino drug lords, the 
local police, and other complications,  not the least of which is 
that Dreyfuss's long-lost daughter is now a cop who just happens to 
get in touch with the crew.
There are some possibilities of acceptable comedy, but the overall 
movie lacks that minimum coherence which -- if you follow my drift -- 
can make  incoherence funny. Instead we get the equivalent of 
disconnected scenes by mediocre standup comics. The  individual gags 
which, in theory, might have worked, get lost in the plethora of 
confusion or forced situations.
Among its capital offenses the movie is steadily vague about its 
characters. These are supposed to be Italian-American hoods as their 
names (plus other signals) indicate, but they come through as vaguely 
Judeo-Italian or Italo-Jewish, down to mannerisms, body and language 
English, expressions, vocabulary, references and so on. The makers 
must have tried very hard to attain this messiness.
Expensive scenes and sets are also wasted, as are, without
exception  all the main characters,  all one-dimensional, from 
headliners to most of the supporting cast. Jennifer Tilly plays a 
prostitute (" the leisure profession " she calls it) with a 
formidable decollete which may be by now her tiresome trademark. 
Laini Kazan, looking wonderful at age 60, has the best of the 
supporting roles.  Though also forced, her performance recalls (very 
distantly) her scene-stealing in 1982's My Favorite Year.
If all sexagenarians were like Lainie, life could be beautiful. But 
what the movie suggests more than anything else is that when you 
reach 60 the best thing you could do is vanish from the face of the 
earth.

Title
Review for Broken English (1996)
BROKEN ENGLISH (New Zealand, 1996) *** Directed by Gregor Nicholas. Written
by Nicholas, Johanna Pigott, Jim Salter. Produced by Robin Scholes.
Photography, John Toon. Editing, David Coulson. Production design, Mike
Kane. Music, Murray McNabb. Cast: Rade Serbedzija (Ivan, the father),
Aleksandra Vujcic (daughter Nina), Julian Arahanga (Eddie), Marton Csokas
(Darko), et al. A Sony Classics release. In several languages. 90 minutes.
Rated NC-17 (see text).
Broken English is the language spoken in New Zealand by immigrants from
many countries. The last half-dozen years have seen a wave of people who
want to become Kiwis (the nickname for New Zealanders).
Long ago, the first inhabitants were Polynesians. Much later they took on
the name Maori ("normal") to differentiate themselves from the European
colonists and settlers, mostly from the British Isles plus a hefty amount
of Dutch. Numerous Croatians arrived in waves in the 1890s, the 1950s and
the 1990s.
A family of recent Croatian emigres with their own values holds center
stage in  the movie. Dominating all is Ivan, played by a Yugoslav film and
stage star, now London-based and doing well.
One has to know the Croatian temper to understand Ivan. He is abrupt,
imperious, intractable.  He is doing well in business, yet remains in a
constant bellicose mood. Much of this is caused by his hatred of Serbs,
whose atrocities toward Croats seem to reprise older ones by another
country. Historical enmities smolder. As Ivan puts a spit through a pig for
a barbecue, he tells a little boy to watch: "That's what the Turks did to
us."
Ivan insult for the Serbs is "Chetniks." That is the pot calling the kettle
black. During the Nazi occupation of Yugoslavia, the Serbs had two
resistance movements, the royalists/nationalists Chetniks, under Colonel
Mihailovic, and the communist Partisans under Tito.The two groups fought
the Germans as well as each other. Germany and Italy set up the allied,
independent State of Croatia under Ante Pavelic, the head of the fascist
terrorist organization Ustasha who, in a campaign of ethnic "purification"
so atrocious that it even shocked some Germans, killed hundreds of
thousands of Serbs, Jews, Gypsies, and anti fascist Croats.
The apple of Ivan's eye is Nina, one of his two daughters. She is played by
first-time actress Aleksandra Vujcic, a newcomer to New Zealand who did not
even want to be in  movies. Ms. Vucjic fits her part to a t. She has
presence, earthy sexiness and good looks. In  many  shots she reminds one
uncannily of Lolita Davidovich, the actress born in Canada of Yugoslav
parents.
Nina is something of a promiscuous Daisy Mae figure sometimes trampishly
dressed. Early on, her Tata ("daddy"in Serbo-Croatian), engaged in the
national activity of talking politics, drinking, and smoking with cronies,
notices that Nina is coupling with a young  man in a parking lot. He
demolishes the car. You don't have to be an exceptionally possessive father
to act that way. Feelings run high in the Balkans. From the Danube down to
Crete, there is still a tradition of fathers and brothers who may knife to
death any man who has sullied a daughter's or sister's honor. Ivan is more
of a familiar figure than an exception.
The restaurant where Nina works is owned by an immigrant Chinese, a
"soignee" lady who is into extra-curricular money-making schemes.  Nina's
New Zealand-born mother enables the young woman to hold a New Zealand
passport. The lady boss proposes that she marry, in name only, and for a
bundle, the chef, Mr. Wu, a refugee from China in need of establishing
residency for himself and later for his also undocumented Chinese
girlfriend.
Meanwhile Nina comes on strong to Eddie, her handsome Maori kitchen-mate.
Lightning-fast sex follows, then a love-making scene. The latter got the
movie a rare and ludicrously severe  NC-17 rating. The activity is
suggested rather than seen, as it takes place in darkness.  Director
Nicholas has appealed, to no avail. It has also been suggested that the
real reason was a four-letter disparagement of the Pope (Croats are
Catholics) and his appeals to brotherhood.
Nina and Eddie live together. Furious Ivan blows hot and cold towards Nina,
now loving now mad as hell.  Still, his opposition becomes an uneasy
wait-and-see truce until it explodes and Nina is made literally into a
prisoner within a sealed room at Ivan's house. For more developments, see
the film. It is time well spent.
I was puzzled by most reviewers' recurring mention of the movie as a Romeo
and Juliet story, until I saw this comparison (plus "star-crossed lovers),
in the press-book. This is an inaccurate simplification. It would have been
valid had the lovers belonged to same-origin but warring (vendetta-prone)
tribes. But here we have a racial situation.
In spite of simplifications and cliches, the film is interesting, authentic
as an ethnographic document and as an insight into the increasingly
multi-racial New Zealand, a land of  just three-and-half million people.An
insider's job, it captures diversities and tensions, it peeps into the
colorful Croatian Kiwis.
At one point,  Nina, ordered by Tata to attend a celebration, brings along
Eddie. The situation is tense yet there's also a wonderfully warm and
joyous side to it as the extras,  including many members of the Dalmatian
Club of Auckland, sing with abandon lovely songs. And, in a nice invention,
it just happens that in the neighbors' yard, at a Maori gathering, swaying
Maori perform Polynesian songs. The musical duel and the beauty of both
ethnic repertories are cleverly , if artificially, symbolic of contrasts
and similarities.
The most beautiful and lyrical scene however, comes after Eddie has left
Nina --temporarily, don't fret. She joins him on a tourist boat he runs
with a friend, and she swims among the dolphins.

Title
Review for Rainmaker, The (1997)
THE RAINMAKER (1997) *** 1/2  Written and directed by Francis Ford Coppola,
from the novel by John Grisham  Narration written by Michael Herr.
Photography, John Toll. Editing, Barry Malkin. Production
design, Howard Cummings. Music, Elmer Bernstein. Producers: Michael
Douglas, Steven Reuther, Fred Fuchs. Cast: Matt Damon (Rudy Baylor), Danny
DeVito (Deck Schifflet), Claire Danes (Kelly Riker), Jon Voight (Leo
F. Drummond), Mary Kay Place (Dot Black), Teresa Wright (Miss Birdie),
Virginia Madsen (Jackie Lemancyzk), Mickey Rourke (Bruiser Stone), Roy
Scheider (Wilfred Keeley), Dean Stockwell (Judge Hale ), Red West (Buddy
Black), Randy Travis (Billy Porter), Johnny Whitworth (Donny Ray Black),
Danny Glover (Judge Tyrone Kipler) Andrew Shue (Cliff Riker), et al.  A
Paramount release. 137 min. PG-13.
John Grisham is a best-selling novelist and, to borrow from film language,
an "auteur" in the narrow sense, as he specializes in one genre (legal
yarns) the way X does in horror or Y in romance. But he is no writer. His
prose lacks style and nuances, his characters have to struggle to reach two
dimensions.
He was lucky to have Francis Coppola write and direct "The Rainmaker."
Coppola's script cuts out many of the repetitions and subplots of the book,
streamlines, smoothes it without oversimplifying it, improves it
significantly.
The film comes at the heels of another lawyer movie, "The Devil's Advocate"
in which lawyers are devils and vice versa --literally. It is done in silly
ways that use the supernatural as a facile alibi. "The Rainmaker" sticks to
much more convincing and affecting realism.
Matt Damon plays Rudy Baylor, who worked his way through a lesser  law
school, finished and found a job in Memphis with a sleazy lawyer with
underworld contacts,  Bruiser Stone (Mickey Rourke). Bruiser's office  is
in character, with a minimal law Library but a tank of sharks.
Flat broke Rudy, evicted from his apartment, using his jalopy as home, must
do his tasks for Bruise yet also study for his bar exams, which he does in
a bar owned by Bruise (a good verbal gag) and later in the cafeteria of a
hospital.
Usually, Rourke's presence guarantees a picture's worthlessness, but here
he is beautifully cast. His legman-assistant is Deck Schiffler (Danny
DeVito), ex-salesman, law graduate, record holder in failing the bar exams
--six times. An ambulance-chasing con-man par excellence, he is amoral
rather than immoral. Matters of conscience as as alien to him as a bottle
of Chateau Latour would be to a Dr. Pepper drinker. He is even oddly
likable and very, very funny.
Rudy may sound like an idealist by lawyeresque standards, yet he is simply
a decent youth with respect for the law and warmth for fellow humans. His
duties send him to one main case, that of the Black family, humble people
whose son is dying from leukemia because the huge insurance firm Great
Benefit has refused coverage and claims, not once but eight times.
Rudy passes the bar exams, Bruiser disappears when the Feds get after him,
Rudy and "paralegal" Deck form a threadbare partnership. The two nothings
take on the insurance giant and its phalanx of platinum-plated lawyers led
by the remorseless, semi-oily, clever, experienced, influential Leo
Drummond, whom Jon Voight plays to the nasty hilt but without cliched
caricaturing.
The film's core is the battle royal between David Rudy and Goliath Great
Benefit. I will not give away the twists , turns , twists within turns of
the fight's strategies, a far cry from a mere Biblical slingshot. I could
not reveal the plot in any case, as it is convoluted and requires a
viewer's concentration. Its essence is a powerful expose of enormous scams
of the kinds that are all around us. Rudy turns into an investigative
sleuth ,a muckracker (a splendid word, often misunderstood) akin to those
who have made "60 Minutes" on CBS the most facinating and needed program of
its kind.
DeVito is terrific as he  both lightens and advances the film with comic
relief. Coppola had lightened the structure of the plot with his cuts. Yet
he still retained the character of  Kelly (Claire Danes), a horribly and
regularly beaten up woman --by a beast of a "loving" yet deranged husband.
She and Rudy meet at the hospital cafeteria where he retreats to study. You
guesse the rest. But as the de developments in Kelly's case are quite
complex, the film can only sketch them out. I think it might have survived
more smoothly had this "de rigeur" Hollywoodian boy-meets-girl entirely
excised.
Lone Rudy,innocent in the ways of lawyering, forms personal attachments
with his cases. This is less of a problem with Miss Birdie, a charmingly
pixillated old lady (Teresa Wright, 25 and unforgettable in Hitchcock's
"Shadow of a Doubt," 79 now). She wants to cut out her relatives from her
will and leave everything to a TV preacher, a phony, we surmise  Rudy
gently retorts that the man is well provided for. She replies that he has
much overhead and besides "his jet is getting old." When Miss Birdie's
sleazy son and wife come from Florida, he sells them the story that the
Miss Birdie is wealthy. Pronto, they switch from despising her to fawning.
So much of the film is under the sign of sleaze. The first judge we meet
(played by Dean Stockwell) is sleazy in his way. So are the elegant
"suits,"the lawyers, and the insurance company's casually chic CEO (Roy
Scheider). But the women are not --and this comes organically, naturally,
not as a sop to feminism.
All the actors are perfectly cast and give marvelously good performances
-both Coppola hallmarks. Among the thespians: Red West  (the desperate,
alcoholic father of the dying young man), Mary Kay Place (the mother),
Johnny Whitworth (their son), Virginia Madsen(a witness), etc. Danny
Glover, the new judge, comes from a civil rights, pro-underdog background.
He has natural elegance, a discreet yet formidable presence, a faint but
clear twinkle in his eyes, and the talent to skew some issues gently when
he judges them to serve justice best.
The players would not have been so good without Coppola's guidance. The
bashing of corporate America and its minions does not have to be heavily
underlined. The mere presence of  humane, morally clean young Rudy does it.
By opposing the lawyer-sharks, Rudy is not so much a knight in shining
armor as he is the decent exception that confirms the rule.

Title
Review for Mumford (1999)
MUMFORD ***1/4.  Written and directed by Lawrence Kasdan. 
Photography, Ericson Core;. Eiditing, Carol Littleton and William 
Steinkamp. Production design, Jon Hutman. Music, Cast: : Loren Dean 
(Mumford), Hope Davis (Sofie Crisp), Jason Lee (Skip Skipperton), 
Alfre Woodard (Lily), Mary McDonnell (Althea Brockett), Pruitt 
Taylor Vince (Henry Follett), Zooey Deschanel (Nessa Watkins), 
Martin Short (Lionel Dillard), David Paymer (Dr. Ernest Delbanco), 
Jane Adams (Dr. Phyllis Sheeler), Dana Ivey (Mrs. Crisp),
Kevin Tighe (Crisp), Ted Danson (Jeremy Brockett), et al. A 
Touchstone release. 115 minutes. R (sex, language, dope)
"I never saw A Purple Cow/ I never hope to see one/But I can tell 
you, anyhow/I'd rather see than be one." (Gelett Burgess, 1866-? 
though often attributed to Ogden Nash)
I never saw a shrink. I hope I never will.  The mind-analyzers or 
healers I know are movie characters. By those standards, Mumford is 
most unorthodox.
He's  played by Loren Dean, 30, who has acted in at least a dozen 
movies I've seen -- but I cannot remember him. Here his Mumford 
looks 30 too.  Unlike so many movie shrinks -- especially in 
comedies -- he's not older,  bearded. has no German accent and 
doesn't act shrinkingly. Who's that man?
He has set up business in a relatively shabby office in a smallish 
town called Mumford, too. Ah, there must be a catch to this, but 
what?  Mumford is an old mill-town (no joke about Miltown the 
medicine) which had fallen into bad times but recovered thanks to 
the Panda Modem factory which employs most of the Mumfordians.
Being ignorant of the ratio of shrinks, I would think that the two 
already in Mumford were plenty.  When Mumford appears, three's a 
crowd. He becomes the most popular of his genus, with methods that 
are un-kosher. How he listens or does not, how he interrupts his 
patients, how he cuts them off and even dismisses them, how he does 
everything else are, to put it mildly, different if not odd  But 
he's not "colorful" either.
His clients range from pathetic to compulsive to sweet to 
obnoxious.They are weirdos, but when all is said and done, you like 
them. Something of a modified, sophisticated Frank Capra seems to 
lie beneath the film's exterior.
Most people like Mr Mumford, starting with Alfre Woodard his 
landlady, neighbor and  cafe-owner. Appealing, wise but not 
sententious, probably complex, she's the one major character who 
would never need to consult a shrink. But young  geek Skip 
Skipperton does.
He's the Panda Modem creator, is worth three billion dollars 
already, is likable, has his own problems, spends most of his time 
skateboarding like a champion, does some strange things. To avoid 
the publicity,  he proposes to Mumford that they meet not as doctor 
and patient but as friends. Which they become in reality. It works. 
Mumford, in fact, most unprofessionally, discusses his other 
patients with him. Original, to say the least.
Without making this film primarily a setting for characters, or a 
love story, or a mystery, these and other elements are all there, 
nicely blended, humorously treated, cleverly sketched out. We feel 
that Mr Mumford, an addict of Unsolved Mysteries on TV,  has his 
owns secrets. There are little clues from the start, but they do not 
point to specifics.  We may or may not begin to guess what's up as 
the film unfurls. Yet nothing hits you over the head, you are kept 
watching, enjoying , smiling, and very often, laughing.
All performances hit the spot.  So does Lawrence Kasdan's track 
record, as writer, director  and producer. The first movie he made 
was Body Heat (1981). Then came The Big Chill, Silverado, The 
Accidental Tourist, I Love you to Death, Grand Canyon, Wyatt Earp, 
French Kiss. A select, unhurried body of work, often original and 
pioneering, stressing psychology (unpedantically), interractions 
among people, often several of them. There's clarity and sensitivity 
there, as well as humor as in movies he wrote and others directed: 
Two of the Star Wars and Raiders of the Lost Ark, for instance.
The consistency of a very good "auteur" runs throughout the variety 
of his work. Mumford is the most recent link in a remarkable chain.

Title
Review for King of Kings (1961)
KING OF KINGS (US, 1961)  Directed by Nicholas Ray. Written by Philip
Yordan. Photography,  Franz Planer, Milton Krasner, Manuel Berenguer.
Editing, Harold F. Kress, Renee Lichtig. Set design & costumes, Georges
Wakhevitch. Music, Miklos Rosza. Producer, Samuel Bronston. Cast: Jeffrey
Hunter,  Siobhan McKenna,  Hurd Hatfield, Ron Randell, Viveca Lindfors,
Rita Gam, Carmen Sevilla, Brigid Bazlen,  Harry Guardino, Rip Torn, Frank
Thring, Guy Rolfe, Maurice Marsac, Gregoire Aslan, Royal Dano, Edric
Connor, George Coulouris, et al.  168 minutes.
KING OF KINGS (1961) In 1927, during the waning days of silents, Cecil B.
DeMille made an impressive life-of-Jesus film called "King of Kings."
Nicholas Ray's longer, 1961 version goes one better. It is surprisingly
moving and sober, and though reverential, it amounts to much more than a
collection of biblical postcards. The narration (by Orson Welles) is
limited and well done.
The movie came after a spate of youth-centered pictures such as Nicholas
Rayšs own classic "Rebel Without a Cause" (1955), and after silly titles
like "I Was a Teen-Age Frankenstein" or "I Was a Teen-Age Werewolf." So the
wags dubbed it  "I Was a Teen-Age Jesus " -- a  good jest had the movie
deserved it.
But it didnšt. The joke was unfair to the film, its makers and Jeff Hunter.
Hunter's face may lack the necessary intelligence for his role, but he is
so well directed that he's convincing enough.
True, his King's English is not perfect. Hunter tells the rebelling Jews :
"Romans are conquerors. If you become conquerors you will be no different
than them." Good pacifism, bad grammar. Someone ought to have caught that
jarring "than" and credited Christ with better English, so to speak. But
then, literacy is not Hollywood's forte.
The picture establishes a clear continuity from Jews to Christians, that
is, it stresses the Christians as Jews. There are several unusual scenes.
Among them, Golgotha's disorderly array of crosses comes through like a
mass of TV antennas  --whether by chance or on purpose I cannot tell.
Curiously, the opening of Francois Truffaut's British-made "Fahrenheit 451"
of 1967, with its own antennas, bears some resemblance to this.
(Interestingly, Ray Bradbury, whose book Truffaut adapted, is the
uncredited writer of the narration of King of Kings)
Jesus on the Cross is not a ghoulish sight. We see no torture. The descent
comes very rapidly and discreetly. Physical violence and pain are neither
underlined no exploited.
The interesting supporting cast includes Siobhan McKenna, Robert Ryan, Hurd
Hatfield, Viveca Lindfors, Rita Gam and Rip Torn.
There are many Spanish supporting actors and extras. The movie was filmed
in Spain, as was the entire quartet of "epics" produced by Samuel Bronston.
These were Bronston's claim to fame:  "El Cid" (1961, also partly shot in
Italy and the UK); :The 55 Days of Peking" (1963); "The Fall of the Roman
Empire" (1964). The 1960s were the heyday of shooting "epics" and action
pictures in Spain, including the works of Sergio Leone --his justly famous
Spaghetti Westerns --which were also Paella Westerns.
Beautiful score by Miklos Rozsa. "King of Kings" absolutely ought to be
shown letterboxed, but is not always.  (Edwin Jahiel)
Written = April 10, 1990  Small additions, changes = December 1998
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for White Raven, The (1998)
THE WHITE RAVEN (1998)  No *  Directed by Andrew Stevens. Written by 
Michael Blodgett . Photography, Michel Slovis.Editing. Ben Hedlund. 
Production design, Michael Borthwick. Cast: Ron Silver (Tully 
Windsor), Joanna Pacula (Julia Konneman), Roy Scheider (Tom Heath), 
Hannes Jaenicke (Dockmonish), Elizabeth Shepherd (Hannah Rothschild), 
Jan Rubes  ( Markus Strand) Jack Recknitz (Inspector Zielinski), Doug 
Lennox (General Dodd), Larry Poindexter(Lieutenant Kreister) 
Agnieszka Wagner ( Zofia), et al. 92 minutes. R (violence).
I am positive that this incredibly bad item went directly to video. 
It appears to have been shown on Pay-per-view cable, then rapidly 
went to regular cable. Even watched for nothing (not counting the 
cost of cable service), it is a disaster.
The story,  which swims in a sea of incoherences, impossibilities and 
idiocies,  utilizes actor Ron Silver as the hero. Silver, in a good 
role, can be quite effective, but here he is ludicrous.
Note that summary credits in film guides list only the names of Roy 
Scheider - who has a minuscule role, and Joan Severance, whoever she 
is --who's not even in the film. Talk of sloppiness. Except for 
Silver, no one has much more than a walk-on appearance.
He plays Tully,  a Pulitzer-winning journalist who had done some work 
on a Nazi death camp survivor. In ways that make no sense, he gets 
involved by his editor (Scheider) in the case of The White Raven. 
This was the biggest or next biggest (some 270-plus carats?) diamond 
ever found.
I can't guarantee that my summary is truly correct since the movie 
acts like a sleeping pill. Even so, it would appear that when young, 
a female member of the Rothschild family (French branch) had been 
deported to a Nazi camp, but not before taking with her the diamond, 
which could become her salvation. (The SS of death camps never 
searched their victims, of course!)
Somehow she survived, presumably by bribing the camp's kommandant 
--which is even harder to believe than Star Wars. We meet her at the 
Rothschild Bank in Paris, which is populated by Israelis of all 
types. The lady, who should be by now at least in her seventies, 
looks at most 50. She declares that the stone is worth one hundred 
million dollars, and, if I am not mistaken (which I could well be), 
she wants her stone back in order to give those zillions to a worthy 
cause (Israel?).
Now the camp Kommandant, who presumably knows where the diamond is, 
has been forever a prisoner in a dank Warsaw jail. He is very old, 
very ill, quite crazy and wants to speak to Ron Silver. But before 
Silver gets to Warsaw he flies to Norway where he visits some 
unidentified friends --or rather relatives, and his (?) antique 
grandfather who has been like a vegetable (silent, etc.) since World 
War II. To top it all, it would appear that the very old man had been 
a brutal guard at the aforementioned Nazi camp.
Next, Tully flies to Warsaw. He has been stalked all along, and still 
is, by a young Lieutenant of the US Armed Forces. That fellow is 
secretly following our hero on the express orders of his General, who 
never told him why he had him play private eye. There's also some 
undefined man, a youngish American who plays host and guide to Tully. 
He packs a gun, and so does the journalist.
(There is quite a lot of firing revolvers. And even a bigger lot of 
Tully chain-smoking even during most impossible moments.)
The host takes Tully to a dance club which is full of sexy, 
provocative girls that make eyes and passes at Silver right away. 
Soon gunshots are exchanged with resulting corpses,  and, and, and... 
The nonsense involves women, the young Lieutenant who'll never become 
a Captain, as well as corrupt Polish plainclothes detectives. Unless 
these are gangsters. Or gansgter-cops. Who knows?
Next Tully has a brief interview with the imprisoned Kommandant, whom 
he records on a cassette. I forget what was said exactly but somehow 
there is a hint that Tully, unbeknownst to himself, was also a Jew. 
This does not help the film's stupidity in any fashion I can discern.
Then the American general and his goons appear, want the cassette, 
rough-up Tully. This is followed by the Polish chief of Police (or 
something) arresting Tully (the cop is also after the diamond). Tully 
escapes in the most laughable way, outrunning and hiding from the 
pursuing cops (in their own territory!), finding asylum as well as 
aid from a beauteous female artist. The latter also smuggles him to 
the American Embassy in the trunk (front) of her VW Beetle. Things 
get so dumb and messy that I wonder whether or not the US  Ambassador 
was also after the diamond.
With a few minutes to go, I fell asleep.
The only, microscopic plusses in the movie are: the lobby of the 
Rothschild Bank in Paris which I imagine was imagined by the set 
designers, and looks worthy of the Alhambra in Spain; a few views of 
Warsaw (the real thing) which are new to many of us who have only 
seen the city in ruins after the 1939 Nazi Blitz or the Ghetto and 
other uprisings; and a beautiful model posing "au naturel" for the 
lady artist.
Can't think of anything else. This has to be as bad, dumb and dumber, 
incoherent and incoherenter movie as was ever made on this planet.
The director, Andrew Stevens, has many credits (TV and film) on his 
resume, as producer, actor and director. They are all unknown, hardly 
familiar, or B works. Mr. Stevens is the son of actress Stella 
Stevens, a Southern beauty (allegedly born in Hot Coffee, 
Mississippi), a Playboy centerfold, and for several years  a familiar 
fixture of B-movies, TV series and sometimes more important films. 
My dim memory of her tells me that given a chance she could act 
pretty well. I don't think that even with her modest past she could 
be proud of her boy.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Up at the Villa (2000)
UP AT THE VILLA (2000) ** Directed by Philip Haas. Edited by and 
written by Belinda Haas, based on the novella by W. Somerset Maugham. 
Photography, Maurizio Calvesi. Production design, Paul Brown. Music, 
Pino Donaggio.  Cast: Kristin Scott Thomas (Mary Panton), Sean Penn 
(Rowley Flint), Anne Bancroft (Princess San Ferdinando), James Fox 
(Sir Edgar Swift), Jeremy Davies (Karl Richter), Derek Jacobi (Lucky 
Leadbetter), Massimo Ghini (Beppino Leopardi). Produced by Geoff 
Stier. An October/Intermedia production,  released by USA Films. 
115 minutes. PG-13 (sex)
Playwright, novelist, short story writer W. Somerset Maugham 
(1874-1965) was in his lifetime as known and as read an 
English-language author as anyone, especially for his short stories. 
Crisp, unfussy writing, a cosmopolitan life,  and sharp observation 
led to a host of movie adaptations --over 50 -- from "Rain" (made 
four times) to "The Razor's Edge" (made twice) to autobiographical 
spy thrillers, to international manners and/or intrigue, to the 
British at home or abroad.
"Abroad", for affluent Americans and for Brits who could afford it, 
more often than not meant "Italy." In 1940 Maugham published the 
novella which this film adapts. That was  during the first year of 
World War II which began in September 1939. The story tells mostly of 
British expatriates in Italy, with a light seasoning of Americans. 
Its background included the Fascist Mussolini regimes. but this 
aspect was attenuated. It is underlined and expanded in the movie 
version which starts after September 1938, that is, after the 
infamous Munich agreements were signed by Hitler, Mussolini, British 
Prime Minister Neville Chamberlain and French PM Edouard Daladier.
There's no more blind a person that the one who does not want to see, 
goes a saying. The depicted English in Italy were among those who, 
whether because of delusion, inertia or stupidity did no return home 
to the British Isles, but instead took Chamberlain's foolish "Peace 
in our time" at face value.
The movie's little colony in and around Florence (where the film was 
shot, as well as partly in Siena), go through their small, effete, 
even stultifying social life.
The picture's center is Mary Panton, about 40. A widow with no 
palpable funds, she is staying at a villa loaned her by friends. Her 
confidente (in some ways) is the colorful, cynical, flamboyant 
doyenne (in rank and fortune) of the colony, also a widow, the 
English Principessa San Ferdinando, played with the gusto that Anne 
Bancroft can command so effortlessly. I am not sure whether the 
Princess is a Brit or an American. Her accent sounds like stage 
English, reinforced by her repeated addressing Mary as "duckey."
The other Brits are by and large pallid, dull types, with the 
exception is Lucky Leadbetter, a gay and indigent artist (Derek 
Jacobi) who is also queenishly flamboyant, but merely on the fringes 
of the local high society. His presence is really not needed in the 
story. It is something of a conundrum. I read Maugham's novella ages 
ago, could not find a copy in a hurry, so that I don't know whether 
this character was in the source text or was added in the script
At one of the regular, society dinners, American newcomer Rowley 
Flint meets Mary. He is a playboy whose wife is not around. It looks 
as if that all spouses,whether dead or alive, were or are negative 
entities. Flint immediately starts his seduction number on Mrs. 
Panton. But, though attracted to him, she is hesitant. Having been 
left fortune-less, she is considering a match with Sir Edward Swift, 
a civil servant who is 25 years older than she, properly proper --in 
fact almost comically so,-- in love with Mary, an old friend forever, 
and a candidate for Governor of Bengal. (It was unclear to me whether 
he is a widower or an old bachelor).
He proposes. She needs a few days to think it over. He leaves for a 
short time -- during which Mary a) rebuffs Flint's advances and b) 
meets again by chance Karl Richter, a young (and overly grungy, 
unkempt and gauche) refugee from Austria. Frustratingly, we never 
learn why he is a refugee? Is he anti-Nazi? Is he a Jew? Why has he 
not a Teutonic accent, even a mild one?
Mary, for reasons unclear and somewhat improbable --libido? pity? a 
passing fancy? -- has sex with the awkward youth in "her" bedroom at 
the beautiful villa. The next day madly amorous Karl shows up, is 
politely informed by Mary that "basta is basta," and it was only a 
one-night stand. His reaction is as unforeseen as it is radical.
Major things happen which now throw Mary into the company of Rowley 
Flint who helps her and.....
This film is heavy on accents and dialogues. The clearest English 
accent belong to Italian performer Massimo Ghini who plays the local 
political top dog, as Secretary of Florence's Fascist Party. He too 
desires Mary, which complicates matters.
The movie loves local Italian color, meaning interiors, architecture 
and nature. It also loves to talk. There is much stress on lovingly 
elaborated Tuscan details--which please the eye but slow down the 
action.
No true three-dimensional characters rise up. The improbable casting 
of Bad Boy Penn as a man of the world, a classy womanizer, is hard to 
swallow,both in part and in whole. If you reflect on the fact that 
Penn's was once married to Madonna, his sophistication becomes even 
less likely.  The electricity between him and Scott Thomas is about 
like that of two AAA batteries.
Ms. Scott Thomas is not particularly appealing in any sense of the 
word. What a pity! After the full or part failure of her last two 
films ("Random Hearts" and "The Horse Whisperer") she deserved a 
better role. She is a very special case. Her filmography is far 
larger than most viewers suspect, but it is also obscure, in that the 
majority of her films (mostly European) have not been released in the 
USA. I first saw her in the Rumanian "An Unforgettable Summer" (1994, 
by Lucian Pintillie), a gem where she gives a four-star performance. 
Get it if you can. Or else the interesting "Angels and Insects" 
(1995) by the same husband and wife team that made "Up at the Villa."
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Hero (1992)
HERO (1992) ** 3/4. Directed by Stephen Frears. Produced by 
Laura Ziskin. Written by David Webb Peoples from a story by 
Ziskin, Alvin Sargent and Peoples. Cinematography, Oliver 
Stapleton. Production design, Dennis Gassner. Editing, Mick 
Audsley. Costumes, Richard Hornung. Music, George Fenton. 
Cast: Dustin Hoffman, Geena Davis, Andy Garcia, Joan Cusack, 
Kevin J. O'Connor, Maury Chaikin, Stephen Tobolowsky, Chevy 
Chase (uncredited), et al. A Columbia release. 112 min. Rated 
PG-13 (language). 
Bernie (Dustin Hoffman) is a schlemiel nonentity, a small-time 
Chicago criminal out on bail, awaiting sentencing. Gale (Geena 
Davis) is a hotshot, award-winning TV reporter. She works for 
other opportunistic cynics led by her boss Chevy Chase. He is 
in top form but oddly uncredited. John Bubber (Andy Garcia) is 
a homeless Vietnam vet who lives in his car. These three do 
not know one another. But then a lot of movies depend on 
geometry-defying parallels that meet. 
At night, from his stalled junkmobile, Bernie witnesses a 
plane crash . He is the only person who reaches the disaster 
immediately. And he becomes, in spite of himself, the savior 
of all 54 aboard, including Gale whose wallet he steals. 
Bernie then disappears into the night and fog, inconsolable 
about the loss of one of his $100 shoes. He gets a ride with 
John Bubber. 
Gale's station launches a ratings-boosting search for the 
"Angel of Flight 104," offering him one million dollars. 
Seizing the opportunity, the candidates multiply. In 
credibility-straining but entertaining ways, the glory goes to 
John, literally a shoe-in thanks to his incontrovertible 
proof. 
Bathed, clothed, perfumed, showered with gifts, honors and 
national adulation, John becomes a mega-celebrity. Having 
stolen  Bernie's credit he now steals Gale's heart, by mutual 
attraction. 
Channel 4 in no way smells like Chanel 5. Its cynical 
exploitation of John increases exponentially while he grows 
into a wise, caring, role-model hero. Shakespeare wrote it in 
"Twelfth Night" : "... some are born great, some achieve 
greatness, and some have greatness thrust upon them." It's 
also like the World War II song about an airman named John who 
got a Japanese Zero plane : "Johnny Zero--is the hero--of the 
day." 
John Bubber does good things for people while stating with 
casuistic sincerity that "We're all heroes if you catch us at 
the right moment," a  reassurance that the masses lap up. 
Thinking of media rather than morals, Andy Warhol had said 
years ago that everyone, sooner or later, will have a few 
minutes of celebrity.
John, however, being a decent fellow, suffers pangs of 
conscience, expressed with nice minimalism by Garcia. On the 
other hand, born loser Bernie who has no scruples is out of 
things and not in the loop.  It takes predictable, 
long-delayed but amusing twists for him to realize what's 
going on, for Gale to start suspecting the truth, and for the 
genuine and spurious heroes to be reunited on the top ledge of 
the Drake Hotel. 
The movie was written by David Webb Peoples, co-author of 
"Blade Runner" and writer of "Unforgiven." It was directed by 
Stephen Frears, the cool Brit with grit who made "My Beautiful 
Laundrette," "Sammy and Rosie Get Laid," "Prick Up Your Ears," 
"Dangerous Liaisons" and "The Grifters. "
To movie buffs, "Hero" feels like an amalgam of populist 
comedy-dramas by Frank Capra. Garcia's John Bubber is close to 
Gary Cooper's John Doe in "Meet John Doe," including the 
top-of-the building sequence. "Hero" also has mega-echoes of 
William Wellman's screwball classic "Nothing Sacred" in which 
Carole Lombard, as Hazel Flagg, first believing, then feigning 
that she has terminal illness, becomes a national heroine. 
Also recalled is Preston Sturges's "Hail the Conquering Hero," 
with patriotic Eddie Bracken rejected by the Army but set up 
by friendly Marines as a war hero. There is even a soupcon of 
"My Man Godfrey" where Depression-era, nouveau-poor tramp 
William Powell, recruited by Carole Lombard in a scavenger 
hunt as "the forgotten man," teaches mindless rich socialites 
the meaning of true class and values. Here, John merely turns 
out to be a Vietnam hero. Even Hoffman's name, Bernie 
LaPlante, recalls Laura La Plante, a silent era leading lady. 
I am not bothered by this synthetic approach since the film is 
cunningly updated to the excesses of the media. It holds a 
totally cynical Hollywood view of the people as suckers for 
romanticized heroes and celebrities. 
What weakens somewhat this entertaining movie is the lack of 
the sharp edges you find in its predecessors: Capra's variety 
of characters and issues within satirical sentimentalism ; 
Wellman's  (and writer Ben Hecht's) madcap rhythm and 
repartees; Sturges's warmth behind his cynicism. 
I am not bothered either by still another movie throwback, as 
Hoffman seems to reprise his Ratso Rizzo from "Midnight 
Cowboy."  He lives in a special twilight world of mental, 
psychological and physical debris. He is a no-thinker who 
mumbles and walks with a shuffle that will never get him to 
Buffalo, except, some day perhaps, to its penitentiary. Deja 
vu, yes, but beautifully done, though sometimes it comes close 
to tedium. 
What is really missing though is muscle and zip. Often, the 
plot mistakes agitation for tempo one the one hand, while on 
the other the film can be too slack and complaisant with  
Bernie's scenes. Many of those are self-consciously acted, 
like protracted showcases for Hoffman's abilities. All the 
scenes overdo his character as slobbish, egotistic and even 
feeble-minded, except for some quick-thinking, fast-moving low 
cunning involving illegal acts.  
Those overdrawn and overlong passages are also over-underlined 
by the many closeups that director Frears is so fond of, 
perhaps as a leftover of his old (and impressive) TV days. It 
is as though the filmmakers wanted to get every penny of their 
investment in Hoffman's star presence. They also do this in 
the technically smashing crash-and-rescue sequences. It's like 
"we invested so much in them that we better them out and milk 
them to the last drop."   
The plot keeps going from good to middlin' bits, whether  
between the sketches or within them. Clever parts are followed 
by weak ones and vice versa.  Joan Cusack, as Bernie's 
disgusted ex-wife, is marvelous as usual, but her spite is 
overdone. Her sister Susie Cusack (part of the Evanston, 
Illinois Cusack clan) makes a lovely debut as Bernie's 
court-appointed, rookie lawyer. Tom Arnold plays a likable 
bartender. Christian Clemenson as Gale's cameraman  waxes 
comically lyrical about his lenses and his shots. Davis brings 
brio to her role, but is given a dumb acceptance speech in her 
award scene. Andy Garcia controls his performance with quiet 
soulfulness, but past a certain point, his part spills into 
schlock. 
This is when, in search of a solution, the movie switches into 
abrupt, gauche changes in mood and characters, all fake and 
sentimentalized, so much so that the film now mocks its own 
maudliness with things like a heavenly women's chrous intoning 
"Glory, Glory, Hallelujah" as people mortify their souls. This 
is the ultimate in cynicism. 
Even so, while the sugar spreads around, the film still 
manages to throw in some hilarious touches, as when, on the 
Drake ledge, Bernie asks the firemen for two coffees. Then, 
for better or worse, we switch to a super-Capra, 
lump-in-the-throat Davis-Hoffman dialogue.  
Like many a movie, "Hero" left me straddling the fence. A 
second, distanced viewing will eventually help tip the scales 
better. Until then, my bottom line is that though "Hero" is 
not a must-see, it is easily a can-see.  

Title
Review for Opposite of Sex, The (1998)
THE OPPOSITE OF SEX ** 2/3 .Written and directed by Don Roos. Photography,
Hubert Taczanowski. Editing, David Codron. Production design, Michael
Clausen. Costumes, Peter Mitchell. Music, Mason Daring. Producers, David
Kirkpatrick, Michael Besman. Executive producers, Jim Lotti, Steve Danton,
Cast: Christina Ricci (Dedee Truitt), Martin Donovan (Bill Truitt), Lisa
Kudrow (Lucia), Lyle Lovett (Carl Tippett), Johnny Galecki (Jason), Ivan
Sergei (Matt Mateo), William Scott Lee (Randy). A Sony Classics release.
100 minutes. Rated R. At the Art theater.
A quick poll about what the opposite of sex is produced the following
replies: "That's a dumb question" (3); "Excessive food" (1); " A PG rating
(1); "Running out of Viagra" (1); "No sex" (10), "Celibacy" (1).
The film opens with a small bang. Dedee's stepfather is being buried. He
may or may not have abused her as she later declares, but then Dedee has a
lot of imagination. A teen nymphette-rebel-with-probable-cause, she paces
around the graveside, smoking, and practically kicking the coffin into the
hole. This must mean that she didn't like the man. She clearly does not
like her life, her mother and perhaps herself. A troubled girl.
Post-burial she runs away --to what looks like a small Indiana town but is
a suburb of South Bend--, to stay with her long-time-no-see much older
half-brother Bill. He is a dedicated schoolteacher and seems to be a nice
sort. His lover Tom had died of AIDS and left Bill plenty of money and an
upscale house. He also seems to have inherited the late Tom's sister Lucia.
Rather nervous, insecure, sexually repressed,  and apparently Bill's best
friend, she's a protector of sorts who hovers around the man. Bill's
current lover is a handsome, likable, twenty-something Mattt. Neither man
evinces any gay mannerisms.
Dedee is 16, going at the same time on 30 and on 12. Like the combination
brat, tramp and "agent provocateur" that she is, she sets out to take out
her dysfunctionality on the Indiana Three. She thinks  highly of herself as
a philosopher-sociologist-shrink,  and talks a lot, a big lot. In spasmodic
ways, she also narrates the film. It's an old device but used here with
much originality. Dedee comments  to the audience about everything, acts
like the eye of God, like someone who has already seen the finished movie
The Opposite Sex, can tell us about it and about herself, pass judgments,
tell us what we are expecting but won't get, tell us what she's going to
tell us.
Dedee is a very fast talker. Her language is foul and trashy. She seems to
be savoring all her filthy words, rolling them around her mouth and putting
them in capitals. That kid is a mix of precocious wisdom and infantilism,
lies and truths, skepticism and cynicism, particles of sophistication and
big chunks of false sophistication.
She can be, and mostly is, unbearably irritating, but then that's part of
the script's strategy. Her foul language would disqualify her from being a
snake oil saleswoman, but she gets other  kinds of results. The first major
thing she does in Indiana is to come on blatantly to Matt, verbally and
physically (but the audience is shown no nudity). In a flash she convinces
Matt that he is, or can be a heterosexual, that in his affair with Bill
"you are basically [verb deleted] your father." She seduces him pronto. The
new couple takes off for California, and takes along ten thousand dollars
stolen from Bill as well as the precious urn in which he kept Tom's ashes.
Her seduction agenda. we learn later, is caused by Dedee's being pregnant
by, most likely, one of her Louisiana lovers, teen-ager Randy, famous for
having only one testicle.
This is just the beginning. If you want to pigeonhole the movie, is a sort
of black comedy/farce. Outrageous complications follow in all directions,
include flashbacks, home movies, everything and everybody.
There's local  sheriff Carl played by the bizarre, improbable Lyle Lovett.
He is a widower and sweet on Lucia. When the latter reproaches him "Your
wife was dying and you [verb deleted] her nurse," Carl missing no beat
replies "If Nancy didn't mind..." Bill gets blackmailed, then falsely
defamed by his former student Jason. The town is most receptive to anti-gay
feelings. and a scandal follows in the local media.
Bill and Lucia set out after Dedee-Matt who become Dedee-Randy when the
latter materializes from the sticks of Louisiana. Carl follows Bill and
Lucia. Add to this fights, guns firing, a motorcycle purchase, other
madnesses and non sequiturs. Add to that an incredible trip to Canada as,
by car, somehow (but how?) A follows B who follows C who has gone there
with D, and where E magically pops up, and where the entire cast is
reunited in a cabin in the woods!
The script  overdoes its wish to be topical, current and trendy. Trying too
hard to be original, it overloads the plot, overkills its gimmicks,
characters, absurdism. Admittedly, there are moments of comedy and farce,
but too many of them get drowned in much humor that thinks it is humor but
is not. Instead of Marx Brothers crazy-funny absurdism, we get
crazy-showy, uncensored absurdism, at full throttle. The would-be
avant-garde continuity, including time and space, is a mess.
Is the film worth seeing? Yes, for specialized audiences that are into the
off-beat. It 's an experiment whose originality is interesting, even if it
is too smug, self-conscious, frenetic and patchy. Screenwriter and now
first-time director Don Roos must know the tricks of Pirandello, Brecht and
the French New Wave, but has gone overboard. And we  still don't know what
the opposite of sex is.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Full Monty, The (1997)
THE FULL MONTY (UK, 1997) ** 3/4  Directed by Peter Cattaneo. Written by
Simon Beaufoy. Photography,  John de Borman. Editing, David Freeman  &
Nicholas Moore. Production Design, Max Gottlieb. Music, Anne Dudley. Cast:
Robert Carlyle (Gaz), Tom Wilkinson (Gerald), Mark Addy (Dave), Paul Barber
(Horse), Steve Huison ( Lomper), Hugo Speer (Guy), Emily Woof (Mandy),
Lesley Sharp (Jean),William Snape ( Nathan), et al.  Distributed by 20th
Century Fox. 90 min. Rated R (language, full rear male nudity)
Films about working-class Britons have always been a big chunk of the
United Kingdom's cinema. They were particularly strong and inventive during
the post World War II period, in which they coincided with the Angry Young
Men movement in the theater. Later yet, from the 1980s on, independent
filmmaking, generally produced by television --for TV as well as theatrical
release--consistently focused on working class themes and/or characters. To
a great extent those works reflected anti-Thatcherism and the new
multi-racial society. The approach was veristic/naturalistic, yet often
combined with imaginative techniques, as in the films by Terence Davies
("Distant Voices, Still Rooms," "The Long Day Closes"), or by Mike Leigh
("High Hopes,""Naked," "Secrets and Lies").
"The Full Monty," a first feature for both its director and its
scriptwriter, brings nothing radically new to the working-class genre in
its combination of socially conscious drama, humor, sadness and realism. It
is built, however, around a "high concept." "High" does not refer to
elitism or aristocracy but rather to a plot that can be summarized in few
words: six out-of-work men from Sheffield in Yorkshire, out of work like
many others, decide to make a bundle by doing a strip-tease for an
all-female audience.
Sheffield, once a thriving steel town --as shown at the movie's opening in
a 25-year old, gung-ho, faded documentary--has fallen onto hard times.
Steelworkers have been made redundant, and while unemployment moneys
apparently still keep coming through for months, they do not suffice. With
enforced idleness, there is also psychological trauma, loss of
self-respect, loss of respect from the men's wives, generalized sadness,
even inability to perform in bed.
For divorced Gaz who loves his most likable teen-age son, there's also the
burden of child-support payments  that he cannot meet. But then everyone
has additional problems. Gerald, formerly the immediate (hence disliked)
superior of Gaz and friends, has a lower-middle-classish lifestyle that
includes ballroom dancing and terrible taste in home and garden decoration.
For months, he has been hiding from his missus the fact that he too was
laid off.
One day, Gaz (Robert Carlyle, familiar to some US audiences from
"Trainspotting" and "Priest") notices--and sneaks into--a very well
attended male strip show "For Ladies Only." Not without difficulty he
rounds up colleagues -- including former "enemy" Gerald -- and sets up
interviews.
One recruit, a black man called Horse, has leg trouble but can still "do
the Funky Chicken." Others are inept. And so on. As expected, Gaz's wild
scheme has the built-in makings of comedy as it goes through reticenses,
stumbles and goofs before a motley crew of Chippendale (male strippers)
dancers materializes. The bonding of the men is not far behind.
There are nice inventive bits in the story, but there are also redundant
sections in this tale of redundancy: some protracted footage as the plot
builds up; a somewhat belabored gimmick of Gerald being distracted during
his first job interview in six months; a dead-end glimpse of two of the
would-be dancers discovering mutual attraction. The film comes to an abrupt
ending, with the fellows doing "the full monty," that is, stripping
totally. (We see only a rear view of them)
There must be a trend these days for movies with no closure, as in the last
three films I have seen :"The Edge," "Box of Moonlight" and "The Full
Monty." They stop without showing us if and how their characters have been
modified by their experiences and what happens next.
On the other hand there are semi-throwaway parts that flesh out the
characters: Dave's relation with his wife, his self-consciousness of being
fat (but there's a lot fatter!), Gerald's being repossessed, the moving
moment of a brass band playing "Abide with Me" at a funeral and other
touches. There is also a funny sequence of a police raid after which the
group is proven not to have been breaking-and-entering because a
surveillance tape of their rehearsal is found. (The video might have served
as a learning-through-errors tool but this is not developed).
The acting is excellent. It is as though the private Robert Carlyle's
strong, leftist political convictions (he used to be a labor organizer) not
only underlie his performance but influence the acting of some of his
colleagues as well as the overall mood of the film.
I surmise that had "Monty" been an American product, it would have stressed
very broad comedy, even slapstick, for better or worse. Worse, by
undermining realism through exaggerations such as a bulkier, John
Candy-like Dave in the buff, by leering, by neglecting its socio-political
side. Better, by accelerating some sequences. As it is, the film is amusing
in a way that gets more chuckles than loud laughter. Interestingly, in the
audience I watched it with, the great majority of chuckles came from women.

Title
Review for Caravaggio (1986)
Producer, Sarah Radclyffe.
Executive producer, Colin McCabe.
Camera, Gabriel Beristain.
Editing, George Akers.
Production design, Christopher Hobbs.
Music, Simon Fisher Turner.
Cast: Nigel Terry, Sean Bean, Garry Cooper, Spencer Leigh, Tilde Swinton,
      Michael Gough, Nigel Davenport, Robbie Coltrane, Jonathan Hyde,
      Dexter Fletcher, Noam Almaz, Jack Birkett.
A British Film Institute, Channel 4, Nicholas Ward-Jackson production.
Released by the B.F.I.
No rating.
     Painter-cineaste Derek Jarman, one of the "enfants terribles" of
the contemporary British scene, has come up with an avant-garde
"biography" of the great Italian painter Caravaggio (1573-1610) which
is imaginary yet factual, artful yet campy, arty yet artsy, original
but self-indulgent, and fascinating for specialized audiences.
     Kudos to the New Art Theatre for living up to its name with this
most chance-taking item.  Not that CARAVAGGIO is alienatingly
esoteric: in London it has drawn large audiences; at the Berlin Film
Festival it won the Silver Bear, the second highest prize.  But it is
neither your nice Hollywood biopic of an artist nor a feature-length
documentary, so that, in its bewildering (to some) "otherness," the
outrageous CARAVAGGIO is bound to polarize audiences.
     At the very least I'd say that this is a must for art-lovers and
students, for people interested in off-beat film and theatre and
visuals.  Shot on a limited budget in a warehouse by the Thames,
CARAVAGGIO roams around at will, flashing back from the dying painter
to his youth, and re-zig-zagging forward to the painter's death.
     It is done in broken bits, against all traditional notions of
continuity.  As it goes along, it invents, at times gratuitously, at
times on the fragile basis of history (or legend)--and it is always
perversely, often delightfully, anachronistic.  Stylized places and
years move in and out, merge, fuse, separate.  There are" nows"--the
20th century, vague, almost atemporal; 16th century "thens"; twilight,
"no time" zones; periods when the incursions of modernity in the past
vary in intensity: a corrupt Roman tinkering with a musical calculator
as he talks to a Cardinal, a Caravaggio patron; a typewriter, a
motorcycle, modern dress.  The anachronisms are not visually
intrusive.  They are reinforced by sounds of accordions, jazz bands,
jets, radio or TV, which, however, are not shown.
     The story may be confusing, but the art visuals are not, and
they're quite extraordinary.  Caravaggio used models for paintings and
Jarman goes to the paintings to reproduce the models, as living still
lifes, in minute reconstructions.
     The painter's models were people of the lower classes.  The
revolutionary, naturalistic, forceful, controversial Caravaggio--an out
and out tradition-breaking avant-gardist--used whores for Madonnas (as
in "The Death of the Virgin," scandal-making, because of its different
emphasis of figures), cutthroats for saints, novel angles and
perspectives: in "The Conversion of St.  Paul" a huge horse
dominates.
     Jarman repeats Caravaggio's magnificent use of sometimes brutal
light in what is the best demonstration of chiaroscuro, a Caravaggio
innovation and, to this day, a lesson about the immense possibilities
of one-source lighting.
     Says Jarman: "Caravaggio invented dramatic lighting ... similar to
the kind of light used in the cinema.  In a way he invented cinematic
light....  Every Italian cameraman is grounded in Caravaggio...."
     What was shock for Caravaggio's contemporaries is a different
shock, that of recognition, for us, as familiar paintings follow one
another, "coming to you live" as well as on on canvas.  It is unique,
superbly lit and photographed, and inventive with props which can be
costumes, carefully arranged fruit or painstakingly folded blankets and
rags.
     As Caravaggio paints, the canvases-in-progress are so convincingly
done that, so far as I know, they're the very best I have ever seen in
a film.  (I have no documentation on the movie and I cannot identify the
person who did those paintings).
     Jarman's whimsy goes beyond Caravaggio and into paintings by those
of a like artistic bent or those that Caravaggio influenced directly or
indirectly.  Jarman's actors and objects are in groupings, poses,
situations which do not copy other works of art, but are inspired by
them, mostly by the use of light: references, serious variants,
tongue-in-cheek homages.
     Among them Le Nain, La Tour, Zurbaran and Velasquez...  Sometimes
the trick jumps at you: an amusingly modified David, "The Death of
Danton" in his "sabot" (portable bathtub).  Sometimes the compositions
are throwaway, lightning-fast.  Between blinks you just might recognize
some of them, a Donatello sculpture for instance.
     The film's Caravaggio is bisexual, with the stress on
homoeroticism.  His major non-art passion, Ranuccio, is his equally
bisexual model, a beautiful low-life hunk that becomes the painter's
blood brother after a fight in a dive, and whom Caravaggio kills at the
end.
     Film connoisseurs might notice that CARAVAGGIO does double duty
with its unstated but clear references to the late Italian film
director Pier Paolo Pasolini.  He too came up from the slums.  He was a
revolutionary artist, a Marxist, a homosexual who was killed by one of
his young pickups.  CARAVAGGIO is even built more or less along
Pasoliniesque lines of disdain and provocation.  It also shows the
influence of Jean-Luc Godard, especially the 1982 film PASSION.
     This is a wild film where the actors, pronouncedly British, mostly
play Cockneys who play Italians.  Where a voice-off narration ranges
from poetic simplicity ("The stars are the diamonds of the poor") to
platitudes, disquisitions (e.g., on Giordano Bruno) and purple prose.
Where the painting of "Profane Love" is accompanied by lyrical flamenco
singing.  Where gold coins are stored in mouths, transmitted by kisses
and placed, Mafia-style, on the eyes of Caravaggio's black-suited
corpse, lying in state like a Sicilian Don.
     You cannot judge CARAVAGGIO by habitual standards.  It has
wretched excesses, "longueurs," claustrophobia, calculated distancing.
But it is also an original experiment, a one-of-a-kind tribute to a
ground-breaking master, and a feast of color, light and shadows.

Title
Review for Felicia's Journey (1999)
FELICIA'S JOURNEY (1999) *** Written and directed by Atom Egoyan; 
based on the novel by William Trevor. Photography, Paul Sarossy. 
Editing, Susan Shipton. Production design, Jim Clay. Music,Mychael 
Danna.   Produced by Bruce Davey.  Cast: Elaine Cassidy (Felicia), 
Bob Hoskins
(Joseph Ambrose Hilditch), Claire Benedict (Miss Calligary), Brid 
Brennan (Mrs. Lysaght), Arsinee Khanjian (Gala),  Peter McDonald 
(Johnny Lysaght), Gerard McSorley (Felicia's father), Danny Turner 
(Young Hilditch), et al Released by Artisan Entertainment. 116 
minutes. PG-13
What makes Johnny and Mary run? To the movies, that is. No one really 
knows for sure. Market Research is an approximate non-science. With 
or without it a few things are obvious. The main target of Hollywood 
(the term is used generically) is the under 30 public. Publicity will 
help, hype,  celebrity actors, awards, and so on.
Yet the precise influence of reviews is unfathomable. The bulk of the 
audience reads no reviews. The smaller but still sizable group of 
potential viewers who do read the critics consists of movie 
professionals in one way or another: aficionados, critics, film 
students, people who parse newspapers and magazines...
Most persons in this sub-group limit themselves to one or two 
reviewers, especially if the latter have built up attraction and/or 
trust among their readers. A major example of this was  for many 
years the appeal of Pauline Kael in the New Yorker magazine. Another, 
current case, is the huge popularity of critic Roger Ebert.
But even for faithful followers, a laudatory review is often 
superseded by the question to end all questions : "what is the movie 
about?" Which may result in attending a show -- even if Ebert gave it 
a lukewarm rating -- or not attending, in spite of the critical 
praise, because the film's genre or type is unattractive.
"Felicia's Journey" is about a serial killer. That's all that may 
matter to John and Mary Doe, who may (mostly John) either get their 
kicks from such a subject or be repelled by it.  But here "serial 
killer" is an oversimplification. We neither see nor hear violence 
and there is minimal "Old Dark House" scariness.
Felicia, a 17-year old from County Cork, is bereft of her boyfriend 
Johnny  now gone to find work in England. There's no news of him, but 
plenty of news for him: Felicia is pregnant. She encounters hostility 
from her own, widowed father, and from Johnny's mother.
As the story is told in bits and pieces --and crucial, skillful 
flashbacks--Felicia thinks that Johnny is working in a lawn mower 
factory in Birmingham, the Midlands. In fact he has enlisted in the 
British Army. This is a betrayal of his Irishness, one of several in 
the story. Felicia's father, a fanatical Irish nationalist, betrays 
his daughter who, according to him, has also betrayed her country. 
"You're carrying the enemy within you." Johnny's mother cheats by not 
forwarding Felicia's letters. And there's more to come.
The very naive girl  sets on a journey to find her lover. She crosses 
the sea, reaches the industral Midlands, is confused, and in a chance 
encounter meets Joseph Ambrose Hilditch, who offers to help her.
Hilditch is an amiable, plumpish quinquagenerian who manages the food 
services of a large factory. He is respected by his admiring staff 
for his culinary judgments. He is, in fact, nothing short of a 
gourmet, and in the oddest of places. Since in spite of the Michelin 
Guide's stars, the UK is not exactly a haven of gastronomy, Hilditch 
is a multiple oddity in his profession and his private life. He is 
aloner without any public life outside the factory.
Hilditch lives alone in a large house whose innards and decor mix 
Victorian, Edwardian, and 1950s styles. You expect antimacassars, 
hand-wound granfather clocks, samplers on the walls, aspidistras. But 
what catches your eye is the man's huge kitchen, his large array of 
old but functioning culinary tools, his antique Mixmaster, his 
kitchen video set. Also his collection of popular, Mantovani-style 
LPs of the 50s era.  Outside the house, the past is symbolized by 
Hilditch's old-fashioned suits and his small, old British  Morris 
car, a kind of VW or Fiat Topolino.
The past and haute cuisine meld as Hilditch obsessively watches tapes 
from way back, tapes of Gala's cooking programs on TV. He follows her 
instructions and prepares refined dishes for just himself.
Gala, a Frenchwoman-in-England (played by director Egoyan's wife 
Arsinee Khanjian) was a great favorite of the public when Hilditch 
was a child. Her appearances, cajoling and imperious, are like a 
subtle take-off on such programs. And a young Hilditch shows up in 
them. Gala was his mother.
Which goes a long way in explaining (or does it?) that Mother-Smother 
is at the root (or a catalyst?) of chidhood traumas which turned 
Hilditch into a serial killer. (The film has sensibly eliminated the 
sexual mother-son element). He has, over the years, "helped" a number 
of women with problems (e.g. runaways or prostitutes); he has, in 
these days of electronics, recorded them and their talks on tape. But 
there are no images of the actual murders. Felicia, that other loner, 
is next in line, but...
Of Armenian descent, Atom Egoyan was born in Cairo, grew up in 
Canada, and is one of most prominent filmmakers of that country as 
well as the world. This, his eighth feature, contains many of his 
themes and preoccupations, is more concentrated than usual, avoids 
arty pitfalls, and is essentially a character-driven psychological 
two-hander. Beautifully and intelligently shot and edited, in both 
literal and symbolic ways, it is refined. Ireland is a feast for the 
eyes, yet cruel towards Felicia. Birmingham is cold and miserable, 
yet, ambiguously, what warmth there is comes from a killer.
The movie is much closer to Bluebeard and  Beauty and the Beast tales 
and very far from Vlad the Impaler. Hilditch is, in odd fashion (the 
key words for this film)  likable and pitiful. He is superlatively 
well acted by Hoskins who has said that his character was a cross 
between Winnie the Pooh and Jack the Ripper. A not-so-obvious 
originality in the film -- for visual reasons--was his casting. 
Rotund and/or short killers in movies are the exception and to a 
lesser degree this applies to plain villains too, to whom it is 
easier to give a lean and hungry look. Of course this is not an 
inflexible rule,   especially when one thinks of Fat Man Sydney 
Greenstreet  in "The Maltese Falcon," or Laird Cregar  as the main 
suspect in the Jack the Ripper melodrama "The Lodger" (1944)
The story-telling is both simple and complex. It evokes sympathy for 
Felicia's misery and her naive pluckiness. It is balancing act 
between sad empathy and alienation for Hilditch. Additionally, it 
handles the dangerous  trick of having some un-jarring black humor. 
What do you expect from a movie featuring a Miss Calligary?
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Return to Paradise (1998)
RETURN TO PARADISE  *** Directed by Joseph Ruben. Written by Wesley Strick
and Bruce Robinson. Photography, Reynaldo Villalobos. Editing, Andrew
Mondshein & Craig McKay. Production design, Bill Groom. Music, by Mark
Mancina.Cast: Vince Vaughn (Sheriff), Anne Heche (Beth), Joaquin Phoenix
(Lewis), David Conrad (Tony), Vera Farmiga (Kerrie). A Polygram release.
109 minutes. R (physical and psychological violence)
There was a l953 love story in the South Seas of that title, and a
runner-up title, Return to the Blue Lagoon in 1991. Return to Paradise is
not a remake of either, even though the innocent filmgoer could easily
think it is a romance in the Tropics, especially since the female lead is
Anne Heche who was so recently in the cutely sentimental Six Days Seven
Nights. Here the title is used as very black irony.
Three twentysomething American men spend some weeks together in Malaysia
whooping it up with wine, women and hash. Two of them, old pals, return to
New York: limo driver Sheriff and architect Tony. The third one, Lewis
(whom the others did not know before that trip) stays behind to help save
the orangutans. Two years later, in New York City, Sheriff is approached by
lawyer Beth with terrible news. After their departure from Asia, the
authorities, investigating a missing rental bicycle that the trio had
high-handedly thrown away, had found hashish used by the men. Lewis had
been arrested. Possession of drugs in certain countries can be punished
with utmost severity. The large amount found by the police called for the
death penalty. The only way Lewis can be saved is for the other men to
return to "paradise," share the blame. If both New Yorkers do this, each of
the trio gets three years in jail. If just one shows up, the imprisoned men
get six years.
Lewis is eight days away from execution. Beth, who represents him, tries to
persuade the two men to sacrifice years of their lives. Much of the film
follows Beth's efforts and the men's quandary, with the main stress on
Sheriff and to a lesser extent, on Tony who is about to get married. The
moral dilemma is unbearable. The process is both slow (the men's reactions
are detailed) and urgent. Beth pleads persistently, in fact with too much
dedication and humanity for a lawyer. (This is elucidated later, but too
neatly and for some in the audience, too predictably). The clock is
ticking, as the story uses a countdown (" 7 days left, five days left..."),
a familiar device but in this context without the predictable ending of
pictures about, say, atomic bombs, where, as a rule (and with serio-comic
exceptions like Dr. Strangelove) the world gets saved at the very last
minute.
The countdown is a gimmick, but it works, except for making one wonder why
Beth waited so long to approach the men. Though  explained, this still
feels like a an artificial device. So does a sexual relationship between
Beth and Sheriff. No matter. The slowness of the passing days keeps raising
the situation's tragic level. So, warts and all, the movie is overall a
most gripping work.
Where all this leads us, I cannot possibly disclose, except to say that one
crucial aspect of the plot is the irresponsibility of the press.
The Malaysia of the movie, obviously unfilmable in the real country, was
shot in Hong Kong, Macao and Thailand, standing in for the island of
Penang, one of the 13 states of the Federation of Malaysia. The photography
and the sets are exquisite, with both urban scenes and landscapes made
enormously appealing, a true paradise for the three companions. But no
doubt, in Malaysia this movie will be banned as (I cannot say why) its
national pride, shown as excessive, is bound to upset that country.
The movie is a remake of a 1989 French film I had never heard of, Force
Majeure (Uncontrollable Circumstances) directed by Pierre Jolivet whose
work I know very little. His cast included solid French actors as well as
Kristin Scott Thomas as the female lead.
>From what I gather, Return to Paradise is not doing well in theaters, which
is what would expect, since this is not "entertainment" but as far from a
feel-good movie as can be. All the more reason to catch it now.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Time to Kill, A (1996)
A TIME TO KILL ** 1/2 Directed by Joel Schumacher.Written by Akiva
Goldsman from the novel by John Grisham.Produced by Arnold Milchan,
Michael Nathanson, Hunt Lowry & John Grisham. Photography, Peter
Menzies, Jr.Production design, Larry Fulton. Editing, William
Steinkamp,Jr.Music, Elliot Goldenthal.Cast: Matthew McConaughey (Jake
Brigance),Sandra Bullock(Ellen Roark),Samuel L. Jackson(Carl Lee
Hailey),Kevin Spacey(Rufus Buckley),Oliver Platt(Harry Rex
Vonner),Charles S. Dutton (Sheriff Ozzie Walls),Brenda Fricker(Ethel
Twitty),  Donald Sutherland(Lucien Wilbanks),Kiefer Sutherland(Freddie
Cobb),Ashley Judd (Carla Brigance),Patrick McGoohan(Judge Omar Noose). A
Warners release. 145 mins.Rated R(violence,language)
Sometimes,in the heat of battle,a soldier gets hit by a bullet but does
not know it right away.In "A Time to Kill" many viewers, who, unlike
professional critics, don't watch it with eagle yes, may realize only
later that the film is full of eyebrow-raising items, manipulations,
weaknesses, inconsistencies and cliches.This is because it is such a
go-go-go, kinetic and suspenseful movie with a weighty theme. But do not
misunderstand me. It is a genuine movie-movie that, warts and all,is
interesting to watch, even thrilling at times.
The first reaction I heard after the film was by a bright, movie-savvy,
liberal (that's a compliment) Mississippian."They got the bad things
that happen much better than the good things."Right.
The bare bones of the story: In Canton, Mississippi,the 10-year old
daughter of construction worker Carl Lee Hailey (Samuel L. Jackson) is
raped and almost killed by two sickening white-trash louts. Her father
later shoots them dead while,unfortunately,wounding most seriously a
deputy.
Newish lawyer Jake Brigance(Matthew McConaughey),clientless and in
arrears with all his bills,is a conservative liberal and all around
great fellow. He defends his friend Jackson,even though neither have any
money. The opposition includes venal Judge Noose(Patrick McGoohan)and
D.A. Rufus Buckley(Kevin Spacey),snooty, cold and ambitious for the
governorship.
The town gets polarized between blacks and many of the whites. A dormant
Ku Klux Klan resurfaces in plain sight,goes after our hero-lawyer."Does
he have a family?" asks a Klansman. "Yes? That's good." You can see what
violence is coming,the kind that calls for the National Guard.
There's something so old-fashioned about the movie's style and content
that many filmgoers will think of "Intruder in the Dust" (1949) and "To
Kill a Mockingbird" (1962), both  great, near-flawless movies about
black people accused of crimes in White Power settings. But "A Time to
Kill" is not in their league.
Its time-frame is so nebulous that it is, at first, the new cars that
clue you in that all this is happening in our period--an awkward notion:
the new South may not be a paradise of racial brotherhood (or the rest
of the USA for that matter) but in the film it is seen as a throwback to
the bad old days.
This is mostly because much of the plot revolves around the question:
"Can a black person get justice from a white, local jury?" The answer is
arbitrarily assumed to be "No." When Jake asks for a change of venue, it
is repeatedly rejected by sneaky,tricky,dishonest and whisky-loving
Judge Noose.
Desperate Jake and Carl Lee do find modest funds for the sustenance of
the jailed man's family and for the trial. How this is done--plausibly
or not--is the neatest trick of the week,thought up by an unexpected
person. Many other aspects are clearly manipulative. Take the early
scenes with Jake's wife Carla. She is pretty,she is bra-less under her
tank top,she glistens with perspiration (ladies perspire, men sweat).
All this spells photogenic sex-appeal. 
Take the many scenes with Sandra Bullock. She too radiates sex-appeal.
She is a most talented actress who,unlike most other by-the-numbers
stars, has her own personality.It is a universal truth that Ms.B.is the
most likable and appealing new face of the 1990s.Now,except for Jake and
Carl Lee,all other characters have second-banana roles-which is
good.It's nice to see the British model applied to US movies,for
name-performers (like Bullock) to take on lesser roles instead of having
the film build up their parts for reasons of prestige or vanity.
The problem however is that Ms.B.'s part is phony. She plays Ellen, a
wealthy, patrician  Bostonian, a law student at "Old Miss" (The
University of Mississippi),the daughter of a legal eagle,the sexy owner
of a sexy Porsche convertible,the possessor of vast experience in
jurisprudence,of the ability to find legal precedents in a wink,of a
genius mind and many other fantastic (I used the word on purpose)
attributes. She keeps bugging Jake,offering her assistance for free. He
keeps refusing until,predictably,he takes her on. She keeps delivering
the legal goods,even if it means doing an improbable Nancy Drew turn by
impersonating a reporter,then sneaking into an office where she finds
with impossible rapidity files helpful to the Cause. It's suspenseful
but overdone.
Also predictable is the tentative (but mercifully aborted) start of a
romance between Ellen and Jake.This develops after the perspiring
Mrs.Jake gets ticked off at her husband's endangering his family, then,
for safety, goes with her daughter to stay with her parents.I am not
breaking a state secret by revealing that she will return,all love and
contrition. 
If all this is not undiluted Hollywood hokum,what is? Yet I do admit
that Ms. B. is a charmer,that by Tinseltown standards her lines are cute
and perfectly in character. 
Jake forms a too picturesque volunteer team with Ellen, Harry and
Oliver. Pal Harry (an excellent Oliver Platt) is an Oscar Levant type
(remember him?),a  self-deprecating,boozing youngish lawyer who
painlessly sacrificed his social ideals to the practice of divorce law
that has made him wealthy. Lucien Wilbanks (Donald Sutherland) is an
older man,a colorful alcoholic,a brilliant but
no-longer-allowed-to-practice lawyer. He supplies,it seems to me,more
ethical than legal support.Sutherland plays him with gusto,probably also
relishing the fact that his son Kiefer Sutherland is in the movie as ...
ignominious villain Freddie Cobb.
On the periphery is Jake's middle-aged secretary. She fills a small
function as a kind of Chorus to Jake. Her "I'm a respectable Southern
lady" is played convincingly by,of all people,Brenda Fricker who is
Irish and was Oscared for "My Left Foot."
Samples of additional improbabilities, cliches and in-jokes: 1) Max the
dog survives a fire, which  makes Jake and animal lovers happy; 2) The
overdone discrediting of the prosecution's medical expert followed by
the discrediting of the medical expert for the defense; 3) Sheriff
Walls, who is black and liked by all,enters a redneck bar. The camera
pans his body from bottom to top,as for enforcers in Wild West pictures;
4) Jake's dramatic summation gives us hitherto unmentioned facts
concerning the rape; 5) Judge Noose's name is like a take-off on Wild
West hanging judges,such as Roy Bean; 6) The nasty DA's name is
Buckley,like you-know-who; 7) Carl Lee Hailey's last name is like that
of the writer of "Roots"; 8) Carl Lee's shooting of the rapists is
photographed in cliche slow motion; 9) How did Carl Lee get so quickly
an assault weapon?; 10) Too many habitual or occasional drunks. 
Making up somewhat for excesses,movieish pulchritude or ugliness and the
abundance of local color,are some original points: The NAACP's
involvement, more for its glory than to help Carl Lee. The preacher of
Carl Lee's church who is not above an indirect bribe by the NAACP.The
penury of both defendant and his lawyer,something very real yet almost
never treated in films. Non-dragging courtroom scenes.
Production values are tops.The performers are all very good, including
newcomer-in-a-lead role Matthew McConaughey,the object of huge
publicity.  Whether his looks deserve the hype they're getting is not
for me to decide. Samuel L. Jackson is fine too,but he will surely be
outlasted by the memorable,magnificent Juano Hernandez,the proud Lucas
Beauchamp in "Intruder in the Dust."
The city of Canton is in Madison County. The moral brunt of this
overwrought but well-intentioned film is to throw bridges between races,
the bridges of Madison County.

Title
Review for Midnight Clear, A (1991)
A MIDNIGHT CLEAR (1992) *** 1/2. Directed and written by Keith Gordon
from a novel by William Wharton. Photography, Tom Richmond. Production
design, David Nichols. Editing, Don Brochu. Music, Mark Isham.  Cast:
Peter Berg, Kevin Dillon, Arye Gross, Ethan Hawke, Gary Sinise, Frank
Whaley, John C. McGinley. An Interstar Release. 107 minutes. Rated R
(wartime violence,  strong language).
Television these days is invaded by older movies about W.W.II. In 1992
it was as if the small screen did not celebrate 1492 but 1942, with
older viewers in mind. Yet Hollywood's annual production stream of war
movies in the 40's and 50's--stressing patriotism and exciting
action--became a trickle in recent decades .
In a non-conformist move, the producers of 'A Midnight Clear' had the
courage to make a non-commercial war film at a time when the genre was
not popular among the masses, and a film whose anti-war message, unlike
the premise of most Second World War pictures, is that even the
'cleanest' conflict in US. history, W.W.II, was not a Good War. 
In style and substance the picture is halfway between the disillusioned
, pacifist movies about W.W. I ("All Quiet on the Western Front," "The
Man I Killed," "Grand Illusion," "Paths of Glory") and the few
revisionist movies about W.W.II, mostly adaptations of sarcastic novels
("Catch-22," "Slaughterhouse Five") that underscored the surreal
dementia of armed conflict.
"A Midnight Clear" comes from a semi-autobiographical novel, and it
convinces. It was made with a young cast and by a then-30 year old actor
directing his second movie. His first was "The Chocolate War" (1988),
about a power struggle in a Catholic boys' school. 
The setting is the Ardennes Forest--Park City, Utah, doubles nicely-- a
snowy no-man's land that could be France, Germany, Belgium or
Luxembourg. The time is December 1944, during the Battle of the Bulge,
Germany's last but devastating counter-attack .
An Infantry and Reconnaissance squad of G.I.s is ordered by martinet
Major Griffin (McGinley) to hole up in an deserted chateau (actually a
fancy country house) and report on enemy movements. The soldiers had
been trained for I & R because of their high I.Q.s--which automatically
make of them skeptical warriors. From twelve the squad has dwindled to
six.You take for granted that the "Ten Little Indians" syndrome will
continue.
In the woods, the Yanks encounter a group of those last-ditch draftees
(too old or too young) that the Third Reich called up for its desperate
"Totalkrieg" (Total War).The Germans make with the "Amis" a deal that's
unusual and will have unexpected consequences. But then strangeness is
more rule than exception in wartime. 
The squad is led by its junior,William Knott (Hawke). His name had been
abbreviated to Will Not, then to Won't, but typically the film does not
milk this for effect. Knott is puzzled and not especially pleased at
having been made sergeant.He is the film's narrator and speaks
matter-of-factly about his comrades and the absurdities and atrocities
of war. We're close to Kurt Vonnegut's Billy Pilgrim territory.
The group includes John Lennon-ish "Mother" Wilkins played by the
co-founder of Chicago's famed Steppenwolf Theater, stage actor, then
filmmaker Gary Sinise. Here he is called "Mother" because at 26 he is
the oldest, married and fussy about neatness. He is going crazy fast and
his companions try to protect him."Father" Mundy (Whaley), is a seminary
dropout who has made the men promise to keep their language clean. The
others are called Bud Miller (a beerish Anglo name), Mel Avakian
(Armenian), and Stan Schutzer (Jewish) 
This, however, is not the old movies' motley group of G.I.s, (or the
Dirty Half-Dozen), with the machine-stamped dosage of religions,
ethnicities,professions, voices (one Brooklyn  accent per movie was de
rigueur), or the sameness of their post-war dreams which invariably
featured "dames" and "big, juicy steaks."
In "A Midnight Clear," neither the I.Q.s, nor the men's backgrounds,
physical characteristics, temperaments, skills, differences or
idiosyncrasies are highlighted. Partly on purpose and mostly, I think,
by serendipity, there is about the soldiers a general vagueness that
borders on impersonality, as if the mad tragedy of war made customary
distinctions futile. 
Some bits of religious symbolism seem unnecessary, as does a flashback
of four of the boys losing their virginity, serially and in one night,
to the distraught fiancee of a killed soldier. That's a most unhygienic
sequence. Otherwise though, the film plays down melodrama and
sentimentality, has a clever but not smartie-pants script and does not
push its points.It even keeps a rein on the character of despicable
Major Griffin, clearly suggesting that for the squad it is this fatuous
commander who is the real enemy, not the Krauts. 
The movie had an excellent critical reception, but given its seriousness
and the lack of a promotional campaign it soon returned to the
orphanage.

Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
THE THIN RED LINE ***  Directed, written by Terrence Malick, based on the
novel by James Jones. Photography, John Toll. Editing, Billy Weber, Leslie
Jones, Saar Klein;. Production design, Jack Fisk. Music, Hans Zimmer. Exec.
producer, GeorgeStevens, Jr. Cast:  Sean Penn, Adrien Brody, Jim Caviezel ,
Ben Chaplin, John Cusack, Woody Harrelson,  Elias Koteas, Jared Leto,  Dash
Mihok, Tim Blake Nelson, Nick Nolte,   John C. Reilly,  Larry Romano, John
Savage, Arie Verveen;  David Harrod, Tom Jane,  Polyn Leona, Miranda Otto;
John Travolta (unbilled), George Clooney. A 20th Century Fox release. 170
minutes. R (violence, language)
Legend-in-his-own-time Stanley Kubrick has not made a movie since Full
Metal Jacket (1987). Now, Eyes Wide Shut, his 16th feature (and the most
anticipated film of recent years), is getting closer to release. The other
legend, Terrence Malick, had made only two pictures until now: Badlands
(1973), based on the 1958 killing spree of Charlie Starkweather and Caril
Ann Fugate, and the poetic Days of Heaven (1978), both of which represented
until now the sum total of his work, have attained cult status. Even  more
than Kubrick, Malick has been a mysterious, even reclusive figure.
Suddenly, in late 1998, Malick-Lazarus rose from the dead with The Thin Red
Line. Outside the circle of movie insiders who knew that this movie had
been worked on for years, TRL came as unexpectedly as a new comet.
The title of the autobiographical source book for TRL comes from novelist
James Jones' saying that sanity and insanity are separated by a thin red
line. It applies perfectly to wars, of any kind, and here, specifically to
the battle of the South Pacific island of Guadalcanal , the largest of the
Solomon Islands (August 1942-February 1943), one of the bloodiest
confrontations of World War II.
The film is bloody, all right, but as a war movie, something of a maverick,
complex, introspective work that is unlike anything else in the genre. Its
central part follows the Army rifle group Charlie Company (I wonder why it
is always "Charlie" in movies?) that disembarks in Guadalcanal after the
initial American attack. They wait, fight, lose men, capture a lethal
Japanese bunker on a hilltop, mop up, leave --though the film still goes on
after their departure.
But there's another side to this, a sort of first in war movies, something
that may jar the audience and make it wonder what it's all about, or,
contrariwise, fill some hard-core Malick aficionados with wonder. This is
the voice-over narration by many of the soldiers. In his previous two
movies too, Malick had resorted to voice-overs, quite successfully. Here,
however, it is not the description of the acts that is related, like the
familiar "...we were all still licking our wounds from the attack when the
captain issued the order to...," but a series of introspections,
psychological/philosophical/mystical thoughts by the men. It's all in their
heads, and much of the time it is well nigh impossible to determine who is
thinking those thoughts.
This is made even more complex by the fact that Malick has cast three
different categories of actors : familiar ones, semi-familiar, and unknown,
many of them looking enough alike to confuse the audience.
Unlike all war films (both formulaic and original) there are few clear-cut
types, whether in physical appearance, characteristic behavior, ethnic
provenance : the Italian-American, the Jew, the drawling Southerner, the
tough-but-great sergeant, the intellectual, the Brooklyn boy who dreams of
a big juicy steak when --never "if"-- he'll get home, etc.)
Malick's "military facelessness" and de-personalization are more true to
wartime than the standard way of having individuals stand out, but the
process is carried too  systematically, too far. There are exceptions, such
as the top man, Colonel Nick Nolte, a career officer whose purpose, it
would seem, is less patriotic duty or hate of the enemy than
self-advancement. "This is my first war " he says, and intends to make the
most of it. Or Captain  Elias Koteas, who is humane and ironically a lawyer
by  profession. (By coincidence, this is the second, very recent
humanization of lawyers, after Travolta's in A Civil Case. Travolta, in an
unbilled cameo, plays a General in TRL. Clooney is billed but makes merely
a microscopic appearance).
At times, the para-Hamletian or Oriental guru-like soliloquies of the men
may make a number of points, but I'd have to see the film again to sort
them out. There seems, however, to be a disconnection between the soldiers
and the nature of their thoughts. One case, clearer than most, is that of
Pvt. Bell ( Ben Chaplin) who is haunted -- in arty visual flashbacks too--
by his young, adored wife. But then this is spoiled by his quoting himself
telling her " If I go first I'll wait for you on the other side of the dark
waters." Were the men at war as poetic as all that??? In fact, did they
ever cogitate in the abstract rather than think numbly of their pains and
troubles?
The simple answer is that there is a single thinker, Harvard graduate and
Rhodes scholar Malick who has parceled out his would-be philosophical,
poetic ramblings to a number of characters. Putting thoughts in the
soldiers' heads is no more than a literary conceit.
The film opens with bucolic (not literally, as their are no cattle) vistas
of a smaller island where two GIs have gone AWOL. From this romantic
paradise (a la Jean-Jacques Rousseau the writer and Douanier Rousseau the
painter), the two men are taken to the ship that's carrying Charlie Company
to Guadalcanal.
This section is for me the best of the film, especially the sequences
where, in the vessel's very cramped innards, we see the mass of soldiers,
near-silent, worried, puzzled, fearful, sailing toward a future that's
unknown except for the fact that things will be bad. On land, much of this
is very well shown too. But I will not get into the critical cliche of "you
feel you are there." No film viewer has ever felt in his/her seat, even
remotely, what it is like to be in combat, in a death camp, a prison's
work-gang, a landing craft, and on and on.
What we really feel like is that we know nothing of the way the men feel
like, what the smells, the itches, the normal pains and the pains from
wounds, the fears, the thoughts of any individual are like, and the
confusion of all, at all times.
The interior monologues have a visual counterpart in the stylization of
nature. As an incurable history buff, I have looked at  endless footage by
combat cameramen. The Guadalcanal I've seen often makes Malick's island
seem arty. (He shot about four fifths of it in Australia  and one-fifth in
the Solomons). He has depicted much of the land in esthetic ways in order,
I suppose, to contrast the inhumanity of humans and of the animals'
survival of the species to the beauty of nature. Nothing wrong with this,
but over-underlining it can be counter-productive and distracting.
People in the know, too, may wonder about the absence of mosquitoes. At
Guadalcanal there were  24,000 Japanese killed,  and 1,600 Americans, but
there were many more thousands who died of malaria and other tropical
diseases.
This romanticism, however, is counterbalanced by combat scenes that are
mercilessly naturalistic and impart a feeling of "real time." The
piece-de-resistance attack on the Japanese bunker is splendidly
choreographed and shot. Notable too is the fact that unlike other movies,
the enemy are not "them dirty Japs" but anonymous human beings who, when
vanquished, become pitiful in their terror. Excellent too is the score by
the ever-original Hans Zimmer. Production designer Jack Fisk (Sissy
Spacek's husband) had also designed the sets for the other two Malick films.
Seesawing between realism and surrealism, cold facts and nebulous thoughts
where one cannot separate wheat from chaff, the movie may appear to be
suffering from personality disorders. In fact, it does. Beginning about ten
years ago, the genesis, preparation and realization of TRL have been an
epic mess. For his casting, Malick approached a Who's Who of performers,
sent many of them the script, had many read for him. The cast kept
changing, actors engaged were dismissed, replacement actors also were
canceled, texts constantly modified, parts modified or cut. During filming,
changes seem to have occurred by the hour. After certain ( many!) scenes
and sequences were done, Malick re-did them, often with major parts getting
reduced to near-zero. The actors were driven batty. And in the editing
stages, Malick re-re-remade his film in the cutting room.
The red line that separates sanity from madness was, indeed, very thin in
the making of this picture. It's a wonder that the end result, with all its
chaotic peculiarities, is nonetheless, memorable. And it does have one
happy aspect: the soldiers, who worry about everything, do not worry about
getting killed by their chain-smoking cigarettes.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Fatal Attraction (1987)
FATAL ATTRACTION (1987) Directed by Adrian Lyne. Screenplay by James
Dearden from his earlier original screenplay. Produced by Stanley R. Jaffe
and Sherry Lansing. Cinematography, Howard Atherton. Production design, Mel
Bourne. Editing, Michael Kahn and Peter E. Berger. Music, Maurice Jarre.
Cast: Michael Douglas, Glenn Close, Anne Archer, et al. A Paramount
picture. 121 minutes.  Rated R.
Some extramarital affairs are no bargains when the chickens come home to
roost. If the chickens are more like hawks with talons, the price rises
much higher.  As when, in "Fatal Attraction" Yuppie lawyer Michael Douglas
has a passionate weekend with career woman Glenn Close. She turns out to be
mentally unstable, thinks of herself as a victim,  and victimizes her
three-day lover.
"Attraction"'s unusual  credits  state: "screenplay  by James Dearden,
from his original screenplay. "  In fact,  Dearden expanded all of
"Diversion,"  a 45-minute British  film  that he had both written and
directed in 1979.  This  is  an excellent, tight work, where a commonplace
situation is packed with uncommon twists -- sharply observed, credible,
well-directed and acted.  It can be seen on television's A & E
"Shortstories" program.
In "Diversion,"  a  thirtyish London writer sees his wife and little girl
off on a weekend in his mother-in-law's  country house. Although he does
not look like a philanderer (he is rather colorless and solemn, ) the man
immediately calls a  young woman met some time ago at a party. She accepts
a date,  seems to be most realistic about  such escapades by married men,
treats the shy, embarrassed writer with irony, yet has an instant affair
with him.
Right away, she starts making demands on his time, resents his leaving her
apartment while she was still post-coitally asleep, wants to see him again,
cajoles him with her cooking. What was for the man a passing diversion with
a willing partner, becomes a problem as the  lady goes as far as
blackmail by slashing her wrists .She  hounds him by phone, even after the
return  of the wife and child. "Diversion" stops there, with an open
non-end, or lack of closure if you will.
James Dearden, a Britisher, is the son of  writer-director Basil Dearden (
"Dead Of Night,"" The Captive Heart,"" Sapphire,"" Khartoum," etc.) For
"Diversion" James Dearden  was awarded the Gold Plaque --  not by  the
American Dental Association, but by the 1980 Chicago Film Festival.
The compact  DIVERSION says all the better things that are found in
"Attraction,"  and does this more honestly, convincingly and believably.
At 121 minutes, "Fatal Attraction" is padded, polysaturated, flashy,
almost three times longer but not one-third as good.  It was directed by
another Englishman,  Adrian Lyne,  who came from   TV commercials and
applied their techniques to his two earlier features: "Flashdance," and
the  artsy , kinky-sex obsessed,  hard-breathing "9 1/2 Weeks."
The transformation of "Diversion"  into 'Attraction,"   the compromises
this entailed  (a different ending was shot originally), make it  obvious
that Dearden and Lyne took a  coherent,  sensitive product,  fiddled with
it , spiced it up with sensationalism  and   mass appeal gimmickry..
This is not to say that "Fatal Attraction"  is bad.  Though flawed,  its
first two-thirds are quite interesting. But when  the makers commit  the
public-pandering error of adding to the  basic "Diversion" theme the
dimension of a film noir  thriller,  "Attraction"  becomes ludicrous,
disintegrates   rapidly, accelerates its ripening   to the point of
gaminess.
Douglas and Close meet briefly at a party. A second time at a business
reunion. A third time in the street . They  have  an instant,  torrid
weekend affair. He wants to end it.  She does not , and makes his life
miserable , pursues him in every way, becomes increasingly demented, claims
that she is pregnant, and  does very nasty things to Douglas, his car and
his family.
>From sequence One , defects  creep in slowly, at first  perhaps visible
only to the habitual  moviegoer, but  later more and more noticeable.
Before Douglas and Close meet, the movie engages in too much cinematic
foreplay, with all the standard film and TV  homey preliminaries that set
up the happy family ambience chez  Douglas,  his  attractive wife Anne
Archer, and their child. The initial   Douglas-Close encounter is also too
cutied up  the second is natural, the third is full-time movie cliches :
Douglas  ,   struggling with a defective umbrella in a  Manhattan downpour
is rescued by  Close, who happens to be close by.  After a facile witticism
which Asian audiences will not appreciate (" the umbrella must have been
made in Taiwan")  the two fail to get a taxi, have a drink. You could guess
the rest from as far away as Hollywood and Vine,  as Close comes on very
strong to Douglas. The interplay is nicely scripted and played however.
But when we cut  to  love-making of scorching intensity,  the lust  is out
of character with  Douglas . As in his other roles, Douglas has a pallid
screen personality.  With  his  furious carnality, Director Lyne --all
surface and no depth --establishes  with drill-hammer subtlety the equation
of sex and violence.
The copulation  literally throws in the  kitchen sink , where it all begins
with the grace of mating wildebeest , Dolbyized panting and groaning, and
jutting, flowing faucets out of Film 269 :"Introduction to Sex Symbolism."
Physically joined, the couple repair  to the bed's horizontality.  Their
exertions, if copied nationally, would make all chiropractors into
millionaires.
The film's artsy explicitness  continues bulldozing its point through a
transitional close-up of a bubbling percolator. (This is doubly artificial
, since a   chic
woman like Close  would have an expresso machine, a Melitta filter, or a
Neapolitan macchinetta).  Unleashed  physicality later resumes in a freight
elevator,  shot with  suspense-story camera angles.
Yet even with its overkill, the movie  works nicely whenever it follows
closely "Diversion"  in plot, details, characterization and dialogue.  It
does a great deal of this--but at the same time it keeps getting uselessly
jazzed up . The modified plot requires  a confidant for Douglas . So be it,
but why make him into an awful, forced character (Stuart Pankin)?
"Attraction" adds more  leaden symbolism via "Madame Butterfly",  as a
nudge-nudge "cultural" reference for upscale audiences--Butterfly being
another desperate "other woman"   abandoned by her lover.
The feature even  resorts to the old  film noir  convention of the swinging
lamp that  produces now light, now shadow; or the trick of the mistress
visiting the  wife  under false pretenses.  Close's claiming a
Douglas-induced pregnancy is  hard to accept, as  the movie's unclear
time-frame  makes it unacceptably premature.  Since Close is  a fabulatrix
who will say anything to keep her man, a  better script would have kept us
wondering  about  the pregnancy.  Instead, it is not merely confirmed. The
plot works in   a rabbit -- a fertility symbol, not to mention the rabbit
pregnancy test .
That an ordinary,  staid  type like Douglas,  happily married to a
charming wife,  and  with  family  portraits on his desk, could have a
fling with a temptress , is credible. His  misadventure with Close is also
credible.  And in spite of its supercharged excesses, the  basic movie   is
still credible --until it  disintegrates by dragging in silly , gratuitous
shock-and-scare tactics  a la sub-Hitchcock (without the Master's finesse
and cool), a la Brian De Palma (Hitch's seldom  successful imitator)  and
other filmmakers.
Its  nadir may well be in the blatant references to "Psycho"'s  cutlery and
shower. But the movie is to Hitchcock what rabbit ears are to cable, and
all it can invent is to go from   the  shower shots  to a  xerox copy of
the bathtub scene of  the French classic "Les Diaboliques."
The  clutter of  sexually-oriented slashing and plumbing paraphernalia
--and a last, totally inadmissible twist involving the wife -- give  "Fatal
Attraction "a fatal blow.   "Attraction" does to "Diversion" what a
pretentious nouveau-riche might do to  a  classic dobosch torte by loading
it with all the whipped cream, fruit,  ice-cream and nuts stored in the
refrigerator
Like its source, " Attraction" is  a movie of two characters  but to fill
the available time,   the wife's role was  built up . Pretty Anne  Archer's
face is  set into one, unwavering  cheerful smile, which might in part
explain why  hubby strayed,  but it does not work that way,  as  nowhere is
Douglas shown as suffering from marital monotony.  Then, It's Thriller
Time!  and Archer wrings her hands,  has a generic fit  and does the dumb
things the director asks her to do.
There is no supporting cast.  All other actors are mere extras. Douglas's
performance is competent yet also  generic. But Close  is very, very good
in the gradations of her acting.   At  the start  she is an  attractive,
assertive single. She  rapidly becomes someone who is  interestingly
unorthodox yet also unsettling in an undefined way. Increasingly
disquieting, she evolves into a  menacing  maniac,  into  a personality
which is abnormal but  convincing, with each successive appearance having
its own demented logic.  Her physical changes are also cleverly  thought
through.  Close's luxuriant hair becomes gradually dishevelled . What was
originally a trendy, Gorgon look, becomes like the head of  the Medusa. And
Close's  steady, unflinchingly direct  eyes , change into  the stare of
Medusa who could petrify those she looked upon.   Glenn Close should be
remembered at Oscar time.
[Written 26 November 1987, during a period when no ratings with stars were
used by me]

Title
Review for Hua yang nian hua (2000)
IN THE MOOD FOR LOVE (China, 2000)  *** Written, produced and 
directed by Wong Kar-wei. Photography, Christopher Doyle and Mark Li 
Ping-bin. Editing, William Chang Suk-ping. Production design, Chang 
Suk-ping. Music, Mike Galasso, Umebayashi Shigeru. Cast: Lai Chin 
(Mr. Ho), Maggie Cheung (Su Li-zhen), Tony Leung (Chow Mo-wan), 
Rebecca Pan (Mrs. Suen), Siu Ping-lam (Ah Ping),  Chin Tsi-ang (The 
Amah). A USA Films release. In Cantonese and Shanghainese, with 
English subtitles. 97 minutes. PG. A the New Art Theater.
"I'm in the mood for love/ simply because you're near me/ funny, but 
when you're near me/ I'm in the mood for love."
Earlier generations certainly know this famous Dorothy Fields/ Jimmy 
McHugh song,  launched when Frances Langford sang it in her feature 
debut "Every Night at Eight" (1935) --which is about a musical trio ( 
Alice Faye, Patsy Kelly and Langford) singing at a radio station. It 
became a staple in World War II when diminutive Frances, a major 
fixture of Bob Hope's USO show, warbled it to the military all over 
the map.
Cleverly, while the movie has many tunes, it uses only the title and 
not the song itself. It was chosen late in the film's development. 
 From its initial idea to the end of production, In the Mood for Love 
underwent many metamorphoses and its making was interrupted several 
times (with a gap of almost a year).  Among the reasons for this: the 
Asian financial crisis; the almost simultaneous filming of another 
feature (the futuristic "2046"); the fact that the two pictures had 
some mutually influencing elements which resulted in a kind of ping 
pong of changes; director Wong Kar-wei's constant re-thinking the 
film; and last but not least, his working without a script.
  In 1962 the British crown colony of Hong Kong was 35 years away from 
reverting to China. Around that time there was a major influx of 
people from mainland China, notably Shanghai. It put a huge strain on 
housing the newcomers.
The movie opens with Mr.Chow renting a room for himself and his wife 
in a cheerful, crowded and dilapidated house. At the same time, 
Mrs.Su does the same for herself and her husband. The new tenants 
have adjoining rooms. We do not see their spouses, who both 
incessantly take business trips. The movie spells out few facts, so 
that the audience has to be on its toes and infer a great deal.
The beautiful Mrs. Su wears a succession of gorgeous dresses, 
craftily color-coded. Handsome Mr. Chow is elegant in his many 
changes of impeccable suits. When I first saw the movie there were 
raised eyebrows about the contrast between chic apparel and shabby 
dwellings, but this is explained by Hong Kong's huge housing shortage 
in the early 60s.
It is inevitable that during the absence of their peripatetic mates, 
Su and Chow will meet, chat in restaurants or noodle  shops 
(noodlerias?), feel mutual attraction. Su works in the office of 
businessman Mr. Ho as his secretary as well as  something like a 
general manager. (We only see briefly just one other employee, an 
errand boy). I repeat, the movie skimps on traditional orientations 
and explanations in favor of its overwhelming subject, "A Man and a 
Woman."
Mr. Ho has a wife and a mistress. Su is not only aware of this but 
imperturbably sets up appointments for Ho and the younger woman, 
covers for him, and has her husband bring back from his trips abroad 
duplicate gifts for Ho's two ladies.
Chow is a journalist. The film's minimal information and parsimonious 
clues reveal this to us slowly. Only much later do we learn that Chow 
is a newspaper's editor.
Over a restaurant the new twosome realize that his wife and her 
husband are lovers. In most scenarios this would give our couple 
carte blanche for carnal knowledge, but here neither the man nor the 
woman "wants to be like them." So the movie intensifies its ballet of 
hesitancies. That's the film's core. It is done with sympathy, 
exemplary delicacy and discretion and underplayed micro-changes. The 
principals meet and meet and meet while repeating "we should not be 
seen together."
This unusual love story goes hand in hand with the acute estheticism 
of its director and its ace cinematographers. Comings and goings, in 
contrast to the protagonists' sartorial elegance, are set in often 
chiaroscuro interiors, in narrow streets with picturesque rain, with 
a stress on walls that have the beauty of decay. The cautious 
symbolism here is reinforced by the soundtrack. Nat King Cole is 
heard doing a number of Latin versions of familiar love songs. (His 
Spanish is fine, a tad Argentinean.  Clue: he says Jo for Yo). There 
are other songs, as well as a too repetitious theme for meowing 
strings.
The terms "Mood" and "Love" are in this work's bloodstream. They are 
expressed without the need for running dialogue. Understatement is 
the order of the day along with major pauses and silences. The 
director made many cuts in the original footage shot, so as to weed 
out and "purify" the movie. This is minimalism as well as an unusual 
form of film asceticism that recalls the strategies of some great 
filmmakers, such as Ozu and Robert Bresson.
At age 5,  Wong Kar-wei had moved with his parents from Shanghai to 
Hong-Kong. The recreation of the times is both economical and 
precise. As the old houses exist no longer, the shooting was mostly 
done in Bangkok.
The director says that he was influenced by Jean-Luc Godard and the 
French New Wave of the 60s. (But certainly not by the anything goes, 
hippie 60s in the USA as well as Europe). Among his Godardian 
techniques is the avoidance of shot -reverse shot in conversations; 
not always showing one of the interlocutors; platitudes spoken by 
some older people; the absence of a script. But contrary to Godard, 
this bittersweet story never ventures outside its one and only 
subject, does not go from the inner self to the outside, but instead 
keeps the camera rock-steady to lead us from out to in, from the 
images to the soul of the characters.
Is this an Asian "Brief Encounter?"  Is there closure? I won't let 
the cat out of the bag.
The actors are perfect. Maggie Chung's and Tony Leung's careers began 
in the early 1980s. They are mega-stars in Asia, and have made a huge 
number of films. (Ms. Chung did 12 features in 1988!) "In the Mood" 
is their fifth feature directed  by  Wong Kar-wei.
At the Cannes Film Festival (2000) Tony Leung won for Best Actor. The 
two cinematographers and the production designer were awarded the 
Grand Technical Prize.
Movie reviews by Edwin Jahiel are at : http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel 

Title
Review for Fastest Gun Alive, The (1956)
FASTEST GUN ALIVE, THE (1956) Directed by Russell Rouse. Written by 
Rouse amd Frank D. Gilroy from Gilroy's story "The Last Notch.." 
Photography,  George J. Folsey. Editing, Harry V. Knapp, Ferris 
Webster. Art Direction Cedric Gibbons, Merrill Pye. Music, Andre 
Previn. Cast: Glenn Ford (George Temple), Jeanne Crain (Dora Temple), 
Broderick Crawford(Vinnie Harold), Russ Tamblyn, Allyn Joslyn ,Leif 
Erickson, John Dehner, Noah Beery Jr, J.M. Kerrigan, Rhys Williams, 
Virginia Gregg, Chubby Johnson, Frank Stringer,  John Doucette , et 
al.   Produced by Clarence Greene. An MGM film. Black-and white. 
(also colorized).  95 minutes.
A Western. perhaps conceived as an A picture but it comes out like a 
B movie, and a tiresome one at that.
George Temple (Glenn Ford) is a shopkeeper in a very small town. He 
is married to Dora (Jeanne. Crain). He has a secret, which is his 
hidden hand gun that he practices with out in the countryside, then 
hides at home. Turns out (for the audience) that he used to be a 
great gunslinger somewhere else, got sick of it, and moved to where 
he is now with Crain. She is au courant but others are not, in fact, 
they all believe that he is the most peace-loving man around.
Then, unconnectedly, there is, elsewhere, Vinnie Harold (Broderick 
Crawford) who leads a gang of robbers-killers. We first meet him 
after a bank robbery, during which he kills gratuitously a bank 
client. The victim happens to be the local sheriff's  brother.This 
guarantees that the posse will be tenacious.
Cut to Vinnie and Co. hearing that a certain person is said to be the 
fastest gun.  Vinnie does not know him, BUT he is obsessed with being 
the fastest gun alive. Vinnie is as mad as a hatter, a card-carrying 
psycho.  So he defies the champ and kills him.
A witness to all that returns to George's town and, with Irish gusto, 
describes and retells that killing ad nauseam. This somehow irritates 
George and adds to his nervousness with being a shopkeeper. George 
and Dora moved in some four years ago, during which George had never 
touched alcohol. But for the first time he enters the local bar.
When rancher Allen Joslyn, complete in cowboy duds and a gun,  shows 
some braggadocio, peacenik George is doubly irritated, tells Joslyn 
that the way his gun is worn is dumb, ineffectual, useless and 
describes how a real gunman goes about such matters. To the suprised 
customers  he reveals that he, George, used to be a gunslinger. They 
do not believe him. He goes home, gets his gun from its hiding place, 
returns to the bar and gives a demonstration. This includes having 
two men throw a silver dollar each in the air. George puts a hole in 
both coins before they touch the ground.
Now the locals believe him. Indeed, they celebrate the fact that the 
champion is among them.
Vinnie shows up and, you guessed it, wants to duel with still 
peace-loving George, otherwise he'll burn down the town. When a nice 
local offers to fight Vinnie --which means certain death --.George 
relents.
Vinnie is killed, of course. In a trick ending we watch a double 
burial, of "George killed by Vinnie" and "Vinnie killed by George". 
But, by George! his widow does not look desperate. Why?  Because 
there is no George corpse. George is alive, well and spirited away. 
This, to have him stop existing and being challenged. We assume that 
he will assume another identity yet in a distant place, where his 
wife will join him, where they can live happily ever after with their 
child (Dora is pregnant, but it does not show.)
Now that you know the plot you don't have to see the movie.
The flick is riddled with improbabilities. It is the same old stuff 
about gunmen challenging others so as to become Mr. Best. There is 
nothing wrong with this notion. It has served some movies well. And 
our movie makes things clear early on as someone says wisely that no 
matter how "best" one is, there's always someone better. It is a 
good, moral, realistic message which applies to everything in life, 
not just gunplay.
But the picture does not convince. In general this illustration of 
the old song "Anything you can do --I can do better" applies to lean 
and hungry-looking younger men who postulate the title and the glory 
of veteran Colt-users. Here Broderick Crawford  (he of the raucous 
voice) is older than Ford and noticeably fatter. He wears throughout 
a single facial expression..
Glenn Ford wears two:: a pained one, and a very pained one. Not 
unusual for this performer. Expressivity was never his forte.
The  cast includes a number of faces familiar from supporting roles. 
(See credits). None of them has more than a two-dimensional part, and 
this includes Jeanne Crain. Not unusual for her either, with the main 
exception being in  her lead in the excellent "Pinky."
Among the performers Allyn Joslyn is the one who is most out of his 
element. Generally playing nervous or jittery types, mostly urban and 
with an element of elegance, he looks blatantly uncomfortable here, 
both in his part and in his outfit.
Broderick Crawford is wasted along with the others. And 
dancer-gymnast-actor Russ Tamblyn has, all to himself, an 
inexplicable sequence. During a dance, he performs an athletic, 
bouncy-jumpy number which is straight out of "Seven Brides for Seven 
Brothers," in which Tamblyn had played. That was a musical fantasy, 
and a very nice one too. But here the number has no place, makes no 
sense, and while quite admirable, strikes the wrong note. Since the 
moral " Fastest Gun" is a Western, you may wonder what such an 
accomplished tumbler is doing out there in the sticks.
The film's director is a minor name. Among his works one finds the 
definitely un-classic (in fact, awful) 1988 remake  of the 1950 
classic film noir "D.O.A."
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for American President, The (1995)
     Had General Colin Powell seen this film, his decision not to run
for the Presidency might have come earlier.  Who, in his or her sane
mind, wants to be President? Look at the beginning of the film.  It
shows the start of President Andrew Shepherd's (Michael Douglas) day.
It's a talk-as-you-walk clipetty clop sequence of the President rushing
through the corridors of power to his office, with a busy, busy staff
briefing him, asking him to make decisions, fast, fast, and whispering
in his ear the names of persons who greet him.
     Soon President Andy starts remind you of President Bill.  The main
difference is that this President lost his wife to cancer three years
ago.  She was his one and only love.  Now, with high approval ratings,
he has his eye on re-election.
     Otherwise, he has a teen-age daughter, shows liberal tendencies
("liberal" here meaning a positive seven-letter word, not a four-letter
insult), cares for the Nation in general and for good causes in
particular, such as the environment and gun control.  He is a Good
Man--and lonely. (Not enough is made of his solitude).
     Perhaps we shouldn't pity him too much when we see what a
dazzlingly efficient and devoted staff he has, all good people, some
with great symbolic names.  President Shepherd's own is pastoral and
paternal.  His Chief of Staff and best friend (Martin Sheen) is
A. J. MacInerney.  (Godard, I bet, would have preferred
I. B. M. Macintosh).  His pollster is Leon Kodak.  His outspoken
advisor (Michael J. Fox), obviously patterned after George
Stephanopoulos, is Lewis Rothschild--one minority name cannily
replacing another.
     The film rapidly introduces the sinuosities of Washington, their
grandeur, pettiness, and in the President's case, some examples of a
decent person practicing "Real Politik."  Soon the President and Sydney
Wade (Annette Bening), a hot shot environmental lawyer-lobbyist, meet
cute, roughly in the Tracy-Hepburn tradition of initial antagonism.
     For non-philanderer Andy, it's love at first sight, so quick that
you have to wonder.  Still, Sydney is charming, has personality and is
no bimbo.  Andy makes overtures, calls to invite the disbelieving
Sydney (she thinks it's a hoax) to be his date at a State dinner.
     The function is in honor of the new President of France and his
wife.  They are bored because, I suppose, of the well-known lack of
social graces in America.  Because, too, the American President is too
wrapped up in Sydney.  Also because he speaks no French.
     Sydney does, with an atrocious accent, and saves the day.  The
whole sequence (as weak as any, especially in the un-etiquettish way
Shepherd flaunts Sydney) would have been bad enough without adding
linguistic insult to plot injury.  The French President responds in his
native language, which is so incredibly, lousily un-French that I can
predict riotous laughter when this movie gets to Paris.
     Now, one of the better aspects of this film is its impressive
studio reconstruction (with liberties) of the White House.  But if you
can't trust Hollywood to find just one Frenchman for the microscopic
part of Monsieur le President, what can you trust it for?  It is
appalling.
     Research on who played the French Presidential couple has a
funnier pay-off than anything in the film: the thespians are called
Clement Von Franckenstein and Efrat La Vie.
     Sydney rapidly responds to the President's advances, with royal
disregard for safe sex.  What we have here is really a return to
Ruritanian romances between royalty and commoners.  In the early stages
of this love affair, Douglas is more amusing than Bening.  Like the
insulated George Bush who was amazed by supermarket uses of check-out
scanners, Mr.  Shepherd does not know how to order flowers, pay for
things or even get an outside phone line.
     The satire is pleasant.  On the other hand, Bening who normally
overwhelms all around her, is herself so overwhelmed by the
Presidential advances that her reactions are of the "Oh, my God, the
Most Powerful Man in the World has asked me out!...  Is in love with
me...  Has slept with me!."  This excessive kowtowing and shuffling of
feet makes one wonder if Bening's love for Douglas is not initially a
form of Presidentolatry and Groupieism.
     Mercifully, as the relation progresses, the couple become more of
a man and a woman in love.  The film acquires more convinction.  The
protagonists get more likable.  What also helps is the old Heroes-in-
Adversity ploy.  The opposition, led by Richard Dreyfuss as the
unpleasant Minority Leader, Republican Presidential candidate and
Senator from Kansas Bob Rumson (you get the gag), adopts smear tactics
vis-a-vis the President and his lady.  Those ridiculous charges will
lead to the Mr.  Shepherd showing his mettle, doing the right thing by
his conscience, his party, his country, the ACLU and his woman, and
closing the movie with one of those cornily warm and eloquent "Wow!"
speeches that were the domain of Frank Capra's heroes.
     There's not a single scene in THE AMERICAN PRESIDENT that breaks
new filmic ground.  The movie does not hold water.  It is not really
interesting, yet, paradoxically, it does hold your interest.
     The actors are all very good, in a "deja played" sort of way.
Douglas, as a rule likable only when playing bad guys, is here a
simpatico, straight arrow  (for a politico) good guy.  The movie is
sweet and idealistic.  Hollywoodisms, silliness and all, it contains a
certain amount of Beltway truth.  And it moves at a fast, un-boring
clip.  It may also be that today we need the reassurances of Capracorn
just as much as in the days of Mr. Deeds, Mr. Smith and John Doe.

Title
Review for Est - Ouest (1999)
EAST-WEST (France-Russia, 1999) *** Directed by Regis Wargnier. 
Written by Wargnier, Roustan Ibraguimbek, Sergei Bodrov, Louis 
Gardel. Photography, Laurent Dailland. Editing, Herve Schneid. 
Production design, Vladimir Svetozarov, Alexei Levtchenko. Music, 
Patrick Doyle. Cast: Sandrine Bonnaire (Marie), Oleg Menchikov 
(Alexei Golovin), Catherine Deneuve (Gabrielle), Sergei Bodrov, Jr. 
(Sacha), Ruben Tapiero (Serioja at 7), Erwan Baynaud (Serioja at 14), 
Grigoru Manoukiv, Tatiana Doguileva, Bogdan Stupka, Meglena 
Massalitinova, Valentine Gavev, Nikilai Binev, Rene Feret, et al. A 
Sony Classics release. In French (and some Russian) with subtitles. 
121 minutes. PG-13. At the New Art Theatre.
World War II ended in 1945. A year later, in June 1946, the Soviet 
dictator Josef Stalin started a barrage of propaganda in the West, 
especially western Europe where there were many thousands of Russian 
émigrés. Stalin promised milk and honey, or more specifically, 
amnesty, a Russian passport, a warm welcome to the Soviet Union which 
the returnees would help reconstruct after its destructions during 
the Hitler War, and in fact make it even better a Workers' Paradise 
than it used to be.  Russians seem to be more sentimental and 
nostalgic for their country than other people. So a lot of the 
émigrés took the bait --and lived (sometimes very briefly) to regret 
it.
Among them was Alexei Golovin a young doctor from Paris, his young 
French wife Marie, and their 7-year French-born son Serioja.
No sooner had the ship reached Odessa, even before all the passengers 
were on terra firms, the Golovin couple and many others realized what 
a mistake their return was. The majority of returnees get jailed, 
executed or are sent to gulags. The Golovins are spared because the 
Soviets need doctors.
The family is sent to Kiev, in a horrible "kommunalka" apartment 
where at best one gets just room per family, shares facilities (an 
euphemism--we see a man coming out of the toilet carrying his own 
wooden seat!), have no peace, no privacy, and be subjected to 
miseries by others. The people are also always spied upon, informed 
on, betrayed. It's not a wonderful life.
Very, very soon Marie wants to return to France -- and she would be 
stupid if she did not--but in the Soviet Union, what's done cannot be 
undone. Stalinist paranoia and mass madness rule, no one is safe, not 
even in his or her thoughts, not to mention that the least act or 
action can and will result in catastrophes.
Alexei agrees with his wife, but being more realistic (as well as of 
Russian extraction) he advises patience --which will lead a split in 
the couple. It's all very believable and very well documented and 
shown. A third, important character, depending on your set of mind, 
may or may not be considered a melodramatic addition. He is Sacha, 
the teen-ager and star swimmer (played by the son of one of the 
film's writers) who, under circumstances that I find not at all hard 
to believe, enters into a special relationship with Marie and later 
becomes part of her scheme to be taken back to France. The latter is 
a thread (a fat one too) that runs throughout the plot as it deals 
with the failed efforts of the woman (partly because her French 
passport was torn up by the Soviets) to contact French authorities in 
Russia.
There is a great more in incidents, events, surprises, suspense and 
criticism of Stalinist Russia. The movie was filmed in Russia for the 
most part, and has an undeniable  visual authenticity. It is, of 
course, manicheistic, with white hats vs black hats, but there is 
really no way to maintain half-tones and subtleties in situations 
which, in real life, were black and white with little in-between.
Political films are becoming rare and more's the pity. Wargnier 
(pronounced Var-NYEH) had earlier won the Best Foreign Film Oscar for 
his also political "Indochine."
I hope he stays on the track of history and politics, which teaches 
audiences a great deal more than space travel fiction.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Family Name (1997)
FAMILY NAME *** Directed by Macky Alston. Written by Alston & Kay Gayner.
Photography, Eliot Rockett. Editing, Sandra Marie Christie and Christopher
White. Music, Camara Kambon. Associate producer, Jennifer Chaiken.
Executive producer, Nicholas Gottlieb. Released on PBS by P.O.V. 89
minutes. Rated TV-PG.
In September 1998, PBS will air Family Name. It is one of very best of the
the P.O.V. (Point of View) series. P.O.V. is an excellent showcase for
independent non-fiction films, the kind that are found mostly in festivals
or specialized programs. Family Name won the Freedom of Expression Award at
the 1997 Sundance Festival,  and the IFP OPen Palm Award. It was later
released theatrically, but not widely, and reviewed very little, albeit
enthusiastically.  P.O.V.-type films may be eye-opening, informative, and
sometimes major contributions to the art and possibilities of cinema. But
they are no competition for the sights, sounds, mayhem, special effects and
such of commercial theatrical releases.
The filmmaker and central figure is documentarist Macky Alston who went
from editor to producer-director. This is his first feature-length picture,
and an  extremely personal work.
Macky Alston is a member of the North Carolina Alston family, an extended,
large and often distinguished "tribe." Both his grandfather and his father
were preachers. The latter, who appears in the film, is most likable, a
person that many churchgoers wish they had as their clergyman. He was also
an activist in civil rights and apparently remains an advocate for causes
dealing with liberty and justice.
The Alstons go back many years, if not centuries. The child Macky, growing
up in North Carolina, always wondered by the number of his black classmates
called Alston. His curiosity remained throughout the years,  but the
questions he put to his family went unanswered.
When Mackey was in his twenties, his father put in his hands a book about
the history of the Alstons. It turned out that they had been among the
largest slave-owners in North Carolina. So, at age 27 (he is 31 now) Mackey
set on a voyage of discovery, visiting descendants of slaves and of
slave-owners who lived mostly in North Carolina.
It was a natural reaction for Mackey, especially as he was gay. For a long
time he concealed this from his folks, and even when he "came out," on his
parents' request kept his secret from some (or all?) his relatives.With his
first-hand knowledge of concealing certain things, and as a member of a
minority, Mackey was all the more dogged in his search.
He was to have have become a preacher and even attended Union Theological
Seminary for two years, but decided not to continue in that path.
Eventually, he moved to and worked in, New York City. (His parents were in
Princeton, N.J.) He sometimes visited North Carolina. On his last trip he
found out that there were to be two big family reunions --one white, the
other black-- both held in the same week, a few miles apart and unaware of
the other reunion.
With a film crew, he attended both reunions, talking to Alstons in both
groups, especially in Pitsboro, N.C., where the phone book is like one long
list of Alstons of all hues. He also searched in New York and other
southern locations. In Pitsboro, the largest town on Chatham County, he
learned that his great-great-great-great-great-great -uncle Joseph John
Alston owned so much land and so many slaves that they called him Chatham
Jack.
The  film's interviewees are numerous. Some won't discuss this aspect of
their history, others do so reluctantly, others yet respond willingly. The
search expands, branches out, flashes back to Charles "Spinky" Alston, a
notable Harlem Renaissance painter who had died in 1977, extends to past
Alstons  (some, prominent) from the past and the present. Mackey sleuths
tirelessly, looks for documents, records, tombstone inscriptions, and draws
both complicated family trees and clear conclusions
His travels, like those of Ulysses open up doors to factual knowledge,
self-knowledge and mutual understanding, but unlike Homer's linear story,
the trips often  zig-zag and can fold back on themselves. The climax is a
concert attended by both races. It becomes a wonderfully warm
rapprochement. A final surprise of, simply, words on the screen, comes as a
twist both touching and ironic. The truth does set you free.
Curiously, the filmic style of Family Name brings to my mind that splendid
documentary by maverick filmmaker Ross McElwee, Sherman's March (1986).
McElwee, the main character, and also a Southerner who lives in the North,
filmed his own peregrinations in Dixie as he retraced the Union General's
progress --  and in the process documented and analyzed (in often hilarious
ways) the lifestyles, legends and mystiques of Southerners, especially
women. Family Name is dead serious, yet not without gentle humor. It is
really worth seeing.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for True Crime (1999)
TRUE CRIME (1999) **  Directed by Clint Eastwood.Written by Larry 
Gross, Paul Brickman and Stephen Schiff, based on the novel by Andrew 
Klavan.Photography, Jack N. Green. Editing, Joel Cox. Production 
design, Henry Bumstead. Music,Lennie Niehaus. .Cast: Clint Eastwood 
(Steve Everett), Isaiah Washington (Frank Beachum), Denis Leary (Bob 
Findley), Lisa Gay Hamilton (Mrs. Beachum), James Woods (Alan Mann), 
Diane Venora (Barbara), Bernard Hill (Warden Luther Plunkitt), 
Michael McKean (Reverend Shillerman),  Francesca Fisher-Eastwood 
(Kate Everett), Laila Robins (Patricia Findley), Mary McCormack 
(Michelle Ziegler), et al. Produced by Eastwood, Richard D. Zanuck 
and Lili Fini Zanuck. Released by Warner Brothers.  127 minutes. This 
film is rated R (violence, sex)
"True Crime" is about two lady-killers. Frank Beachum, a black man, 
was found guilty of murdering a pregnant convenience-store employee. 
to rob the place of less than one-hundred dollars. He is in San 
Quentin's death row.
The other lady-killer is Steve Everett ( 69-year old Eastwood), a hot 
shot  NYC reporter. His exposes of corruption in high places had made 
him enemies. Worse yet was his compulsive womanizing. This crested 
when he had sex with a minor ("I thought she was 18") who was the 
daughter of his newspaper's owner. Expulsion followed, and a period 
of heavy drinking. Now on the wagon, he is working for the Oakland 
Tribune.
We meet him in a bar where he consumes non-alcoholic beverages. Why 
does he go to a watering spot for those?. One rationale might be that 
he has separated from his wife and does not like drinking alone, even 
Dr. Pepper. On the other hand, the now sober Steve has not sworn off 
sex. At the bar he chats up a colleague, Michelle, a cub reporter at 
the Tribune. She cooperates in the flirtation even though she is 
young enough to be his granddaughter.
After a few drinks Michelle leaves the bar. "Drive safe" says Steve 
in one of those phrases that substitute adjectives for adverbs. It's 
night, it's pouring felines and canines, the windshield wipers are 
working overtime, Michelle drives at over 60 mph in the driving rain. 
Is an accident being telegraphed to the audience? You bet. Michelle 
perishes on the unimaginatively named Dead Man's Curve.
The next day, or rather night, on the stroke of 12 Beachum. will be 
executed. The Tribune had assigned Michelle to interview the man in 
his last hours. What bad taste!  How cynical! Now, with the girl 
gone, Steve gets that job. Right away he senses a miscarriage of 
justice. He has special doubts about the reliability of sole witness 
who claimed to have seen Beachum, smoking gun in hand. Steve 
investigates...
Clint Eastwood as justice-maker, righter of wrongs or crusader is 
nothing new. Nor is the film genre of trying to save an innocent man 
from execution. Almost certainly the first example of this was in 
D.W.Griffith's classic, 4-stories epic "Intolerance" (1916).
The death penalty has been, and still is, a major, controversial 
issue, in great part because some people on death row might be 
innocent.
In his twenty-first film as a director, Eastwood tackles as heavy and 
upsetting subject as can be. But what also upsets me is the number of 
persons saying or writing  that "True Crime," is "entertaining," 
"enjoyable," or "fun." Are we so desensitized?
At the paper, Steve gets strict orders from above to stick to the 
formula and try no tricks. The regulations are set by city editor Bob 
Findley (Denis Leary) and editor-in-chief Alan Mann (James Woods).
Bob is dull fellow who is not exactly enamored of Steve. He just 
found out that Steve had been sleeping with Madame Findley. (She had 
perversely  cued her husband by leaving traces of Steve's passage. 
And Steven had been with her earlier, before going to the newspaper).
Alan is by very far the most attention-holding, lively and 
interesting person in the movie. His behavior, lines and actions are 
pure over-the-top James Woods, one of the most fascinating performers 
in Hollywood, even if his presumed politics are wrong.
Undaunted (as Clint is, perpetually), Steve sets to prove the 
innocence of Beacham. What? Can he do this in just, merely, hardly, 
only a dozen hours  (if that many) before the execution?
That's a bit thick. This thins the plot. What a pity that the 
ludicrousness of it all detracts from the seriousness of a situation 
replete with human pain, anti-capital punishment messages, 
anti-racism, and the injustice of justice gone wrong.
Conveniently and artificially stressing the suspense is the fact that 
with  every minute counting Steve's estranged wife practically 
bullies him to take, on that very day, their 5 1/2 year-old girl to 
the zoo, as previously arranged.  Absurdly, the strong Eastwoodian 
character obliges. (The girl is Eastwood's daughter with Frances 
Fisher. This and other aspects shown seem to be self-references to 
Clint's own womanizing)
Artificially, far too neatly, there's a stress on parallels between 
Steve's failed family and the strong bonds in Beacham's. The latter's 
desperate wife and their little girl visit him for the last time ever.
In artificially and most inappropriately tacked on black humor, the 
San Quentin. prison's chaplain is a smug, unfeeling prig who brings 
phony and wrong "consolations" to Beacham, irritates him as well as 
all others.. It's in terribly bad taste, yet the clergyman is very 
well played by another actor who is on my list of favorites:.the 
superbly versatile, chameleon-like  Michael McKean who, like that 
most hyper of thespians, James Woods, has enhanced many a movie and 
TV series (e.g. "Dream On")
The rest of the cast is good and performs soberly. Fine too are the 
production values, cinematography, and especially the depressing 
sounds of clanking prison doors and gates.
But the film is one of those time-watching affairs where clocks (as 
here) or other types of countdown timers keep approaching inexorably 
the fatal H-hour. It's been used, misused and overused in  movies 
about executions, war, terrorism, heists and practically all other 
genres, comedies included (e.g. Kubrick's "Dr. Strangelove") The best 
application of this, one that transcends gimmickry, is in "High Noon."
Given the impossible time-frame, Steve's instincts are more like 
powers of divination than detection.. His laser-sharp eyes that zoom 
on  crucial clues add to the unrealism,. Steve's movie-traditional 
(i.e. deja vu cliche) last minute mad drive to get to the Governor on 
time to save Beacham is ridiculous.
I do appreciate the portrait of Steve as a superanuated Don Juan for 
not trying to redeem him. However, the under-12-hours cliffhanger 
gets more unlikely by the minute. While the subject is strong,  its 
treatment is wrong. It's patchworky, as if the three scriptwriters, 
rather than collaborate, made  separate contributions which were 
cobbled together in an unreal and unsubtle manner.
The "de rigueur" song that goes with the end-credits is, as usual, 
bad, irrelevant and dumb.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Incognito (1997)
INCOGNITO (1997) * Directed by John Badham.  Written by Jordan Katz. 
Photography, Denis Crossan.Editing, Frank Morriss. Production design, 
Jamie Leonard. Music, John Ottman. Cast: Jason Patric (Harry 
Donovan), Irene Jacob (Prof. Marieke van den Broeck), Thoma Lockyer 
(Alastair), Ian Richardson (Turley), Rod Steiger (Milton Donovan), 
Maja Ottensen (nude model), Ian Holm, et al.  108 minutes.
I ran into this film on cable. Or rather, I collided with it. It 
bruised my taste and my logic. I stuck it out, but it never improved.
  Jason Patric is the painter Harry Donovan. Patric is nice looking. 
Harry is surly and a creature of few words, generally unpleasant. 
That's because --I guess -- he wants to rise to fame and money. What 
he does however, in practical terms, is to forge paintings. And can 
he forge!!! He is said to be the very best of his ilk--and he knows 
it.
The trick is that he creates paintings by far less-known artist, 
which renders the possibility of the frauds being discovered low. 
Very low. Perhaps nil, since we never hear of his having been caught 
ever.
What is clear is that Harry has invariably stayed clear of forging 
the work of great, familiar artists. In fact he says early on "Only 
Rembrandt can paint Rembrandt."
I am a bit confused as to whether he copies paintings or makes new 
ones but in the unmistakable style of A, C or Y. My guess is the 
latter. No matter. Such forgeries do not seem to have attracted the 
inspection and close analyses by specialists.
It sounds like a good scam except that, if you ponder on it, you 
realize that while it makes more sense than making (up) a Van Dyke, a 
Degas or a Van Gogh, there us still a possibility, however remote, 
for connoisseurs of A, C or Y to become suspicious.
OK. Let's suspend disbelief for the sake of fun. But the, where on 
earth is that fun?
The very start of the movie, before we met Harry, is a flash-forward 
of news on TV --inexplicably in black and white. It shows Harry in a 
field being chased by a goodly part of the British police Force; 
burning a rolled item (a painting no doubt) on a fire conveniently 
found in the great outdoors; doing this as the law is tackling him, 
bodily, and as a TV newsman with winged feet also catches up with the 
running man.
The other half of the intro has Ian Holm ---as a kind of conduit to 
forgers and their employers--demonstrating to a small group what 
immense talent Harry has for fakes.
The plot is so murky that I am not sure I got its details right. 
Morose Harry is pissed off at the entire world. The dealers-gallery 
owners and middlemen (middle people, that is) are exploiting him. 
Back at his pad, in London, he sulks. Multiply this by 100 when he 
gets a letter from a gallery, per which they cannot have an 
exhibition of his (genuine, personal) works for some technical reason 
that I forget. Partly because a gorgeous model (Maja Ottensen) with a 
perfect figure, arrives, disrobes and poses, only to be dismissed 
(with pay) by Harry.
So, when fraud sponsors and bankrollers offer Harry a huge amount to 
do a "newly found Rembrandt," Harry says yes this time.
Matters get  exponentially muddled and silly (but not funny-silly). 
They  lead Harry from colorful London to picture-postcard Paris to 
Holland, perhaps to Germany too, but I won't take an oath on this. In 
France, in an outdoor cafe by the colorful Seine river, he meets cute 
with Marieke (Irene Jacob) -- in an improbability of 9.9 on a scale 
of 10. She seems to know something about painting. In fact she is the 
author (I think) of the art book Harry is perusing (just the 
pictures), al fresco--but neither nor we learn this until subsequent 
film sequences.
When Harry goes to the Louvre to look at Rembrandts in the process of 
being restored, in spite of his claiming he is a professor of art, he 
is refused access. But he runs --you guessed it? --into Marieke who 
tells him she's a student, and gets him in.
Having done a bit of spying, he is back on the quays of the Seine. He 
runs into Marieke sitting at a cafe with two French (presumably) art 
specialists. His shoulder is carrying a tree-size chip, so he 
proceeds to insult the two men (on matters of art) leaves. Marieke 
joins him (or he joins her).  She is impressed no end Harry's moody 
outspokenness and original thinking. Before you can say Toulouse 
Lautrec, they're kissing passionately. Before you can say "How about 
it, kid?" they're rushing to her hotel. But she's lost her room key. 
She wakes up the aged night-porter, but the couple is in such a hurry 
that they copulate on a sofa in the foyer as the old fellow looks on 
and thinks, I am sure "Wait 'til I tell Jacques, Jules and Jim about 
this ! I bet they won't believe me."  I bet they won't, too, since I 
can't believe it myself.
Morning arrives in Marieke's room. He is still in bed. She is up. Her 
nudity is not unappealing, but she's way behind the model seen 
earlier in London.
I can't remember if it is at this point that her full name is 
disclosed and her true profession. She's got to be Dutch, but she has 
no accent. I suspect her English was dubbed. Perhaps not. I couldn't 
care less.
The fact that at age 30 (and looking younger than that) Marieke van 
den Broeck is a specialist's specialist on Rembrandt, an ace, a 
wonder, raises more eyebrows. But then, how can you raise eyebrows 
that are already permanently raised?
The couple separate. We lose sight of the lady and concentrate on the 
forger. All sorts of technicalities ensue as he gets his very special 
needs: special paint and chemicals, an aged canvas and so on. This 
part, if done in  semi-documentary fashion less sketchy, frantic and 
bamboozling, would have held some interest. But you have to take it 
all on hurried faith.
When the finished product gets back to the UK. more absurd 
complications ensue, including two killings. Surprise! Marieke 
reappears to verify the authenticity of the "Rembrandt." Contrary to 
expectations, while it looks genuine,  something in her tells her 
this is not the real thing.
I'll spare you and myself the dolor of relating further developments, 
all outrageously absurd. Harry tries to flee to France, with Marieke 
attached to him with handcuffs.  (He also forges a passport in a 
jiffy, thanks to his Swiss Army knife). The former bedmates have now 
an antagonistic releationship. It will change to love, as anyone can 
foretell.
Remember Alfred Hitchcock's "The 39 Steps"? .This part of the movie 
is like a forgery of Hitch's great movie. And a desecration. There 
are no winks to the audience nor any surprises. There is no humor, 
wit, slyness or suspense that might involve you. The photography 
however is very good.
Later comes a ridiculous trial whose only saving grace is the snooty 
prosecutor played with gusto by long-nosed Ian Richardson. When Harry 
demonstrates his talent in court by redoing his painting, there's 
some excitement, but the process, with its McDonald's speed and the 
use of magically available special ingredients, is less than 
believable. It is mentioned that this had happened in the case of the 
real-life Van Meegeren, that notorious, legendary ace forger of 
Vermeers. But it is still unconvincing.
Improbabilities, impossibilities, contradictions come in bucketfuls. 
Remove nearly all of the film's plethora of subplots, stick to a 
handful and you might get a pretty good thriller.
I forgot to mention that early on and at some other times as well 
there appears on the screen Rod Steiger. Aging and in ill health , he 
plays Harry's father. They love each other. Harry tells him he 
admires him above all else. Steiger was a painter too. He wishes 
Harry would do his own painting rather than his illegal trade. And so 
on. But the old man is poorly defined. His function in the picture is 
hazy.
Brit-born director John Badham has some OK movies in his repertory:
Just before "Incognito" he had made "Nick of Time" (1995),  too 
over-the-top but fun. Other films (e.g. "Drop Zone, "" The Hard 
Way,""  Blue Thunder,"" Bird on a Wire,"" Stakeout.""  Short 
Circuit")  are not memorable, except for two most enjoyable, 
entertaining titles, "Saturday Night Fever"and " WarGames."
Jason Patric has no large filmography (yet?) but I do remember his 
doing very well in at least two very good features: "Rush" and 
"Geronimo: An American Legend." In my review of the latter I wrote : 
"Setting aside other considerations, Patric is a solid reason for 
seeing this film." "Incognito" adds no bonus points to the player, 
but it is not his fault.
The French actress Irene Jacob's debut was in a nice, short 
supporting role in Louis Malle's moving "Au Revoir, les Enfants" 
(1987). Fame came to her with her starring in two films by thinking 
man's auteur, the Polish moralist writer-director Krszystof 
Kieslowski (1941-1996): "The Double Life of Veronique" 
(France-Poland,1991) and the last last movie he ever made,"Three 
Colors: Red" (France,1994). Most of Jacob's other films were of minor 
interest. Had only Kieslowski not died so early!
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for 10 Things I Hate About You (1999)
10 THINGS I HATE ABOUT YOU (1999)  ** 3/4  Directed by Gil Junger; written
by Karen
McCullah Lutz and Kirsten Smith. Photography, Mark Irwin. Editing,
O.Nicholas Brown. Production design, Carol Winstead Wood. Music, Richard
Gibbs. Produced by Andrew Lazar. Cast:  Heath Ledger (Patrick Verona),
Julia Stiles (Katarina Stratford), Joseph-Gordon Levitt (Cameron James),
Larisa Oleynik (Bianca Stratford), David Krumholtz (Michael Eckman), Andrew
Keegan (Joey Donner), Susan May Pratt (Mandella), Gabrielle Union
(Chastity), Larry Miller (Walter Stratford), Daryl (Chill) Mitchell (
Morgan) and Allison Janney (Ms. Perky). A Touchstone (Disney) release.
Pictures. 93 minutes. PG-13.
The lack of Cold War movies has left a gap --but the teen genres never die,
Shakespeare is up, classic English novels are up, and the old repertories
of American directors and writers have given way to a bewildering number of
new names, both in mainstream and independent film-making.
It was fated that at some point literature and high school would finally
meet. They did in 10 Things, but whoa! You don't really expect a high
school flick with students studying and learning, do you? No such thing in
the Land of the Free.
The way the Bard and the kids get together, as directed by a an experiences
TV person inhis first featurem and as written by first-timers, is to take
The Taming of the Shrew and deviously transport it to an institution of
middle non-education. Well, it's Shakespeare and not Shakespeare, in about
the proportions of a mouse to an elephant. But it's a big mouse. Still,
those who call this movie an updating or modernizing of the play should
have their Bard examined.I wonder why the credits don't say "Based on an
idea by Bill Shakespeare"?
There's a general concept of the father and the daughters. Here Padua's
Signor Baptista becomes Walter Stratford, his senior daughter Katharina
("Kiss Me Kate") is Kat, and the younger one, Bianca, remains Bianca.
The Stratford girls (get the joke?) go to Padua (sic) High School that
ought to get acting credit here. Played by that huge, superbly kitschy
Stadium High School in Tacoma, it looks like a cross between some of the
palaces the oil-barons built some 100 years ago, the Chateau Frontenac of
Quebec City, and other massively wild follies.
Bianca, who's vague and vaguely sweet, is popular. Period. There's nothing
vague about Kat. She's clearly a brilliant. But also a young Dragon Lady,
though unladylike as she goes around spreading haughtily her misanthropy,
militant feminism, disrespect (to put it mildly) of the entire staff and
student body whom she insults perpetually for their conformism, stupidity,
you name it. Her tongue is caustic and tart, and I don't mean like a Tarte
Tatin. Her manners are to match. She even backs up on purpose into the car
of Joey Donner, the school's pretty boy (and a professional model) who is
full of money and you-know-what. (Well, he had it coming).
The kids, with some exceptions (for audiences who keep up with TV) are not
played by familiar faces. They look generic, including Bianca and Kat, no
beauties, but then the latter, Julia Stiles, does a beaut of a job with her
role. If I ever wanted to cast Ilse Koch ("The Bitch of Buchenwald") I'd go
to Julia. In uniform, with boots, a couple of German shephers dogs and a
thicker waist, she'd be perfect.
Daddy is played with restrained humor by Larry Miller in a secondary but
original role. A single parent, an MD . A  gynecologist I believe, but then
the movie has the habit of leaving matters vague and with loose ends. He's
seen too many awful pregnancies, births, abortions and such. While
interestingly chummy with his girls he's firm about their keeping their
virginity. No dates, no fooling around, he has decreed. This may be OK with
Kat, whom he knows well. After school he casually asks her "Did you make
anybody cry today?"  "Sadly, no" she replies "But it's only 4:30."  That's
what's known as a felicitous repartee.
Bianca is another story. She's itching to go on a date, especially with
local Lothario Joey who has her in his sights. Eventually, smart Daddy
comes up with a pronunciamento. "You can date if Kat does" which he is
positive will never happen. And thereby hangs the essence of the story.
To liberate Bianca, Joey tries to set up Kat with someone. No piece of
cake, this. The only possible candidate is tough-looking, Australian-born
(like the actor who plays him) Patrick Verona (Get the references to Two
Gentlemen of Verona?)  But Patrick is no gentleman, or so it would seem.
"What! He's a CRIMINAL! " exclaims one of the boys who is assisting Joey so
that some other pal who's sweet on Bianca can have a chance.  He recites a
litany of the would-be suitor's horrible record which includes a break from
San Quentin (or something of the sort) and facts such as "He sold his own
liver for a new pair of speakers!" "He ate a live duck!"  Unfazed, Joey
bribes Patrick to date Kat, even though the boy from Down Under keeps
upping the ante. And that's where the courtship, the taming, the rigueur
misunderstandings begin.
It's an odd thing. Up to this approximate point the movie was clever and
very entertaining nonsense and way out funny details. But as we reach what
should be the core of the story, things go limp. Sure, there were cliches
before this, but freshly and imaginatively cooked, along with some original
bits.
Now the totally predictable is upon us, with unnecessary diversions,
sub-plots and asides that distract, add dead weight, put the breaks on what
was until now a fast-moving car. Kat is delighted to get accepted by Sarah
Lawrence College (back East) but Daddy is unhappy that she'll be so far.
So? Patrick visits a rather dismal femme-club. This adds little to the
developments.  I expected Maenads to attack this sole male customer, but
no.
Pat is too quickly,too obviously transformed, via hairdo and makeup, from
the "criminal," sullen type to a nice, neat fellow. Luxury student cars
abound. They limit the human interest as they set the film among the
Children of the Rich. (At least either Kat or Bianca leaven this later by
asking Dad "What's a hot rod?")
Irrelevancies and inconsistencies gather. At a party (deja vu all over
again), Kat gets drunk, which is what reveals her true (i.e.nice but
hidden) self. Is this promoting liquor among the under-aged as a catalyst
of truth? By party-time the film has lost its impetus, has become aimless.
It puts in too much padding --which means that there's too little for the
movie proper.  The inevitable prom, the Golden Fleece of high school
movies, doesn't help either.
No question about it, there are nuggets even among the pebbles of Part II :
Kat's brazen, sexy invasion of a detention schoolroom; recurring quotations
from Shakespeare's other works, aimed, no doubt, at the literati. Even
better, in both parts are several scenes with two supporting characters who
steal the show again and again. Mr. Morgan is a most likable and
non-cliched teacher of English (or writing) who raps deliciously the lines
of the Bard and whose familiar give-and-take with his students is sheer
pleasure. Equally appealing is Mrs. Perky, the guidance counselor whose own
rapport with the kids is a howl, especially as she never stops writing a
porno novel on her desk-top computer. Hilarious. And she casually asks both
the students and her secretary for synonyms, as for an enlarged male
member. Fast-reacting Kat comes up with a winner: "tumescent."
A pity that this picture starts on a strong three-star level but loses
steam approximately past  the halfway mark. Perhaps one should eventually
get a video and save on tape all the scenes with Dr. Stratford, Mr. Morgan
and Mrs. Perky.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Act of Violence (1949)
ACT OF VIOLENCE (1949) Directed by Fred Zinnemann. Written by Robert 
L. Richards. Story by Collier Young. Photography, Robert Surtees. 
Editing,  Conrad A. Nervig. Art direction,  Cedric Gibbons, Hans 
Peters. Music, Bronislau Kaper. Cast: Van Heflin, Robert Ryan, Janet 
Leigh, Mary Astor, Phyllis Thaxter, Berry Kroeger, et al. An MGM 
film. 82 minutes.
Except for the setting of this movie (in California, along with too 
many thousands of others, in all genres), it is a pretty effective 
work. It starts out  quickly and directly, from the first images. So 
does tension which will not ever abate. There are asides, 
embellishments or "fioriture."
Tall, limping  WWII veteran Robert Ryan, packing a revolver, travels 
to a small California town with vengeance written all over his face 
and his heart. A prominent citizen, Van Heflin, is his prey. Heflin, 
who has done well as a building contractor, is being celebrated by 
the locals after a project has finished.
He has a pretty young wife (Janet Leigh), a very young boy, good 
business and a nice home. (Remember that this was 1948 or so. What 
passed for nice houses would be grade C today).
The two men had been P.O.Ws in a German camp, with Heflin the ranking 
officer and Ryan his friend and second in command of a group of 
twelve airmen. When Ryan informed Heflin that the men were digging a 
tunnel, Heflin was entirely against the planned escape as hopeless, 
but as his opposition fell on deaf years, he betrayed the plot to the 
Nazi commandant.  As a result  ten men died horrible deaths. After 
the war,  survivor Ryan set out to avenge the dead.
When panicked Heflin discloses his dark past to his wife, he tries to 
find excuses, to rationalize his treachery, to blame the Germans' own 
treachery for not keeping their promise to thwart the escape without 
killing anyone. But not so deep down he acknowledges his guilt, his 
having traded his denunciation for precious food.
Heflin's terrible guilt and terrible fear are grippingly shown 
through economical dialogue and acting. The hunter-hunted motif is 
developed mercilessly, but it is the theme of guilt that dominates 
the movie, in believable film noir visual, atmospheric style and, 
above all a "noir" conscience.
Where the story goes from there I cannot reveal except that it 
encompasses a friendly prostitute (good acting by Mary Astor), the 
involvement of the underworld, and inexorable "no exit" development. 
The movie -- powerfully dramatic and tragic--  does not cop out, 
attempt to adorn matters, invent solutions. Strong stuff.
(One relatively amusing thing for us today is that when Heflin is 
asked about the worth of his business, he says 20 thousand dollars, a 
small fortune then, peanuts today.)
Austrian-born director Zinnemann (1907-1997) made his debut in 
Hollywood around 1937. His films are humanistic, intelligent, 
thoughtful. He had made over two dozen movies in America. Arguably, 
the best was The Seventh Cross (1944). Made during WWII and starring 
Spencer Tracy, this was the story of a group of anti-Nazi Germans who 
escape from a German concentration camp in the mid-1930s.
Just before Act of Violence, he filmed made the classic The Search 
which was the first role of Montgomery Clift and the first Hollywood 
shot in post-war Germany. In this gem, American GI. Clift cares for a 
Czech boy, a displaced person, and reunites him with his mother. A 
warm, highly praised movie, it was mostly known only in film 
society-type circles.
Act of Violence which followed has remained largely unknown, probably 
because of its depressing subject. Then came the works that made of 
Zinnemann a household name, starting with The Men (1950, Marlon 
Brando's screen debut) and several more, including Member of the 
Wedding, High Noon, A Hatful of Rain, The Nun's Story, From Here to 
Eternity, The Sundowners, A Man for All Seasons, The Day of the 
Jackal, Julia.
War, politics and their effects were never far from Zinnemann's mind, 
along with  matters of principles, morality, conscience and 
psychology. He died at age 90, leaving us a major legacy of works 
that rise to great heights.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for 8 Heads in a Duffel Bag (1997)
8 HEADS IN A DUFFEL BAG  3/4  *  Written and directed by Tom Schulman.
Photography, Adam Holender. Editing, David Holden. Production design, Paul
Peters. Music, Andrew Gross.Cast: Joe Pesci (Tommy Spinelli), Andy Comeau
(Charlie), Kristy Swanson (Laurie Bennett), Todd Louiso (Steve), George
Hamilton (Dick Bennett), Dyan Cannon (Annette Bennett) and David Spade
(Ernie). released by Orion Pictures and Rank Film. 90 minutes. Rated R (for
ridiculousness, risible violence, raunchy language)
No, this is not black humor. El Mariachi is black humor. Fargo is black
humor. Grosse Pointe Blank is black humor. But 8 Heads is not black
humor.What is it then?
It's a mess. It's a cheap attempt at getting laughs. Mobster Tommy Spinelli
(Joe Pesci) carries from New Jersey to California what the title of the
film says (they all belong to hoodlums) for delivery to a Big Boss as proof
of assignment accomplished by
Tommy's middle echelon boss.
At San Diego's airport carousel,  two identical bags are accidentally
switched. The heads-duffel goes to Charlie (Comeau). He is a med student
who makes you pray that if he ever graduates you'll be better off seeing
your friendly veterinarian than Doctor Charlie.
Charlie is visiting his long time no see girl-friend Laurie (Swanson) who
has decided to dump him. He doesn't know this yet, and while he thinks he
was invited by her family, he was not. Anyway, her folks (Hamilton and
Cannon) drive everyone down to a resort hotel in Mexico.
That's where Mom, a recovering alky,is the first to peek into the bag and
go into hysterics. Charlie, then Laurie are next. Tommy in the meantime,
trying to track down Charlie, ends up with the student's roommates who seem
to be the only other living creatures on campus.
I will now spare you the details and spare myself thinking about them. Not
that some bits are not funny, but they are submerged in repetitions,
stupidities, improbabilities, plot holes, and anything else you care to
name. The performers are totally undeveloped, bad, and exaggerate badly
while accomplishing the feat of being characterless at the same time.
Pesci overdoes to death his irascibility, aggressivity, violence,
telephone-busting, sadism and other such virtues. The eight heads are
increased by more of them, courtesy of the Med School's stash of frozen
corpses.
Some mileage is gotten out of a few scenes or sequences. Like the setups
between Pesci and the roommates -- one "sensitive," the other cynical --
that might approach amusing absurdism. Sadly, the film does not know the
meaning of subtlety or wit and does not know when to stop milking the same
cow.
Annoyingly, there is a running motif of ridiculing  Mexicans and another of
including caricatures of contemporary "bandidos."  In one development,
George Hamilton's new car is stolen by local highwaymen, painted red,
rented by Charlie, re-stolen by the same gang, and...
Feeble puns are made with "head," such as losing it, go ahead, head out,
head on, etc. A wonder they didn't think that in Italian the Mafia bosses
are Capo or, in the plural, Capi.
The severed heads are extremely life-like. In  a potentially funny
nightmare of Pesci's, they come to life and sing to him "Mr. Sandman." This
comes too late to salvage things.  Incoherence, monotony and overkill, well
entrenched by now, will go on also in what's ahead.
Since many of us have had our luggage switched for a look-alike, the
movie's one positive side is a reminder to mark your bags in distinctive
ways. That's worth half-a-star.

Title
Review for Beautician and the Beast, The (1997)
THE BEAUTICIAN AND THE BEAST (97) ** 1/5.  Directed by Ken Kwapis. Written
by Todd Graff. Photography, Peter Lyons Collister. Editing, Jon Poll. Music
by Cliff Eidelman. Production design, Rusty Smith. Produced by Howard W.
(Hawk) Koch Jr. & Graff. Cast: Fran Drescher (Joy Miller), Timothy Dalton
(Boris Pochenko), Ian McNeice (Grushinsky), Lisa Jakub (Katrina), et al. A
Paramount release. 100 minutes. PG.
Fran Drescher ("The Nanny"), an acquired taste, sounds like a flight of
migrating geese. Timothy Dalton is a very good, appealing actor whose
handsomeness improves with age (he is 50). He ought to be in more, major
movies. Here he reacts rather than act.
She plays Joy from Queens, teaches "science" at a school, meaning
hairdressing, make-up, pedicure and the like. A fire starts in the science
lab, she rescues various animals including a python (this is the first of
several not followed up potential gags or twists). The heroine makes
tabloid headlines.
He plays Boris Pochenko, the President-for-life of Slovetzia, a
postage-stamp-size country of eastern Europe that can be located on the map
only with a magnifying glass, if you look at (forgive me, Alfred) the North
by Northwest of Romania. A former Communist dictatorship the nation is now
a non-Communist dictatorship under Pochenko. Belatedly realizing that help
from the West calls for some westernization, and that charity begins at
home, the widowed President sends one of his yes-men to America to recruit
a teacher for his four children.
Ian McNeice,the best performer in the movie, is envoy Grushinsky, who,
misled by the headlines, takes Joy for a bone fide educator. (You should
always read the fine print). Realizing his mistake he still offers Joy the
tutoring job. Flown to Slovetzia, the beautician muddles through in her
teaching, charms the kids, tells it like it is, remains unflappable, takes
charge of everything and antagonizes the dictator. Any viewer with a mental
age over 6 knows that romance and democracy will blossom.
"B & B" is, in a sense, a far removed poor man's Frank Capra movie of the
post-modern persuasion: humble people or mavericks can make big changes in
others and in society. Joy is an American, therefore America is best. Joy
shows common sense, American common sense. There's a speechifying
opposition to Boris by young people who meet in a discotheque's
not-so-hidden back room. The music and counterculture are American,
therefore America is best.
Even by the pliable parameters of fantasy, the film is indigent in
imagination and rich in impossibilities. Everyone in Slovetzia speaks
English, from the nomenclatura to the kitchen help. The President's kids
look and sound American, in spite of the older boy   unsuccessful
attempting a Slavic accent.
Forget about logic and continuity. A subplot about the elder daughter and
her anti-Boris boyfriend is padding that gets nowhere. Elsewhere,before an
official ball begins, Joy and Boris start dancing to the violin of the
first musician who gets there. Next arrives the accordionist, but there are
no accordion sounds. Then the piano joins in, but it is followed --not
preceded-- by the entrance of the pianist. The early soundtrack  has a nice
soupcon of klezmer music, then the score becomes generic.
The whole thing is rather sloppily put together and very uneven as a
comedy. Most jokes and gags are not witty or humorous, nor do they give us
broad slapstick as in Marx Brothers films or the British combination of
broad and cool comedy -- as in the Ruritanian  (i.e. set in an imaginary
country) "The Mouse That Roared," "The Mouse on the Moon," "Romanoff and
Juliet" and others. Joy's slide-show jokes on Jesse Helms and Newt Gingrich
are not just lame, they have no legs.
Joy herself is a living joke, a Jewish-American Non-Princess who enriches
the language with Yiddishisms and assaults the eyes with tacky, blatantly
colored clothes that could bring back memories of toreador pants in
spandex.
The emblem of Slovetzia is a boar. It would be tempting to declare that the
film is more bore than boar, but this would be unfair since some bits
between lulls do make you chuckle or laugh. Like Joy's possessive mother
who carries her daughter's umbilical cord in her purse. Like the local
encyclopedia's entry for General Boris Pachenko who "in 1991 organized and
coordinated Operation Desert Storm." Like the arbitrary, sudden and funny
Evita-on-the-balcony spoof.
Less succesful is Joys insistence to have Boris take her to a sweatshop
factory so that he can get in touch with his people. To an artificial
chorus-from-nowhere rendering of the Communist anthem "The Internationale,"
the President  awkwardly schmoozes, Joy does a too brief, too vague
imitation of Sally Field on a platform in "Norma Rae" demanding
unionization
The President is like Uncle Josef Stalin  in hair, mustache, uniforms and
accouterments. Joy de-Stalinizes him with her homespun wisdom, her appeals
for better parenthood, her haircutting skills, her unexpectedly esthetic
advice for civilian suits. Dalton gets his morals fixed and his good looks
back, but he does not grab you, he never seems to have any kind of brains.
Ethnic jokes can get tedious or produce gems. Woody Allen's "The biggest
sin in my family is to buy retail" or Lainie Kazan's Jewish mother
receiving Peter O'Toole in  "My Favorite Year" are clever comic
contributions. In "B & B" there's little dialogue to remember. Still, near
the end there's a good line. Back in Queens, Joy is horrified at what her
mother gave her pet chicken: "You fed the chicken chicken?"  There is, too,
a remembrance of a high school musical version of "Rosemary's Baby." "I
love you, but don't keep me waitin' / This embryo belongs to Satan."
By now it is official that Hollywood is again relying heavily on female
audiences, making "women's pictures," and/or working in femme-appealing
elements even in action and disaster films as well as in a hybrid comedy
like "B &B."
I say "hybrid" because the movie falls partly into the venerable, escapist
Ruritanian category. The name comes from writer Anthony Hope who set his
romance-adventure story  "The Prisoner of Zenda" (1894) in the imaginary
country of Ruritania. Whether called Freedonia, Romanza, or Slovetzia, most
of those kingdoms or duchies were located within the old Austro-Hungarian
Empire, often in Romania --whose Transylvania also gave us Count Dracula.

Title
Review for Scenes from a Mall (1991)
     At the core of SCENES FROM A MALL there is both emptiness and a
saturation of movie references.  At the edges is a film connoisseur's
loving tribute to mostly European cinemasters.  This makes it more a
work for film historians than for seekers of movie entertainment.
     SCENES FROM A MALL is in effect a one-act, two-character play.
Nick and Deborah Fifer are a Beverly Hills couple preparing to
celebrate their 16th wedding anniversary, which coincides with the
Christmas season.  Woody Allen is a lawyer for sports figures looking
to endorse products.  Bette Midler is a trendy psychiatrist and
writer.
     A prologue offers us unsexy bedroom cavorting, movie-banal with
its interruptions by their his and hers telephones.  The couple's
passion, unconvincing and unappealing, is further undermined by the
camera's insistence on closeups of their decidedly un-Adonis and
un-Venus looks.
     The script keeps hammering us with dates in order to convince us
that both Nick and Debbie are 40.  In fact, in 1991, Midler was 45 and
Allen 55.  (Curiously, they were both born on December 1st).
     As Nick and Debbie drive to a mall to pick up their holiday
presents, there are some mildly satirical scenes of affluent Angelenos
stalled in traffic and using their cellular phones.  At the vast
shopping center, for unexplored reasons, Nick blurts out that he's had
an affair (it was over yesterday, at 4:30PM).  Soon after Debbie
'fesses up that she too has been carrying on with an older Czech
colleague .
     In a tour of upscale stores and ethnic eateries, the couple
fight, talk of money and divorce, reminisce, make up, clash
again, argue keep blowing hot and cold.  The camera persists in its
unflattering photography.  A mime (Bill Irwin) keeps hounding the
twosome as a diversion unjustified and unsupported by the script.
     With a bare minimum of other speaking parts, the supporting cast
is one of extras used as background decor notably several gorgeous
younger shoppers who contrast with the couple's homeliness.
Motivations are unclear, the tension is artificial, the dialogue 
uninteresting, the principals uninvolving and miscast, in spite of 
sporadic jokes, gags and one-liners.  Woody Allen the actor cries out for 
Allen the writer-director, He can act much better than this.  Back in 
1976 he had done superbly in THE FRONT, directed by the late Martin 
Ritt and scripted by Walter Bernstein. 
     Of some interest to specialists are Paul Mazursky's peripherals.
Mazursky's filmic characteristic is to cook American meat with
European sauces.  His attraction to Continental cinema is enormous.  To
mention but two cases, the early ALEX IN WONDERLAND is imitation
Fellini, with young film director Donald Sutherland hounding the Italian
master; DOWN AND OUT IN BEVERLY HILLS is a remake of BOUDU SAUVE DES
EAUX (BOUDU SAVED FROM DROWNING), one of Jean Renoir's several
French classics of the 1930s.
     In the French New Wave of the 1960's, references to other films
were endemic.  In SCENES FROM A MALL too.  Among them, the traffic jam
just has to come from films by Fellini, Antonioni, Tati and Godard;
Allen is constantly lugging a banana-like surfboard--a cumbersome
phallic symbol of the Blake Edwards school and a reminder of Allen's
film BANANAS; a tacky Auguste Renoir mural in the mall refers to the
painter's son, Jean Renoir; a bench scene may well have been inspired
by Alain Resnais' HIROSHIMA MON AMOUR; the mime's provenance is
Marcel Carne's CHILDREN OF PARADISE.
     I'll say this much at least, that Mazurky's choices are most
eclectic and his devotion to great directors is touching.
     Less esoterically, this movie is kind of perverse upending of
Ingmar Bergman's SCENES FROM A MARRIAGE, combined with Paul Bartel's
SCENES FROM THE CLASS STRUGGLE IN BEVERLY HILLS, in which Mazursky
had a part.  And more blatantly, Nick and Debbie, for no good reason,
watch SALAAM BOMBAY in a mall theatre and make love, in contrast to
sad scenes on the screen.  The only audience is our sick couple and a
couple of shushing Sikhs.
     Those film games are cute but unintegrated.  Better woven in is
the real/symbolic soullessness of the mall and its horrid pre-fab
modernism, sterility and anonymous promiscuity.  Or the ethnic
restaurant with a Mexican-garbed waitress--a tired, middle-aged
Wasp--and deafening Mariachis who prevent the couple from talk about
splitting their assets.
     Potentially good is the use of music, from the opening credits of
Marlene Dietrich singing Cole Porter's " You Do Something To Me," to
more Porter ("Let's Do It," "Easy To Love"), to Louis Armstrong or the
Nino Rota scores for Fellini's AMARCORD and JULIET OF THE SPIRITS.
But again, those tuneful references come closer to nostalgia for people
of Mazurky's (or Allen's) background and generation than to anything
substantial.
     With its spot-the-source game, SCENES FROM A MALL does have, for
film buffs, a certain appeal, nostalgia and the shock of recognition.
But for seekers of originality as well as the general public, this work
is neither fish nor fowl, neither fresh nor foul.  Mostly it feels like
a set of unfinished ideas.
     Still, seen again, it is rather more interesting than the first
time, and does not quite deserve the critical lambasting it received
when it came out in 1991.

Title
Review for Lavender Hill Mob, The (1951)
     This marvelous Oscar-winning movie (Best Story and Screenplay by
T.E.B. Clarke) was one of those priceless comedies (mostly from the
Ealing Studios) that made British screen humor triumph in the 1950s.
     Oscar-nominated Alec Guinness is a milquetoastish bank employee
who dreams up one of those perfect crimes -- a gold-bullion caper --
that never turn out to be perfect.  Successful at first, the likable
malefactors are thrown into a desperate, frustrating chase after
incriminating evidence -- miniature Eiffel Towers.  The hunt takes them
to Paris, then back to England.  There is wonderful irony as the film
climaxes with the duo tracking down the last of the statuettes inside a
Police show.
     The acting by Guinness and Holloway is perfect .  They are
excellently supported by their acolytes Sidney James and Alfie Bass.
Audrey Hepburn, then a bit actress in her fourth film, has a a
microscopic part.  Thirteen years later, in MY FAIR LADY, as a big
star playing  Liza Doolittle, she would be reunited with Stanley
Holloway who played her father.
     THE LAVENDER HILL MOB is a delight of witty structure and briskly
economical pacing.  Guinness had come to world-wide attention with his
multiple roles in KIND HEARS AND CORONETS (1949).  With THE LAVENDER
HILL MOB the comic, idiosyncratic Guinness persona itself was
launched, in all its variations of quiet diffidence, cunning,
stubbornness and that famous half-smile that seems to say "I know
something you don't know."
     THE MAN IN THE WHITE SUIT followed that same year and was also
nominated in the straight screenplay category.  Then came more
comedies:  THE PROMOTER, THE CAPTAIN'S PARADISE, THE DETECTIVE, THE
LADY KILLERS, and more films with serious, funny or in-between roles,
all unique.  THE LAVENDER HILL MOB is the kind of movie where you root
for the thieves, but in its period films lacked the gumption to come
out with the conclusion that often "crime does pay."

Title
Review for Men of Honor (2000)
MEN OF HONOR (2000) **1/2 Directed by George Tillman. Written by 
Scott Marshall Smith, based on the life of Carl Brashear. 
Photography, Anthony B. Richmond.  Editing, John Carter. Production 
design, Leslie Dilley. Music, Mark Isham. Producers, Robert Teitel , 
Bill Badalato.  Cast: Robert De Niro (Billy Sunday), Cuba Gooding Jr. 
(Carl Brashear), Charlize Theron (Gwen), Aunjanue Ellis (Jo), Hal 
Holbrook (Mr. Pappy), Michael Rapaport (Snowhill), David Conrad 
(Hanks), Powers Boothe (Captain Pullman) ,David Keith (Captain 
Hartigan), et al. A Fox 2000 Pictures release.  128 minutes. 
Prudishly and illogically rated R (for Navymen's salty language)
Biopics (biographical picture) have been a staple genre since movies 
began. They--including Hollywood productions--are overwhelmingly 
"creative," readjust fancifully the lives of notable persons, invent, 
adapt, prettify... and make historians despair.
Yet many of those films have been major hits. For example, the movies 
directed by German-born actor and director William Dieterle who 
achieved fame and glory with a string of  MGM pictures with great 
actors: "The Story of Louis Pasteur" (1936), "The Life of Emile Zola" 
(1937), "Juarez" (1939),  "Dr. Ehrlich's Magic Bullet" (1940), "A 
Dispatch from Reuters" (1940), "Tennessee Johnson" (1942).
There have been movies about baseball greats like Lou Gehrig, "Pride 
of the Yankees" (1942); about a remarkable polio-treating nurse, 
"Sister Kenny" (1946); about the famous nurse Florence Nightingale in 
"White Angel" (1936) (by Dieterle) or in the British "Lady with a 
Lamp" (1951); about "Nurse Edith Cavell" (1939), that brave woman 
who, during World War I,  helped Allied soldiers escape 
German-occupied Belgium and ended up before a firing squad. The list 
is enormous.
In the heyday of biopics (the 1930s and 1940s) the world was younger, 
the audiences more naive than now, the film critics fewer and less 
sophisticated, at least when dealing with history of the big screen. 
But flights of fancy and non-scholarship notwithstanding, those 
movies contributed a great deal to educating their spectators. The 
biopics were a wonderful  introduction to facts and persons which 
only a small fraction of the masses knew anything about or even had 
ever heard of.
Today, in the area of films about real people and events, the more 
discriminating viewers and reviewers are more demanding than in the 
past,  The case of "Men of Honor" is another litmus test.
It is "based on" (words that ring the alarm bell) the life of Carl 
Brashear who was the first black to be accepted (grudgingly) to the 
Navy's Salvage school. He became an ace deep-sea diver and later a 
role model hero.
In those days (late 1950s on) the Armed Forces were officially 
integrated, but there was still no lack of violent, rampant racism. 
It took superhuman will, tenacity, patience as well as talent to get 
to where Carl Brashear got. So what we have here is a feel-good movie 
and a feel-bad one rolled into one during two-plus hours of 
spectacle.  But how many of the details are true and how many are 
Hollywood?
What rings truest is the feel-bad side. Carl was the son of a 
Kentucky sharecropper whose struggle to survive is realistically 
shown as pure horror. Sad and powerful too are most of the many 
episodes of Brashear's painful rise within a white and openly hostile 
military milieu. Without revealing the march of events, it is obvious 
to me that this huge and painful aspect of the movie is its best 
element.
The feel-good part is another story. Robert De Niro plays Billy 
Sunday, a super-talented Master Chief and Carl's immediate superior 
at diving school. Billy is a rebellious, authority-defying maverick, 
an alcoholic at some point, and while superior at his job, flawed in 
many other ways. Yet he will turn out to be a man with a conscience.
All this could be true, but is it? And all his is vitiated by 
bucketfuls of movie cliches, excessive  colorfulness, improbable 
dialogue and speechmaking, paint by numbers progression, and much 
else that required a suspension of disbelief.
This story also echoes  quantities of movies that feature 
tougher-than-hell D.I.s,  movies about Marines shaping up on Parris 
Island, movies with typically Hollywoodian moments complete with Big 
Emotions made even bigger by a Too Big Musical Score.
De Niro, who at times is like a parody of Douglas MacArthur plus 
Popeye, has had better roles, though even  here, his being De Niro 
does salvage some of the silliness.
Even so, in the footage of Sarl and Billy, the two leading 
characters, when their personal lives are depicted the film piles up 
unconvincing or phony or cute passages. A sampling, in no order of 
priority:
In the opening scenes in Kentucky, we glimpse the boy Carl's 
beautiful mother. She is oddly chic within a context of people who 
live in misery --at least I remember her as elegant. The romance 
between Carl and and a lady librarian plus medical student is 
touching, partly because Jo (Aunjanue Ellis) is good and appealing. 
But the war hero commandant of the diving school (Holbrook) is so 
totally gaga that his mega-racism is ludicrous and ineffectual, more 
a mental case than anything else. Worse yet, Gwen (Charlize Theron) 
who seems to be De Niro's child-wife, is a totally useless, unclear 
and unneeded character.
Where the guillotine's blade falls is in the last sequence, set in a 
military courtroom. It is so "inspirational," colorful, sentimental 
and fabricated that the audience should be provided with certificates 
of authenticity.
The film does keep you going, does perform a good service by 
acquainting us with the unusual and admirable Carl Brashear, but is 
also as untrustworthy as the near totality of biopics. One would 
think that in the second century of movies there must be ways to 
maximize veracity and minimize theatrics. Yet the picture does have a 
saving grace -- in that it deals clearly with the scourge of racism. 
This can make us forgive "Men of Honor" many of its sins.
Technically it's A-1 and, I suppose, true to deep-sea procedures in 
sequences that make the divers in heavy gear look like immigrants 
from Jules Verne and "20,000 Leagues under the Sea."

Title
Review for Family Business (1989)
FAMILY BUSINESS ** (1989) Directed by Sidney Lumet. Written by Vincent
Patrick from his novel. Photography, Andrzej Bartkowski.  Editing, Andrew
Mondshein. Production design, Philip Rosenberg. Music, Cy Coleman. Music
director, Sonny Kompanek. Cast:
Sean Connery, Dustin Hofman, Matthew Broderick, et al. A Tri-Star release.
113 minutes. Rated R (adult situations, general immorality.)
Sidney Lumet is an excellent director of the urban scene, and especially
strong at portraying the jungle of New York City ("Network," "Serpico"). He
begins "Family Business" with an array of interrelated ethnicities and the
old trick of showing a part of the city as a village where everyone  knows
everyone else, while zooming in on three generations of one family: Jessie
(Connery)  the 65-year old grandfather, a postwar immigrant who is a free
soul, barroom brawler, con-man and retired thief; his son Vito (Hoffman),
an ex-thief gone straight who has made a fortune in wholesale meats; his
grandson Adam (Broderick), an ace student of molecular biology who has
dropped out of M.I.T. just months before getting his Master's degree.
Adam has come up with a plan for a scientific-industrial heist  suggested
by one of his former professors. This will net one million dollars. Grandpa
is ready to go, but dad Vito, alienated from Jessie,  takes a lot of
convincing--even though the wholesale meat business is not the most kosher
of occupations. At first, flamboyant Jessie , quiet Vito and soul-searching
Adam menace the viewer with that tired old movie cliche of lovable,
colorful characters. In a short second stage one begins to hope that, for a
change, the movie will get away with using lovable, colorful characters.
Soon however, this and the rest begin to disintegrate.
For one thing, we have to keep unscrambling ethnicities. Connery (a
Scotsman) is supposed to be an Irishman who, with his late Sicilian wife
begat  Hoffman, who married Jewish girl Elaine (Rosana DeSoto) and begat
Adam. Both Adam and his papa are proficient at Passover prayers at Elaine's
parents. Then we have to unscramble motivations, morals, structural details
and holes.
Why did Adam quit his studies? (Near the end a dumb, simplistic explanation
is given).Why does Vito yield  to entreaties? Why is  Adam's
overmaterialistic girlfriend (Victoria Jackson) made the focal point of a
sequence yet immediately disappears from the picture? How is it that Vito's
penthouse does not have a dishwashing machine? Why are some court sentences
so phony? Why do so many talky asides diffuse and dilute the movie?
There are amusing touches here and there, like an old pal of Jessie's
selling cheap to the old fellow and his grandson hot goods, designer shoes
"that fell off a truck." But even this effect is soon destroyed at an Irish
wake where liquor flows freely and illegally in the funeral home and the
same entrepreneur brings in a rack of stolen fancy suits which are bought
by the mourners, including a large contigent of Irish New York cops. The
gag becomes unsettling. Much later, at a second Irish wake, the same man
and the same cops are partaking of Japanese electronics which also "fell
off a truck" -- a fact which escalates the unsettling into the
distasteful. By this time too, ethnicity --a delicate thing to handle--
verges on maudlin caricature.
In the meantime the three men have carried out their burglary, with
results, both technical and personal, which my reviewer's credo of
non-disclosure will not let me spell out. It's enough to state that there's
a bit of suspense, a steady loss of  funny effects , a large growth of
pathos, unbelievability and gaps, all matched by the viewer's  growing
indifference as the movie becomes increasingly unpleasant.
Although Sean Connery gives the most picturesque performance, it is sketchy
and overdone, while Hoffman makes the most of his torn-loyalties part and
Broderick nicely underplays his underwritten role. Once before Sidney Lumet
had directed Connery as the mastermind of a heist, in the 1972 "The
Anderson Tapes," and failed, except for the depictions of supporting roles.
Curiously, the same happens here: some portraits of secondary characters
are excellent, from judges to shabby prosecutors. There is an especially
film-stealing actress (unidentified in the press information) who plays a
chillingly cold lawyer.
In the sub-text of this confused movie there's an ethical attitude
represented by Connery. Theft which involves risk-taking is much more
acceptable than "legal" large-scale stealing by some stockbrokers, big
business, banks, politicians and the like. The idea has some merit but is
unexploited. Unexploited too is the clever  twist behind the robbery, one
that involves Adam's professor.

Title
Review for Troublesome Creek: A Midwestern (1995)
TROUBLESOME CREEK: A MIDWESTERN. (1996)  Produced, directed, written by
Jeanne Jordan & Steven Ascher. Photography, Ascher. Editing, Jordan. Music,
Sheldon Mirowitz. Sound, Jordan, Ascher, George Christ. Narrated by Jeanne
Jordan.A West City Films, Inc. production. 88 minutes.
Next week (on 14 April 1997) PBS premieres an excellent documentary.
"Troublesome Creek" has won the Grand Jury Prize at the 1996 Sundance Film
Festival; the Sundance Audience Award; the Prix Italia; and was nominated
for a 1996  Academy Award as Outstanding Documentary.
This is a film that comes from the heart, so it is fitting that it has been
picked up by that always heartfelt PBS series, "The American Experience."
The title was almost inevitable. It refers to a twisty, unpredictable creek
on the Iowa farm of Russ and ex-schoolteacher Mary Jane Jordan, but also to
what banks call the "Troubled Accounts List" of loans.
The farm is in rural Iowa, near the town of Rolfe. It has been in the
Jordan family since 1867, when a former Union soldier moved to Iowa. The
current owners have been capable and have done well for the last forty
years. From the 1950s to the 1970s there was steady progress, which also
means expansion, and more equipment -- and more loans from willing banks.
Then troubled times came in. Farmers, who in Abraham Lincoln's day were the
overwhelming majority of Americans, had dwindled down to six million by
1960. By 1990-91, when "Troublesome Creek" was filmed, they were fewer than
two million.
Bank loans can be a way of life for farmers, and were for the Jordans too.
Loans and payments were renewed yearly, but then came an impasse: a debt of
$200.000 to the new, impersonal, banking consortium that had taken over the
old, friendly local bank.
When the filmmaking married couple of Jeanne Jordan and Steven Ascher in
the East, heard that foreclosure was menacing Jeanne's parents, they went
to Iowa with the double
purpose of lending moral support and documenting the farmers' struggles on
film. The main subjects were the older Jordans plus one son who worked with
them and another who farmed separately but (see the film) could not make a
go of it through no fault of his own.
On the periphery --but a significant one-- is much of the Jordan and
in-laws tribe.
With Jeanne narrating and commenting, the filmmakers do a splendid job of
unobtrusive
cinematography. The fact that Jeanne is a Jordan adds immeasurably to the
film in the way of reminiscences, changing times, family history,
characterizations of parents, siblings and outsiders. All of this comes
from the point of view of someone who is loving, deeply involved yet
unusually objective too. It's quite a balancing act, yet it comes through
naturally and convincingly.
The text and images are sharp, both warm and noting of cold facts, yet
never rhetorical or posturing. The Jordans are documented and so is the way
of life of farmers, with its special world, values and family tightness.
When Jeanne reminisces about her old high school, now closed for lack of
students, she tells us of a Date-Your-Dad event when, as she was driven to
it by Russ, she worried about what the two would talk about, adding (I am
paraphrasing): "With so many children and work, I really never had a
one-on-one conversatiom with my father." It's a striking revelation.
The sympathy for the Jordans is made with naturalness and ease also because
Jeanne has the luck to have a likable family of articulate, generally
well-educated persons, with pleasant voices accents --and photogenic to
boot. Nature has done a good job of casting.
Life also added one of those unplanned incidents that filmmakers prize. At
the start of the young couple's visit to the farm, a kitten  is meowing
pathetically from the top of a high barn.
There's no way to rescue it, but then, uncharacteristically for baby cats,
the small creature makes an enormous jump and lands unscathed into the arms
of Jeanne's brother. (We later see it as a grown cat). It is a minor
miracle that makes the viewer hope to see repeated as the rescue of the
farm. But in real life  there is no Deus ex Machina, no sudden inheritance
or discovery or oil that will solve all problems at the eleventh hour.
The senior Jordans must come to the difficult, pragmatic decision to hold
auctions for their cattle, for their machinery and their private
possessions. If this works out, the land and the house can be saved, their
son Jim can run it with his own machinery, father and mother can
semi-retire in town but with Russ still active as advisor on the farm.
There is steady, genuine suspense before and during those auctions. I will
only reveal that the outcome is positive, though the ultimate fate of the
farm under Jim remains a question mark.
The film is subtitled "A Midwestern" with the sense of quiet humor that
characterizes it. Russ and Mary Jane are avid fans of Hollywood Westerns.
They watch them on their television set, and we see a number of scenes,
cannily chosen by the filmmakers to illustrate the formula as given by
Russ: "Good Guys, Bad Guys, Fights," which of course parallels the Jordans'
own situation .
Other humorous touches are many, combined with warm ones, like Mary Jane
always finding an excuse for not putting up for auction some of her
doodads, or friends driving 120 miles in heavy snow to lend moral support
at the auction, or strangers with bad auction etiquette. Then, at the
Thanksigiving reunion there's the confusion  caused by every member of the
large family having a name starting with J.
We have not had any Save the Farm Hollywood movies after the spate of them
in  the 80s. Most of them were good as they went counter to the
romanticizing of farm life in fact and in older idyllic films, but none was
as genuine as the insider's job of "Troublesome Creek."

Title
Review for Before Night Falls (2000)
BEFORE NIGHT FALLS (2000) *** Directed by Julian Schnabel. Written by 
Cunningham O'Keefe, Lazaro Gomez Carriles, Mr. Schnabel, from the 
memoirs by Reinaldo Arenas.
Photography, Xavier Perez Grobet, Guillermo Rosas. Editing, Michael 
Berenbaum. Production design, Salvador Parra. Art direction, Antonio 
Muno-Hierro. Costumes, Maria Estela Fernandez. Music, Carter Burwell. 
Additional music, Laurie Anderson, Lou Reed. Cast: Javier Bardem (as 
Reinaldo Arenas), Oliver Martinez, Andrea Di Stefano, Johnny Depp, 
Sean Penn, Michael Wincott, Olatz Lopez Garmendia, Vito Maria 
Schnabel, Najwa Nimri, Hector Babenco, Jerzy Skolimowski, Sebastian 
Silva, et al. A Fine Line film. 135 minutes. R (sexuality, violence, 
language)
Painter-sculptor Julian Schnabel entered filmmaking with "Basquiat" 
(1996), about the graffiti street artist who briefly rose to fame. 
"Before Night Falls," Schnabel's second feature, centers on Cuban 
writer Reinaldo Arenas who is not a household name in North America. 
To what extent he is or was famous  in Cuba, a small nation with a 
big interest in the arts, is not explicited in the movie. It does not 
matter much, however.
Arenas, born in 1943, was a poor peasant boy with a rich gift for 
poetry.  He must have been 15 when he joined the Castro-led uprisings 
(December 1956 on...) against corrupt dictator (and former sergeant) 
Fulgencio Batista, who had to flee Cuba on  January 1, 1959.
The Revolution at first seemed to be good for Arenas. He received an 
education, found employment, wrote prose and poetry, won a major 
prize for a book, made friends both in and out literary circles. His 
friends were, it would seem, overwhelmingly gay.
Per the movie, by Castro-ite standards, intellectuals and/or artists 
are counter-revolutionary. The mere suspicion of political 
incorrectness may make someone an object of persecution, and almost 
guarantees it when the subject practices homosexuality, which Arenas 
did on a very large scale.
You cannot neatly separate fantasy from fact or near-fact in this 
movie, and this too does not matter. Arenas's first book was the only 
one published in Cuba, and found unacceptable by the authorities for 
reasons unspecified and only hinted at. Arenas, becomes a persona non 
grata, is oppressed, suppressed, persecuted for his life-style and 
associations, even framed. He is arbitrarily and repeatedly jailed 
under abject, near-infernal conditions, thrown into a pile of true 
criminals, and perhaps other railroaded innocents.
He manages to survive and to smuggle to Europe his subsequent works. 
In one such case it is BonBon, a flaming transvestite allowed prison 
visits --for unexplained reasons-- who carries a manuscript in an odd 
part of his anatomy. He is played by Johnny Depp. Depp  makes another 
appearance as a rather elegant Lieutenant who runs a prison and 
applies smoothly sadistic methods to get sexual gratification from 
Arenas. (Much earlier in the movie Sean Penn, unrecognizable, had 
given a ride in his cart to the teenage Reinaldo)
The acting of Javier Bardem (b. 1969) is outstandingly diverse, 
powerful and convincing --you keep your eyes glued on him. It's got 
to be in his genes. He comes from  a family of Spanish thespians-- 
grandparents, parents and siblings-- many of them famous.  Uncle Juan 
Antonio Bardem (b. 1922) was active until recently as director and 
scriptwriter. In the 1950s cinephiles used to sum up Spain's cinema 
as "the three Bs: Bunuel, Berlanga and Bardem."
Javier Bardem has acted in two dozen movies, but in the USA the 
public-at-large has probably seen him only in "High Heels" by 
Almodovar and "Jamon, jamon" by Bigas Luna.
This is neither a "normal" nor an "academic" or a "reportorial" 
biography of Arenas, but a fascinating mix of realism, ultra-realism, 
surrealism, dreams, true as well as invented documentary footage, 
poetry, fantasy, political criticism.
In a striking, memorable apocalyptic sequence, social outcasts live 
among ruins,  feast, copulate, and are fitting a hot-air balloon to 
escape to Florida. There is voice-over recitation and excellent Cuban 
or Cuban-inspired music. The well-filled two-and-a-quarter hours 
capture moods, mores, tragedy, some humor, life, sadness, joyfulness, 
pain, history, within a life under pressure. All this is not amount 
an orderly description of our hero/anti-hero. Though confusing at 
times it is a rich tossed salad whose main ingredient is Arenas.
In 1980, Castro allowed the departure of "undesirables" of all hues, 
including homosexuals and many criminals, by opening the harbor of 
Mariel for several months. 125,000 Cubans thus emigrated to the USA. 
One of them was Arenas. He spent 10 years in New York, then died of 
AIDS.
The film is oddly and arbitrarily bilingual, alternating in Spanish 
(subtitled) and English (with a Spanish accent). As Yul Brynner would 
say "it is a puzzlement." But what is an admirable puzzle is how most 
of the movie was shot in Mexico where it recreated so well the 
sights, sounds, people in their very Cuban-looking racial mixtures, 
streets, crumbling buildings, and all else with a precision that can 
fool even those who know the island. Additionally, what I suspect to 
be New York footage shot on video adds a special grittiness to the 
last part of the film. Ordinary studio sets and special effects pale 
by comparison.
Movie reviews by Edwin Jahiel are at : http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel 

Title
Review for Before and After (1996)
BEFORE AND AFTER *** Directed by Barbet Schroeder. Written by 
Ted Tally,based on the book by Rosellen Brown. Photography, 
Luciano Tovoli. Editing, Lee Percy. Production designer, 
Stuart Wurtzel. Music, Howard Shore. Produced by Schroeder and 
Susan Hoffman. Cast: Meryl Streep (Carolyn Ryan), Liam Neeson 
(Ben Ryan), Edward Furlong (Jacob Ryan), Julia Weldon (Judith 
Ryan), Alfred Molina (Panos Demeris). A Hollywood Pictures 
release. 108 minutes. PG-13
Given the people involved the film ought to be good. It is.  
Frenchman Barbet Schroeder,has directed "General Idi Amin 
Dada," "Barfly," "Single White Female" and sev eral other 
films --and has also been a producer, performer, screenwriter, 
photo-reporter, documentarist and critic. Meryl Streep is 
currently on her 10th Oscar nomination. She won Supporting 
Actress in "Kramer vs. Kramer" and Best Actress in "Sophie's 
Choice". Liam Neeson, best known for "Schindler's List," has 
held very different roles in nearly thirty movies since 1981. 
The production designer and cinematographer are class A. 
The Ryan family lives near a small New England town.  Carolyn 
is an MD, Ben a sculptor of massive wood and metal artifacts, 
son Jacob is a 16-year old with problems and not unusual 
clashes with Dad, younger sister Judith is problem-less and 
sensitive. 
A young working-class girl, who, unbeknownst to the senior 
Ryans, was Jacob's girlfriend, is found dead. It looks like a 
clear case of murder. Suspicions fall on Jacob. His parents 
disbelieve, but just the same, Ben checks out the car Jacob 
was driving. Finding bloody evidence, Ben panics and foolishly 
destroys it. 
That action starts a series of false moves by nearly everyone. 
Jacob skips town for six weeks, then is caught. Out on bail, 
he eventually comes out of his shell and relates to his family 
his version of the events. The Ryans hire a skilled lawyer, 
but even then feed him what information they consider 
helpful...  
In its first part the film runs like a drama observed with 
rather documentary distancing. The total movie is also a study 
of parental pain --and guilt -- combined with one of those 
judicial cases where the concealing of the truth by 
well-meaning adults only makes matters worse and entraps them 
mercilessly.  
The contest between the law and naive individuals is uneven. 
It's like the opening shots of ice-fishing through holes made 
by special power drills. The fish don't stand a chance against 
those techniques.
In a change from formulaic movies, "B & A" plays down 
suspense, bathos, whodunit and mystery-story elements, thrills 
or feelgood revelations.  As the movie distances itself from 
cliches it gets closer to real life. We are shown the town and 
its people in careful, small doses, which is good, as the 
film, by avoiding much local color, can concentrate on the 
Ryans. 
The source novel was rather rhetorical compared to the sober, 
clinically observed film adaptation by an Oscar-winner ("The 
Silence of the Lambs"). Also, in the book the Ryans were the 
Jewish Reiser family, a fact that added racist reactions by 
the locals. We do get, however, some class prejudice ("you 
rich people") in the movie. 
I cannot tell why the Reiser-to-Ryan change was made 
(prudence?) but I imagine that the addition of another level 
-- intolerance -- would have burdened the story with more 
screen time, detracted from its in-family drama and made of 
the film a heavier document. 
The acting is excellent. For this, much credit goes to Barbet 
Schroeder who directs intelligently but not sentimentally. The 
Ryans mix but do not match. The parents go from a happy couple 
to one with differences and conflicting notions of how to deal 
with the situation. 
Except for Michele Pfeiffer, Meryl Streep is the only other 
actress I know whose eyes, even without tears, can have a 
redness that means pain. Liam Neeson, mercurial and 
temperamental, is prone to instinctive (often wrong or 
violent) decisions, yet even so a new bond is forged between 
father and son. 
Julia Weldon makes a fine debut as a young girl who sees her 
seniors with quiet perspicacity, and understands them. Alfred 
Molina, as the pragmatic Greek-American lawyer who calls 
people "kiddo" and calls the shots, has to fight on two 
fronts: the prosecution and the misguided parents who do not 
realize that morality, justice and the law are not synonymous. 
Molina has a vigorous presence just this side of flamboyance. 
Some of the most striking scenes are with Edward Furlong who 
does much with minimalist acting. When visited by his parents 
in juvenile jail, he is surly, silent and, in his father's 
words, "catatonic." This translates to a child who is scared 
to death. 
As thin and wan as a consumptive youth in a 19th century 
novel, Furlong later acquires a trace of improved health. His 
face has a marked feminine look,reinforced by a voice that, I 
hope, will some day lose its high-pitch nasality. The way he 
is now, Furlong could make a beautiful transvestite in some 
picture.
In the neglected "A Home of Our Own" scripted by Patrick 
Duncan (the writer of "Mr. Holland's Opus"), Furlong was 
impressive as the oldest of widow Kathy Bates's six children. 
In "Little Odessa" he was the son of Vanessa Redgrave and 
Maximilian Schell, and the young brother of Tim Roth. Look for 
him in future films.  

Title
Review for Guinevere (1999)
GUINEVERE (1999) ** 1/2. Directed and written by Audrey Wells. 
Photography, Charles Minsky. Editing, Dody Dorn. Production design, 
Stephen McCabe. Music , Christophe Beck. Cast: Stephen Rea (Connie 
Fitzpatrick), Sarah Polley ( Harper Sloane), Jean Smart (Deborah 
Sloane), Gina Gershon (Billie), Paul Dooley (Walter), et al. 
Producers :
Tani Cohen, Boaz Davidson, Danny Dimbort, Dody Dorn, Beau Flynn, 
Julia Ganis , Todd Gilbert,  Jonathan King (III), Avi Lerner, 
Claudine Magre , Trevor Short, Stefan Simchowitz, Bob Weinstein, 
Harvey Weinstein, Brad Weston (II). A Miramax production. 104 
minutes. R (sex)
Reluctantly, I'll have to spell out much of the plot. "Guinevere" is 
a May -October love affair. Bohemian photographer Connie Fitzpatrick, 
is played by Irishman (b.1949) Stephen Rea. Harper Sloane, is played 
by Sarah Polley (b.1949). We meet them at her sister's wedding in 
July 1991., in San Francisco.
The Sloanes are an upper middle-class family, at least in income: Dad 
is a lawyer, Big Sister is a lawyer, her husband is a lawyer. There's 
symbolism here, but it is not especially exploited, except that 
Harper, a recent college graduate, has been accepted at the Harvard 
Law School and appears to be less than enthusiastic about it.
At the wedding she  seems to feel awkward, restless and uninvolved 
--until she meets its photographer Connie. The turning point comes 
later, when the pictures he took arrive. He's framed them so as to 
miss Harper, but the lot includes a presumably "catch the real 
person" picture of her, solo. The enchanted girl rushes to visit him 
in his proletarian studio-plus-apartment. He impresses her with his 
persona, she impresses him with her youth, things heat up and she 
moves in with Connie while lying to her family by saying she is had. 
in fact, not been accepted by Harvard and that she is now staying 
with a girlfriend. The Sloanes -- defying  logic --somehow accept 
both alibis.
Connie seduces Harper both physically and mentally, makes her his 
assistant and teaches her photography. You smell  immediately the 
Pygmalion thing --with a difference: it's like Rex Harrison going to 
bed with Audrey Hepburn first, and only then drilling her in the art 
of speaking. Here this is visual language, with a Nikon camera. 
Harper does well, but too soon for viewers  who are "au courant" with 
the skills of photography. Still, it is an interesting relationship, 
even though neither he nor she are interesting per se.
Following a mixed bag of small episodes, some fifty minutes into the 
film, Mrs. Deborah  Sloane appears in the twosome's abode. She is a 
handsome 40-year-old woman (Jean Smart, b.1959) who might have made a 
more appropriate mistress than her daughter. Ms. Smart steals the 
show in a rather short sequence. She does not throw a tantrum, does 
not recriminate, but coolly dissects the situation. She tells Connie 
:"You're even older than me, and you're [word deleted] my daughter." 
She also analyzes, with a clever subtext of regret, the fact that no 
woman who is not physically perfect would dare show her flesh to the 
experienced eyes of Connie. And she hits the nail on the head with "I 
know exactly what she [Harper] has that I haven't got. Awe" which she 
explains lucidly.  Connie- the-seducer's reaction is "You're quite a 
woman, Deborah." But she puts him down with "Mrs. Sloane. I am Mrs. 
Sloane" and departs.
This sequence is the best in the movie, especially as the 
well-sketched Mrs. Sloane can be at the same time a haughty 
socialite, a flutterhead,  a bitch on wheels., and wise.
The movie is, in part, about Harper's belated (she'll be 21 in a few 
months) coming of age. Now she is thinking of moving out and having 
her own small apartment near Connie's. He counters with "this is no 
time to go" adding that in five years' time she will know when that 
time comes. Nonetheless, Harper returns to her parents' home. At the 
dinner table, Deborah has the cowed group (her husband, two daughters 
and son-in-law) play a perverted fame involving fortune cookies. The 
young woman has had it. She returns to Connie who is throwing a 
surprise party for her 21st birthday. It is a bohemian affair, in 
which the various types seem to be as dull and stereotyped as the 
buttoned-up bourgeois.
Some time passes. The movie, neutral until now, takes a serious, sad 
swerve. Connie has to be hospitalized for detoxification. (We knew he 
was a hard drinker but the movie had not warned us that he was an 
alcoholic). More bad news: Connie is also broke. The couple drive 
from San Francisco to Los Angeles where he hopes to sell some 
pictures. Humiliation sets in when he has to get a handout from an 
old friend,. It increases when soon after, Connie, looking his age, 
loses some false teeth while eating. To pay the dentist they pawn his 
Nikon camera (there is abundant product placement for this brand 
throughout). In a motel room, he sends out Harper to buy booze. What 
follows should evoke in  cinephile minds a variant of "A Star is 
Born." It is not, however, the end. This comes four years later, when 
Harper, now a successful photographer, returns to the dying Connie, 
joining a quartet of former lovers and at the very end describing 
death to the man via a montage of fantasies. Both sequences are 
corny, dumb  stuff that goes against the movie's realism.
Technical credits are good. The principals' performances are 
convincing, credible (except for a silly, too-young number of Connie 
on a rooftop), and  Stephen Rea handles ably a non-Irish accent : I 
heard just one brief Irish lilt in his intonation.
The main supporting role, of Billie (Gina Gershon, whose small part 
in the recent "The Insider" was memorable) is underwritten. The rest 
of the characters are insignificant sub-supporters.
Guinevere is the name the photographer gives all his mistresses. The 
why of it escapes me. I see no connection to King Arthur's wife 
Guinevere, or to Sir Lancelot, her lover.
The movie is the first one directed by Audrey Wells, the writer of 
"The Truth About Cats and Dogs." It makes its points, several of them 
sharp, others rather vague. I wonder what was the input, if any,  of 
its army of producers (see the credits above).

Title
Review for Baby, It's You (1997)
BABY, IT'S YOU, the story of an inter-faith romance, was the title of the
second movie written as well as directed (1983) by John  Sayles, that
superb independent film-maker. It is also the title of the film that opens
in June 1998 the 11th season of the excellent P.O.V. documentary series
airing on PBS. By another coincidence, Sayles's fictional works as well as
the P.O.V. offerings are both concerned with people and the human
condition.
The current BABY is by prize-winning film-maker Anne Makepeace. It is an
autobiographical slice of life and time, about Ms.Makepeace and her
Canadian-born husband, writer Peter Behrens, with a "supporting cast" of
their non-mainstream  (when not downright weird by conventional standards)
baby-boomer siblings.
Having reached their late forties the childless couple decide to have a
baby. At Anne's age "it's really hard to get pregnant the fun way," says
Anne, so the two decide to undergo modern fertility procedures. These
become a mini-medical Odyssey that involves body, mind and feelings I will
not reveal what actually happens (or does not ) since the film is, in its
way, a real-life suspense story, with revelations and with branching out
into the principals' families. To various degrees, the latter involve
Anne's brother Douglas who, in Utah, is planning to embark on polygamy and
have twenty kids; Doug's patriarchically bearded neighbor who has seven
wives; Anne's hippie-ishly bearded other brother Roger, a semi-recluse in
Appalachian mountains with his company of goats; uncles and aunts from New
England; Peter's artist sister Mary whose quandary parallels that of Anne
in her first days in college; Peter's sister Anne in Canada, who, with her
lover Tanya, adopts a baby; some other characters.
Very well shot by Uta Briesewicz, the film is a small tour-de-force in the
way it follows chronologically and step-by-step the efforts, dashed hopes
and new hopes of the parents-to-be (perhaps), their solid marriage, and
Anna's reflections on her past. In a sense, she, as the documentary's prime
maker, is stalking her own self, but with naturalness and no trace of
play-acting, setting up situations or staging anything.
Andy Warhol's dictum  that sooner or later everyone will have a few minutes
of fame is debatable. What is unarguable however, is that, as  BABY shows,
all the lives of all human beings contain at least one movie subject, and
probably many more as this documentary does.
It touches on family relationships, marriage, abortion, unexpected drama,
changing or new standards and mores. "To breed or not to breed? That is the
question " plus the belated decision to have a child in mid-life, while not
elaborated upon, still speaks loudly of the rat-race for success and
financial security, of the siren-song of professionalism, the business and
busy-ness of this waning century. Other problems of Anne and her brethren
can be laid on the doorstep of their Yankee parents whose relations with
their children were, we suspect, hardly confidential, and for whom any
mention of sex was inconceivable.
It's all there, both in text and sub-text, both in the banality of life and
its unconventionalities. To what extent viewers will be touched or
enlightened is an open question. But they will surely be interested and
intrigued.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Erin Brockovich (2000)
ERIN BROCKOVICH (2000) *** Directed by Steven Soderbergh. Written by 
Susannah Grant. Photography, Ed Lachman. Editing, Anne V. Coates. 
Production design, Phil Messina. Music, Thomas Newton. Cast: Julia 
Roberts (Erin Brockovich), Albert Finney (Ed Masry), Aaron Eckhart 
(George), Cherry Jones (Pamela Duncan), Peter Coyote (Kurt Potter), 
Veanne Cox (Theresa Dallavale), Marg Helgenberger, Cherry Jones, 
Scotty Leavenworth,Gemmenne de la Pena, Tracey Walter. Produced by 
Danny DeVito, Michael Shamberg and Stacey Sher. A  Universal 
/Columbia release.  127 minutes. R.(language)
Let's talk beauty. Julia Roberts made her first big splash in and as 
"Pretty Woman." The title has stuck to the lyrically enthusiastic 
descriptions of her.
Is she really as incredibly gorgeous as the slick magazines keep 
hammering? What's happening to the classic canons of pulchritude? 
Through the ages the standards have changed. The chorus girls of 
1930s-40s motion pictures are, to say the least, plump by today's 
measurements. The pouty little mouths of the silent screen 
disappeared after talkies took over. "Glamor" is a moribund 
expression. Even so, some constants do remain.
Julia Roberts has a willowy figure. Her face is, to put it mildly, 
unorthodox. Both serve her well in "Erin Brockovich." Her noticeable 
nose and big slash of a mouth are respectively symbolic of Erin's 
amazing ability to sniff things out and to talk her way through the 
film with vigorous arguments, and expletives that are light years 
away (or 61 movie years) from Rhett Butler's "Frankly, my dear, I 
don't give a damn!"
Writer-director Steven Soderbergh's first feature "Sex, Lies, and 
Videotape" won the Golden Palm at the 1989 Cannes Festival. Almost 
all of his subsequent films have been remarkable, original, quirky 
and playing with time --but not commercial hits. Yet  his excellent 
"King of the Hill " was most accessible and his recent "Out of Sight" 
pleased audiences and critics.
Erin Brockovitch , correctly pronounced should be VITCH and not VIK, 
but I can't remember hearing the last name in the movie. I can flatly 
state however that the film will be a big hit. It is a mainstream , 
linear job without tricky flashbacks or other stylistic flourishes. 
It stars an enormously popular prima donna who is in just about every 
scene of this two-hours-plus story. And it is arguably the best 
performance to date by Roberts.  But don't let the word "mainstream" 
fool you. Soderbergh has assimilated audience-pleasing principles 
yet, in other ways injects novelty and imagination in his picture.
Take the opening. Erin, a twice divorced single mother of three, is 
scraping bottom financially. She needs -- and how -- a job. We meet 
her in a wonderfully scripted and performed interview with an MD for 
a receptionist position. Her febrile talk underlines her anxiousness 
as well as her lack of credentials. The doctor then says something 
like "Now look at this"-- and you just know that she won't get the 
job. The movie cuts away to Erin getting back to her car, which, 
seconds later, gets hit by the BMW of, ironically, another doctor. 
Fine, clever direction and editing.
Erin gets aging lawyer Albert Finney to sue. His firm is small, his 
girth is not. We get, refreshingly, the only courtroom trial in a 
movie that's chockfull with legalities. The scene is short, but not 
sweet for Erin. She loses. No explanations are given but we guess 
clearly that Erin's blatantly sexy outfit on the stand and her 
generous use of the f-word have done her in.
Increasingly desperate, the lady scours the want ads. She may have 
been a beauty queen in Topeka, but she was also a school drop-out. 
The absence of qualifications again. Things are tough. So Erin, with 
the irony that throughout the movie alternates with pathos, applies 
for a file-clerk job at Finney's very office, She gets it through 
mega-moxie which includes her special brand of outspokenness
The film tells you from the start: This is a True Story. That's more 
often than not an alibi for embroidering fantasies and inventions 
into facts. Yet in its basic, general lines the movie is fact indeed. 
Getting ahead of myself  I'll say that a real corporation,  giant, 
$28 billion Pacific Gas & Electric, had to pay the  largest 
reparation ever in the USA to a huge number of suing individuals.
True too is that the real Erin started it all, that she dressed, 
acted, spoke the way Julia Roberts does.  She also was a looker. You 
can ascertain this in the sequence where Erin takes her kids to an 
eatery. The comely waitress is the genuine Erin.
  When ordering food Erin pretends not to be hungry but then, back 
home, devours a can of something. It does not matter whether or not 
this  is an invention. It is touching, plausible and fleshes out the 
character.
The movie's Erin is an extraordinarily fast learner who uses 
efficiently her eyes, nose  and hitherto unexploited brains. 
Shuffling files she finds out that there is a connection between PG&E 
and the dreadful illnesses and deaths in the working-class California 
desert town of Hinkley, next to which the corporation had been 
dumping a poisonous chemical, hexavalant chromium. Forcefully 
persuading her boss Ed Masry (Finney) that she should and could 
investigate, she takes off with the energy of a rocket.
The unlikely Erin becomes a convincing sleuth as well as a sensitive 
and sympathetic interviewer of the population of Hinkley. All of its 
people have been and still are affected by the poison. Some of them 
are naive, in need of education and of persuasion to sue. Most are in 
awe of a mammoth power company's power. Additionally, there are 
strong layers in the film where the ordinary people mistrust lawyers, 
lawyers mistrust other lawyers, and legal firms are scared of being 
sunk by the billions of dollars the corporations can fight back with, 
as in the film "A Civil Action."
Increasingly Erin shows superb initiative, intelligence and an 
amazing comprehension  and specific details of her work. The movie 
works breathlessly as human interest and as a dandy detective story 
against a painful background. Deja vu?  Yes. Think "Silkwood," the 
aforementioned "A Civil Action,"" The Insider," etc. Yet the subjects 
are so enormous that there's room for several more works along those 
lines.
"EB" has a nice balance of tragedy, suspense, and humor. Erin herself 
is the right combination. She takes her work --in fact her mission -- 
as ardently as possible, and her role as mother too, At the same time 
she seems, slyly, to take her private persona un-seriously, 
sometimes self-mockingly. She dominates the story. Lawyer Ed plays 
second (but still major) fiddle to her. Puffy Albert Finney's 
performance is perfectly on-target. He is fully dimensional as a 
professional, as Erin's often annoyed boss, and in the ways he slips 
into the role of a friend and partrner. The varied supporting cast 
are well-drawn, with economy and feeling. Sensibly, the movie does 
not try to make of them picturesque characters. Instead it saves all 
its ammunitions of colorfulness for  Julia R. There is 
star-worshipping strategy here--not irritating, in fact quite 
pleasant, but
over-the-top .Even so, it's not an Achilles' Heel.
The main sub-plot (actually a sub-sub-plot) comes from Erin's plight 
in caring for her children. This is partly solved by new neighbor 
George, a  tattooed biker and construction worker who makes good 
money and gets jobs only whenever he pleases. He volunteers to 
babysit the kids, whom he likes.  Obviously  this service is also his 
entree to becoming Erin's new flame. The affair is not especially 
interesting, appealing or romantic. Mercifully George doesn't take up 
much movie time. He does have one good, telling moment, and I do mean 
a moment.  While he helps Erin in a "business" picnic of the Hinkley 
folks, bikers raise dust on the road. George's short look at them is 
neutral but says a lot in a  prime illustration of the Kuleshov effect
A major, indeed enormous distraction runs throughout the film : 
Erin's hooker-like outfits,  short skirts, long legs, spike heels and 
a push-up bra cleavage that constantly threatens to spill the goods. 
Her reverse dress code raises eyebrows and criticism. It also brings 
on Erin's snappy retorts. She does not mince her words. The 
spectacular views, whether cheap, cheaper or cheapest, underline her 
"take me as I am" attitude. One does wonder how many times the sights 
make males in the audience miss dialogue lines. They may also be 
missing the fact that this is a feminist film with a vengeance. Erin, 
if you half think of it, Wonder-Bra and all, is no bimbo but an 
activist who's pulling out all the stops. That she is is smart enough 
to ask for raises is natural.  But she has a true cause and feels 
sincerely the pain of others. Her themes song could be "Body and 
Soul."
The familiar formula of the film is the old David and Goliath one -- 
the triumph of the little people over mighty forces--which has fed 
countless movies, including several of Frank Capra's. It's 
irresistible, makes the audience rapt with suspense, causes it to 
cheer openly or inwardly when the good guys win.
"ER" 's scenario feels like the job of a veteran writer, yet it is 
Susannah Grant's first solo script, following her co-writing of 
"Pocahontas" and "Ever After." Remember her name.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Living Out Loud (1998)
LIVING  OUT  LOUD  * 1/4  Written and directed by Richard LaGravenese.
Photography, John Bailey. Editing, Gregory & Lynzee Klingman.  Production
design, Nelson Coates. Music, George Fenton. Produced by Danny DeVito,
Michael Shamberg & Stacey Sher. A New Line release. Cast:  Holly Hunter
(Judith), Danny DeVito (Pat), Queen Latifah (Liz Bailey), Martin Donovan
(Bob Nelson), Elias  Koteas (the Kisser), Richard Schiff (Philly), et al.
A New Line release. 102 minutes. R (language, drugs, sex massage)
Q: Mr. Critic, I have some questions about this movie. Be patient with me.
I have a doctorate from Europe, have been in the USA for some time and
speak English pretty well. But there are a few things about American life,
politics, and some movies that I can't quite understand. Some expressions
too as [ Editor's note: the speaker is foreign-born, therefore he uses "as"
correctly, instead of "like"] when you put in your reviews words like
parsimonious, avuncular, or tropism.
A: Not to worry. I have the same trouble with Finland and Turkmenistan. I
promise to keep things simple. If I can't, I'll put an asterisk * for words
easy to find in a dictionary.
Q: My first question is about the title that, well, confuses me. From the
rather funny previews I thought it was Laughing Out  Aloud. It wasn't, and
it wasn't funny either.
A: I concur (it means I agree with you). I don't get the title either,
except in a very roundabout * way.
Q: How about the subject? It is clear that Holly Hunter has recently
divorced after being married for 16 years to a cardiologist who must make
good money. Their apartment is in an expensive co-op on Fifth Avenue. Holly
is desperate. DeVito, who plays the co-op's doorman-elevator operator is
sad. Long ago his wife had kicked him out. Very recently, his daughter had
died. Danny likes to gamble and owes a lot of money. Those two characters
have been seeing each other for years, but without really seeing. For the
man, the lady was so out of his class that he probably didn't think of her.
For the woman, DeVito must have been like a piece of indifferent furniture.
But now they get together, become friends, and DeVito falls in love with
her. The chance of her reciprocating (hey, I do know some fancy words!) is
like a snowball in hell (I also know some idioms!)
I don't think that the situation is very original, except for the
differences between the two characters. I remember some films with women of
about 40 who suddenly found themselves alone and lonely.
A: You're doing OK. Let me add something from real life and from movies
that also applies here: the cases of some medical students that marry
nurses (Holly was and still is one) who work hard to help their mates, but
after the man becomes a wealthy doctor, he dumps his wife for a younger
woman, as in this film. The script does not go into background details,
however.What it implies,you have to take on faith. And that is that Holly
was defined by her husband, that Holly was not a whole person but merely
Mrs. Cardiologist. So she finds herself at loose ends, mentally,
psychologically, even physically (note the sequence with the masseur, a
hulk *)
Q: Right. That's why she wanders about, tries to find herself (ugh!),  gets
a massage that may or may not includeout-and-out sex. We don't know. But
aren't there more things we don't know?
A: Lots. Holly has fantasies, like a vision of her suicide. That's pretty
clear. But other fantasies are not. The main one is when she is in a bar
during amateur night, looks for a bathroom, opens a door and is seized by a
man who kisses her, then apologizes. He thought she was a woman he was
expecting. Did this happen? Was it a figment * of Holly's imagination? In
any case, it seems to have done her some good.
Q: How about her enthusiasm about the singer of that bar? She is played by
Queen Latifah. I know that she is a rapper who now also does "regular"
music. When I was young, abroad, I saw many movies that had in them what I
believe you call torch singers. Here Queen Latifah (who is very good) is
Liz Bailey. I bet it is a reference to Pearl Bailey (whom we adored in
Europe), in style and appearance.
A: Wish I had thought of that. Latifah's somewhat modernized versions of
older songs were good, yes.  Holly's enthusiasm is partly that phony cliche
where non-WASPs * (think of Charlie Chan) are endowed with wisdom, even
though in this case Latifah herself admits that she is none too wise in her
love life.
Q: Were you interested in the non-affair between Holly and Danny? I just
could not get excited by it, even though there were a few OK moments.
A: I was most uninterested. Those characters are the whole movie, and while
I did sympathize with their problems, this couple is uninteresting. The
movie got duller and duller. It became Sighing Out Loud as I kept looking
at my watch. Even the camera-work was dull. Things became laughable when
Holly took uppers (this means feel-good drugs, pills) and went to a
nightclub recommended by Latifah.
A: It was silly. The club turns out to be an all-lesbian place, packed
wall-to-wall by women in designer * outfits, dancing like choreographed,
well-rehearsed professionals! Holly takes to the floor like a veteran. Come
on!
Q: There were several scenes with Holly that did not seem to add anything.
Agree?
A: Absolutely. Tacked-on * tacky * stuff. Take Nurse Holly at the hospital,
first with an unpleasant, older patient who berates * her equally
unpleasant daughter. Pointless. Then the same lady is all dolled up * and
becomes Holly's confidante. Now, if you asked the scriptwriter, he might
tell you that both scenes have something to do with the fear of being left
alone, especially as one ages. But they really contribute nothing to the
story.
A:  Well-known film writer Richard LaGravenese: The Fisher King, A Little
Princess, The Mirror Has Two Faces, etc. He is the person who transformed
the Harlequin-type * book The Bridges of Madison County, a sentimental
weepie *, into a very nice movie. But here, in his first time as a
director, his would-be moving-feminist-tract *  is a flat yawner *. It was
inspired by two Anton Chekhov short stories which, to my shame, I do not
know.
Q: Still, didn't you like the performances?
A: One does what one can with what one has. Not much in this case. Ms.
Hunter, 40, was given make-up and colored hair that are most un-flattering
(there are too many closeups in any case) and cheapen her character. She
repeats too many mannerisms. Her Georgia accent has sometimes been an
asset, sometimes not, and sometimes was made hybrid by her trying to
conceal it, as in this film. The hybrid approach does not work. Her
voice--which is not the same the thing as her accent -- often grates. After
the premiere of The Piano, she spoke a mile a minute * to the press, as if
trying to make up for her role as a mute. She and her voice raised many
eyebrows.
I admit though that at picture's end (when Holly seems vaguely ready to
have a real life of her own) DeVito's singing of They Can't Take That Away
>From Me was quite good.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Matilda (1996)
MATILDA ***   Directed and co-produced by Danny DeVito. Written by 
Nicholas Kazan and Robin Swicord from the book by Roald Dahl.  
Photography, Stefan Czapsky. Editing,Lynzee Klingman & Brent White. 
Production design ,Bill Brzeski. Music, David Newman. Cast: Danny DeVito 
( Harry Wormwood), Rhea Perlman (Zinnia Wormwood), Mara Wilson (Matilda 
Wormwood), Pam Ferris (Principal Trunchbull), Embeth Davidtz (Miss 
Honey), Paul Reubens (FBI agent), et al. A TriStar release. 95 minutes. 
Rated PG. 
Made both for children and grownups, plain funny or darkly funny in its 
depiction of downtrodden kids, "Matilda" will please all, disturb no 
one. It comes from a story by Roald Dahl whose fantasies were the source 
of  "Willy Wonka and the Chocolate Factory" and "The Witches." "Matilda" 
is fairy tale-ish enough to be unfrightening to youngsters and 
un-subverting to adults--unless the latter are as caricaturally stupid, 
uncultured, vulgar and insensitive as the crummy parents of charming 
Matilda.
Harry and Zinnia Wormwood dress horribly, talk dumbly, are concerned 
only with the most dubious blessings of suburbia and materialism. But 
they are very funny in a "yeech!" way. He is a used-car dealer of 
Himalayan dishonesty. He cheats the sellers, gives them a pittance, then 
scotch-tapes and camouflages the cars which he resells for 
thousands.There is nothing in him of the relative warmth of, say, 
car-dealer Ted Danson in the neglected "Made in America." As Harry also 
deals in stolen car parts, the FBI is stalking him. One of the two 
agents is Paul Reubens (Pee-Wee Herman) in a small role.
The most interesting thing about Harry may get lost in the shuffle as 
the story concentrates on the title character. Harry is not merely a 
felon and a mega-crook, but a creature who finds blissful, almost erotic 
thrills in his accomplishments, a man who waxes ecstatically 
self-congratulatory about his skills, the con-man as an artist.
The Wormwoods have two children, a boy sketchily used and undeveloped in 
the film, and their younger daughter. Matilda is like one of those 
characters in popular lore on whom a fairy godmother bestowed supreme 
intelligence. She is mentally so precocious that it makes her a junior 
version of John Travolta in "Phenomenon." Her self-absorbed, loutish 
parents are unaware of her genius as well as of everything else 
concerning the girl. 
In her bookless house Matilda teaches herself to read. Discovering the 
public library, this junior Wormwood becomes a Bookwormwood, goes 
through hundreds of volumes, mostly novels for grownups. A shot of her, 
sitting on the grass abd devouring a book while on the other side of a 
wire fence, children are playing, sums her up beautifully, even 
touchingly.
When Harry finally notices the books his reaction is:" What d'ya want a 
book for? There's nothing you can get from a book that you can't get 
from televison faster." Their living-room TV set, always on, is, by the 
way, stolen goods. While watching it that Matilda discovers that she 
also has the power of telekinesis and of making things explode.
Matilda would the embodiment of neglected (though not abused) children, 
were it not for comic exaggeratiions. At age six-and-a-half she tells 
her folks that she should have been in school, a notion that never 
crossed the Wormwoods' minds. Especially as they vaguely believe (when 
forced to think) that Matilda is still four! Additionally, as Harry says 
"If you go to school, who will sign for the packages?" The place is 
piled high with containers of illegal car parts.
Finally Matilda does go to a private establishment in a gloomy mansion 
whose principal, nicknamed Miss Trunchbull, is a sadistic monster. 
"Aaaah. Newcomers! Fresh Meat!" she says to herself. Miss T. was a 
shot-put, javelin and hammer throw champion at the 1972 Olympics. These 
were the games where Israeli athletes were assassinated in Munich. While 
Miss T., played by a British actress, has no national identity, she is 
built like a Walkyrie, wears a kind of paramilitary uniform and may well 
have been inspired by the infamous SS, Ilse Koch, The Bitch of 
Buchenwald, down to jackboots and riding crop.
I won't give away how she still practices her sports on the terrified 
pupils, how she affirms her authority, what is the special punishment 
room called "The Cruncher," what one of her dark secrets is, etc.etc. 
Enough to say that one of the signs in her school reads :"If You Are 
Having Fun Learning, You Are Not Learning."
Matilda, who is most appealing, lovable and (among other things) a 
mathematical genius with a computer mind, rapidly bonds with the much 
put-upon teacher Miss Honey (the name says it all). Miss Honey also has 
a deep dark secret.  She visits the Wormwoods and realizes what creeps 
they are. Miss Honey and Matilda become allies and defeat the Principal, 
with no small thanks to Matilda's increasing powers to move and levitate 
objects and people. Not in gory, vengeful fashion like Sissy Spacek in 
"Carrie," but 
nicely and constructively, for the common weal.
The special effects for all this can get a bit tiresome, but they are 
just a gnat in the ointment of this satirical, farcical, blackly 
humorous tale. The balance among characters is finely tuned. At one 
extreme are Matilda's family and the school principal. At the other, the 
mellifluous ("mel" means "honey" in Latin) Miss Honey. At the center, 
always perfectly normal in personality and character is Matilda, played 
with confidence, natural wisdom and mischievousness by the young actress 
of "Mrs. Doubtfire."
DeVito and Perlman, married to each other in real life, must have drawn 
inspiration from their experiences and observations. Though howlingly 
grotesque, they achieve, in a paradoxical tour-de-force, a basic level 
of believability that makes the children's triumph over nastiness even 
more satisfactory.

Title
Review for Anniversary Party, The (2001)
THE ANNIVERSARY PARTY  (2001) *** Written and directed by Jennifer Jason 
Leigh and Alan  Cumming.Photography, John Bailey. Editing, Carol Littleton 
and Suzanne Spangler. Music,  Michael Penn. Cast: Alan Cumming (Joe 
Therrian), Jennifer Jason Leigh (Sally Therrian), John Benjamin Hickey 
(Jerry Adams), Parker Posey (Judy Adams), Phoebe Cates (Sophia Gold), Kevin 
Kline (Cal Gold), Owen Kline (Jack Gold), Greta Kline (Evie Gold), Mina 
Badie (Monica Rose), Jane Adams (Clair Forsyth), John C.Reilly (Mac 
Forsyth), Jennifer Beals (Gina Taylor), Gwyneth Paltrow (Skye Davidson), 
Denis O'Hare (Ryan Rose), Levi Panes (Michael Panes) and Karen Kilgariff 
(Karen).Produced by Joanne Sellar, Alan Cumming, Jennifer Jason Leigh. A 
Fine Line release.115 minutes. Rated R.
Leigh and Cumming are a married couple. He is a Brit bisexual writer, she 
is an actress whose career is menaced. They have recently gotten back 
together after one year's separation. And to celebrate their sixth wedding 
anniversary, they invite several friends (or "friends"?)--all in showbiz in 
one way or another, plus, for "political" reasons, next-door neighbors whom 
they have never seen but with whom they have been having a fight about a 
too-barking dog. The party is at the couple's modern, to-die-for home in 
the Hollywood Hills.
Leigh is on my list of best performers. This movie confirms it. It matters 
little that the film's basic set-up is s not especially original. Once 
again we have motley people in a limited space. But, as in Lawrence 
Kasdan's "The Big Chill," the participants are not too motley, since the 
hosts and most of the guests are, and play, Hollywoodian professionals.
In the course of the evening, an above-average number of extant, new or 
possible relationships, of home as well as "trade" problems, are touched 
upon and/or catalyzed as relatively sane or quirky or fairly sane people 
interract. Much of this is due to the lessening of inhibitions courtesy of 
the drug Ecstasy.
The film has documentary authenticity. When the performances (acting, 
dialogue, behavior, etc.) do ring false, they are in fact "real-life false" 
since showbiz people almost always act no matter who, what or where they 
are. Conclusion: we get faithfulness off-stage, in private lives.  Their 
roles in this movie may or may not reflect personal experience, but even 
when they don't, they come from a milieu that the thespians, witers, 
directors, etc. are most familiar with.
It makes no difference to the audiences that certain parts or passages are 
improvised, or else pretend to be. The bottom line is convincing realism. 
If something looks or sounds phony, it is because it is that in life, when 
cameras are not running.
The movie has nothing that's radically fresh or unusual,  just as most 
people --including film-persons-- seldom offer anything new. But what you 
see and hear is very well done --notably its satires.
Unlike some other movies I have seen recentlly and that were shot in 
digital video with murky results, the video here is pretty close to the 
traditional celluloid. It could even fool you into non-awareness of the 
digital process.
Movie reviews by Edwin Jahiel are at : http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel 

Title
Review for Wonder Boys (2000)
THE LONG WEEKEND or CAMPUS CONFIDENTIAL
WONDER BOYS (2000) *** Directed by Curtis Hanson. Written by Steve 
Kloves, from the novel by Michael Chabon. Photography, Dante Spinotti 
.Editing, Dede Allen. Production design, Jeannine Oppewall. Music, 
Christopher Young ( "Things Have Changed" written and performed by 
Bob Dylan). Produced by Scott Rudin and Hanson. Cast: Michael Douglas 
(Grady Tripp), Tobey Maguire (James Leer), Frances McDormand (Sara 
Gaskell), Robert Downey Jr. (Terry Crabtree), Katie Holmes (Hannah 
Green), Rip Torn (Q), Walter Gaskell  ( Richard Thomas), Richard Knox 
(Vernon Hardapple), Jane Adams (Oola), et al. .A  Paramount release. 
112 minutes. R. (drugs)
"It's a puzzlement" as the King of Siam would tell Anna. And some 
movies can be bigger puzzlements  than others. More films than one 
suspects need a second viewing, so that the past, seen again and 
recollected in tranquility, might result  in a really valid opinion. 
Ideally that viewing should come days or weeks or months later, but 
of course this comes too late for the first, hot-off-the-press 
review. That's where retrospective judgments come in.
The great majority of viewers have given "Wonder Boys" a warm 
welcome. I add my voice to theirs, but it cannot be as categorical as 
most. My margin of error is larger than usually.
The movie has interesting makers. Director Curtis Hanson has made 
some ten pictures (since 1972)  including "Bad Influence" and "The 
Hand That Rocks the Cradle" before vaulting to fame for his  1997 
"L.A. Confidential." Writer Steven Kloves had scripted three : 
"Racing with the Moon" (1984),  "The Fabulous Baker Boys" (1989)  -- 
both very good -- and "Flesh and Bone" (1993) which I don't know. 
Neither Hanson nor Kloves seems to be in a hurry. "Nice," as Onslow 
might say in "Keeping Up Appearance."
The cinematographer, the production designer, the editor ( the 
legendary Dede Allen, resurfacing after many years) are among the 
best.
The actors are notable and cast with originality. Michael Douglas, 
the male lead, has never been simpatico. Clark Gable always was, 
Harrison Ford always is, but Douglas has a kind of ego-centered face 
that's an asset in some roles but not in others.
Tobey Maguire, now 25, is a major wunderkind of the last decade. So 
is  Katie Holmes, now 22, the revelation of "The Ice Storm" (which 
also starred Maguire) who went on to TVs  "Dawson's Creek,"  the 
appealing, offbeat "Go" and the fiasco "Teaching Mrs. Tingle. "
Talented in idiosyncratic ways is Frances McDormand , known as the 
winner of the Best Actress Oscar in "Fargo" but not for many other, 
remarkable appearances. In "Hidden Agenda" for instance.
What first struck me about "Wonder Boys" is that it has no pretty men 
and women,  except for Katie Holmes (but who knows what she'll look 
like in fifteen years?) And what struck me as the movie progressed 
was that Michael Douglas, in a non-simpatico role, paradoxically has 
our sympathy, if you follow my drift.
The plot rather convoluted. I have not read the source book but 
reliable persons tell me that the script follows it well and does not 
betray it.
At the tall tale's center is fifty-something Professor Grady Tripp, 
played by 56-ish Douglas. He teaches creative writing at a college 
in Pittsburgh, where the picture was shot, using many Carnegie-Mellon 
sites.  Some eight years ago Tripp had huge success with his first 
novel. Since then he's been working on his next one. Seized by 
post-mid-life crisis, plus the fear that comes with  the pressure of 
following a tough act (his own book), unable to make decisions, Grady 
Tripp keeps writing a mammoth, single-spaced manuscript, He is on 
page 2611.
Adding to his state of mind is an overkill of other factors : his 
third wife just left him; his lover of five years, Sara Gaskell 
(McDormand) who is the Chancellor of the school, tells him she is 
pregnant by him. Her husband Walter Gaskell  ( Richard Thomas) is the 
ingratiating head of the English Department hence Tripp's boss. 
Unkempt Grady is a kind of outdated hippie who is partial to pot, 
wears rumpled, probaly smelly clothes, has dishevelled hair and 
sometimes looks like something the cat dragged in.
The events take place over the long weekend of "Wordfest," the 
school's annual literary shindig that brings to campus writers, 
agents, publishers, some of them weird, as are certain other 
attendees.  "Wordfest" 's host is Walter Gaskell. For a reception in 
the Gaskell house, he has purchased Lafitte-Rotschild wine, 
improbably so, since it is so pricey that only a few football coaches 
might afford it. That's just part of the film's improbabilities, 
which can be simultaneously part of its appeal-- the story being a 
kind of semi-affectionate blackish comedy.
Its alternate title might have been "Campus Confidential" an expose 
of Academe's private face which seems to be an insider's report but 
in fact is not. Yes, campuses are not exempted from what the Romans 
used to call "hankium-pankium." Yes, strange people (professors, 
students, staff and others) do strange things. Yes, many 
campus-dwellers can be caricatured. But it seldom happens that 
matters are as pronounced, even blatant, as in the movie. Its 
authenticity is often questionable.
Among the facts and/or developments are: Sara's pregnancy 
(decisions, decisions); cute, intelligent, promising writer Hannah, 
one of Grady's students, rents a room at his house (the third Mrs. 
Tripp, never seen, has her own house in the burbs) and would love to 
start something with Grady, who could be her grandfather and wisely 
takes no action. (The crush is flattering to the quinquagenerian but 
hormonally unlikely). There is the  aside of a  black dude whose car 
he claims Grady has taken. (It's there for farcical absurdism though 
at the end this gets worked into the story).
What rules the set-up is the person of James Leer (Tobey Maguire), 
another brilliant writer from Grady's class. Wonderboy James gets 
somehow involved (don't ask) in the big reception, where a new and 
very odd relationship is created between him an the other "wonderboy" 
(at 50-plus?) Grady. Peculiar developments follow. Among them James's 
shooting dead (with what he had claimed was a toy pistol) Professor 
Walter Gaskell's blind dog which hates and attacks Grady --who will 
limp for th rest of the picture; the theft of a valuable Gaskell 
memento, a jacket worn by Marilyn Monroe at her wedding with Joe 
DiMaggio; the improbable carrying around the dead hound, for days, 
inside the trunk of Grady's car.
More complications that raise eyebrows.  Grady's editor, the creepy 
Terry Crabtree (Robert Downey Jr.) now on the professional skids, 
comes to the colloquium with a towering transvestite played by 
Michael Cavadias of the rock group Bullett. Terry is taken with James 
(with whom he eventually sleeps) while counting on James's and 
Grady's books-to-be to save  his career. (I wonder how Downey, in 
jail off and  mostly on  since 1996, has managed to be in about 10 
films since 1997!!!)
James is undeniably a huge talent, we are told, though we never have 
any real proofs of it. James, a sophomore I think is  morose, 
near-catatonic,  with all sorts of mysteries, secrets and 
peculiarities.His character  is pushed to such extremes that these 
also push away one's interest in James.
It was Gertrude Stein who said that she prefers normal people over 
abnormal ones, "because the normal ones are so much more interesting."
I'll modify this by "eccentrics can be appealing; weirdos seldom are."
James is a congenital liar, a fabulator who keeps inventing his past, 
an occasional thief, a smoker of Grady's cannabis. I suppose that 
those traits mean that he's a genuine writer.
Moreover, James is a savant on matters cinematographic. When it comes 
to Hollywood facts and trivia he has a bottomless memory. Early on he 
recites a list of actors who  killed themselves, with precise dates 
of their suicides. He could win millions with movie trivia  such as 
"Marilyn was small but most people don't know it." It's unreal, even 
if film history teachers would love to have James clones in their 
classes. And it also reminds me of what philosopher Henri Bergson, 
the 1927 Nobel winner for literature,  said around 1900: "Memory is 
the intelligence of imbeciles."
The movie is hellbent on throwing the viewers off-balance,on 
depicting weirdness at all costs,whether arbitrarily open --as 
in-jokes-- or as cryptic allusions. Even fleeting details are 
commandeered, such as Sara's car, a white vintage French Peugeot DS, 
already rare in the 60s and 70s USA. Does this intend to connect to 
the older, hippie days  for the benefit of sharp-eyed cognoscenti and 
deconstructionists? Yet over and above throwaway bits, irritations 
and such, the movie does have its big share of fun, human comedy and 
near-slapstick. If ever a film needed a follow-up screening, this is 
it.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Flirting with Disaster (1996)
FLIRTING WITH DISASTER (1996) ** 1/2 Written and directed by David O.
Russell. Photography, Eric Edwards. Editing Christopher Tellefsen.
Production design, Kevin Thompson. Music, Stephen Endelman. Cast: Ben
Stiller (Mel Coplin), Patricia Arquette (Nancy Coplin), Tea Leoni (Tina
Kalb), Mary Tyler Moore (Mrs. Coplin), George Segal (Coplin), Alan Alda
(Richard Schlicting), Lily Tomlin (Mary Schlicting), Josh Brolin (Tony),
Richard Jenkins (Paul), CeliaWeston (Valerie) , et al. A Miramax release.
91 minutes. Rated R (language, sexual situations, substance use)
The first feature by David O. Russell, the low budget "Spanking the
Monkey," was daringly original. It made the writer-director more than just
promising, which is something that new filmmakers have to live up to,
especially as there is generally a kind of curse attached to second
features.
In Russell's case, the funny "Flirting With Disaster" is no comedown, even
though the film is neither daring nor a minor landmark. It is clever
without brilliance or depth, it is inventive without originality.
"FLT" is a road movie of sorts. Not quite an odyssey as it has only three
way-stations. Following a zippy montage, we meet Mel Coplin (Stiller),
about 30, in an adoption agency. Entomologist Mel, the beloved and loving
adopted son of a New York Jewish couple (Moore and Segal), is married to
sweet Nancy (Arquette). They have a first baby who remains unnamed for an
outlandish time, partly because Mel is in the throes of a pre-midlife
crisis.
Has this been brewing for some time or is it sudden? The film, not exactly
a profound study of characters, tells us nothing. We are simply shown a
confused Mel who feels that his identity will never be complete so long as
he does not learn who and what his natural parents are.
Working in an adoption agency, Tina Kalb (Leoni), a beautiful long-legged
ex-dancer now on the brink of divorce and, perhaps, a Ph.D. in psychology,
delivers the goods. "Your mother lives in San Diego. Let's go." Tina wants
to include herself and her camcorder as part of her academic research.
The quartet drives west, is reunited with a caricatural, multi-wedded
Southern belle. She looks nothing like Mel, is a devout Reaganite ("he was
a great friend") and the mother of gorgeously vacuous beach bimbo twins.
Through a mixup in Tina's files, the lady turns out to be the wrong person.
I give away nothing as the audience had guessed this all along.
The episode is amusing, has good farce, almost hilarious dialogue and
changes of behavior. Contrite Tina, whom Mel is attracted to, is now sure
she has located the right parents. From the San Diegan sun, the foursome
treks to snow and slush, Gerald Ford-loving Michigan. The new candidate is
an improbable father, a low-life type. Diagnosing Mel's "Jew nose," he
forwards him to New Mexico, but not before a fracas that involves a couple
(in both senses) of Alcohol, Tobacco & Firearms officers.
Paul is gay with some neuroses. Tony is bisexual. As movie luck would have
it he had gone to school with Nancy, now desires her and also feels the
need to have a baby. The quartet grows to a sextet as the two men, none too
credibly, go with the Coplins -- as vacationers, not professional sleuths.
Episode Three leads to Antelope Springs, N.M. and the real McCoys, the
Schlictings (Tomlin and Alda) and their sullen, weirdo son. This, the
journey's decisive leg, turns out to be an acid trip for some.
The Schlictings are unreconstructed old acidheads, anachronistic hippies
who in the Sixties were jailed for making LSD. They are are now "artists"
who live from their awful work, "with supplements from other things." In a
film that keeps announcing its moves, you can guess that what they
fabricate in their basement is not Christmas seals. (Major laughter is
produced when Tina lights up and Alan Alda stops her with "This is a
non-smoking house.")
There is some lust in the film (Mel and Tina, Tony and Nancy) but this
pales before the catalogue of references to body parts. It begins as
Patricia Arquette primps most intimately for her husband; then Mary Tyler
Moore briefly shows her bra-clad breasts (actually nothing risque); it
continues with legs, calves, noses, male organs, more breasts...
It's rather systematic, as is the movie's development. The plumbing of
characters is sacrificed to broad gags. You laugh allright but the movie's
creatures are not really attaching, likable or interesting. Eventually they
get a bit  tiresome, along with the plot's cliched mixups of humans, cars,
keys and other objects.
Writer-director Russsell is no Preston Sturges or Woody Allen, although,
vaguely like Woody, he tries to exploit Jewishness vs. Goyishness.  The
Coplins (especially Mary Tyler Moore), Tina, the two lawmen are more
neurotic than dysfunctional, while the Schlictings (except the son) are in
harmony with their kookiness. All actors deliver OK performances in their
limited-scale roles.
Do not look for ambitious thoughts, not even the old notion that the blue
bird of happiness is found at home or next door. This is first and last a
machinery for screwball farce. It's a pleasant enough work, with the added
bonus of deserving inclusion in the BBNMM Society's roster (that's Bring
Back the Ninety Minute Movie).
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Midnight Clear, A (1991)
A MIDNIGHT CLEAR (1992)  *** 1/2. Directed and written by Keith Gordon
from a novel by William Wharton. Photography, Tom Richmond. Production
design, David Nichols. Editing, Don Brochu. Music, Mark Isham.  Cast:
Peter Berg, Kevin Dillon, Arye Gross, Ethan Hawke, Gary Sinise, Frank
Whaley, John C. McGinley. An Interstar Release. 107 minutes. Rated R
(wartime violence,  strong language).
Television these days is invaded by older movies about W.W.II. In 1992
it was as if the small screen did not celebrate 1492 but 1942, with
older viewers in mind. Yet Hollywood=92s annual production stream of war
movies in the 40=92s and 50=92s--stressing patriotism and exciting
action--became a trickle in recent decades .
In a non-conformist move, the producers of =93A Midnight Clear=94 had the
courage to make a non-commercial war film at a time when the genre was
not popular among the masses, and a film whose anti-war message, unlike
the premise of most Second World War pictures, is that even the
"cleanest" conflict in US. history, W.W.II, was not a Good War. 
In style and substance the picture is halfway between the disillusioned
, pacifist movies about W.W. I ("All Quiet on the Western Front," "The
Man I Killed," "Grand Illusion," "Paths of Glory") and the few
revisionist movies about W.W.II, mostly adaptations of sarcastic novels
("Catch-22," "Slaughterhouse Five" ) that underscored the surreal
dementia of armed conflict.
"A Midnight Clear" comes from a semi-autobiographical novel, and it
convinces. It was made with a young cast and by a then-30 year old actor
directing his second movie. His first was "The Chocolate War" (1988),
about a power struggle in a Catholic boys' school. 
The setting is the Ardennes Forest -- Park City, Utah, doubles nicely--
a snowy no-man's land that could be France, Germany, Belgium or
Luxembourg. The time is December1944, during the Battle of the Bulge,
Germany's last but devastating counter-attack
An Infantry and Reconnaissance squad of G.I.s is ordered by martinet
Major Griffin (McGinley) to hole up in an deserted ch=E2teau (actually a
fancy country house) and report on enemy movements. The soldiers had
been trained for I & R because of their high I.Q.s--which automatically
make of them skeptical warriors. From twelve the squad has dwindled to
six . You take for granted that the "Ten Little Indians" syndrome will
continue.
In the woods, the Yanks encounter a group of those last-ditch draftees
(too old or too young) that the Third Reich called up for its desperate
"Totalkrieg" (Total War). The Germans make with the "Amis" a deal that's
unusual and will have unexpected consequences, but then strangeness is
more rule than exception in wartime. 
The squad is led by its junior,William Knott (Hawke). His name had been
abbreviated to Will Not, then to Won't, but typically the film does not
milk this for effect. Knott is puzzled and not especially pleased at
having been made sergeant.  He is the film's narrator and speaks
matter-of-factly about his comrades and the absurdities and atrocities
of war. We're close to Kurt Vonnegut's Billy Pilgrim territory.
The group includes John Lennon-ish "Mother" Wilkins played by the
co-founder of Chicago's famed Steppenwolf Theater, stage actor, then
filmmaker Gary Sinise. This is his first role in a film. Here he is
called "Mother" because at 26 he is the oldest , married and fussy about
neatness. He is going crazy fast and his companions try to protect him.
"Father" Mundy (Whaley), is a seminary drop-out who has made the men
promise to keep their language clean. The others are called Bud Miller
(a beerish Anglo name), Mel Avakian (Armenian), and Stan Schutzer
(Jewish).
This, however, is not the old movies' motley group of G.I.s, (or the
Dirty Half-Dozen), with the machine-stamped dosage of religions,
ethnicities , professions, voices (one Brooklyn  accent per movie was de
rigueur ), or the sameness of their post-war dreams which invariably
featured "dames" and "big, juicy steaks."
In "A Midnight Clear," neither the I.Q.s , nor the men's backgrounds,
physical characteristics, temperaments, skills, differences or
idiosyncrasies are highlighted. Partly on purpose and mostly, I think,
by serendipity, there is about the soldiers a general vagueness that
borders on impersonality, as if the mad tragedy of war made customary
distinctions futile. 
Some bits of religious symbolism seem unnecessary, as does a flashback
of four of the boys losing their virginity, serially and in one night,
to the distraught fiancee of a killed soldier. That's a most unhygienic
sequence. Otherwise though, the film plays down melodrama and
sentimentality, has a clever but not smartie-pants script and does not
push its points.  It even keeps a rein on the character of despicable
Major Griffin, clearly suggesting that for the squad it is this fatuous
commander who is the real enemy, not the Krauts. 
The movie had an excellent critical reception, but  given its
seriousness and the lack of a promotional campaign it soon returned to
the orphanage.
------------
Written June 1992. Seen again October 1993. No changes in opinios.

Title
Review for Great Gatsby, The (1974)
THE GREAT GATSBY (1974) Directed by Britisher Jack Clayton. 
F. Scott Fitzgerald's moody novel of the 1920's jazz age was 
adapted by Francis Ford Coppola, given sumptuous visuals by 
cinematographer Douglas Slocombe and designer John Box (both 
British), and a very interesting cast: Robert Redford ( too 
much of a one-note Gatsby), Mia Farrow ( a vague Daisy 
Buchanan), Bruce Dern ( a disgusting Tom Buchanan) , Sam 
Waterston ( a homely, unsmiling chorus as Nick Carraway) , 
Lois Chiles (Jordan Baker, Nick's friend), Howard Da Silva 
(Meyer Wolfsheim), and others. When this adaptation came out 
it was negatively received and became a fiasco. Opinions 
ought to be revised upwards. The film is quite faithful to 
the book but it has a number of irritating qualities. Its 
144 minutes are too protracted; the tempo is slow; the 
pregnant silences are overdone; many shots  are drawn-out 
and much dialogue, or rather speeches, as mostly people 
speak solo even when two are involved. Hardly any of this 
speech has a natural rhythm.The sound is dubbed, too much 
so. It has an echoey quality which is excellent when it 
stresses the vastness of Gatsby's house, but then this 
spreads to other sounds and speeches.  There's an overdone 
moody solemnity about the picture. Yet , at the same time, 
the film has fine moments and a great deal of touching 
melancholy and Fitzgeraldian disenchantment. Flaws 
notwithstanding, the actors are affecting. Nelson Riddle 
contributes a wonderful 20's score with mood-enhancing songs 
(sometimes also too artsily  slowed-down) like "What'll I 
do?", "When You and I were 17," or "Every Morning, Every 
Evening." Seen with commercials, this movie becomes endless. 
But without them, it is, on balance, very much worth 
watching or taping. (Edwin Jahiel)

Title
Review for Chocolat (2000)
CHOCOLAT  (UK, 2000)  *** 1/2  Directed by Lasse Hallstrom. Written 
by Robert Nelson Jacobs from the novel by Joan Harris. Photography, 
Roger Platt. Editing,  Andrew Monsheim. Production design, David 
Gropman. Music, Rachel Portman. Cast: Juliette Binoche, Lena Olin, 
Alfred Molina, Judi Dench, Johnny Depp, Peter Stormare, Carrie-Anne 
Moss, Leslie Caron, Hugh O'Connor, Victoire Thivisol. Aurelien 
Parent Koenig.  Producer David Brown. A Miramax co-production and 
release. 121 minutes. PG-13.
In French, "chocolat" means both chocolate and hot chocolate. In 
1988  there was another film by that title, a splendid 
socio-political work which had nothing to do with sweets but was 
director Claire Denis's  semi-autobiographical reminiscence of her 
youth in then colonial French Cameroun's (sic) in North-West Africa.
By coincidence, the year 2000 also saw "Thanks for the Chocolate," 
the 52d feature by the redoubtable Claude Chabrol. It won the major 
Delluc Prize in France, has not yet arrived in the USA, and has 
little to do with food --even though Chabrol is the most 
gastronomy-oriented of major directors.
Our "Chocolat" is only indirectly political, as it refers to forces 
of enlightenment versus obscurantist and conservatist attitudes. But 
it does fit nicely within the sub-genre of "food movies and their 
magic," one that includes the Mexican "Like Water  for Chocolate," 
the American  "Big Night,"  and the great Danish :Babette's Feast." 
(The fine Canadian lesbian film "Better than Chocolate" gets its 
title indirectly as its protagonist happens to be a chocomaniac).
Director Lasse Hallstrom made several movies in his native Sweden. 
"My Life as a Dog" rightly became an international hit and led to 
America. There he made the quirky and under-seen "Once Around," the 
lauded "What's Eating Gilbert Grape," the fair "Something to Talk 
About," and the excellent "The Cider House Rules." 
Hallstrom's movies have originality and deal with offbeat 
characters. With "Chocolat" he goes several steps further by giving 
us a real fairy tale. It is Lent time in 1959.  In a French village, 
single mother Vianne (Binoche) and her daughter Anouk (Thivisol of 
"Ponette" fame) appear out of nowhere. (Juliette Binoche's most 
recent films include the "Three Colors" series, "The English 
Patient" and "Alice and Martin.") 
Vianne has come to purchase a derelict "chocolaterie." Where her 
money comes from, how she transforms the locale into a decorated, 
well-equipped shop with chocolates, truffles and other goodies to 
die for, plus other aspects of the film, remain a mystery. But after 
all the movie is an A to Z pantasy. Before you know it, the place 
looks great -- and he confections can make audiences drool. This 
shop is a genuine "salivatorium."
Soon Vianne has a small group of faithful followers, including the 
curmudgeonly  old Mrs. Amande Voizin (Dench) who early on had 
declared the shop's look to be "early Mexican bordello." But she 
gets tamed and forms a trio with Vianne and Josephine (Lena Olin who 
is Mr. Hallstrom's wife and had co-starred with Binoche in "The 
Unbearable Lightness of Being.") Josephine, first shown as a 
kleptomaniac then as a battered wife,  leavesher abusing bar-owner 
husband, finds refuge in the chocolaterie, gets prettier, becomes 
Vianne's co-worker and finally--just like Madame Voizin-- can smile, 
laugh and be normal.
The chocolates, the hot chocolate and other sweets have magic 
ingredients, including hot chili peppers. Also odd names such as 
"Nipples of Venus." Tasting almost anything does miracles, changes 
lives, lifestyles and attitudes.
But -- there's always a "but" in fairy tales--, there is Opposition 
with a capital O. The village's uncontested boss and Mayor (the 
England-born  Alfred Molina, he of a thousand faces) is the Comte de 
Reynaud. His word is law, his odd religiosity a kind of substitute 
for a traumatized psyche. He covers up the fact that his wife has 
left him for good (why is not explained but could be guessed) by 
pretending that she keeps extending her trip abroad.
The other major character is the Mayor's secretary, husbandless 
Madame Clairmont (Moss), a high-bourgeoisie lady with a talented 
young son, Luc. She is also the estranged daughter of old Mrs. 
Voizin and forbids Luc to talk to his grandmother.. And she's 
against the chocolate shop and its people. (There are reasons given, 
sort of reasons, that is. Don't expect Cartesian logic.)
The Count is a fine specimen of unreasonable intolerance. When 
defied by Vianne, he reminds her that his ancestors had put to the 
sword hordes of Protestants (or Albigensian heretics?)  He 
communicates his dislike of Vianne to the parishioners, who follow 
meekly, and tries to do the same to the very young new priest who is 
smart, tolerant and not taken in by the "capital offense" of Vianne 
who dares open her place while Lent is going on.
How the plot develops must remain unsaid, except for the later 
addition of Johnny Depp. He shows up on water, with other river rats 
who, much like gypsies, are disdained, mistrusted and indeed opposed 
by the villagers. This adds another element of discrimination 
against people who are "different" by knee-jerkily religious, 
extreme-right, sclerotic, unthinking peasants. The film's main body 
goes from Lent in 1959 to Lent the following year.
The  message is tranparently about tolerance vs. mindless 
suspiciousness, but it is also a paean to gustatory delights. Food 
is a religion in France, but it can co-exist with "regular" faith, 
just as tradition can peacefully co-exist with novelty. The story 
reminds me of the near-classic in the early days of the Cold War's 
Red Scare (and future  McCarthyism) "The Boy With Green Hair" 
(1948). A war orphan wakes up with green hair one day, and that's 
enough to make him "different" and discriminated against.
"Chocolat" is most entertaining, light even when things get serious, 
often very funny (note the parts with the young priest.)I. It was 
made mostly in England, with some footage in France. I suspect that 
the real French village used was for high shots of rooftops, later 
patched in with studio scenes. All the performers speak in English 
with a variety of would-be French accents. A delicious film, easy on 
the eyes and, I hope, on the digestion of any chocolate-eating 
actors. 

Title
Review for Talented Mr. Ripley, The (1999)
THE TALENTED MR. RIPLEY (1999) *** Written and directed by Anthony 
Minghella; based on the novel by Patricia Highsmith. Photography, 
John Seale. Editing, Walter Murch. Production design, Roy Produced by 
William Horberg and Tom Sternberg. Cast: Matt Damon (Tom Ripley), 
Gwyneth Paltrow (Marge Sherwood), Jude Law (Dickie Greenleaf), Cate 
Blanchett (Meredith Logue),  Philip Seymour Hoffman (Freddie Miles), 
Jack Davenport (Peter Smith-Kingsley), James Rebhorn (Herbert 
Greenleaf),  Sergio Rubini (Inspector Roverini), et al. A Miramax 
Films/Paramount Pictures.release. 135 minutes. R (sex, language, 
violence)
Add another title to the continuing, large number of French film 
remade as  Hollywood productions. The original was the 1960 thriller 
"Plein Soleil," (called "Purple Noon" in Anglo countries) by Rene 
Clement (The Battle of the Rails,  Forbidden Games, Gervaise,  Is 
Paris Burning? etc.)
In the early 1950s wealthy American Mr. Greenleaf, whose son Philip 
(Maurice Ronet, 32) was whooping it up in Italy, hires young Tom 
Ripley (Alain Delon, 24) to go to Italy and bring back the playboy. 
The film was the beginning of very good-looking Delon's stardom, 
reinforced by the Italian "Rocco and his Brothers," "The Eclipse" and 
"The Leopard." Swiftly he reached superstar/heartthrob status, and 
very rich. Ironically for the man who played a killer and mpostor in 
"Plein Soleil," years later he was more than suspected of connections 
with the French Mafia --and worse.
Patricia Highsmith (1921-1995), an American expatriate to Europe 
where she was much appreciated, wrote five Ripley novels. "The 
Talented Mr. Ripley" is the second of the series and the first to be 
filmed. Later came Wim Wenders's "The American Friend."
The talented Mr. Minghella is British of Italian extraction, wrote 
and directed the imaginative "Truly Madly Deeply,". which is 
wonderful; directed "Mr. Wonderful" which is not but still good; 
scripted and directed the triumphant "The English Patient."
The original movie's is excellent, though its leads are Frenchified. 
In the remake, the main lines are the same. Tom Ripley, a pianist who 
lives in poverty in New York as a men's room attendant, is mistaken 
by shipbuilder magnate Herbert Greenleaf for a Princeton schoolmate 
of his profligate son. His recompense for returning the errant Dickie 
to the USA is $1,000. In the late 1950's, the movie's period, this 
now paltry sum wenta very long way abroad toward La Dolce Vita  fun, 
games, fast Alfa-Romeos, fast everything and everybody.
Tom, who has no special looks, suntan, or overt sophistication, worms 
his way into Dickie's household through talented, confidence-man 
tricks. Dickie lives high on the hog, is reasonably dissolute, crazy 
about jazz, plays the saxophone, seems happy with his would-be writer 
girl Marge.
He does mock Tom for being rather rusticated, but he becomes 
friendly, treats Tom like a pet, buys him suits and stuff, takes him 
around, notably to a jazz club (excellent music) where Tom scores 
through his musicianship. He does not score with women. There is 
already a soupcon of gayness or bisexuality. It will get amplified 
but still treated with kid gloves.
Tom, having tasted the "good" life,  cannily plans and plots away. 
But his ultimate aim is not immediately apparent --probaly not even 
to himself, as he is something of a secret psycho. Still, friendship 
is good, but, in complex ways  it leads to a major dispute at sea, 
during which Tom kills Dickie. Next thing you know is that Tom 
impersonates Dickie.
I will say little about the plot, twists, complications and the other 
parties involved in it. The developments are interesting, the 
zig-zags good, the suspense quite effective. But not as effective as 
it might have been.
There are several reasons for this. In no order of priority: too many 
improbabilities, narrow squeaks; coincidences. Too much tight timing. 
Too many tricks by Tom, yet they work without any major glitches 
when, in real life there would have been several. Tom paints himself 
into corner after corner, yet he always manages to get out of them in 
"accelerando" tempo.
Much of the story is elliptical. Apparently, the film would have come 
to over four hours had it not been severely edited. I presume that 
the cutting down process came at the price of some abruptness and 
muddling.
There are several, discreet influences of Hitchcok, including the 
decision to make this a character-driven movie. Including also 
passing details, such as Bernard Herrmann-like sounds. I wish 
Minghella had looked more closely  at what King Alfred had wrought. 
He would have learned that Hitch kept everything clear and clean, so 
that the viewer would not be distracted and waste time wondering or 
puzzling -- at the expense of suspense. Minghella director should 
have studied Hitchcock's "Strangers on a Train," which has several 
points in common with "Ripley" -- and was also based on a Patricia 
Highsmith novel, her first to be filmed.
The moral of "Ripley" is that, yes, you can fool all the people all 
the time. I will not get into the conclusion of the movie, but anyone 
who knows that other Ripley books followed can guess that Tom is a 
survivor.
In spite of my objections I find the movie taut (if not tight), 
gripping, colorful, even beautiful--in its many Italian settings. The 
supporting characters are interesting and effective. Small parts ( a 
young working-class woman, a deaf landlady); mid-parts (an Italian 
detective and an American detective; a likable choir master); major 
parts ( New York heiress Meredith and t  obnoxious American-abroad 
Freddie).  Gwyneth Paltrow as Marge is mostly decorative --and even 
then, seldom photographed through flattering lenses. Weaknesses 
notwithstanding, this is a three-star film

Title
Review for Evita (1996)
EVITA ** 1/2  Directed by Alan Parker.Written by Parker and Oliver
Stone.Based on the book and lyrics by Tim Rice.Photography, Darius Khondji.
Production design, Brian Morris.  Editing, Gerry Hambling. Music, Andrew
Lloyd Webber. Choreography, Vincent Patterson.Costumes, Penny
Rose.Producers, Alan Parker, Robert Stigwood and Andrew Vajna. Cast :
Madonna (Evita), Antonio Banderas (Che), Jonathan Pryce (Juan Peron) et al.
A Hollywood Pictures release. 130 minutes.  PG-13.
A viewer's background makes a lot of difference when it comes to judging a
movie. For example, if you have no particular interest in Argentina and its
history  (notably the Juan Peron era), if you like Andrew Lloyd Webber,
and Madonna, you may be all set to like Evita-the-movie. On the other hand,
if you have seen Evita on the stage, you might make comparisons that do not
flatter the film.
"Evita" uses a number of flashbacks, a technique that seems to be more and
more frequently used or misused. The film opens with the announcement of
Eva Duarte de Peron's death in 1952, cuts back to the provincial funeral in
1926 for Eva's natural father. She was the low-class, illegitimate daughter
of a married, philandering local bourgeois. The church service for him has
a big heavenly chorus soundtrack. Then we cut to Eva's colossal funeral
procession in Buenos Aires, also to a huge musical soundtrack.
You begin to suspect that the leading principle behind this work is that
Bigger is Better, a suspicion that takes no time in being confirmed. To
what purpose? To give us a musical biography of the young woman with a
shady past who climbs methodically the social ladder,sleeps with
increasingly important people, reaches the all-powerful military caste and
finally snares Colonel Juan Domingo Peron. They married in 1945. She was
26, he was 50.
If you've seen any documentaries about Eva Peron, you'll notice that the
film does not invent facts too much the way most older Hollywood biopics
did. Here several aspects of the couple's powerful partnership come
through: the rise of  Peron to his first Presidency (1946) and the
aftermath; the initial mistrust of Eva by the Army; the unrelenting scorn
by high society ; Evita's efforts to better the life of the masses; the
adulation of the lower classes and many in the middle classes; the fiasco
of her visits to Franco's Spain and to the Pope; and so on. It's all
sketchy but sufficient. The main troubles with the film are merely Madonna,
the music, the lyrics and the singing.
Much has been said about the parallels between Eva's and Madonna's rise to
fame and power. It's a superficial comparison. More to the point  is that
Madonna, who will soon be 40, shows her age. She plays Eva at 15, then from
ages 25 to 33. No matter how well the magic of makeup is used, it cannot
shave off more than a few years. (In some shots she reminds me of Judy
Holliday in bad hair days). Somehow Evita and Madonna never really merge,
especially for those who are familiar with photographs and movies of the
real Eva Peron. Still, it would be too much to ask of this kind of
"historical musical" to come up with fully developed characters.
I  suspect that Andrew Lloyd Webber is a composer whose works include very
few "real" songs. In "Evita,"  beyond "Don't Cry for Me Argentina," and
another tune that I forget, there's not much musical nourishment. The movie
becomes something like a mega-music video directed by a latter-day Cecil B.
De Mille. Its parts are interconnected by  minimally harmonious recitatives
that tell us the story. This makes the words more important than the music.
Unfortunately, the lyrics are flat. Think of those in "My Fair Lady," "The
Music Man," "The King and I," all so charming, witty, so well adapted to
plots and characters, and you want to weep. Topping this, Madonna's singing
has none of the strong, semi-belting approach of other stage Evitas.
Talking of weeping, the picture does its utmost to manipulate the public,
to move it by building up big emotions (especially in the Casa Rosa balcony
scenes),to come up with a hagiography of Evita, warts and all. It doesn't
work for me. What does is the nice device of Chorus, played and sung by
Antonio Banderas, the best thing in the film. He keeps popping up as a
series of characters who make a running commentary and are quite critical
of  Evita. It comes, alas, to a final cop-out as Banderas joins the crowd
and kisses Eva's casket.
Banderas's voice may not be great but it serves the purpose well. Jonathan
Pryce's is small and insignificant, like his playing of Peron who looks
rather dumb (I was conscious of his fake nose too) as he takes a back seat
to Evita. The real Peron attained power through populism, through appeal to
the "descamisados," the shirtless people of the laboring classes. In the
film his big public moments are whenever he takes off his jacket, in a
silly equation of jacket and shirt. The other equation of Bigger with
Better is equally silly, but still, this munificent, lavishly staged, very
well shot production does have its striking visual moments.

Title
Review for Michael (1996)
MICHAEL * 1/2 Directed by Nora Ephron. Written by Nora Ephron & Delia
Ephron and Peter Dexter & Jim Quinlan. Story by Dexter & Quinlan.
Photography, John Lindley. Editing, Geraldine Peroni. Production design,
Dan Davis. Music, Randy Newman. Producers, Sean Daniel, Nora Ephron, James
Jacks. Exec. producers, Delia Ephron, Jonathan D.Crane.Cast: John Travolta
(Michael), Andie MacDowell (Dorothy), William Hurt (Frank), Bob Hoskins
(Vartan Malt, the editor), Robert Pastorelli (Huey), Jean Stapleton (Pansy
Milbank), Teri Garr (the Judge), the dog Sparky, et al. A Turner Picture,
Alphaville Production released by New Line Cinema. 106 min. PG.
Movie fantasies about or with angels are a tricky genre. Not a
proliferating one, thank Heaven. "It's a Wonderful Life" is the perennial
champion. Other popular movies include Cocteau's classic "Orpheus,"
"Stairway to Heaven," "For Heaven's Sake," "Wings of Desire," "The Bishop's
Wife" (remade as the current "The Preacher's Wife"). A companion genre
deals with ghosts: the superb "The Ghost and Mrs. Muir," the amusing "The
Ghost Goes West," "Ghost," "Blithe Spirit," the old "Peter Ibbetson," the
wonderful, fairly recent "Truly Madly Deeply." There are also films with
heavenly envoys like "Here Comes Mr. Jordan" or entertaining visits to
Satan, like the original "Heaven Can Wait."
"Michael" is a disappointment, doubly so as it was made by the talented
journalist, novelist, essayist, and filmmaker Nora Ephron. Her excellent
track record as screenwriter and/or director, includes "Silkwood," "When
Harry Met Sally," "This is My Life," "Sleepless in Seattle" and the very
funny but terribly underrated Steve Martin vehicle "My Blue Heaven."
"Michael" is already making gadzillions at the box office, mostly on the
strength of John Travolta whose comeback has been stupendous. But ticket
sales are absolutely not a measure of movie quality.
Here we have partners Hurt and Pastorelli who are reporters (so to speak)
for the   Chicago-published "The National Mirror," one of those supermarket
tabloids that stop at nothing. With their irascible editor Hoskins the
buddies have an unlikely relationship which is also muddy, like most of the
movie.
Hurt gets a fan letter from Jean Stapleton (as Pansy Milbank), who invites
him to come to her home in rural Iowa and meet a real angel who is staying
with her. We never know how much of this the journalists believe, but they
quickly talk Hoskins into an assignment. As improbabilities pile up, the
boss adds to the team the just-hired MacDowell, a multi-divorced dog
trainer. In another of the film's arbitrarinesses Hoskins decides on the
spot that she is a specialist on angels.
Widow Milbank is the owner of a decrepit, 1930's style motel of clientless
cabins. The angel is genuine but not typecast. He is an ill-kempt,
chain-smoking, boozing, cussing yahoo who eats like a slob, likes sex and
in certain ways seems related to Archie Bunker -- the TV husband of Jean
Stapleton.  But he does have wings and some odd kind of maverick appeal.
"Michael" soon becomes a road movie as the trio drive Michael to Chicago.
It's a long trip because Michael, always cheerful and full of bad jokes and
hearty yuk-yuks wants to take in sights of Americana, such as the world's
largest  ball of twine and the biggest non-stick fry-pan.
No one ever notices that he is an angel, because the film cheats. Even
though he wears a large overcoat, his winged back ought to have bulged like
Notre Dame's Quasimodo's, but doesn't. More cheating follows as Michael
somehow becomes more couth.
In restaurants, no one objects to his smoking. Women go for him in the
blink of an eye. In one place Michael improvises a dance with two girls who
are joined by the rest of the female clientele. There's still a lot
Saturday night fever left in the older and bulkier Travolta. This part is
what, in my rating, accounts for the extra half-star.
Predictably, this leads to an attack by local yokels, a major melee and an
appearance before Judge Teri Garr who wants to see Michael in chambers. You
guess the rest. You are also guessing, for no valid reason except that you
know Hollywood's standards, that Andie and John will bond, to put it
politely.
Back on the road we learn that Andie is a part-time composer of country
music. She sings a sample in another eatery where a lot of "poetic"
nonsense about pies fills the air.
The main trouble with this movie is a boring, four-writer script which
illustrates the saying "A camel is a horse built by a committee." The
dialogue is dull, dull, dull,  uinteresting and unwitty. The acting by the
three non-angelic principals is minimal and wooden.These characters lack
character, appeal, personality, dimensionality or connections to one
another. Lifeless Pastorelli is even upstaged by his dog Sparky. This
sketchiness extends to the supporting roles.
Travolta does his best of a bad scene as he tries to be whimsical, funny
and likable. Nothing helps. Twenty-six songs try to rescue the movie. They
don't help either. You sense all along the frantic, exponentially growing
searches for what to do next.
It's a long trip to Chicago, longer for the public than for the actors.
It's not often that a would-be humorously feel-good picture goes by without
some audience laughter or appreciative sounds, yet the many people I saw it
with were entirely silent throughout. At least, nobody snored.
"le mauvais gout mene au crime" Stendhal

Title
Review for Devil's Advocate, The (1997)
DEVIL'S ADVOCATE ** 1/3  Directed by Taylor Hackford. Screenplay, Jonathan
Lemkin & Tony Gilroy, from the novel by Andrew Neiderman. Photography,
Andrzej Bartkowiak. Production design, Bruno Rubeo. Editing, Mark Warner.
Music, James Newton Howard. Cast: Keanu Reeves (Kevin Lomax) Al Pacino
(John Milton), Charlize Theron (Mary Ann Lomax), Jeffrey Jones (Eddie
Barzoon), Judith Ivey (Mrs Lomax), Craig T. Nelson (Alexander Cullen),
Connie Nelson Christabella), et al. A Warners release.144 min. R
(nudity,sex,blasphemy,possible incest)
In 1935, that great stylist and inventor of the Marlene Dietrich persona,
director Josef Von Sternberg, made "The Devil Is a Woman" from the French
novel " The Woman and the Puppet" (1898)  by Pierre Louys. The devil
(figuratively)was a heartless seductress played by Dietrich.
In 1997, Taylor Hackford ("An Officer and a Gentleman," "Against All Odds,"
"Dolores Claiborne") made "Devil's Advocate." The Devil is (literally) Al
Pacino. The advocate is Keanu Reeves as Gainesville, Florida, trial lawyer
Kevin Lomax. Kevin used to be a prosecutor who won all his 64 cases before
he switched to being a defender who never lost a single case. He seems to
have powers of observation that approach divination, especially for jury
selection and psyching. His insights get almost like semi-funny parodies of
Sherlock Holmes explaining his clues to Dr. Watson.
The films gets off to a good, slick start. Lomax defending a creepy high
school teacher accused of molesting a girl, wins again, even after
detecting that his client was guilty. The supporting roles are well cast
and played and so remain throughout the movie.
Before you can say "what the hell," an envoy from New York legal firm
recruits our Southern genius. His wife is pleased, his acutely religious
mother worries about his move to the New Babylon. In the Big Apple (shown
as the Colossal Apple) Kevin is impressed by what appears to be the biggest
and wealthiest firm on the planet.
The Boss is Pacino. His nom-de-film is John Milton, a too-cute literary
conceit  wasted on those audiences that never heard of "Paradise Lost."
Mr.Milton shows Lomax around, tempts him-- not on a mountaintop, but on the
roof of a dizzyingly tall building. The site, the sights, the legal
offices, everything else range from spectacular to awesome.  Lomax is
impressed by the red-carpet treatment. So is does his wife Mary Ann. (He
calls her Mare, which is a diminutive that has always bothered me). Kevin
and Mare are a beautiful couple, in love and into touchy-feelies. She's a
sexy blonde with just a soupcon of trashiness. In their new milieu of New
York they and we can almost smell the money. It's not the best of odors as
it is obvious that the firm is a shady international power with tentacles
all over the world. So what we have in the movie's first part is primarily
a big and unflattering expose, a kind of long, blackly humorous lawyer
joke.
The young couple's social education continues at a huge Who's Who party
that includes Senator D'Amato and boxing promoter Don King. To the credit
of Reeves and Theron, the young couple reacts with relative sobriety, even
as Milton does his seduction number on Mare and beautiful, law partner
Christabella, does hers on Kevin.
Milton tests Lomax with a case of a Haitian cited by the health authorities
for slaughtering a goat in a squalid basement, as part of his ju-ju. The
man,we learn,is worth 15 million dollars. (This is one loose end among
many). As expected, Lomax wins again. As expected, the sweet (?) smell of
success affects him, but he does not undergo a radical transformation.
Still, he changes enough for Mare to start feeling neglected and building
up a hatred of New York. She has frightening, off-on visions, flashes of
monstrosities. People are not what they seem. Mare, becoming unbalanced, is
on the road to insanity. The plot thickens to the coagulation point when
Milton decrees that Kevin is his choice to defend real-estate magnate
Cullen accused of a triple murder....
"Devil's Advocate" is a high pressure film, very flashy in all departments,
brilliant in photography and sets. The latter are grandiose, purposely
overdone, often tackily gaudy. Donald Trump's own monumental penthouse was
used for Cullen's. It is in monumentally bad taste.
Milton's abode is rich and strange. "Where does he sleep?"says Kevin. What
a naive question! We all know that the Devil never sleeps -- and here's the
rub. The audiences come to the movie knowing that Milton is the Devil, and
even if they are somehow unaware of this, watching the story makes it
obvious. From Chinese to Russian to Spanish Milton speaks all languages
fluently -- but not with a pure accent, which goes to show that even the
Devil would have a devil of a time with totally native speech. Or with
English grammar for that matter, as Pacino says "different than" instead of
"different from."
Milton knows what goes on everywhere (note the subway scene). Milton
switches easily from cajoling to flirting to advising to asserting
authority to all else. And throughout Pacino plays him in an over-the-top
way that attempts to be amusing but in practice can get tiresome. We get
clobbered by Pacino, mugged by his mugging, while Reeves goes to the other
extreme of playing in almost  minimalist style.
The movie, starting out as a lawyer thing, veers into a "Rosemary's Baby"
thing. But while "Rosemary" deals only with Satanism, "Devil" is vitiated
by its unholy mix of the social, the societal and the supernatural. The
latter is well executed thanks to morphing and masks and other visuals, but
since we know the answers, the surprises are for the eye, not the brain.
The supernatural defuses the real and the social, and vice versa.
The other mix, of would-be black humor, pathos or tragedy, doesn't really
work either. True, the movie is sufficiently twisty, visually imaginative
and stocked with enough shocks, so that with tolerance and ever-increasing
patience, the captive audience can keep going without yawns. But the big,
satirical punch-line that lurks  ( Who Needs the Devil When We Have
Lawyers?) is only perceived through a glass darkly, confused and diffused
by exaggerations.

Title
Review for Simon Birch (1998)
SIMON BIRCH ** 1/2  Directed and written by Mark Steven Johnson, suggested
by the novel łA Prayer for Owen Meany˛ by John Irving.Photography, Aaron E.
Schneider. Editing, Betsy Heimann. Production design, David Chapman. Music,
Marc Shaiman. Cast: Ian Michael Smith (Simon Birch), Joseph Mazzello  (Joe
Wenteworth), Ashley Judd  ( Rebecca Wenteworth), Oliver Platt  (Ben
Goodrich), David Strathairn ( Rev. Russell), Dana Ivey ( Grandmother
Wenteworth),  Beatrice Winde (Hilde Grove), Jan Hooks ( Miss Leavey ), et
al. A Hollywood Pictures release. 113 minutes. Rated PG.
In older days, when handkerchiefs (small squares of cloth) were in common
use, many films where sentiment predominated were called "a two-hankie," "a
three-hankie" movie, etc. Today, how many paper tissues will absorb the
lacrymosity of "Simon Birch"'s audience is debatable, but use of Kleenex (a
registered trademark) will and does occur among several viewers, as does a
hush during certain sections of the film.
This isn't all bad. Any picture that touches hearts, even those of
salesgirls (a sexist expression from older eras), can nowadays come as a
relief from screen brutality, gratuitous action, catastrophes, spectacular
special effects and the like, all at the expense of rational thought or
natural feelings.
That's the bottom line for "Simon Birch," which comes from a book by John
Irving -- said to be his most popular in the U.K.--but do notice the
credits above. They state "suggested by the novel," which distances the
movie from the printed work far more than " from the novel." Irving himself
apparently demanded this, as well as the change in the title.
This is the first film directed by Mark Steven Johnson, a Minnesotan in his
early thirties who scripted   Grumpy Old Men , Grumpier Old Men, Big Bully,
and the yet unreleased Frost (or Jack Frost). The task of writing a
scenario from any John Irving book is daunting; translating Irving's mix of
fantasy, realism, humor and seriousness, points of view and strategies into
a motion picture is no piece of cake. (Two Irving novels have already been
made into films, The World According to Garp, and The Hotel New Hampshire.
A third, The Cider House Rules, is in pre-production).
Mr. Johnson opted for simplification, modification and selectivity --for
example he cut out the original's sections about VietNam. The story that's
left is about Simon, who, we learn right from the start, lived from 1952 to
1964 in a small New England town. The son of hardy stock (symbolically, his
father is in the granite business), he was the tiniest child ever born in
the local hospital. He suffered from a genetic flaw called Morquio's
Syndrome which results in dwarfism.
We meet Simon when he is about 12, fully grown at three feet and one inch.
He is played by 11-year old sixth-grader Ian Michael Smith (b. Chicago, in
May 1987), in his film debut. It is worth quoting the press information
which, as a rule, hypes things up, but here is really fascinating. "Ian
lives near Chicago with younger brother Brian, his mother , who has an MA
in music education and has been a high school band and orchestra director,
and his father, a management consultant and former stage actor with a BA in
political science and a Master's in foreign language teaching." Ian Smith,
a top student who reads a great deal, has many interests, is learning piano
and trumpet, etc. etc.
In the film, Simon's diminutive size finds its other extreme in an
amazingly precocious, intelligent brain and, to use a much-abused epithet,
a truly unique disposition. The boy, fully aware of how he is seen by
others, as a freak or a toy, a pet, the object of games at his expense
(though not really cruel ones), takes it all in with equanimity, tolerance,
humor, even self-mockery. He appears to be philosophical about his unusual
physique and, indeed, something of a mystic who believes that God created
him for some mysterious special purpose and that He plans for Simon to
become a hero some day.
Simon closest friend is a boy his age, his constant companion Joe
Wenteworth who towers over him. Joe too is different from the other
townspeople. He was born out of wedlock to the beautiful Rebecca, after she
had a brief encounter with a stranger. Rebecca, ever charming, poised and
good-humored, has never revealed the identity of Joe's father, not even to
her mother ( Grandmother Wenteworth), a local and rather patrician widow
who allies a mock-serious mien with genuine kindness. When, years ago,
Grandma's black maid Hildie lost a leg, the senior Mrs. Wenteworth, having
hired a replacement maid, also engaged a second one, to take care of
Hildie, who became her friend and companion to both ladies' dying days.
Simon's parents are left unexplored in the movie though it is obvious that
they consider the boy as an unwelcome presence. Not much is said about the
Wenteworth group, yet is abundantly clear that, with Simon in tow, they
constitute a lovable circle for us and a circle of eccentrics by local
standards.
I speculate that the change of name from the novel's Owen Meany to Simon
Birch is no choice out of a hat. Most probably "Simon" is an ironic joke
about "Simple Simon," since this Simon is anything but simple. "Birch" may
have to do with the resilience and the bending of the tree. Whatever the
symbolism, Simon is a complex creature whose rich language and reactions
keep astounding us. His comments and repartee are way beyond his age. For
example, he wonders why Rebecca does not reveal to Joe his father's
identity: "You're already a bastard. You might as well be an enlightened
one."
Simon occasionally may sound like a child, but more often like an adult,
whom some might call smart-alecky.  In Sunday school class and at church
services he is a thorn in the Reverend Russell's flesh  as he argues,
reasons, contradicts with impeccable logic and a vast knowledge of the
Bible. At some point there is even a duel of Biblical quotes between the
child and the preacher.
There is also, in the boy, a layer of sexuality that comes out in speech a
la John Irving. And, if I remember correctly, at one point Simon mentions
to Joe his physical attraction to Rebecca, over and above his love for the
young woman whose affection, kindness and understanding of Simon make her
his surrogate and (in today's sense) virtual mother.
The story is framed by a serious Jim Carrey, as the now adult Joe, who,
without projecting his teeth, narrates the start and the end of the tale --
a tale that I shall not even hint at except to say that Simon's search for
his purpose on this earth and Joe's search for his father come to fruition.
It's a colorful, original story but it also moves too slowly, even gets
sluggish and heavy-handed at times, has unclear elements, lays it on thick
--"it" being characterizations, events, a saccharine and/or inappropriate
music score, excessive colorfulness, predictable bits, etc.  Above all one
is being constantly manipulated at the level of emotions. The movie, which
is too long, too often pushes pathos into bathos.
Yet, each time I began to twitch and get bored, I reminded myself that,
after all, this picture does go against the grain of the no-think cinematic
excesses that engulf us and that  this is something to be thankful for; and
that Ian Michael Smith's extraordinary performance makes up for filmic
weaknesses.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Head Over Heels (2001)

HEAD OVER HEELS (2001) Zero *. Directed by Mark S. Waters. Written by 
a half-dozen males. Executive produced by four or five. Photography, 
Mark Plummer. Editing, Cara Silverman, Production design, Pery 
Andelin Blake. Music, Steve Pararo, Cast:  Monica Pierce (Amanda), 
Freddie Prinze (Jim), Sarah O'Hare, Shalom Harlow, Tomiko Frazer , 
Ivana Milicevic (the four models),  et al. About 100 minutes. PG-13.
April may be the cruelest month, but from January on the cruelty of 
bad movies dominates the screen. Summertime is overwhelmingly for 
schoolchildren of all ages, from 10 to 50 -- with inane action, 
pallid romances, and flat comedies. The "good" season,  from fall 
through December, shows the best of a bad lot plus the better stuff 
of potential Oscar candidates. Year-round small salvations may come 
from some foreign movies as well  as from American rookie (or 
not-too-commercial) filmmakers.
The non-story of Head Over Heels comes from about six writers whose 
right hands did not know what the left ones were doing.  If those 
fellows ever got together it must have been by e-mail only.
In this flick, Amanda is a talented paintings restorer in New York's 
Metropolitan Museum. She's devoted to her work, but her boyfriends 
are not devoted to her. Catching the latest one in bed with a new 
girl, she moves to the upscale apartment shared with four 
super-(almost) models. The rent is a dirt-cheap $500, but then her 
room turns out to be a closet. However, there's the adjoining huge, 
luxurious space with shelves and amenities for clothes, shoes, hats, 
perfumes and other tools of the trade.
So far so good. But past the opening sequences the film plunges as if 
attempting suicide. In that building Amanda meets tenant Jim as he 
takes for a walk a huge Great Dane. (It belongs to someone 
immobilized in bed.) An elevator door opens, out come Jim and Hamlet 
(the hound) who breaks away and throws himself amorously on the girl, 
if you get my drift. The gag, linguistically and physically, is very 
broad. Perhaps one of the writers was thinking that Great Danes go 
for great dames.
Jim is in the fashion trade but nothing is specified about this  --or 
anything else-- in this vaguer and vaguer picture. His apartment 
faces the five women's, its windows are never curtained or draped. A 
veritable fishbow for the ladies' eyes.  Amanda, egged on by her four 
matchmaking housemates, quickly falls for Jim. He  who responds, but 
so awkwardly, lamely, unclearly that the movie keeps losing its 
interest exponentially.
All that is supposed to be funny and humorous. It is not. It's not 
even cute. The writers sleepwalk through the non-plot. Unable to 
invent anything, they opt for a bad clone of Hitchcock's "Rear 
Window." As the he five Peeping Tomasinas (Amanda & Co.) spy on Jim, 
they see something vague which makes them think that Jim has murdered 
a woman. The girls now sleuth  in a series of stupid,  disconnected 
scenes and events. I'll stop here.
Of course you've guessed already that the girls are wrong, that 
Amanda and Jim are fated to kiss -- and tell. In his telling there's 
a major twist which is  unbelievable and terribly handled.
What holds a smidgen of interest in the caricature (or is it a 
faithful rendition?) of the four models. They are airheads, 
uncultured, even idiotic. Their life revolves around fashion, sex 
with the improper stranger, ornaments, plastic surgery, money.and 
such. It's La Dolce Vita, Gotham-style. Their language is salty but 
not colorful, their vocabulary, basic. The gags and jokes are 
repetitiously recycled. They range from inane to tired, from 
feeble-inded  to scatological.
When the girls are all hiding together in a lavatory 's cubicle 
(don't ask) to the tune of disgusting body noises the toilet erupts 
like a volcano and covers the ladies from head to toe with an 
accumulation of thick, stinking, brown... let's call it lava.
You get the clear feeling that, at five-minute intervals the 
flickmakers are wondering  "where do we go next?"
Amanda (Monica Pierce) is a pallid presence, though occasionally a 
pleasant one. The housemates are characterless yet irritating. In 
real life,  sane persons of any sexual preference would put them in 
an address-book under the rubric "Avoid at any cost."
Jim (Freddie Prinze) is so bland that it ought to be forbidden by law.
Movie reviews by Edwin Jahiel are at : http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel 

Title
Review for Sgt. Bilko (1996)
SGT. BILKO *** 1/4  first half,  ** second half. Directed by 
Jonathan Lynn. Written by Andy Breckman. Photography, Peter 
Sova. Editing, Tony Lombardo. Production design, Lawrence G. 
Paull. Music, Alan Silvestri. Producer, Brian Grazer. Cast: 
Steve Martin (Sgt. Bilko), Dan Aykroyd (Col. Hall), Phil 
Hartman (Major Thorn), Glenne Headly (Rita Robbins), Daryl 
Mitchell (Wally Holbrook), Eric Edwards (Doberman), Travis 
Tritt as himself, Austin Pendleton (Major Ebersole), Chris 
Rock (Lt. Oster). A Universal release. 92 min. Rated PG.  
Whenever a new movie is made from TV shows, I take stock of my 
pop fiction background and find that my familiarity with 
television oldies is most limited.
Coming rather late to TV ownership, I made up for this with a 
big appetite for movies and more movies, programs -- mostly 
British, mostly funny (from Monty Python to Blackadder to Mr. 
Bean, Yes, Minister, Keeping Up Appearances, Waiting for God), 
Poirot, Inspector Morse, and so on. Even higher on the list 
are documentaries and cultural programs, especially those 
dealing with history, politics, society--what could be called 
The Way We Were.  
I marvel at the millions who remember shows with Groucho Marx, 
Jack Benny, Burns and Allen. Or All in the Family, Route 66, 
the Twilight Zone, Charlie's Angels, Dragnet, Bewitched... the 
list is huge. I suppose that those viewers sacrificed 
movie-movies for TV, and that more millions, younger folk with 
a vast knowledge of things well before their time, have a 
thing for reruns.  
My knowledge of  TV's Sergeant Bilko is zilch. With some 
sympathy, I remember Phil Silvers from  films, even though 
these were rarely top drawer. So, I cannot argue with persons 
who call the Phil Silvers Show a classic--though "classic" 
seems to apply to most anything that was on TV years ago, just 
as "antique" is used for many objects just a couple of decades 
old.
The upshot of all this is that I came to the movie "Sgt. 
Bilko" without prejudices or the ability to compare. The only 
comparison I can make is of Steve Martin with himself, in 
other movies. The answer is that once again, Martin is a major 
talent that almost never wears thin.
The movie's Bilko is a magna cum laude operator of tricks, 
scams, gambling, con-games, loaded dice set-ups, all issuing 
in and from the Ft. Baxter motor pool that the Sergeant runs. 
"Pool" takes on new meanings as men and women live it up in 
fun and games.
Martin, silver-haired and silver-tongued, thinks, improvises 
and acts on his feet so lightning fast that you just got to 
respect him. He lines with silver the pockets of his crew. 
They admire, love and follow him blindly, even as he lines his 
own pockets with gold. His bigger share is only fair, given 
his leadership, imagination and abilities.
Steve Martin is a great performer who here plays a great 
performer, a man of (metaphorically) a thousand faces. He 
issues brisk orders one moment, plays humble the next. When 
facing officers he has a visible factor of independence from 
authority, shows defiance, superiority or familiarity. The 
brass are putty in his hands. Bilko can cajole, flatter, play 
dumb or smarter-than-thou, and always comes out on top.
A juicy contrast is established when an outsider, young, 
straight-arrow, honest Pfc.Wally Holbrook joins the pool. 
Without missing a beat, Bilko, talking a mile a minute, puts 
the stupefied kid in the picture. Then, pointing to one of his 
people he adds: "He'll take your bag. Don't worry. He's 
bonded." If that's not a four-star line, what is? 
The performances, all of them, from big to tiny roles, are 
excellent. Dan Aykroyd plays beautifully second banana as 
Bilko's bozoid, gullible yet complicitous Colonel. Phil 
Hartman as Major Thorn does slow burns, all the better since 
they are acted with minimalism instead of the classic way made 
famous long ago by Edgar Kennedy.  
Thorn, now on inspection, might have been Colonel or General 
by now, except for a mishap, years ago, unwittingly caused by 
the Sergeant. In a hilarious flashback we see how Bilko had 
bribed an Army boxer to take a dive. Mistakenly, his assistant 
gave the money to the opponent pugilist, so that both fighters 
threw the match.
Without my getting into developments or details, the gags 
cascade and are most comical. Not subtle, not witty, but broad 
as befits farce. 
There's a wild switching of barracks signs and soldiers' 
identitities during a Thorn inspection. Then comes an 
investigation by military nerds who must break the codes of 
Bilko's computers. 
There is also a subplot about Bilko and his girl (Glenne 
Headley, reunited with Martin after the excellent "Dirty 
Rotten Scoundrels") whom he stands up at their wedding time 
after time, but who, in an appealing (and feminist) way, has a 
mind and will of her own. All this is wrapped up in fine 
production values and Alan Silvestri's clever, humorous score. 
Now for the not-so-good news. As a great 19th Century actor 
lay on his deathbed, he turned to his sad-faced company: 
"Don't feel sorry for me. Dying is easy. Comedy is hard." 
Farce is even harder. 
It's a rare movie that can sustain its brio past a certain 
point. At exactly the halfway mark "Sgt. Bilko" starts to 
slide and get rather tedious, at least in comparison to what 
came before. 
I noticed that, in the public, loud peals of laughter subsided 
after the first part. Even so, the wonderfully imaginative, 
enjoyable, well timed initial 45 minutes are reason enough to 
see the film.

Title
Review for Born Yesterday (1993)
BORN YESTERDAY (1993)** Directed by Luis Mandocki. Written by Douglas
McGrath, based on the play by Garson Kanin. Photography, Lajos Koltai.
Editing, Lesley Walker. Production design, Lawrence G. Paull. Music, George
Fenton. Cast: Melanie Griffith, John Goodman, Don Johnson, Edward Herrmann,
Max Perlich, Fred Dalton Thompson, Nora Dunn, Benjamin C. Bradlee, Sally
Quinn, et al. Released by Hollywood Pictures. 102 minutes., Rated PG
(language)
Two movies by Mexicans in one week: Maria Novaro directs the Mexican
ณDanzonฒ and Luis Mandocki (ณGaby-a True Storyฒ and ณWhite Palaceฒ) directs
ณBorn Yesterday.ฒ
In 1946, Garson Kaninนs ณBorn Yesterdayฒ was a Broadway hit. In 1950 it
became a movie directed by George Cukor. Both works made a star of Judy
Holliday. The current ณBorn Yesterdayฒ claims to be based on the play, but
it is closer to the movie.
I am getting tired of comparing originals and remakes, as I have done
recently for ณSommersby,ฒ ณThe Vanishingฒ and ณPoint of No Return.ฒ  This
time, I will make only passing remarks.
The 1950 film is by far the better of the two. It is also good in itself,
even though the comparison is, understandably, making some critics
overpraise the original. The new version, though only fair, does make an
unboring  time-passer.
Crass and shady millionaire Harry Brock (John Goodman) goes to Washington
in order, not to clean it up like Mr. Smith, but to push some crooked
senators already on his payroll into saving a military base adjoining his
mammoth development.  He is accompanied by his mistress Billie Dawn
(Melanie Griffith), a ditsy blonde ex-Vegas hoofer whom he loves but treats
like dirt. Also with him are his "consigliere"  Edward Herrmann and Harryนs
nephew Max Perlich.
In a world of luxury, name-dropping, phony chic and dachshund limos, and in
a series of scenes -- some funny, others not -- Billieนs unbelievable
mega-stupidity and ignorance prove to be embarrassments. Harry hires
smarty-pants journalist Paul Verrall (Don Johnson) to tutor her. At first
Paul refuses, but then a $500 a day fee (plus expenses, I would imagine)
overcomes his principles.
Even a pea-brain can guess what will happen, starting with Billieนs ณI
donนt want some stuffy old tutor.ฒ Guess whom the camera shows next? Right
away, she makes blatant passes at Paul, and after some bits oน business
(funny and non-funny)Billie blooms instantly into wisdom, learning and
Paul-crush.
She asimilates learning with the speed of a movie E.T., learns about the
Constitution, reads Tocqueville, discusses him -- when in reality she might
have learned, at the very most, to speak like tabloid headlines. Educating
Eliza Doolittle or Rita was credible, but educating Billie?
The hors-dนoeuvre to this menu is in ณBeing Thereฒ mode, as Billie learns
the eight responses for all occasions. Cued by Paul, she applies them. Itนs
dumb, itนs entertaining, and it includes the goof ณThatนs about as funny as
a Democrat  being elected President. ฒ The movie must have been made during
the Bushian post-Desert Storm glow.
Among the howl-inducers is Billieนs profundity. She contemplating a Van
Gogh in a museum.  ณItนs so small but it feels bigger than the whole room.ฒ
Another is her mnemotechnical trick to remember Constitutional Amendments.
At a posh Washington restaurant she sings them to the tune of ณThe Twelve
Days of Christmasฒ with band and co-eating celebrities obligato. Just
recalling this can make one blush from embarrassment.
Meanwhile, back at a dude ranch, Paul has been falling for Billie faster
than the "blitzkrieg,"the lightning-fast initial  German victories in World
War II.  This is infinitely less credible than in the 1950 edition. But
then Paul himself is unbelievable, a pallid character with a deep tan that
keeps reminding you that you are watching Don Johnson, a.k. a. Mr. Melanie
Griffith, Hollywood  Actor, here transferred from the streets of Miami to
the power corridors of Washington Vice.
Everything is telegraphed and marked like runway lights in an airfield.
Itนs no surprise that the pliant Billie (in whose name Harry has most of
his properties) will rebel and show Harry and Washington a thing or two.
She also shows her legs. I had not intended to see this film until I saw an
ad that showed, intriguingly, a pair of beautiful legs with a manนs leg
(contortionism?) draped over the gams (a word used  in the original playนs
period). My curiosity was not libidinous but nostalgic and cine-referential
: the photograph somehow brought memories of ณThe Graduateฒนs poster and
Mrs. Robinson.
Lackaday!  Even if Billie becomes a graduate of sorts, this movie is no
ณGraduate.ฒ But it does have some small surprises. Item.  The legs in the
photograph must be those of a body double. Item. Don Johnson is short,
shorter even than Melanie. I bet that, as in Alan Ladd pictures, they used
a lot of boxes and special camera angles to play down the differences in
size. Item. Edward Herrmann is wasted. Item. In his microscopic role, the
small Max Perlich is totally superfluous. Perhaps he was edited out in the
final cut. Perhaps Perlich knew somebody.
Item. Goof or subtlety? Paul, a writer and savant who also teaches at
Georgetown, tells Billie: ณIf I get involved with you Iนm no different THAN
Harry.ฒ Billie, seconds later: ณYouนre no different FROM  Harry.ฒ
(Capitalization mine).
Item. Paul: ณHello, how have you been?ฒ  Billie: ณVery GOOD  And you?ฒ
Paul: ณPretty GOOD.ฒ  To think that in spelling bees, some kids age 11 to
13, in my town, can spell ณsporran,ฒ ณcerography, ฒ ณzaibatsuฒ or
ณwapentake.ฒ
Among the sins of ณBorn Yesterdayฒ. First, not any two characters ever
connect or show rapport. Secondly, Johnson and Goodman are both miscast,
the first being made into a phony intellectual, the second into a massive,
crude ball of dumbness that lacks the nastiness of his predecessors, Paul
Douglas on the stage, Broderick Crawford on the screen.  This Harry is so
ludicrous that his contorsions on a dance floor conjure up Barnum and
Baileyนs kneeling elephants.
The movie misses a major opportunity : to illustrate that a little
knowledge is a dangerous thing by taking many of the Washington celebs who
scoffed at Billie and expose them as mere possessors of tidbits and
veneers, morsels handy for posing as smart, educated, literate or chic. In
the kingdom of the blind, one-eyed people are kings. Thereนs a whole
comedic expose to be made on this subject.
"BY"has an ostentatious look of unbridled capitalism and profiteering. The
hotel where much of the action takes place is the luxurious Willard, gutted
in 1986 and restored as the Willard-Intercontinental. But Harryนs
imperially Presidential  penthouse suite is an imaginary construct of 4,000
square feet where charges for a few days can be more than the average
Americanนs yearly salary. The skillful setup of this suite allowed a great
deal of camera mobility and deep-focus shots.
The better news is that overall the picture  does not bore and does
entertain, even though there are no major laughs, because, perhaps of the
underlying, mean-spirited mood of the picture.
The Golden Raspberry Foundation has awarded Melanie Griffith the prize for
Worst Actress of the Year (for ณShining Throughฒ and ณ A Stranger Among
Usฒ). But now she redeems herself as the best of four choices to replace
Judy Holliday. Melanie, a Black Belt among cerebrally challenged stars,
fits her part so effortlessly here that you are not even conscious of her
notorious little-girl voice. But then again, Judy Holliday convinced us
that inside her uncultured dumdum persona a smart, sharp ณnaturalฒ was
waiting to come out.  With Melanie Griffith, this takes a leap of faith.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Man Without a Star (1955)
MAN WITHOUT A STAR (1955)  Directed by King Vidor. Written by Borden Chase
and D.D. Beauchamp from the novel by Dee Linford. Photography, Russell
Metty. Editing,Virgil W. Vogel. Art, Alexander Golitzen, Richard H. Reidel.
Music, Joseph Gershenson.  Cast: Kirk Douglas, Jeanne Crain, Claire Trevor,
William Campbell et al. 90 minutes.
King Vidor was a major figure who even in his lesser films invariably had
very fine moments, mostly of stress. These were photographed with powerful
use of camera angles, swooping shots, and imaginative juxtaposition of
sight and sound.  "Man Without a Star" is a case in point, and though not
at the top of the Western-filled 1950s (a period that tried to bring new
depth and scope to the genre), it does a most creditable job of a fairly
familiar situation.
Easygoing rider Dempsey Rae ( Kirk Douglas), an ambulant cowboy, takes a
greenhorn kid (Campbell) under his tutelage, to his (Dempsey's) future but
only temporary sorrow. He gets involved in a war between Open Spacers and
Barbed Wirers.  He hates the wire which "is catching up with me again."
The movie is uneven, has contrived parts, prettified situations, and one of
those awful 1950s openings where balladeers or crooners (in this case
Frankie Laine)  sing awfully, miserable  songs with miserable lyrics.
The barbed-wire, don't fence-me-in  symbolism  is heavy-footed.  But there
are many gratifying aspects:  much convoluted, tense and  tight action with
original twists and moments  The camera work is beautiful. Director of
photography. Russell Metty did three fils for Orson Welles: "The
Magnificent Ambersons,"(with two other cinematographers), the visually
amazing "Touch of Evil, " and "The Stranger." Some of his other credits
include Howard Hawks' "Bringing Up Baby," John Huston's "The Misfits," and
"Spartacus" for which Metty was awarded an Oscar.
As for Kirk Douglas, his part and performance are variants of something he
can do blindfolded, the role of the champion who won't bend.
Jeanne Crain, the female lead, was primarily a sweet thing or a pretty
ingenue. Her filmography is a mixed bag, her roles were on the thin side
--with one outstanding exception:  in Elia Kazan's "Pinky," a sensitive,
gripping, courageous and pioneering drama released in1949.  Crain  played
Pinky, a very light-skinned black girl who passes for white. Otherwise, in
much of her work I find beautiful Jeanne seldom fully convincing or
interesting.
In "Man Without a Star" her unexpected casting  as an opportunist -- even
her first name, Reed, is masculine -- is original  and works out rather
well.  The supporting cast includes such  reliable character actors  as
Richard Boone, Jack Elam and Jay C. Flippen. Other female parts went to the
excellent, earthy Claire Trevor and to the exotically named Mara Corday.
The latter  worked almost exclusively in B-films, (to put it charitably,
since many were C-pictures)  In "Man" her performance may or may not be
notable, but the movie itself was the best she ever appeared in. (Edwin
Jahiel)

Title
Review for Arlington Road (1999)
ARLINGTON ROAD *1/4. Directed by Mark Pellington. Written by Ehren 
Kruger. Photography, Bobby Bukowski. Editing, Conrad Buff. Production 
design, Therese DePrez. Music, Angelo Badalamenti. Producers, Peter 
Samuelson, Tom Gorai, Marc Samuelson. Cast: Jeff Bridges (Michael 
Faraday), Tim Robbins (Oliver Lang), Joan Cusack (Cheryl Lang), Hope 
Davis (Brooke Wolfe), Robert Gossett (FBI Agent Whit Carver), Mason 
Gamble (Brady Lang), Spencer Treat Clark (Grant Faraday), Stanley 
Anderson (Dr. Archer Scobee), et al. A Screen Gems release. 117 
minutes. R (violence)
The day after I saw this movie, I was reading in The New York Times 
George Vecsey's analysis of the US women's soccer team victory. 
(Vecsey is both a paragon of sports writers and an excellent author 
of non-sports books, including "Loretta Lynn, Coal Miner's Daughter" 
the bestseller which became a great movie). I quote:  "Now the 
American women are hot, but, then again, America lives for temporary 
diversion and instant gratification -- new pop groups, new 
sunglasses, new cars, new Internet stocks." One might add to this 
many other items, including new movies, such as Arlington Road.
The following day I received a TBS announcement for a made-for-cable 
film, First Daughter, about the kidnapping of the President's 
daughter by American terrorists. As Voltaire said about God, "if He 
didn't exist, he should have been invented." Hollywood, in the 
absence of that so-useful Big Bad Soviet Bear, predictably turned to 
world-wide terrorism , including home-grown American destroyers. As 
in Arlington Road, an ambitious but disappointing opus.
At  D.C.'s George Washington University, Professor Faraday ( Bridges) 
teaches courses on terrorism. He's a widower with his boy, Grant. His 
FBI-agent wife, was killed in a Federal cock-up. Faraday is being 
semi-consoled by Brooke, one of his graduate students. He lives on 
Arlington Road where he makes friends with neighbors Oliver (Robbins) 
and Cheryl Lang (Cusack). Then he begins to suspect that Oliver is 
not the architect he claims to be, but a terrorist leader...
The film open with the protracted, unexplained sequence. A heavily 
bloodied, badly burnt boy staggers down a street. Just as you think 
that he'll fall down dead, he is rescued by Michael Faraday who 
drives him to a hospital. It's all  done as a skillful "internal" 
montage, whose horror, however, does not really hide goofs and 
improbabilities. Item: in a close-up, a drop of blood falls on one of 
the boy's sneakers. Seconds later, the same sneaker has no blood. 
Item: Arlington Road is a suburban street flanked by many houses and 
lawns but I cannot remember seeing any people around. It is far too 
convenient that the only driver who notices the kid's predicament is 
Faraday. Item: the child  rapidly goes from apparent death throes to 
a lightning-fast recovery with one arm in a cast as the only visible 
sign. The explanation of the boy's condition, given by his parents, 
the Langs, is a fireworks accident.
All this is an artificial gimmick to have Faraday and the Langs meet 
and develop
nice, neighborly relations. The couple has a  boy, Brady, and two 
girls.  Brady and Grant become best friends. This is held in reserve 
for future, nefarious purposes. It is also is a gimmick for 
dis-alienating the orphan Grant who disapproves of papa's girlfriend 
Brooke, and for turning the 8-year old into a "regular American boy," 
a fact that gets worked into the plot.
Another ho-hummer. Michael Faraday's questioning of Oliver's 
kosher-ness as a designer of malls starts with his 2-seconds' glimpse 
of plans that are not of a mall but of an office building. Quick 
eyes, what?
Item: when later Michael needs to look at those plans by getting into 
the Lang house when the couple is not there, the two little girls who 
open the door are uncharacteristically pan-faced and suspicious; 
Michael's excuses for entering are woolly-minded, blatantly dumb. So 
is his search.
Item: Brooke, rather thinking that Michael's suspicions are paranoid, 
is an  unbelievably obtuse naysayer. So is the FBI agent, a friend of 
Michael's.
Cliche Item: when a good person is feverishly phoning about a 
discovery from a pay-phone, and turns around, the enemy is standing 
there.
Improbable Item: Michael is checking old newspaper files about 
Oliver...who suddenly appears behind him.
Cliche Item: the obligatory as well as unbelievable car chase.
Impossible Item: the way chasers and chased connect.
Goof Item: a car is hit broadsides; next that side is shown undamaged.
[Here I eliminate about dozens of other items]
The finale is highly improbable but does score a point by going 
against the guesses of audiences conditioned by too many action Good 
vs. Evil flicks. I won't disclose it.
The script of Arlington Road-- a name evoking Red, White and Blue 
patriotism-- wastes much money and technical talent  during its two 
hours where nothing makes sense. Its photography and editing are 
artsy not arty. Story an dialogue go overboard with deviousness and 
indirection. Has no one learned from Alfred Hitchcock the value of 
clarity ?. The whole is an alienating mess, and a probably uncalled 
for stress on large-scale, minutely organized, hugely financed (but 
by whom?) American terrorism.
The movie's events are under the sign of  The World Trade Center and 
Oklahoma City bombings, and the mess at Ruby Ridge. Consciously or 
not, it connects with such good pictures as The Invasion of The Body 
Snatchers, The Stepford Wives, Seconds, Rosemary's Baby, et al., that 
is, films where people are not what they seem to be.
Rescuing it from total destruction are good performances by Bridges 
who is convincing in his pain and obsessions; by Robbins who is 
smooth and would be frightening if credible; and by the clever 
casting of ever-charming Joan Cusack as a wolf in lamb's clothing.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Village of Daughters (1962)
VILLAGE OF DAUGHTERS (UK, 1962) Directed by George Pollock.  Written 
by David Pursall, Jack Sheddon. Photography, Geoffrey Faiththfull. 
Editing, Tristam Cones. Music, Ron Goodwin. Cast: Eric Sykes,  Scilla 
Gabel , John Le Mesurier, Grégoire Aslan , Warren Mitchell, Anthony 
Morton, Eric Pohlmann, Edwin Richfield, Yvonne Romain, et al. An 
MGM-UA production. Black and white.
George Pollock is a minor British filmmaker who was assistant 
director on several high-class movies of the 1940s, starting with 
Gaslight (1940) and going on to such works as Pimpernel Smith, 
Spitfire, The Demi-Paradise, Blithe Spirit. Brief Encounter, Great 
Expectations, The  Browning Version(1951). All of the above are 
excellent features.
He then became a full-fledged director of a dozen pictures in the 50s 
and 60s. These were not memorable,  with the huge exception of a set 
of four detection comedies: Murder she Said, Murder at the Gallop, 
Murder Ahoy, and Murder Most Foul. These were Agatha Christie 
mysteries in which the sleuth was Miss Marple. All starred the 
quirky, unforgettable and irreplaceable Margaret Rutherford, then in 
her 70s. With her bulk, odd diction, mannerisms and colorful 
eccentricities, Miss Rutherford stole the scenes, the show and the 
audiences' hearts. She later became a Dame of the British Empire.
Pollock directed those works with unabated vigor and humor.  The 
films, most entertaining as well as unpretentious, had excellent 
supporting casts. Another, major asset was provided by Ron Goodwin's 
jaunty, original and memorable music scores. These  became a 
trademark of the films.
Alas, Village of Daughters is in a far lower level than the Miss 
Marple bonbons. It is headed by Eric Sykes whose comedic skills were 
appreciated in England but who remains almost unknown in the USA. 
Village also has a few good performers, familiar supporting/character 
British actors such as John Le Mesurier, as the local priest,  or 
Gregoire Aslan, as the mayor and father of pretty and marriageable 
Anunciata. Aslan,  Swiss-born and of Armenian descent, has appeared 
in dozens of films, many of the French but several too from the 
European Continent and the USA. A chameleon player, he played men of 
many professions and nationalities, including Arabs, Italians and 
Greeks.
In Village, however, neither the main nor the supporting characters 
are memorable. The plot is simplistic. In a Sicilian village, there 
are many single girls but a scarcity of males. The latter have 
emigrated to seek their fortune.  Suddenly comes the news (which the 
postman, of course, reads first) of the coming of an envoy from 
abroad, a man delegated to select a bride for a now-wealthy 
ex-villager. Eric Sykes, playing a down-and-out salesman, is mistaken 
for the envoy. Complications ensue. They are generally neither 
original nor funny.
The Brits who play Sicilians are unconvincing--but the 
made-in-England Sicilian setting is better.  The score by Ron Goodwin 
is mediocre.
The subject and its treatment were already ourdated  by 1962 standards.

Title
Review for Jing ke ci qin wang (1999)
THE EMPEROR AND THE ASSASSIN (Jing Ke Ci Qin Wang) (China, 1999) *** 
1/4  Directed by Chen Kaige. Written  by Wang Peigong and Kaige. 
Photography, Zhao Fei. Editing, Zhao Xinxia. Production design  Tu 
Juhua. Music, Zhao Jiping. Produced by Han Sanping, Shirley Kao and 
Satoru Iseki. Cast: Gong Li (Lady Zhao), Zhang Fengyi (Jing Ke), Li 
Xuejian (Ying Zheng, King of Qin), Sun Zhou (Dan, Prince of Yan), Lu 
Xiaohe (Gen. Fan Yuqi) Wang Zhiwen (Marquis Changxin) and a cast of 
thousands.  A Le Studio Canal Plus/Pricel/Shin Corp./NDF presentation 
of a New Wave Co./Beijing Film Studio production. A Sony Classics 
release. In Mandarin with subtitles, 161-163 minutes. R (violence and 
gore)
Unless you are a fiercely militant member of the BBNMM group (Bring 
Back the Ninety Minute  Movie), you can not only endure but enjoy 
this long film. Enjoy visually, that is. "E & A" 's top award for 
production design at Cannes '99,  was deserved. The sets and 'scapes 
-- as well as the photography and the mass movements -- are 
breathtaking.
If you are a scholar of Chinese history, this story, climaxing in 221 
BC, may thrill you for its subject. It may also get you going 
pointing out liberties taken with history, inaccuracies, inventions 
or fictionalizations--but I wouldn't worry about that. Few moviegoers 
outside China are specialists. College-age film students in 2000 AD 
have little historical memory, not to mention knowledge. This, in 
spite of the abundance of historical programs on TV. Ignorance of 
even major events of the 19th century often finds an  astounding 
alibi in "that was before my time."
The convoluted story centers around the efforts of Ying Zheng, the 
King of Qin.  After centuries of turmoil, Qin and six other kingdoms 
(The Seven Warring Kingdoms) were China's main subdivisions. (The 
film deals wit four of them.) Ying is obessed with unifying them 
under his rule, or in less polite terms, of conquering them. His 
methods are ruthless. He also plots with his lover Lady Zhao for 
skullduggery which would give him  "legitimate" cause for attacking 
the most powerful of the other kingdoms, the neighboring Yan. The 
trick is to make of Lady Zhao what, in today's parlance we might call 
a mole or a double agent who would arrange for a professional 
assassin in the pay of Yan to attempt murdering Ying, thus clearing 
the way for the latter's invasion of the kingdom of Yan.
This is the main thread of a tale so complex that it requires printed 
explanations on the screen. It includes a great many atrocities as 
Ying evolves from idealist to tyrant; a betrayal of Lady Zhao by her 
regal lover; her falling in love wit the assassin Jing Ke; the 
newfound scruples of the now-retired killer; and many other twists, 
events and characters, plus a host of warriors.
This is epic filmmaking that melds Hollywood spectaculars by C.B. De 
Mille, other lavish historical films ("Ben-Hur," "Spartacus," etc.), 
crowd scenes a la Sergei Eisenstein, certain Kurosawa movies, even 
some Italian epics made in the early 1900s. It is impressive. It is 
splendidly photographed. It is color coordinated (oh those Chinese 
reds! Colors that is, not Reds).
Much pomp and many circumstances have made "E & A" the most expensive 
Chinese film ever. It was three years in the making. Its first 
test-screening, in Japan, was of about 3 hours (180 minutes.). The 
next cut was down to 160 minutes.  A third went down to 140 minutes. 
The fourth and final one, went back up to 161 minutes. Curiously, it 
was not shot, as it should have been, in 70mm widescreen.
The film was partly financed by sources outside China, notably French 
ones. The actual cost has not been divulged, but calculated guesses 
range, in US Dollars,  from 10 to 30 million. Even at the top figure 
the movie is amazingly cheap by European standards, dirt-cheap by 
American standards. I would guess that its Hollywood cost would be 
close to 200 million.
Chinese labor and other costs are so low that I can also guess that 
given the right political and trade circumstances, there would be a 
spate of movies filmed in China by foreign interests.
The director is Chen Kaige who, along with Zhang Yimou is today the 
super-star of the so-called Fifth Generation of China's filmmakers. 
This is the seventh feature by Chen who skyrocketed to international 
renown with his fifth, "Farewell My Concubine," the co-winner of the 
1993 Cannes Festival along with Jane Campion's "The Piano."
For the beautiful and talented actress Gong Li (Lady Zhao) this is 
her third film with Chen. Her debut was in "Red Sorghum" (1987) which 
was also the directorial debut of Zhang Yimou. I don't know when 
those two became "an item," but they worked together in all the other 
six Zhang features between 1989 and 1995: "Codename Couguar," "Du 
Jou," "Raise the Red Lantern," "Qiu Ju," "To Live," "Shanghai Triad." 
Then they separated, both in real life and in films.
"E & A" is said (but no one seems to know the specifics) to have 
employed 300,000 extras ( I suspect set-builders are included in this 
figure) and many thousands of Red Army soldiers. Many lavish and 
detailed interiors and exteriors were constructed. Ying Zheng's 
palace was conserved as an attraction for visitors, a show place. In 
another show place, Beijing's Great Hall of the People in Tienanmen 
Square, the movie was projected in 1988 to three thousand guests, 
probably a first of its kind in China. Chen, who had not always been 
the darling of censorship, was not criticized. Ying, the King, then 
Emperor of the film, is by tradition one of China's great heroes. 
Eventually however, the Chinese media were critical of the 
unflattering presentation of Ying.
There is also a debate about Ying the Unifier and Mao that other 
Unifier. The two are often compared. However, some people feel (but 
director Chen Kaige evades the question) that the movie is an 
allegory for Mao's Great Leap Forward.and his catastrophic Cultural 
Revolution.
With its enormous stress on visuals and often melodramatic twists and 
turns, there is no real room left for the analysis of characters. The 
performances are good. They include the principals as well as some 
supporting parts such as a charming blind girl whose family the 
assassin had destroyed, and a canny, effeminate Marquis . He is the 
Queen Mother's lover, wily, role-playing and the exact opposite of 
what is called in computerese WYSIWYG (what you see is what you get).
The various illustrations of "power corrupts; absolute power corrupts 
absolutely" are points made vividly. And the impermanence of tyranny 
(think Hitler, Stalin ...and Mao) is a post-scriptum in the film, as 
one learns that the King became Emperor, but only for fifteen years.
PS.  Ying Zheng was responsible for the Great Wall of China. It is 
also his tomb, at Xian, that is guarded by that huge, famous 
collection of terra cotta soldiers.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Von Ryan's Express (1965)
VON RYAN'S EXPRESS (1965) *** Very satisfactory W.W.II actioneer.
Directed by  Mark Robson. Produced by Saul David. Screenplay by Wendell
Mayes and Joseph Landon, from a novel by David Westheimer. Photography,
William Daniels.Editing, Dorothy Spencer. Art, Jack Martin Smith. Music,
Jerry Goldsmith. Cast: Frank Sinatra, Trevor Howard, Sergio Fantoni,
Raffaela Cara, Adolfo Celi, John Leyton, Vito Scotti, Edward Mulhare,
James Brolin, Wolfgang Preiss. 118 min. Not rated.
In Italy, captured American Ryan (Sinatra), a temporary colonel, is put
in an Italian POW camp for Britishers. After much stress, especially
between Ryan and the top Brit, career officer Trevor Howard (who is
outranked by the Yank), Ryan leads a mass escape that fails. The
escapees are   recaptured.
Then the Allies, in German uniforms (hence the "Von" in the film's
title) take over a "Kriegsgefangenzug," which is one those wonderful
German compound terms (a.k.a "railroad words").It means "a train of
prisoners of war."
Chased by another train  full of armed Germans, they try to reach
Switzerland. The picture stretches belief and does become increasingly
silly, but at the same time there is much suspense. It is good
cliffhanger stuff, keeps mounting (along with the silliness) but also
keeps grabbing you. 
The tone, compared to that of many other movie in the same genre (or
similar sub-genres) is more serious than jokey. Many a good man dies. 
The film has only two big names of thespians, Sinatra and Howard, but
amont the others are some really fine character actors like the Italian
Adolfo Celi (who was a great the arch-villain, that same year,in  the
James Bond "Thunderball") or the German Wolfgang Preiss. The actors
deliver most capable performances, in movie-movie style, of course. 
Ryan-Sinatra is one of those fellows whom perhaps one might not trust
too much in civilian life, but whose wiles and talents come in handy in
the situations of this film.
"Von Ryan's Express" is not free from familiar elements, such as what
you might call "the esthetic relief," here in the shape of a  very
pretty girl, the mistress of the German General. Yet she is also
something of an anti-cliche. Instead of the deja vu character of a woman
who pretends to go along with the Germans but helps the Allies, this
lady betrays and is shot by Sinatra, while the watching Italians think
that the Nazis killed her.
Interestingly, the movie was Academy Award nominated for its sound
effects by Walter Rossi, the same man who some years before had won an
Oscar in the same category for the first released movie scripted by
Wendell Hayes,"The Enemy Below," an excellent W.W.II submarine picture.
Scenarist Wendell Mayes is less known than Mark Robson,the film's
director, perhaps because over a 25-year period, he received credits
"only" in 15 pictures.
My top choices among them would include "The Enemy Below," his next film
"The Spirit of St. Louis" and two that he wrote for director Otto
Preminger: "Anatomy  of a Murder" (which had seven Oscar nominations,
including one for Mayes's writing) and "Advise and Consent." (There was
one another collaboration with Preminger too, the most watchable "In
Harm's Way") 
Also on this list I place the Ted Post-directed "Go Tell The Spartans,"
(1978) one of the best Vietnam War movies. A thorough re-evaluation of
Wendell Mayes may well add more titles. (Edwin Jahiel)

Title
Review for Enemy Below, The (1957)
THE ENEMY BELOW (1957) *** Produced & directed by Dick Powell. Written
by Wendell Mayes, from the novel by D.A. Rayner. Photgtaphy, Harold
Rosson. Editing,Stuart Gilmore. Art design, Lyle Wheeler, Albert
Hogsett. Music,Leigh Harline. Music director, Lionel Newman. Special
Effects, L.B.Abbott.  Special Soundd Effects, Walter Rossi. Cast: Robert
Mitchum (Capt. Murrell),Curt Jurgens(Von Stolberg),David Hedison(Lt.
Ware),Theodore Bikel(Schwaffer),Russell Collins(Doctor),Kurt Kreuger(Von
Holem), Frank Albertson,Biff Elliot, Alan Dexter,Doug McClure, and many
others. 98 min.Not rated. Color,  
Director Dick Powell was the juvenile or young tenor in many musicals,
who made a strange about-face and turned to often convincing tough guy
roles. His most memorable one was in the film noir "Murder, My Sweet." 
Later he produced an directed five features, of which Number Four, "The
Enemy Below" is by far the best, and good by any standards.  
It is a World War II submarine yarn about an American destroyer
captained by Robert Mitchum who is hunting down a German sub 
in a cat-and-mouse game. The U-Boat is commanded by Curt Jurgens. His
able second and good friend  is played by Theodore Bikel.  
A sure-handledly directed film, it may be formulaic, but with a
difference, mostly because of the interesting resemblances and
differences between Mitchum and Jurgens, and some solid
characterizations in other roles. Naturally, it has the expected quota
of stiff upper lip and "Up periscope!", some bits about humanity, and
last minute sentimental touches thrown in. 
Within the war film genre there is a sub-genre about undersea warfare.
Within the latter, there is a  sub-sub-genre--as here-- which celebrates
the respect that brave, professional commanders feel for their
opponents' skill and courage. There's a job to be done, and it must get
done without hate, without showing the enemies as cruel men, if not
monsters. In fact the main German opponents are humanized and rather
"sympatisch." The opposing commanders are not rah-rah or gung-ho, but
tired of war and disillusioned.
There are several good moments that work well without pummeling you with
bathos or with funny stuff. Two examples at random: 1)  the Germans
defiantly singing the stirring "Ich hat' ein' kamerade"; 2)  the
American crew in a lifeboat, returning to the  sinking vessel to get
their Captain and one man saying: "Come on, Sir, I'm double-parked
downstairs."
This said, the movie is still  a far cry from the pronounced realism and
the de-glorification of war that is  found much later in the German 
"Das Boot" (1981), the best of submarine movies.
The action scenes are good but will not fool experienced eyes. Many
shots betray the use of miniatures in a tank, with the additional dead
giveaway of flames and waves that are too big. (They may make you wonder
who are the lucky people who may have inherited some of those finely
crafted toys.) 
This 20th Century Fox film was done in CinemaScope. When shown on
television not letterboxed but via the infamous pan and scan system that
cuts off both sides, the loss of widescreen, so useful for giving one a
good view of submarine interiors, hurts the story and the esthetics.
"The Enemy..." was the first film ever made with a script by Wendell
Mayes, whose writing credit appears in 15 films from 1957 to 1982,
including "The Spirit Of St. Louis," three Otto Preminger films 
("Anatomy Of A Murder," "Advise and Consent," "In Harm's Way,")  
"Von Ryan's Express," and the excellent Vietnam War movie  
"Go Tell The Spartans." 
Walter Rossi won an Academy Award for his special sound effects. (Edwin
Jahiel)

Title
Review for Mulholland Falls (1996)
MULHOLLAND FALLS **  Directed by Lee Tamahori. Written by Pete Dexter. 
Story by Pete Dexter and Floyd Mutrux. Photography, Haskell Wexler. 
Editing, Sally Menke. Production design, Richard Sylbert. Costumes, Elle 
Mirojnick.Music, Dave Grusin. Producers, Richard D. Zanuck & Lili Fini 
Zanuck. Cast: Nick Nolte, Melanie Griffith, Chass Palminteri, Michael 
Madsen, Chris Penn, Treat Williams, Jennifer Connelly, Daniel Baldwin, 
Andrew McCarthy, and John Malkovich. An MGM release. 107 minutes. Rated 
R (violence, sex, language)
All you wanted to know about the "Hat Squad" and then some. In the early 
1950s, there really was within the Los Angeles Police Department a "Hat  
Squad" of four tough and independently-minded cops. They were a good 
example of the truism that sometimes just the thinnest of lines 
separates lawmen from gangsters or vigilantes.  As per the movie, they 
dressed with gangster chic and used gangster methods.  
At the start, led by Nick Nolte (overcutely named Max Hoover),  they 
roughhouse, arrest a gangster, take him for a drive "to the airport."  
Soon the captive says "this ain't the way to the airport," which, if 
you've heard once, you heard a thousand times in movies. 
The next bit is better. When the man understands that he's a candidate 
for the final solution, he protests "You can't do this. This is 
America." Nolte replies "This isn't America, Jack. this is L.A." Then 
they throw the fellow over a Mulholland Drive cliff.
This was just a mood-setting hors d'oeuvre.  The main course is  about 
what happens when Nolte investigates the murder of a young woman. Movie 
cliches spill out all over.  Most of them don't travel well.  Director 
Lee Tamahori, the New Zealander who made "Once Were Warriors," must have 
watched hundreds of American police, gangster and "noir" movies. He 
can't resist any  genres conventions,   adds to them several  
post-modern ellipses that may not hurt, but annoy, and embroiders to the 
point of obfuscation, absurdism and arbitrariness.   
"Mulholland Falls," in the hands of the writer and the director turns 
into an occasionally interesting but mostly mushy compendium of the old 
roles held by Humphrey Bogart, Dick Powell, Robert Mitchum and the like. 
Above all, you sense the desire of this movie to emulate "Chinatown." I 
does not. " Last year's underrated "Devil in a Blue Dress, " set in 1948 
L.A., beats "Mulholland" hollow in every way, acting included.
Using generous doses of flashbacks and other devices, the movie throws 
in bucketfuls of coincidences, improbabilities and impossibilities. The 
dead girl was for a while the mistress of Hoover-Nolte. She was also the 
mistress of a bigwig. Someone had taken (but how?) very sharp pictures 
of sexual activitity.  The Atomic Energy Commission gets into the game, 
with dark, private as well as Governmental secrets.  The Untouchable 
(and one suspects, rather mad) Hatters do things that defy logic. 
Just one example. Nolte (forget about the mistress part) is happily 
married with Melanie Griffith. She primps at length while waiting for 
her man to come home, presumably to make love. Now (somehow) Nolte has 
in his possession a 16mm film of the dead girl, when she was very much 
alive and was having sex with Nolte. Nolte gets home and finds a 
shell-shocked, pitiful Melanie. She (somehow) had stumbled upon the film 
(in her house! ). .She (somehow) has a movie projector on the premises. 
She (somehow) knows how to run it. Anyhow, it is a very sad, pitiable 
spouse who now faces Mr. Hoover. (Griffith's role is tiny, of use only 
as a name on the marquee). 
Nolte, the hard-boiled egg, mumbles and goes from no facial expression 
to level 2 on the scale of 10.  Best buddy Palminteri is around for 
camaraderie as well as comic relief, but he is so dumb that he's not 
funny, so dumb that you wonder about the entrance requirements to the 
Hat Squad.
The loss is not total. Early on, a bar  singer does a nice job of 
"Harbor Lights," the song we associate mostly with John Ford's  movie 
"The Long Voyage Home." Talented people contributed the camera work, 
sets and costumes. Between yawns, you could be impressed by the visuals. 
From null@filmcritic.com Wed May  8 11:35:41 EDT 1996
Article: 3333 of rec.arts.movies.reviews
Path: nntphub.cb.att.com!not-for-mail
From: null@filmcritic.com (Christopher Null)
Newsgroups: rec.arts.movies.reviews
Subject: REVIEW: MULHOLLAND FALLS (1996)
Followup-To: rec.arts.movies.current-films
Date: 7 May 1996 17:12:16 GMT
Organization: Null Publishing Co.
Lines: 58
Sender: ecl@mtcts1.att.com (Evelyn C. Leeper)
Approved: ecl@mtcts1.att.com
Message-ID: 
Reply-To: null@filmcritic.com (Christopher Null)
NNTP-Posting-Host: mtcts2.mt.att.com
Summary: r.a.m.r. #05150
Keywords: author=Null
Originator: ecl@mtcts2
Xref: nntphub.cb.att.com rec.arts.movies.reviews:3333
Status: RO
     Just so you know, there are no waterfalls in Los Angeles.  The
titular MULHOLLAND FALLS refers to the smarmy practice of taking a
criminal to the high point of the mountainous Mulholland Drive and booting
him off, only to catch up with him sometime later at the bottom.
     MULHOLLAND FALLS is the preferred method of ridding 1950s L.A. of
unwanted baddies, and it is most often used by a foursome of elite cops: 
Nick Nolte, Chazz Palminteri, Chris Penn, and Michael Madsen.  Their
newest mission:  to find the murderer of Allison (Jennifer Connelly), a
girl whose bizarre death leads the gang to a General (John Malkovich) at
the Atomic Energy Commission and his number one thug (Treat Williams).
     Could have been interesting, but it unfortunately isn't.  The main
problem appears to be substantial meddling with what likely started out as
a good script.  Instead, there are no surprises here at all.  The plot is
formulaic and leaves nothing to the imagination, and it moves at a snail's
pace.  Also, important expository scenes have been cut out to apparently
give more screen time to the many big-name stars paraded through the film.
     The most noticeable flaw in this regard is Melanie Griffith's
character, playing Nolte's estranged wife, whose role is a complete
throwaway but is used to try (and fails) to develop sympathy for her and
her poor hubby.  Almost as bad are Andrew McCarthy, as a stereotypical
homosexual informer, and Connelly, who we see only in flashbacks.  Note: 
when we do see her, we are treated to generous portions of
surgically-enhanced cheesecake.
     Still, the movie has its moments.  The quartet is mostly entertaining
when they interact among themselves, particularly Nolte and Palminteri. 
There are a number of nice lines of dialogue that really imbue the film
with a sense of the macabre.  And placing us against the backdrop of
nuclear testing is somewhat thought-provoking and interesting.  As well,
director Lee Tamahori, who last did ONCE WERE WARRIORS, is as capable here
as can be expected given a lackluster script.
     The bottom line is that MULHOLLAND FALLS runs in circles pretty
slowly.  You might expect a little more from an American film, but as
Nolte's character puts it, "This isn't America; this is L.A."
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com
-Screenwriter-Producer  /  Novelist-Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Girls Town (1996)
GIRLS TOWN ** 1/2. Directed by Jim McKay.Written by McKay, Denise
Casano,Anna Grace, Bruklin Harris and Lili Taylor.  Photography, Russell
Fine. Editing, McKay and Alex Hall. Production design, David Doernberg.
Music, Guru. Producer, Lauren Zalaznick.  Cast: Aunjanue Ellis (Nikki),
Bruklin Harris (Angela), Anna Grace (Emma), Lili Taylor (Patti),
Guillermo Diaz (Dylan), John Ventimiglia (Eddie), Antony Imperioli
(Michael) An October Films release. 90 minutes. Rated R (language) 
Coincidences again, or better call them connections. The current  "The
First Wives Club" is about four older women,  once best college pals,
now abandoned by their husbands for chicks. One woman commits suicide.
The surviving three are reunited and unite against their spouses.
In "Girls Town" four young women, two black (Nikki and Angela),  two
white ( Patti and Emma), have their own clique. When they are close to
graduating from high school, Nikki, the academically smartest of the lot
and a future Princetonian,  unexpectedly and inexplicably commits
suicide. After swiping Nikki's diary, the surviving three conclude that
she had killed herself because she had been date-raped by a co-worker
outside the school. His name, Richard Helms, sounds like a dig at
politics.  
The diary helping, discussions among the trio reveal to them how little
they had really known their best friend Nikki, induce self-analyses.
bring to light that Emma had also been the victim of a date rape.
The most forceful member of the three, and the oldest one, is Patti,
played with unbound energy by Lili Taylor, the star of  "I Shot Andy
Warhol." She is a single mother. Her ex-boyfriend Eddie is an abusive
brute. She dresses so horribly in bulky overalls that it makes your eyes
hurt--not that her friends are fashion models either. Nor is any of the
three a looker, which fact reinforces some anti-Hollywood aspects of the
movie. (The overalls may be a sign of defiance or seeking and affirming
one's identity, like the graffiti of names in the school bathroom). 
The trio more or less affirm their feminism in long talks, unstructured
and coming to a large degree from sessions of improvisations between the
film's director-co-writer, members of the cast, and others. The ladies
avenge themselves by trashing the car of Emma's rapist, attacking (not
too violently) on the street Nikki's rapist,vandalizing Eddie's place
and pawning his TV set. 
While "The First Wives Club" is a costly Hollywood Establishment
production and "Girls Town" an independent, micro-budget film, and while
one is set in ritzy Manhattan and the other in a pronouncedly grungy,
working-class neighborhood somewhere in New York, both aim at a female
audience, respectively mature and young. And while "Girls," which is by
far the better of the two movies --early this year it won the Sundance
film festival's filmakers trophy and special jury prize-- it is not
without raising some questions.
Both "Wives" and "Girls" have weighty subjects, which the first film
chooses to treat as entertainment for the audiences, unlike the  second
which is eager, serious and heavy on naturalism, "Girls" tries to
involve the audience by having it peep and eavesdrop into the concerns
of its young women. As this is done mostly through talk, the process
exacts the price of inducing some fatigue in the public. No matter how
true to life and to the speakers, the improvised, diffuse babbling is of
uneven interest to the viewers-listeners. It can hit arid passages, lead
to rambling rather than to crystallizing specific points. (The
first-time director is a lover of documentary cinema and has a
background of music videos).
Art has to go beyond literal reproduction. It must select, prune and
structure, ideally in ways that seem to be natural. The organization of
"Girls" lacks tightness and simply does not go far enough.  
Then there's the Political Correctness factor that balances
symmetrically the black and the white girls and shows a remarkably
endearing, entirely natural non-consciousness of race. This goes beyond
the original quartet. When there are only three women left, another
black schoolmate eventually becomes a marginal confidante. There is an
additional black-and-white pair of best friends around, with whom the
threesome fights. 
"Girls" goes way beyond plain old racial harmony and tolerance. 
Blackness or whiteness matter to the friends as much as the Man in the
Moon, which means not a whit. Think about it: this wonderful
indifference is taken light-years farther than in any other movie I can
think of. It is, for me, the core of the picture, the high point I will
remember above all others.  Is this genuine?  An artifice? Wishful
thinking? I cannot tell, but no matter. This is what gives the film its
warmth and its positive thinking.
Hard to judge is Nikki's suicide because we have not enough clues. Was
it her rape that caused it? Was the rape the last straw in some problems
unknown to us?  Unexplained too is the original relationship between
Patti and Eddie, The lack of antecedents makes it confusing. Was Patti a
patsy who, peculiarly, used to put up with Eddie's brutality? Did she
become an activist-leader almost overnight, with her pent up feelings
and thoughts catalyzed by Nikki's death and the reinforcement of the
group? 
The film knows its three Rs, race, rape and rap.  Its soundtrack adds
much female singing of rap. As Jean-Luc Godard might put it in one of
his playful but not necessarily meaningful wordplays, remove the "e" and
rape becomes rap. 
In the movie's mix of weaknesses and virtues add to the latter that 
"Girls" qualifies for inclusion in the lists of BBNMM, the Bring Back
the Ninety Minute Movie Society.

Title
Review for Oscar (1991)
OSCAR (1991) ** 3/4 . Directed by John Landis. Written by
Michael Barrie and Jim Mulholland, from a play by Claude
Magnier. Photography, Marc Ahlberg. Music, Elmer Bernstein.
Cast: Sylvester Stallone, Peter Riegert, Chazz Palminteri,
Joey Travolta, Vincent Spano, Ornella Muti, Don Ameche, Yvonne
DeCarlo, Martin Ferrero, Harry Shearer, Elizabeth Barondes,
Jim Mulholland, Tim Curry, Kirk Douglas, William Atherton,
Marisa Tomei, Ken Howard , Richard Romanus, et al. A
Touchstone release. 100 min. Rated PG.
Would you believe Sylvester Stallone in a non-violent comedy?
Would you believe Yvonne DeCarlo back in circulation? Or a
stutterer played by Eddie Bracken who had retired in 1953?
Would you believe such an Italian-American, Italian (the
enchanting  Ornella Muti) or Italianate gathering of movie
eagles--well, mostly eaglets, canaris and sparrows--with some
Anglos thrown in for balance?   
As befits a farce of this type, the parts, from medium to
tiny, are shared. No one has a real lion's share, not even
Stallone. Everyone seems to be having a good time. But for a
long stretch, that good time is too good for the good of the
movie.
"Oscar" has nothing to do with the statuette. Superficially it
could be called a screwball comedy, but it is really something
different, a transplanted, Americanized adaptation of a French
"vaudeville" that ran endlessly, years ago, on the Paris
stage.
The "vaudeville" is a special type of French farce and has
nothing to do with British or American  vaudeville. Georges
Feydeau (1862-1921) was the undisputed master of the genre.
The original French "Oscar" was written by Claude Magnier--not
an undisputed master but still quite a skillful plot-maker.
Its American adapters did nicely too, except for some unfunny
excesses, e.g. baptizing Stallone "Angelo (Snaps) Provolone."
Essentially though, they caught the spirit of the play and
mostly kept to its "classical" format. Wisely, they did not
try to air it out and make it much more than  filmed theater
with unity of place (the Provolone town house) and time (under
one day).  
Provolone is an underworld boss in the early Thirties Golden
Age of gangsterism. Having promised his dying Papa Kirk
Douglas to go straight, he tries hard. On the day Snaps is
about to turn into a legit banker everything happens. Cops
stalk his house. Bankers plan to defraud him. His accountant
Anthony asks for the hand of Lisa, Snaps's daughter, while
telling his employer that he's been robbing him all along. 
Lisa lies to Snaps that she's pregnant  by the chauffeur
Oscar, now gone, because she wants to marry--anybody will do so
long as she can get out of the Provolone place. Can you blame
her? Yes you can, because Lisa has as little class as anyone
around her.
The girl that Anthony loves turns out to be Theresa, who
pretended she was Miss Provolone. Then come more mistaken
identities in a madhouse of entrances, exits, announcements,
revelations, engagements, separations, rival gangsters,
visitors, and, of course, the props of farce. Here those are
three identical black bags that play musical chairs as they
get endlessly switched . Respectively they contain jewelry,
greenbacks and the underwear of the former maid--who will marry
the former fiance of Snaps's daughter. 
The situation is madly promising. The execution is maddeningly
wrong, at least for a long time, with troubles ranging from
the direction to the pacing, from the acting to some of the
lines. Snaps, trying to be a gentleman and to eliminate both 
firearms and gangster parlance from his mob --sorry, from his
household staff--keeps rebuking them: "Don't call me Boss."
"Sorry Boss" is the knee-jerk reaction. Not once but again and
again and again.    
A 19th century thespian said on his deathbed: "Don't feel
sorry for me. Dying is easy, comedy is hard." Farce is even
harder. The secret is to play it cool, to underplay, to have
the text carry the actors and not vice versa. 
"Oscar" however makes wrong moves from the start, but
mercifully not to the finish. It goes from loud and raucous
notes to dead spots. The actors mug with huge gesticulations,
as if parodying  a bad silent movie. They shout in unison,
which is a deadly practice.
So what ought to have combined Damon Runyon and Georges
Feydeau falls flat. It's basically a simple case of overkill,
of exploding nuclear devices when one bullet would do. 
The jokes are of vaudeville (in the Anglo sense) caliber.
"Come here!" --" I can't, I'm smoking a salmon"--" So, put it
out."  Or " Of course I knew. I just had no idea." (Sam
Goldwyn said it better: "It's not only unfeasible, it cannot
be done.") 
Then, at some point, something good happens. I can't say
exactly where or how. Perhaps we've been desensitized by then,
but assuming the film was shot in sequence, the performers
seem to find the right level of timing and delivery. 
It helps that we also introduced to two amusing Italian
tailors, Ferrero and Shearer, and to the very funny and timid
Tim Curry who plays Snaps's  elocution teacher and ends up
marrying Lisa. Their appearances shift the mode from
raucousness to humor and even seem to bring a modicum of wit
to the other characters, the imbroglios and the confusion. The
film becomes genuinely comical . 
Except for those newcomers, acting honors go to the befuddled
Chazz Palminteri, Stallone's dumdum bodyguard and, would you
believe it, yes, to Sylvester himself. He maintains a nice,
gentlemanly cool throughout, is even endearing and looks as if
Rocky and Rambo would horrify him were they to show up at the
Provolone mansion.
Stallone is also the shortest man around. No effort was made
to put him in elevator shoes or have him stand on platforms
hidden from view. Could it be that someone decided that if it
was good enough for Edward G. Robinson as gangster boss from
"Little Caesar" to "Key Largo" to allow his underlings to
tower over him, it was good enough for Sly Stallone.
(Snaps Provolone, to better himself, learns a new word each
day. By an amusing coincidence, in the title role of "Bugsy,"
another 1991 movie, gangster Warren Beatty too practices
quotidian enrichment of his vocabulary). 
Long ago in Hollywood, pretty-boy crooner Dick Powell had a
solid second career as the tough hero of thrillers. Taking the
reverse route, Stallone could well become a pretty good
funnyman.

Title
Review for Siege, The (1998)
THE SIEGE (1998) *** Directed by Edward Zwick. Written by  Lawrence Wright,
Menno Meyjes, Zwick. Story, Wright. Produced by Lynda Obst, Edward Zwick.
Executive producer, Peter Schindler. Photography, Roger  Deakins. Editing
by Steven Rosenblum. Production design, Lilly Kilvert.  Music, music by
Graeme Revell. Cast:: Denzel Washington (Anthony Hubbard), Annette Bening
(Elise Kraft), Bruce Willis (General William Devereaux), Tony Shalhoub
(Frank Haddad), Sami Bouajila (Samir Nazhde), David Proval (Danny Sussman),
et al. A  20th Century Fox release. 110 minutes. R (violence)
Back in 1951, the longshoreman-philosopher Eric Hoffer published his first
book "The True Believer : Thoughts on the Nature of Mass Movements" -- a
short, great treatise which made "True Believer" a catch-phrase that's as
valid now as ever. It's also at the root of The Siege.
Fanatics such as Mao's Red Guards or Europe's Red Brigades have been
treated in films abroad but rarely in American political thrillers.
Hollywood's richest fodder was the villainy of the Soviets. With the  Evil
Empire now gone, replacements are needed. Militant Islamic fundamentalists
can partly fill this void. This is what The Siege does.
Technically, all its production values are impressive, from sets,
photography, music score, crowd scenes and skillful editing. The latter
takes effect right away, with a montage that alternates between violence
and visual poetry.
A sheik who masterminds terrorists is driven in a Mercedes through the
beautiful emptiness of desert sands. In a bloody ambush, he is abducted by
the mysterious attackers. Cut to almost lyrical high shots of a mosque in
New York City, where a muezzin (the Muslim man who calls the hours of
prayer) chants beautifully from a minaret, as the faithful pray, and as a
panoramic view of the Big Apple appears.
In  the city's One Federal Plaza, Anthony "Hub" Hubbard (Denzel Washington)
leads the FBI's New York anti-terrorist unit. Anonymous threats demand the
sheik's liberation. Words become acts, a string of bombings:  of a bus, a
Broadway theater, the Federal Building itself. An attack on a school is
thwarted. The body count is in the hundreds.
The FBI reacts with surveillance,chases and arrests. It's a duel of Good
vs. Bad, manicheistic but not in the simplistic way of westerns with their
immediately identified evildoers and heroes.
The side of Good focuses on Hub and his Lebanon-born buddy Frank Haddad,
well-played by Tony Shalhoub who was US-born in  a Lebanese family. The
other lead role goes to CIA operative Elise Kraft, (Annette Bening).
The FBI is a melting-pot of Oriental-Americans, African-Americans and
Everything-Else-Americans. Hub mobilizes them, barks his orders, puts the
agents go instantly into high gear. These use high-tech plus deductive
reasoning. You might think that the ethnic rainbow's political correctness
is too neat, its lighting efficiency too much, but we outsiders cannot tell
whether we are witnessing real life or movie life. What matters is that
there is convincing verisimilitude on the screen.
The lead trio are forceful,look good and credibly intelligent. There may be
some deja vu with the two men but there's none in Elise's  quite original
role. It underlines both the rivalry and the cooperation between FBI and
CIA. Ms. Bening's physical appearance is carefully calculated. Her makeup
does not hide her age; she is attractive but not glamorous, lively but not
artificially cute. Her persona is full of interesting ambiguities, of
role-playing and true feelings, of using charm and sexuality to infiltrate
the terrorists. She may also have the best pragmatic line in the film when
she admits that no politics and policies can be simon-pure, that there are
no clear-cut rights and wrongs, that one "has to choose the right that is
the least wrong."
The film's first part is a fine thriller. The second half expands in ways
that have caused controversy and indignation among Arab-Americans. As the
terrorist menace swells, the American President (Clinton, in genuine TV
appearances) is under pressure. He has to resort to martial law, with
General Devereaux (Willis) in charge.
An unpleasant, dour man who dislikes Hub and Elise, Devereaux has tunnel
vision, sees himself as the country's savior, and proves to be another type
of True Believer.  Set on rounding up as many Arab-American male New
Yorkers as possible-- including the US-born--he does with a cold gusto that
includes executing a suspect.
New York in a state of siege is like an occupied country. The procedures
remind you of the treatment of Japanese-Americans during WW II;  of the
stadiums full of arrestees in Pinochet's Chile (cf. the movie Missing); of
the Nazis' Kristallnacht in November1938 rampage against the Jews, and of
the later herdings that led to death camps.
The developments pit Frank, Hub and Elise against the unbearably arrogant
Devereaux. Crucial questions are raised, but they take on a melodramatic,
rather simplistic, rhetorical shape that hurts the movie. It would have
been better to debate the issues in depth and to give some dimensions to
the Arab-Americans. But then there would not have been all the slam-bang of
Part II -- and there's something in Hollywood that abhors physical
inaction. The joke here is that the long second half is filmically much
less exciting than the first.
The Siege's subject is inherently tricky and touchy. Even before iys
release, the film sparked protests by Arab-Americans, including the Arab
Anti-Defamation League. It is roughly the same situation as for Godard's
Hail Mary and Scorsese's The Last Temptation of Christ. Both movies were
boycotted even before they came out . (Later, in Paris, there was even  a
fire bombing  of the theater showing the Scorsese).
It is a given that in real life there are Good People and Bad People of any
creed, race and color--perhaps with the exception of Icelanders who seems
to be all good. Islamic terrorists however, what with the almost daily
headlines, have special visibility in the West. (Arabs in general even
stand out visually  because of the women's clothing). Even though the movie
goes to some lengths (some of them awkard) to stress that the the acts of a
few taint unfairly the many good people, you can't blame Arab-Americans for
worrying.
On the other hand, director Zwick is a liberal whose heart generally seems
to be in the right place. Witness his Glory and his Courage Under Fire
(both with Denzel Washington). In a sense, his making The Siege, flaws and
all, was something of an act of courage under fire.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
MEN IN BLACK ** 3/4 . Directed by  Barry Sonnenfeld. Produced by Walter F.
Parkes,
Laurie MacDonald.Screen Story and Screenplay by Ed Solomon.   Based on the
Malibu  comic by  Lowell Cunningham.Photography, Don Peterman. Editing, Jim
Miller. Production design, Bo Welch. Costumes,Mary E. Vogt. Visual Effects
Supervisor, Eric Brevig. Alien Make-Up Effects Rick Baker.
Co-Producer,Graham Place. Executive Producer, Steven Spielberg. Music,
Danny Elfman. Cast: Tommy Lee Jones (K),  Will Smith (J),  Linda Fiorentino
(Laurel), Vincent D'Onofrio (Edgar),  Rip Torn (Zed), Tony Shalhoub
(Jeebs), Siobhan Fallon (Beatrice), et al. An Amblin production released by
Columbia. 96 min. PG-13.
Will Smith's good looks and good timing, ironic mien and overall cool make
him a capital asset  of this yap and zap movie, along with Tommy Lee Jones
in what is probably his first out-and-out comic role, played
tongue-in-cheek, mostly deadpan, with a delivery of lines faster than any
character's in a Howard Hawks screwball entertainment.
MIB is a spoof of many things, primarily of sci-fi flicks and specifically
of nasty non-brothers from other planets. It also changes a "serious"
comic-book into comedy. Jones (whose name is K in a throwaway Kafka joke)
belongs to a  super-super-secret government outfit, so secret that other
agencies know of it. The Men in Black are after illegal aliens, nor your
garden variety undocumented Mexicans, Paraguyans, Antilleans, Nigerians or
former Sovietskis, but real E.T. aliens. In a spoof of census-taking, the
secret agents know that some 1,500 outer-spacers live in the USA.
Most are "good citizens" and are left alone. But the occasional bad 'uns,
destroyers in a mind-boggling variety of forms (such as nasty Spielbergian
gremlims, insect-like monsters, critters a la Alien, animals, ordinary
humans, and so on), have to be terminated with extreme prejudice.The
ingenious way K searches for them is by reading supermarket tabloids.
Clever and funny.
As his venerably-aged partner wishes to retire, K, looking for a
replacement, selects NYPD cop Smith, who becomes J. The two engage in a mad
series of comically vigorous feats.
The opening sequences are funny. The MIB secret immigration building is a
howl, especially as weird creatures are asked by Customs if they are
carrying forbidden fruit, vegretables and the like. Jones's patter (it
often reaches rhetorical heights) is very funny. Te neural neutralizer, a
gizmo that zaps selected periods of memory, is amusing. (To avoid its
effects the Men in Black wear dark, aptly named Ray-Ban glasses. That's the
best product placement in years).
Most funny too is when Will Jones is somehow led to a recruiting room of
the MIB yet has  no idea as to why he is there. Zed (the great Rip
Torn,good in any role, even the smallish one here)  administers a test to
the Best of the Best of the Best, all in uniform (they are the cream of the
military), bellowing cliches. Smith wears flamboyant street casuals.
An even funnie small gem is when, absurdly and unflappably, Smith takes the
written exam sitting in a  modernistic boothlike seat, with nothing to
place the questionnaire on, using a pencil that breaks and pierces sheets
of paper, yet coming out the victor.  that have no place on which to lie,
is a small gem. The scene was probably influenced by movies of the late
Francois Truffaut, in which schoolchildren have no end of problems with ink
and copybooks. (Elsewhere there are also middlin' funny throwaway
references to movies and  TV such as Sgt. Friday, Jeopardy, etc.)
Such passages, plus the two partners, are delightful. The other major
assets of the film are most imaginative photography and amazing special
effects that include morphing and transformations.
Now to the negatives. There is no true plot, unity or continuity. The movie
grows as, and into, a catch-all. There is a lack of logic and explanations,
even by crazy standards. Anything goes, anything is good for a gag or
verbal or visual joke, whether it's about  an E.T. squid baby to Dennis
Rodman, to goings on in the morgue, to a farmer's wife (no, not the usual
traveling salesman salacious jokes). Most work amusingly, but the
over-episodic structure, the arbitrariness of events, the unending yap and
zap, lessen the movie. Too much is too much and may, depending on the
viewer, start leading to tedium abetted by the unsolved problem of "how can
we end this picture?" Well, it just fizzles.
I grant you that it is not easy to parody sci-fi films, not just the funny
ones but those eager movies that, from a certain angle, are themselves
unconscious parodies. Even so, Men In Black is guilty of what is often a
central problem of the movies it spoofs: overkill.
As it runs 96 minutes, MIB might be given a cautious certificate of
membership in BBNMM,the famed organization Bring Back the Ninety Minute
Movies. With ten minutes cut and much tighter construction, MIB may even
have been a candidate for
a Certificate of Merit.

Title
Review for Accompagnatrice, L' (1992)
THE  ACCOMPANIST (L'ACCOMPAGNATRICE) (France, 1992)  *** 1/2  Directed by
Claude Miller. Written by Miller and luc Beraud, based on the novel by Nina
Berberova. Photography, Yves Angelo. Music, Alain Jomy. Editing, Albert
Jurgenson. Cast: Romane Bohringer, Elena Safonova, Richard Bohringer,
Samuel Labarthe, Julien Rassam, Nelly Borgeaud, Claude Rich, et al.  A Sony
Classics release. 110 minutes. In French with subtitles. Rated PG.
Nazi-occupied Paris. Glamorous soprano Irene Brice (Leningrad-born,
ex-Russian actress Elena Safonova) hires an accompanist. She is 20-year old
Sophie (Romane Bohringer) a talented pianist who, like many French people
in the winter of 1942-43,  is undernourished.
Unlike many in German-dominated France, Irene and her
businessman-profiteer husband Charles (Richard Bohringer, in real life
Romane's father) live in luxury. Irene laughingly admits that she is
isolated from "rigors and privations." The Brices  hobnob with the rich and
the infamous and, marginally, with the German authorities. Marginally
because Charles, though an opportunist,  unlike many other Frenchmen is no
true collaborationist  but a complex man who does a balancing act between
his conscience and his self-interest. He even taunts the Germans.
Irene, a charmer, is blithely unaware of anything except music, adulation,
joie de vivre and her lover Jacques. Yet she's no air head.  Solemn Sophie
is fairly complex. She moves in with the couple, shares some of their
privileges , quietly observes their private and public lives. Her new
condition does not  change her much.  What does affect her is her
ambivalence toward Irene :  a mixture of admiration and  silent
disapproval, and an understandable , professional frustration at staying in
Irene's musical shadow. Even though she is appreciated by Irene and the
public, the young pianist always remains an anonymous second fiddle to the
singer. It does not help either that, in a friendly way, Irene also treats
Sophie a bit like a favorite servant. And neither woman opens up to the
other.
As Charles becomes increasingly conscious of reaching  a kind of point of
no return -- moral as well as practical--  he decides to escape from France
with his wife. Taking Sophie along, they go South, cross the Pyrenees,
reach Lisbon and take a freighter to England.   There, the entrepreneurial
Charles successfully becomes his wife's impresario -- but there is a
problem: Jacques, the lover and a member of the French Underground is also
in London...
The film starts out as a series of portraits and adds  vivid components of
life, society and dealings under the Occupation. It eventually becomes
something of a saga and a melodrama, but both are played down.  There is a
delicate, constant balance among the three main characters. Stresses vary
without  becoming  systematic. Although Charles may have less screen time
than the women, his role keeps growing in importance and depth. It is
Charles who touches you most,  yet the film does not resort to
simplifications, moral judgments, villains or heroes.
I said "three characters." I really meant four, the fourth one  being the
music. There is  for me  something  most appealing  in the way  so many
French films  since 1960 incorporate  classical music, use it organically,
and often make it the key element. Think of "Diva, " "The Music Teacher,"
"Tous les Matins du Monde." It is a far cry from Hollywood's stubborn
resistance to "serious" music, and, in quality and variety, also a far cry
from the made-to-order compositions in "The Piano," an excellent film but
with a jarringly anachronistic score.
Strongly and intelligently woven into the story, the mostly vocal music of
"The Accompanist" ( Mozart, Schumann, Richard Strauss, Schubert, Berlioz,
etc.) is not limited to snippets. Beautifully dubbed by  young soprano
Laurence Monteyrol, it is superbly lip-face-and-body-synched by Ms.
Safonova.
The film reproduces its period with great accuracy, captures perfectly in
look and content facts, situations, politics and moods of Occupied France
and of Marshall Petain's Vichy Government. Vichy itself, the provincial
spa that became the  bizarre seat of the pro-German French State  (
France's Non-Occupied Zone), comes in for some deft descriptions.
Among the best touches is a cameo by Claude Rich as a realistic,
disenchanted Vichy Minister who lends a sympathetic ear to Charles'
determination to escape.
References to Petain, Laval, Brinon, Otto Abetz, Doriot, the Free French,
De Gaulle and the like add much to the ambiance if you know this particular
chapter in history.
There are many subtleties, such as color differences  between the French
sequences and those of wartime London, the latter, says director Miller,
shot "with deep reds and blacks, like old Rank films. "  And there is at
least one  conceit,  included, no doubt, for the delectation of movie
specialists: Charles,  near the end, tells his wife: "I hate the character
that you are making me play." This is almost word for word what another
Charles, actor Charles Boyer, said to his wife in Max Ophuls' 1953 gem "The
Earrings of Madame de..."
I tip my hat to a movie that does not try to simplify people, issues and
facts, and works in music so effectively. Even if viewers do not identify
every historical detail, the film is not at all hard to follow. My only
puzzlement  is why Jacques always sports a heavy five o'clock shadow,
Claude Miller is, among other things, a director of faces who  has been
influenced by Ingmar Bergman. Here he makes eloquent use of close-ups of
faces and eyes. The late Francois Truffaut, who also did much along those
lines,  and with whom Miller worked on seven films,would have been pleased.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for World Is Not Enough, The (1999)
THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH (UK-US,1999) * Directed by Michael Apted. 
Written by Neal Purvis, Robert Wade, Bruce Feirstein, based on a 
story by Purvis and Wade. Photography, Adrian Biddle. Editing, Jim 
Clark. Production design, Peter Lamont. Music David Arnold ("The 
WorldIs Not Enough" theme performed by Garbage and written by Arnold 
and Don Black) Produced by Michael G. Wilson and Barbara Broccoli. 
Cast: Pierce Brosnan (James Bond), Sophie Marceau (Elektra), Robert 
Carlyle (Renard),Denise Richards (Christmas Jones), Robbie Coltrane 
(Valentin Zukovsky), Desmond Llewelyn , John Cleese , Maria Grazia 
Cucinotta (Cigar Girl), Samantha Bond (Moneypenny), Michael Kitchen 
(Tanner), Colin Salmon (Robinson), Serena Scott Thomas (Dr. Molly 
Warmflash), Ulrich Thomsen (Davidov), John Seru (Gabor), 
Claude-Oliver Rudolph (Colonel Akakievich) , Dame Judi Dench (M)  An 
MGM release. 128 minutes.PG-13
James Bond flicks are among my un-guilty pleasures. They include not 
only the Sean Connery vehicles but also the oft-maligned Roger 
Moores, Timothy Daltons and the underrated George Lazenby in " On Her 
Majesty's Secret Service."  Pierce Brosnan I could take or leave. His 
are not Pierce-Arrows among Bonds. But the latest one, "The World is 
Not Enough," is a pain.
It also pains me to be negative about director Michael Apted's first 
(I think) action-action pic, when Apted has several  excellent or at 
least solid works: "Triple Echo," "Agatha," "Coal  Miner's Daughter," 
"Gorky Park," ," "Gorillas in the Mist," Class Action," "Incident at 
Oglala," "Thunderheart," "Nell."
Better yet, he is the maker of the documentary "Seven Up" (1964) 
which follows a number of kids in the UK. Its artistic/sociological 
success made Apted follow it up with the same subjects seven years 
later (in "Seven Plus Seven"), then in "21 Up," "28 Up," "35 Up." Now 
being released in the U.S.A is "42 Up." The first reports are most 
positive.
Should James Bond henceforth be called James Moribund?  The latest 
entry relies exclusively on derring-do, much of it borrowed from 
earlier Bonds. Enough is enough, especially when the plot, such as it 
is, consists of a collage of sequences which not only scream "deja 
vu," but are by and large uninteresting and characterless -- as are 
most of the characters in the story.
  "The World is Not Enough" (an awkward  title that signifies nothing) 
floats on a sea of excesses, without any of the novelty, humor and 
amusing sophistication of many earlier Bonds. It opens in a promising 
locale, Bilbao in Spain, yet the sequence's heroics feel pasted on. 
It gets worse in London, with a dumb chase and duel of hydrofoils on 
the Thames, capped by a balloon. It is all SFX (special effects) and 
nothing else. Then come the credits which -- as in an omen -- specify 
that the title song is performed by Garbage.
Bond goes to Baku in Azerbaijan, then to Kazakhstan, then to the 
Caspian Sea, then to Istanbul --and perhaps other places ending in 
"stan" for his exploits. His original assignment is to protect 
Elektra, the daughter of an assassinated oil tycoon, against a 
terrorist called Renard. That word means "fox" in French, but Renard 
is a dull, un-foxy villain. His distinction: he has a bullet in his 
head. It makes him immune to pain. But we, the audience, have no such 
immunity against boredom.
Mourning does become Elektra, since she has chic outfits in the most 
impossible locations. As played by Sophie Marceau, a very popular 
star in France but no true performer, Elektra bored me. Even when she 
turned out to be a nasty little number and not a true victim. There 
is sex, of course, with Bond. It is the sort of thing that in keeping 
with our new ethos (hypocritical or not) plays down sensuality, 
nudity, flesh-photography and groans. It is a dutiful acknowledgment 
of the old Bond-as-womanizer thing, here sanitized and clearly used 
as a filler.
A second woman is introduced, Doctor (sic) Christmas Jones, who is a 
scientist, joins forces with Bond, also bodies -- another filler. 
Denise Richards, another one of the USA's fifty million "celebrities" 
looks and sounds like a Valley Girl, even though she was born in 
Illinois.
When Bond meets her, he's supposed to be Russian and speaks Russian 
to her and others, but somehow it is English., then it becomes "real" 
English.  Don't ask. Says Dr. Christmas :"Your English is very good 
for a Russian" He: "I studied at Oxford." Should I comment?
  Bond wears designer suits no matter what the situation, place, feats 
and explosions are. He also has special see-through eyeglasses to 
peer at hidden weapons on men and undies on women. By the way, when 
it comes to pulchritude, there are quite a few beautiful women 
glimpsed here and there, but these do not include the lead roles.
There are torture scenes in the film, but the real torture is 
watching it. Not simply during its full 128 minutes, but from minute 
5 to the end. A teen sitting in front of me at the rather sparsely 
attended projection (it was a morning show) got up four times to get 
to the theater's concession. If this doesn't speak loudly what does? 
Indeed, there is no continuity, no suspense, nothing that an absentee 
viewer could miss. Nor is there any  "sophistication," which is 
outrageous but funny in the better Bonds. Psychology rates zero,
As for acting -- what acting?  As for humor, just a feeble and leaden 
attempt to sketch in John Cleese as the M.I. 6 new gadget-maker. As 
for novelties, the main one has Bond having a broken collar-bone, 
wincing at times but still able to do his thing. We've gone from the 
impossible to the supernatural, I guess.
The movie, which went through a slew of working titles, officially 
has three writers. Obviously though, it had everybody else and his 
sister pitching in with "ideas." It all results in no sense nonsense, 
it all has no oomph, rhythm or continuity, it all proves again the 
saying that "a camel is a horse made by a committee." The ratio 
between cost and "quality" must make this as bad an action flick as 
any.
It is painfully clear that the movie (like too many others) is aiming 
at a pre-teen, teen, and early post-teen market of kids who have no 
familiarity (at least on the big screen) with the rich Bond tradition.
Why do I still give it one star then? Because I have a soft spot for 
Apted (critics are human after all); because the gimmick of oil and 
pipelines has a real model these days; because Robbie Coltrane, as a 
big Russian Mafioso, saves whatever scenes he is in.

Title
Review for Trick (1999)
TRICK (1999) ***  Directed by Jim Fall.Written by Jason Schafer. 
Photography, Terry Stacey. Editing, Brian A. Kates. Production 
design, Jody Asnes. Music, David Friedman. Producers, Eric 
d'Arbeloff, Fall and Ross Katz.  Cast: Christian Campbell (Gabriel), 
Brad Beyer (Rich), Lacey Kohl (Genevieve), Tori Spelling (Katherine), 
John Paul Pitoc (Mark), Clinton Leupp (Miss Coco Peru), et al. A Fine 
Line Features release. 90 minutes.  R (language, sexuality, 
toplessness)
Trick is a gay gay film. No, this is not a typo, since both meanings 
of gay are intended, as Trick is a rather upbeat romantic comedy. 
Nowadays gay films are out of the closet and into the street. Gayness 
has stopped being camouflaged or apologetic or sad or militant or 
whatever. It is treated above-board and openly. Trick is a good case 
of a movie that's entirely matter-of-fact in its subject and 
treatment.
The aptly-name Gabriel is a pretty angelic-looking, low-key gay young 
man who aspires to song-writing in the old tradition of musicals. He 
is helped (or is he hindered?) by his best friend since high-school 
days. She us Katherine, a hyper-kinetic actress. To give a 
demonstration Gabe sits at the piano and Kate sings and tap-dances. 
It's quite funny.
Gabe is a relative loner, and on the shy side. He shares an apartment 
with Rich who is heterosexual with a vengeance, as he regularly 
preempts their lodgings so as to activate his libido with a string of 
women. This  forces Gabe to spend a lot of time out of the apartment.
On such an evening, Gabe decides to have a look at the rich gay scene 
of which he is not a part. At a strip bar, he and the 
athletic-looking go-go boy Mark get each other's attention. Then, by 
coincidence, they meet on the subway, where Mark energetically picks 
up Gabe. One thing leading to another, the active Mark and the rather 
passive Gabe spend a long night (The Long Night is the title of a 
film and the essence of several others) looking for a place to be 
alone together. But they get foiled time and again, in often comic 
ways. However, what started out as a search for sex ends up as the 
beginning of a love affair.
As the  mini-Odyssey proceeds among the night-life clubs and 
activities of gays, there are several asides, parentheses, 
interruptions and characters, several of those quite entertaining. 
The film does not occur in real time, since events go from one day to 
the next dawn, but it has a sort of classic unity of time, place and 
subject.
Some scenes go on for too long before the movie cuts to the chase, 
yet many other scenes are well-times. Among others, they show quite 
cannily the transformation of Ben from timidity and embarrassment to 
sexual openness, and of Mark from stud-ness to caring (and from what 
we thought of as just a body to someone with brains).
The subject is not really terribly interesting, nor would it be in a 
non-gay film. In fact, with variations, a some heterosexual movies 
have been about a man and a woman looking for a place to be together. 
I am also thinking in particular of some Czech, Polish or Hungarian 
films  where the guilty party was a Communist society with a terrible 
dearth of apartments--even rooms. The political subtext added much. 
especially in the indirect ways needed to make such works acceptable 
to official censors.
Yet what Trick lacks in originality is made up by its colorfulness 
and by its succession of solid comic inventions. E.g. a drag queen 
called Coco Peru with her flamboyance and advice to Gabe, in the 
toilets; or, in a bar, an older man's funny new song "Come to gusta 
mi pinga"; or, in Gabe's and Rich's place, a woman who is a 
caricature of Marilyn Monroe bears her breasts and "philosophizes."

Title
Review for Nurse Betty (2000)
NURSE BETTY (2000) *** Directed by Neil LaBute. Written by John C. 
Richards and James Flamberg, based on a story by Richards. 
Photography, Jean Yves Escoffier. Editing, Joel Plotch and Steven 
Weisberg. Production design, Charles Breen. Music, Rolfe Kent. 
Produced by Gail Mutrux and Steve Golin. Cast: Renée Zellweger 
(Betty), Morgan Freeman (Charlie), Chris Rock (Wesley), Greg Kinnear 
(Dr. David Ravell/George McCord), Aaron Eckhart (Del), Tia Texada 
(Rosa), Crispin Glover (Roy), Pruitt Taylor Vince (Ballard) Allison 
Janney (Lyla), et al. A USA Films release. 112 minutes. R (violence 
and language)
After a mostly dismal summer of films made mostly by pea brains for 
culture dropouts, "Nurse Betty" (NB from now on) may (or not) be 
marking a turning. It premiered in May at the Cannes Festival where 
it won the Best Screenplay award. I saw it then and I just saw it 
again. It's a good film that goes in several directions while keeping 
its focus on the charming, next-door pretty Renee Zellweger as Betty.
Sixty-one years after The Wizard of Oz,  Betty, like Dorothy, is a 
Kansan who leaves her state.  Although she is not transported to a 
magic land, like Dorothy, she does so in a way. She takes off in a 
Buick, drives to La-la Land in Southern California to make her dream 
come true.  In Fair Oaks, Kansas, Betty is a a sweet, apple-cheeked, 
apple-cheeked, liked-by-all waitress in a diner. She is married to 
scummy used-car dealer Del who does not appreciate her, cheats on 
her, acts like a creep and is into very shady non-car deals.
Betty in a TVholic who watches (and tapes) incessantly the soaper "A 
Reason to Love." In it actor George McCord plays the super-duper 
surgeon and heartthrob Dr.David Ravell. Betty is so much in love with 
the Doctor character that he has become real to her. She's rushes 
home to catch the next episode. A closed door separates her from the 
living room in which Del brings two men, older Charlie and the 
latter's young sidekick Wesley. They have an underworld deal with Del 
who has done something unkosher. He gets killed, but in an unexpected 
(and yes, funny) way that involves his badmouthing native Americans, 
the guests' shocked reaction at Del's racism, a scalping and a gun.
Putting it briefly, Betty plunges deeper and deeper into the fiction 
of the soap opera, reinvents herself as a nurse who some years ago 
had an affair with Dr. David, and travels to L.A. to meet the good 
Doctor. She keeps quoting to herself a kind of mantra, David's  words 
in the soap: " I know there's someone special out there for me." 
Betty is convinced that she is that someone
The film rapidly becomes a road movie (and quite an original one) in 
which encounters flirt with the picaresque. Charlie and Welsley are 
after her. In the process, the older man idealizes her while Wesley 
thinks his companion is crazy.  Eventually, and through the wildest 
(and funniest) of developments, Betty is taken for a nurse, meets 
actor George McCord, persists in calling him David and in acting as 
though she were really David's old flame and a real nurse. George 
gets convinced that it is all a game on her part in order to be hired 
in the soaper.
The whole thing is delightful, humorous, funny and comical, yet also 
sad, and quite (but clearly) complicated in its para-Pirandellesque 
way. There's no way to assign the movie to a genre, and in this it 
will recall  many of the non-genre or mixed-genre films of the French 
New Wave, which also echo here through several references to movies.
It is a fantasy which is impossible, even incoherent, but lack of 
logic is no defect in this case. It is a black comedy. It is a hybrid 
--in a positive way, as in hybrid roses. It is literally a crazy 
quilt whose components are handled with legerdemain, like a shell 
game. It works-- except  for the tacked on happy ending--a minor 
weakness.
In this screwball (but non-slapsticky) picture whose heroine has a 
screw loose there is no message. To say that it is a comic critique 
of television's sway on people would be an oversimplification.  The 
closest I can come to finding kissin' cousins in today's American 
cinema is the Coen Brothers, with touches of Tarantino.
The acting by all is bull's eye class, except for the annoying, 
two-expressions playing by Chris Rock and his repeated ad nauseam 
f-word and s-word. His only virtue is that he underlines, by 
contrast, the excellent, even subtle performance by Morgan Freeman 
whose character gets increasingly complex.

Title
Review for Before Sunrise (1995)
BEFORE SUNRISE(1995) ***1/4 . Directed by Richard Linklater. Produced by
Anne Walker-McBay. Written by Linklater & Kim Krizan. Photography, Lee
Daniel. Editing, Sandra Adair. Cast: Ethan Hawke, Julie Delpy. An
American-Austrian production released by Castle Rock. 101 min. Rated R
(unjustified).
The siren song of Europe is getting to many of our younger Independent
filmmakers. The current American New Wave, even more than its predecessors,
to a great extent owes a debt to the talky styles of the old French New
Wave, especially Jean-Luc Godard and Eric Rohmer. Now some American
writer-directors are also transporting the action of their films to Europe,
physically and in spirit.  Like much of Jim Jarmusch=B9s =B3Night on Earth.=
=B2
Like Whit Stillman=B9s =B3Barcelona =B2 and Richard Linklater=B9s =B3Before =
Sunrise.=B2
The earlier works of those writer-directors , including  Linklater=B9s first
two major features (=B3Slacker=B2 and =B3Dazed and Confused=B9), were
quintessentially American.  But in =B3Before Sunrise=B2 he has the Old World
and the New World meet on the Budapest-to-Paris train, in the shape of two
23-year olds, Vienna-bound American Jesse (Ethan Hawke) and Paris-bound
=46rench Celine (Julie Delpy)
There=B9s almost instant electricity, so that when the train pulls into
Vienna, and Jesse, broke and flying back to the States the next day,
proposes to Celine that she interrupt her trip and spend with him the next
14 hours going around in the Austrian city, she accepts.
In a bold and uncommercial move for an American director, instead of action
or heavy breathing, Linklater has his entire film follow the pair as they
wander about town and talk,talk, talk...
In the train, Jesse had told Celine his pie-in-the-sky idea for a =B3A Day i=
n
the Life Of...=B2 TV   program, where 100 cameras throughout the world would
each follow a person around the clock. Now, in Vienna, Jesse becomes
director Linklater=B9s stalked subject.
The twosome=B9s conversations are careful facsimiles of genuine youth talk,
one that eager, mutually attracted new acquaintances  would engage in any
time, any place. There=B9s soul-bearing, small revelations, tidbits and the
many banalities that go with  mutual discovery. In a park,  for instance,
Celine exclaims  =B3Hey, there=B9s a rabbit!=B2  Jess; =B3Hi, Mr. Rabbit!=B2=
 Celine:
=B3He=B9s so cute!.=B2
They jabber away, with the man sometimes chatting up the woman, as they
meander by streetcar or on foot. They see sights, visit a record store, an
amusement park, a grungy bar with awful music, a string of cafes. They get
their palms read and watch street nightlife that includes a terrible
belly-dancer. They meet briefly some people (amateur actors,  a post-hippie
poet panhandler) but without the systematic encounters of =B3Slacker.=B2 No
matter what they do, Jess and Celine=B9s adventure is one long tete-a-tete.
And they keep talking...   Hawke and Delpy speak lines carefully but not
blatantly scripted. These ring true and originate in part from
improvisations during rehearsals.  The Godard-Rohmer influence is
crystal-clear. As in Godard,  in a mixture of trivialities and serious
items, Jesse and Celine jump from subject to subject, keep up a barrage of
questions, comments, anecdotes, micro-lectures, irrelevant information.
Celine contributes some skeptical Gallic views, like feminists being mostly
invented by men, in order to tell women =B3You are now free. Let=B9s hop in
bed.=B2
We still get only fragments of who Jesse and Celine are. One thing is
certain, that he is no M.A. in English as, on-screen and in interviews
Hawke keeps repeating =B3... for her and I.=B2
All this is punctuated by clever little non-verbal touches, some quite
well-digested Godard characteristics, like a pinball machine, ambient
noises, the pair =B3photographing=B2 each other without a camera or admittin=
g
their mutual attraction in a lovely scene of imaginary phone calls.
As in Rohmer they explore thoughts and feelings, though without approaching
the complexity of Rohmer=B9s strategies, the intelligence, didacticism and
ambitiousness of Godard=B9s dialogues and monologues, or, Louis Malle=B9s
analytical gabfest in =B3My Dinner with Andre.=B2 The Linklater-Krizan scrip=
t
was not written for profundities or rhetoric but for realism and romance.
At times this difference can make the appealing =B3Before Sunrise=B2 slightl=
y
tedious for viewers who have experienced saying and hearing it all before.
Yet the originality, authenticity and fidelity to real life add up to a
freshness uncommon in American cinema.
The hours pass. The original 110-Volt electricity between Celine and Jesse
increases to 220 Volts, the European standard. Stronger current brings
bigger problems. Brief encounters between people from distant lands can be
heartbreaking. Linklater keeps his characters seemingly gay and insouciant,
yet as they get closer to each other you begin to ache for some way to make
this nice twosome a real, lasting couple.
The scenario=B9s solution is straight out of =B3Love Affair,=B2 =B3An Affair=
 to
Remember=B2 or  Rohmer=B9s =B3A Tale of Winter,=B2 films that the two young =
people
must have missed, since, like the lovers in those movies, they make no
contigency plans.
In =B3Before Sunrise=B2 there=B9s charm, humor, un-treacly warmth and an
effective use of classical music. The movie does not fall into the old trap
of the naive American vs. the sophisticated European, and it also takes an
intelligent, un-cliched and un-touristy advantage of the city of Vienna.
Hawke has somewhat ridiculous facial hair but a pleasant personality that=B9=
s
at the juncture of callowness and maturity. Attractive and intelligent
Delpy speaks flawless English, very cannily observed. Like many foreigners
who, consciously or not, want to show off their command of a foreign
language, she uses four-letter words instead of =B3stuff,=B2  =B3thing,=B2=
 or =B3make
love.=B2  This, I am sure, is what made the unreliable and illogically
prudish judges come up with a rating of =B3R=B2 rather than =B3PG-13.=B2
PS. April 1997. The French New Wave is also present as an homage to
filmmaker Jacques Rivette's "Celine and Julie Go Boating." It is not by
accident that the couple here are named Celine and Jesse ... and go
sightseeing.
Original review , copyright Edwin Jahiel 1995, 1997

Title
Review for Head Over Heels (2001)

HEAD OVER HEELS (2001) Zero *. Directed by Mark S. Waters. Written by 
a half-dozen males. Executive produced by four or five. Photography, 
Mark Plummer. Editing, Cara Silverman, Production design, Pery 
Andelin Blake. Music, Steve Pararo, Cast:  Monica Pierce (Amanda), 
Freddie Prinze (Jim), Sarah O'Hare, Shalom Harlow, Tomiko Frazer , 
Ivana Milicevic (the four models),  et al. About 100 minutes. PG-13.
April may be the cruelest month, but from January on the cruelty of 
bad movies dominates the screen. Summertime is overwhelmingly for 
schoolchildren of all ages, from 10 to 50 -- with inane action, 
pallid romances, and flat comedies. The "good" season,  from fall 
through December, shows the best of a bad lot plus the better stuff 
of potential Oscar candidates. Year-round small salvations may come 
from some foreign movies as well  as from American rookie (or 
not-too-commercial) filmmakers.
The non-story of Head Over Heels comes from about six writers whose 
right hands did not know what the left ones were doing.  If those 
fellows ever got together it must have been by e-mail only.
In this flick, Amanda is a talented paintings restorer in New York's 
Metropolitan Museum. She's devoted to her work, but her boyfriends 
are not devoted to her. Catching the latest one in bed with a new 
girl, she moves to the upscale apartment shared with four 
super-(almost) models. The rent is a dirt-cheap $500, but then her 
room turns out to be a closet. However, there's the adjoining huge, 
luxurious space with shelves and amenities for clothes, shoes, hats, 
perfumes and other tools of the trade.
So far so good. But past the opening sequences the film plunges as if 
attempting suicide. In that building Amanda meets tenant Jim as he 
takes for a walk a huge Great Dane. (It belongs to someone 
immobilized in bed.) An elevator door opens, out come Jim and Hamlet 
(the hound) who breaks away and throws himself amorously on the girl, 
if you get my drift. The gag, linguistically and physically, is very 
broad. Perhaps one of the writers was thinking that Great Danes go 
for great dames.
Jim is in the fashion trade but nothing is specified about this  --or 
anything else-- in this vaguer and vaguer picture. His apartment 
faces the five women's, its windows are never curtained or draped. A 
veritable fishbow for the ladies' eyes.  Amanda, egged on by her four 
matchmaking housemates, quickly falls for Jim. He  who responds, but 
so awkwardly, lamely, unclearly that the movie keeps losing its 
interest exponentially.
All that is supposed to be funny and humorous. It is not. It's not 
even cute. The writers sleepwalk through the non-plot. Unable to 
invent anything, they opt for a bad clone of Hitchcock's "Rear 
Window." As the he five Peeping Tomasinas (Amanda & Co.) spy on Jim, 
they see something vague which makes them think that Jim has murdered 
a woman. The girls now sleuth  in a series of stupid,  disconnected 
scenes and events. I'll stop here.
Of course you've guessed already that the girls are wrong, that 
Amanda and Jim are fated to kiss -- and tell. In his telling there's 
a major twist which is  unbelievable and terribly handled.
What holds a smidgen of interest in the caricature (or is it a 
faithful rendition?) of the four models. They are airheads, 
uncultured, even idiotic. Their life revolves around fashion, sex 
with the improper stranger, ornaments, plastic surgery, money.and 
such. It's La Dolce Vita, Gotham-style. Their language is salty but 
not colorful, their vocabulary, basic. The gags and jokes are 
repetitiously recycled. They range from inane to tired, from 
feeble-inded  to scatological.
When the girls are all hiding together in a lavatory 's cubicle 
(don't ask) to the tune of disgusting body noises the toilet erupts 
like a volcano and covers the ladies from head to toe with an 
accumulation of thick, stinking, brown... let's call it lava.
You get the clear feeling that, at five-minute intervals the 
flickmakers are wondering  "where do we go next?"
Amanda (Monica Pierce) is a pallid presence, though occasionally a 
pleasant one. The housemates are characterless yet irritating. In 
real life,  sane persons of any sexual preference would put them in 
an address-book under the rubric "Avoid at any cost."
Jim (Freddie Prinze) is so bland that it ought to be forbidden by law.
Movie reviews by Edwin Jahiel are at : http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel 

Title
Review for Excess Baggage (1997)
EXCESS BAGGAGE  *  Directed by Marco Brambilla. Written by Max D. Adams,
Dick Clement & Ian La Frenais.Story by Adams. Produced by Bill
Borden.Photography, Jean Yves Escoffier.Editing, Stephen Rivkin. Production
design,Missy Stewart and Carolyn Kessler. Music, John Lurie. Cast: Alicia
Silverstone (Emily), Benicio Del Toro (Vincent), Christopher Walken
(Emily's uncle Ray), Jack Thompson (Emily's father), Harry Connick, Jr.
(Greg), Nicholas Turturro (Stick), Michael Bowen (Gus), Sally Kirkland
(Louise), et al.  A Columbia release. 105 minutes. PG-13.
Back from a trip I looked for a movie worth reviewing. The end-of-summer
openings looked dismal by and large, with the main exception of "Excess
Baggage." That's the occasional translation of "El Bulto," a Mexican
production dating from 1991. It had received much praise abroad; its recent
US release had very positive reviews.
What, however, was on the screen was another "Excess Baggage," a Hollywood
flick starring Alicia Silverstone and produced by her own company, First
Kiss. Even discounting my great expectations for the Mexican movie, the
Silverstone vehicle was a bummer.
20-year-old Alicia plays 18-year-old Emily  She is the (presumably) only
child of a widower, a shady tycoon (or is this tautological?) played by
Australian Jack Thompson who came to prominence with "Breaker Morant" but
has had few really important roles since. This one is no exception.
The movie opens with a bang. Emily, pretending she's been abducted, phones
Dad and asks for a ransom of one million dollars. (She uses some device
that changes her voice to a man's. How she got it is beyond me, but then I
walked in one minute late, as credits and action were rolling. Still...)
The magnate agrees. Emily ties up, gags and handcuffs herself, gets inside
the trunk of her BMW. Professional car thief Vincent (Del Toro) steals the
automobile, unaware of the "excess baggage." There's the obligatory chase.
The car is hidden in a warehouse full of stolen vehicles. The film begins
to slow down. Slowness grows into a drag. The drag is handicapped by the
performers, the script, the awful editing, the bad continuity, several
confusing sections, unclarity as to people and relationships.
Del Toro plays Vincent in a mumbly-jumbly, hoarsy-monotonous, often
inaudible voice. He looks sullen and vague, not so much by character but
rather like someone who has overdosed on tranquilizers. His very first
smile comes at minute 71. The voice and the acting are vaguely Actors'
Studio derivatives and not vaguely throwbacks to James Dean and Marlon
Brando.
Vincent looks grungy. He has a partner, Greg (Harry Connick) who looks like
a classy car-dealer, which indeed he is. Greg produces some of the rare
mirthful touches when, much later, told of a catastrophe, he keeps reacting
with "Gosh!"
Vincent discovers Emily. He becomes her unwilling abductor (don't ask). The
two get into a road-movie situation. They have the kind of
would-be-funny-and-antagonistic relationship which has all the bells,
whistles and flashing lights that spell "future romance."
Emily is a spoiled brat who smokes like a steam locomotive, guzzles liquor,
flaunts her sexuality (more imagined than real) and is an overall pain. I
have not followed religiously Miss Silverstone's career, yet it seems to me
that she has gained weight. Her baby fat is visible. She's on the chubby
side, like chorus girls of the 1940s. Her acting is also about the level of
that of chorus girls of the 1940s. Or the 1950s. Or college students of
many decades who are performing in an amateur play.
The plot can't make up its mind. It hesitates  and seesaws between comedy
(even slapstick), action and pathos. The comedy is of the cutesy-couple
persuasion. The action is muddled. It includes dealings among four
partners-in-crime: Vince, Greg and two others that make up the ring of
thieves. (But with the garagefuls of stolen, pricey cars, many more
acolytes would have been needed).
The action is enhanced by Emily's dad's enlisting the help of his brother
(or brother-in-law? unclear), ex-CIAer Ray. He is played by Christopher
Walken, who, at his best, with his piercing eyes and his peculiar,
hairless, sometimes androgynous face can exude menace like nobody's
business --and can do it in a minimalist way.
Among his best recentish roles is that in the excellent "True Romance"
directed by Tony Scott.  I'm thinking of this movie as it has a distant
"air de famille" with "Baggage," which, following "Demolition Man," is his
second feature. Brambilla had been "discovered" earlier by, and worked
with, Tony Scott's older brother, filmmaker Ridley Scott ("Alien," "Blade
Runner," the road-movie "Thelma and Louise").
36-year-old Brambilla has worked primarily in TV commercials whose tiny
time-span techniques are reflected in the choppiness of this feature-length
movie. Sprinters are not Marathon-runners.
The pickings are slim. If you do see this product please note the waitress
who has her CDs for sale and who unwittingly helps Walken to locate Del
Toro. She's good, but I cannot identify her with certainty from the slim
pressbook and other research.
Now to the pathos, such as it is. This unfocused film makes you wonder what
brat Emily's scheme is all about. Near the end she tells Vincent  that she
did it "to make my father feel." "Feel what?" "Anything." So here's the Big
Secret. Daddy lavishes bucks and BMWs on his girl, but does not show
affection--or is it attention? Now we also understand why Emily had
previously tried to set fire to her prep school. Deep stuff.
The audience I saw "Baggage" with was passive, very seldom giggled or
laughed. Instead, there were frequent return trips to the concession stand.
The film, set in the State of Washington, was shot in neighboring and less
expensive British Columbia. Grungy sets and rainsoaked landscapes added
another depressing touch to this listless production.

Title
Review for Mirror Has Two Faces, The (1996)
THE MIRROR HAS TWO FACES  *** Directed by Barbra Streisand.Written by
Richard LaGravenese. Based on the 1958 French film "Le Miroir a deux
faces," written by Andre Cayatte & Gerard Oury, directed by Cayatte.
Photography,Dante Spinotti & Andrzej Bartkowiak. Editing,Jeff Werner.
Production design, Tom John. Music, Marvin Hamlisch ("Love Theme"
composed by Barbra Streisand. Produced by Barbra Streisand  & Arnon
Milchan. Cast: Barbra Streisand (Rose Morgan), Jeff Bridges (Gregory
Larkin), Mimi Rogers (Claire), Lauren Bacall (Hannah Morgan), Pierce
Brosnan (Alex), Elle MacPherson (Candy). A Tristar release. 126 minutes.
PG-13.
The remake of French movies is a major Hollywood sub-industry. The
results are  invariably inferior to the originals.Some remakes are OK
now and then, but the great majority are bad. The latest case was
"Diabolique" The surprising news is that the new opus by and with Barbra
Streisand is better than the 1958 French movie.
Surprise Number Two for me is that for once I enjoyed watching a movie
with a large audience. I normally go to earliest possible shows on the
least trafficky days. No odious smells, no sticky goo on the floor, no
crinkling cellophane and loud chomping, no running commentaries, no
laughter at the wrong places. For "The Mirror," however, the theater
though packed was odorless, noiseless and the audience laughed
unboisterously at the right times.
The film is most enjoyable, well paced and without dull  moments. Its
improbabilities or exaggerations vanish behind the qualities of script,
acting and Miss Streisand's direction, her third after "Yentl" and "The
Prince of Tides."
It starts as Jeff Bridges's picture, then is shared by him  and
Streisand before the focus  moves on her --an interesting progression. A
mathematician at Columbia University, Greg is addressed as Professor
Larkin. He should really be called Professor Dullski or, if he taught
literature, Professor Yawnesco. He knows and loves his stuff, even has a
new book out, but he bores his students to perdition. I have never seen
such a somnolescent or indifferent group outside some Hollywood high
school pictures. 
Bachelor Gregory is also a basket case in his private life. At 46 (I
give him the age of Bridges), he still gets terribly distracted by sex
-- and sex is everywhere, from a gorgeous redhead in his classroom's
front row to television where insects mate in educational programs and
so many products are sold through sex. (I waited in vain for the sound
track to come up with that vigorous old song "Everybody's Doing It.") 
Larkin is influencable with a vengeance. At a book-signing gathering, he
opens his address  with some flat academic humor. A beauty  (model Elle
MacPherson) walks in, sits down, silently but blatantly provokes him a
la Sharon Stone with her sex appeal. Gregory's talk becomes gibberish.
Very funny.
We learn that she is his latest ex-paramour and that he is unhappy with
the fact that all his relations with women fail because they revolve
around sex. His conclusion is that he ought to be looking for a kindred
soul and mind, minus the sex. 
Like the famous revue  "No Sex Please, We're British," the
mathematician's new slogan  could be "No Sex Please, I'm  Gregory." He
places an ad  ad in which he seeks only companionship and specifies
"Must have a Ph.D. and be over thirty-five. Physical appearance not
important."
The other thread of the plot deaks with two sisters, Claire (Rogers,"the
pretty one") and Rose (Streisand,"the smart one") .Claire spots the ad
and sneakily mails Greg the picture of Rose. She looks just right to
Greg.
Rose, by coincidence (well, it's only a movie) is also a Columbia
professor, of literature. As she readies herself in an awful dress for
Claire's wedding. Always a bridesmaid and never a bride, brainy,
lively,witty but without lasting relationships with men, she is a
perfect match for Gregory.
They and their minds meet, hit it off, develop an odd, platonic rapport
. They eventually marry, but always under the no sex strictures imposed
by Gregory and accepted by Rose, reluctantly as we shall see soon
enough, when Rose wants romance and what comes naturally. This leads to
complications and a transformation... 
The acting, broad but not too, with a huge assist from direction and
script keeps hitting the bull's eye. Jeff Bridges, never a looker, has
been a major, versatile talent. Think of "Bad Company,"" Fat
City,""Thunderbolt and Lightfoot,"" Hearts of The West,"" Starman," "
Nadine,"" Tucker,"
"The Fabulous Baker Boys,""Fearless." Streisand's great one-woman band
abilities are a given. Here, in odd ways, she may remind you  at times
of the still-moving "The Way We Were."
Mimi Rogers, who possesses the most interesting crooked mouth in
pictures, and her new husband Pierce Brosnan (of whom she gets quickly
tired), are pallid, superficial characters.This makes a contrast with
the personalities of the Gregory-Rose duo, lets Bridges and especially
Streisand bask in the spotlight. They deserve it.   
Lauren Bacall plays the mother of the two women with a combination of
chic, fading glamour, sure-of-herself presence and egotism, and motherly
limitations, notably her non-understanding of Rose. This incomprehensio
comes to an end in a long-delayed, moving scene that flirts dangerously
with maudliness but survives it.  Mother and daughter stop snipping and
sniping. They open their hearts as Rose comes out squarely with  her
complexes about her appearance. Here Streisand seems to be exorcising
her own demons.
With her refrain  "I raised two daughters, buried a husband,"  Bacall is
a Jewish mother, but one pushed neither into a cartoon or a caricature.
Overall, Jewishness in the film is not insisted upon. Sometimes it comes
through gently in details, like Rose's "Talk to me already."
Gags are in good supply and nicely timed, like Rose's showing Greg how
to capture his students' interest. There also humorous rather than
outright comic parts, such as Rose's astounding of Greg with her
comprehension of math. Better yet, the audience is rewarded with an even
larger number of subtle bits of business. Examples: the early sequence
about Claire's wedding is used for character portrayals and spares us
the actual ceremony; the talkative meanderings of Rose and Gregory in
which the discussions are amusing, novel and attention-grabbing but
always cut before they become cumbersome; the first semi-kiss of the
couple and Rose's wary reaction -- she pats Greg's back. There is much
more along those lines, with excellent details.  
Some weak areas do exist in the film, most of them papered over. When
Gregory drops in on Rose's huge, lively class, she is in the process of
charming and too manipulating her students with a discussion of love and
sex which rings phony. She gets far too personal in her "confessions,"
uses  medieval courtly love (adoration of the lady but no sex) in
sketchy ways, knows the name of every student in that crowded
amphitheater (!!!). The well over 50 prof fishes for the sympathy of
students in their 20s with hip language. About complete love she
exclaims: "When it does last, it feels fucking great!" The young
scholars applaud.
She also tells them that when you fall in love you hear Puccini. At
film's end Rose and Gregory, previously separated, are reunited in a
sequence out of old screwball comedies. We hear Puccini 's "Nessun'
dorma" but then, with the filmmakers clearly worried about this
cultural-musical reference becoming lost on most audiences, the finale
and end credits switch over to the couple's endless gyrations in the
street and the old cliche of a pop song pops up. Otherwise, the movie is
truly fresh.  Whether or not it is read closely as a throwback to
romantic comedies, as a part-feminist tract or whatever, it holds many
pleasures for any mature audience.

Title
Review for Six Days Seven Nights (1998)
SIX DAYS, SEVEN NIGHTS (1998) ** 1/2  Directed by Ivan Reitman. Written by
Michael Browning. Photography, Michael Chapman. Editing, Sheldon Kahn,
Wendy Greene Bricmont. Production design, J.Michael Riva. Music, Randy
Edelman. Cast: Harrison Ford (Quinn Harris), Anne Heche (Robin Monroe),
David Schwimmer (Frank Martin), Jacqueline Obradors (Angelica), Allison
Janey (Marjorie), Temuera Morrison (Jager), et al. A Touchstone release.
101 minutes. PG-13
Who the director Ivan Reitman is, I know. When the four-year old was
brought to Canada  from his native Czechoslovakia, his genes must have
carried a Czech love of laughter that later, as producer-director, Reitman
transferred to his comedies and farces. The best-known are "Meatballs,"
"Stripes," "Ghostbusters," "Twins," "Kindergarten Cop," "Dave." Whatever
their artistic merit,  most  of them were box-office-busters.
Who the writer Michael Browning is, I cannot find out. Deciphering the
frustratingly less-than-meager information about him in the pressbook for
"Six Days, Seven Nights" seems to say that he has sold some scripts but
that this may be his first produced effort. Watching  "6D7N" however, does
make one thing clear: Browning has seen a lot of Hollywood pics and built
(some might say cobbled) his scenario from more films than you can shake a
schtick at.
Savvy moviegoers could play a parlor game about sources: From Here to
Eternity, Heaven Knows Mr.Allison, Swept Away, Swiss Family Robinson, The
Admirable Crichton, Father Goose, the Flight of the Phoenix, perhaps Sands
of the Kalahari, Butch Cassidy, the Indiana Jones movies, many more. Plus
the hundreds of romantic comedies where tue love begins as antagonism. Plus
those in which X is engaged to Y but it is Z who finally gets X.
Does all this matter? I can't tell. The film plays it safe by being
mainstream stuff for mainstream audiences. It is a no-brainer that  makes
its public laugh a lot. Exacting viewers may dismiss it, yet won't be
bored. The scenery is beautiful, the casting good, the performers
appealing, the dialogue amusing.
New Yorker Robin (Anne Heche pronounced "Haych") is a hotshot assistant
editor at "Dazzle," one of those glossy femme-mags that print articles such
as "20 ways to reduce your derriere, snag a man, make up for travel in
Tierra del Fuego, put down your boss," while inventing statistics about sex
or marriage.
Though frantically busy, Robin accepts the offer of Frank (David Schwimmer)
her boyfriend for three years, to fly to an island paradise in French
Polynesia for the kind of stay that travel brochures (and the movie's
title) advertise. From Tahiti to their final destination, conditions make
the couple go in a small cargo plane, a vintage DeHavilland Beaver,
four-seater puddle-jumper that's like a rickshaw with a propeller. Its
owner/pilot is Quinn Harris (Harrison Ford), who has good looks, a sense of
humor, and, as it turns out, had quit a profitable business for a simple,
idyllic life. Shades of Gauguin and other, real or fictional European
immigrants to the South Pacific.
Coming along is sexy Angelica (Jacqueline Obradors), Quinn's part-time
girl-friend, part-time hoochie-koochie dancer, part-time whatever (not
clear). In the  pricey hotel  on the secluded island, Quinn gets sloshed to
the point of  trying to pick up Robin whom he doesn't remember. He gets
some action with Angelica. Frank comes up with an engagement ring. But into
each life, a little rain must fall. Frantically calling from New York, her
editor wants Robin fly to Tahiti on a pop in and out  assignment.
Robin bribes Quinn, who's not above upping the ante. They get caught in a
storm, crash-land on an unidentifiable, deserted, gorgeous island played by
the Hawaiian island of Kauai where dozens of exotic movies have been shot.
All along there is some nice banter with some good reactions and repartee
Radio communications are kaput. Aha! Ignoring the fact that this is not New
York, smartypants Robin comes up with her cellular phone. Zero results. (I
wish Harrison Ford had said "Toto, I think we're not in Kansas any more.")
You guess the rest,but not its style, which is rather laid back for a
romantic adventure comedy. The cliché antagonism is played way down. So are
the mutual attraction and the dialogue. Heche and Ford are very good with
comedy and in implying more than is actually spoken out. Both get good
mileage from  facial  and body English, with well-directed timing. Heche,
though no great beauty, is pretty, more cute than cutesy, quietly sexy. (A
poster I've seen doubles her actual cleavage!). The sex element is
discreet, limited to such shots as Ford removing a (symbolic?) snake from
the lady's panties; a brief embrace and roll in the surf (cf.From Here to
Eternity); and such..
The couple-in-progress keep their sense of humor throughout their rough
(including major, Indiana Jones, falls and tumbles), near-fruitless
exploration of the spectacular island. Tempers hardly flare. Heche has a
knack for showing her reactions by using just her eyes -- which is easier
said than done.The budding May-November romance pointedly  jokes about
Harrison Ford's age but dismisses it as a factor.
Meanwhile, back at the ranch (the hotel), Frank ogles Angelica as she
dances in a tourist-trap number. Later, as the search for the new Robinsons
fails, Frank and Angelica, now united in worry, get soused and in bed. The
morning after he feels guilty. She consoles him with "It's like after a
funeral, everybody has sex!" His response, an expression of doubt, and
hers, a quizzical "Don't they?" look, get high marks.
David Schimmer's supporting role is well conceived. The loser-to-be is an
Everyman rather than a boob, like, say, Ralph Bellamy's wealthy Oklahoman
yokel in "His Girl Friday." Neither likable nor offensive, Frank is a
cruise-ship sort of romantic, and is sexually aroused in John Doe fashion.
Miss Obradors, who some years back  was plucked from a supermarket checkout
and into TV and a few rather obscure films, does nicely too, except that
she looks and sounds rather like a Latina, not a French citizen of
Polynesia.
Back to the island again. It is preordained that bummish-at-the ages bon
vivant Harrison Ford is also ingenious, will devise ways to survive and
avoid a major danger. The latter reminds me of the old advice given by a
film composer: " When in doubt, go to the Hallelujah chorus from Handel's
'Messiah'". When in doubt with trapped-on-island stories, bring on the
pirates.
Ms.Heche is not, as I've heard it said, a new Carole Lombard. Her style is
distinctly her own. She proves that, cause celebre or not (her lesbianism),
she can make a wickedly good comedienne. Ford who will very soon be 56,
remains as attractive a leading man as ever (the shots of his balding pate
are an uneven -- now you see it now you don't) and one of the very few
performers today who can do no wrong. An experienced pilot, though probably
not "an aviation ace" as the pressbook hypes it, he actually pilots the
plane in scenes shot from a helicopter.
This may be a Kleenex movie, disposable and forgettable, but paper tissues
too have their place in life. The film is a camouflaged, tongue-in-cheek,
mild parody of many oldies. Its deja vu aspects do not bother me. What does
sadden me as an officer in the Language Police is that Ford pronounces
"nucular" for "nuclear," and that the printed information has the star of
"Patriot Games" saying that (sic) "Quinn is an ex-patriot American."
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for O Que É Isso, Companheiro? (1997)
FOUR DAYS IN SEPTEMBER (O Que É Isso, Companheiro?) (Brazil, 1997) *** 1/2
. Directed by Bruno Barreto. Written by Fernando Gabeira  (from his novel
"O  Que Isso, Companheiro?" "What's Up, Comrade?") and Leopoldo Serran .
Photography,  Félix Monti. Editing, Isabelle Rathery. Production design,
Marcos Flacksman, Alexandre Meyer. Music, Stewart Copeland. Cast
(alphabetically):  Cláudia Abreu  (Renee), Alan Arkin (Ambassador Charles
Elbrick), Pedro Cardoso (Fernando alias Paulo), Nelson Dantas (Toledo),
Mauricio Goncalves (Brandao),Luiz Fernando Guimaraes (Marcao), Caio
Junqueira (Julio), Matheus Nachtergaele (Jonas), Marco Ricca (Enrique),
Fernanda Torres (Maria), et al. A Miramax release. In English and
Portuguese (subtitled). 106 minutes (113 in Brazil). Rated R. Some language
and violence.
Political films are not a dime a dozen; "thoughtful political thrillers"
(an oxymoron?) are even fewer. The 1997 Academy Award nominee (Best Foreign
Film) "Four Days in September" is very good. All its virtues don't
necessarily jump at you as you watch it (especially the first time), but
they increase when you think back on the movie.
It is based on facts, which have been minimally given the cosmetic
treatment that invariably goes with adaptations from reportages to movies,
with their spectacular "Oh, wow!" additions or their simplified Good Guys,
Bad Guys morality.
The general background lies in the agitated history of Brazil with its
autocratic governments. The immediate background is that of a succession of
military governments which, since 1964, had suspended constitutional
guarantees, civil rights, and the freedom of the press.
Demonstrations, as usual led by students, were numerous but ineffective.
The film opens with excellent fake documentary riot footage, in black and
white. Cut to  July 20, 1969.  Some young friends (among them a former
seminarist and an actor) are watching on television astronaut Neil
Armstrong (in the Apollo 11 mission) step out of the lunar module "The
Eagle" and onto the surface of the moon.
There is no uniformity in that small group's politics, except a desire for
democracy. One of the men is knee-jerkily anti-US and pro-Soviet; another
proposes drastic revolutionary action; the actor is skeptical about the use
of violence in the resistance.
Soon, some of them and others join a tiny group, MR8, the October 8
Revolutionary Movement. Led by Maria (a pseudonym), the new members are
given noms-de-guerre, trained in pistol-shooting and other matters.
Their first operation is the robbing of a bank (aka liberating funds for
the good fight), which succeeds, but at the expense of one of the men who
hesitates to shoot (a no-no in terrorist handbooks) is shot, wounded,
caught and tortured.
"Paulo," the middle-class intellectual among them, is a dud with guns but
skilled in political oratory. It is crucial that the voice and the acts of
the opposition  to the government be widely known. But since censorship
muzzles the press and other media, only a flamboyant act and its resulting
headlines can break through nationally and internationally, call the
world's attention to Brazil. Paulo comes up with that act : the abduction
of American Ambassador Charles Elbrick.
This is done, the guerillas get their publicity, announce a short,
un-postponable deadline for the release of the Ambassador in exchange of
some 15 political prisoners. Otherwise, Mr. Elbrick will die.
What develops is a story known to many Brazilians but few North Americans.
I will only reveal some of its aspects. For instance, one of the group, the
pretty young blonde "Renee," under false pretenses manages to seduce the
Ambassador's Chief of Security. The movie, in its economical fashion, shows
neither the actual sex scene (which is painful enough to imagine without
having to see it) nor the information that Renee obtains. Instead, the
action goes directly to the results.
Mr. Elbrick is taken to a safe-house. It turns out to be not all that safe.
That's an important, typical point. The kidnappers are idealists all right,
but when it comes to underground skills, they're still wet behind the ears.
Their leadership changes when two older men, respectively veterans of the
Spanish Civil War and of terrorism in Sao Paolo, arrive to take over from
Maria. Yet even then the operation is woefully unprofessional --with a
major exception: the very clever way in which the ambassador is finally
returned to freedom.
Add to this the enormous psychological burden on the young people who had
really not thought through the horror of having, perhaps, to execute a
human being. This is made even more painful as Ambassador Elbrick, held in
a small room (where either he or his captors have to be blindfolded) forms
a sort of bond with Paulo and Renee, a bond reinforced by Elbrick's quiet
but sincere disapproval of any government's repressive measures.
To its credit, "Four Days" is structured in ways that are un-sensational,
un-theatrical, un-heroic, un-romantic, un-sentimental and un-corny. Yet it
contains many moments of edge-of-your-seat tension and suspense. And it has
"State of Siege" written all over it.
"State of Siege" is a 1973 French film by the master of political "thinking
thrillers," Greek-born Costa-Gavras, famous for "Z," "The Confession," and
"Missing," among others. It too was the retelling of a true case. In 1970
Uruguay, Tupamaro guerillas kidnapped and executed Dan Mitrione, an
American agent of AID, the Agency for International Development. He was
accused of using it as a front and being in reality a CIA operative who
taught repression and torture to South American authorities in more than
one country.
"Four Days"  keeps recalling and paralleling "State of Siege" in dozens of
ways over and above the subject: from the same tactics in abducting an
official from his limousine, to the discussions between the guerillas and
their prisoner. Those, however, are inevitable aspects of such situations.
The comparison is more interesting in the details where the two movies
differ.
Whereas Costa-Gavras can create sweeping, dramatic visual moods, director
Barreto ("Dona Flor and her Two Husbands") sticks to a straight
quasi-documentary line, with ample use of original TV newsreel  footage,
whether of politics, Brazil's Independence Day, or a football game -- all
worked well into the plot.  Still, those are relatively minor technicals
aspects.
Where "State of Siege" and "Four Days" part company is that the former was
clearly an indictment of the U.S.A. and the dark side of some of its
foreign policies, while there's not anti-Yankee agit-prop in the latter,
where the culprit is the militarist Brazilian government. In "SOS" Mitrione
(called Santore, played by Yves Montand) is presented as clearly guilty,
though he looks neither ev il nor kind.  Here, Elbrick is played by Alan
Arkin as an most likable and decent being. He speaks fluent Portuguese. He
does not have a great deal of screen time, yet he under-acts so splendidly
that his restraint becomes eloquent and his character memorable.
Dialectics in "Four Days" are much less stressed than in "SOS." The
Tupamaros are infinitely more professional than the MR8 group, the latter
often reaching high levels of amateurish ineptitude.
Even so, the Brazilian movie maintains its natural, credible rhythm. It
uses skilfully  its rapid editing from one scene to another and cuts out
non-vital sections. The differences among most of the characters (the
hardened pro, the young types in search of romantic adventure, the true
believers, etc.)  are sketched briefly but sharply.
Given its subject, this may sound odd, but "Four Days" is a subtle work.
Several events (invented or not) are extremely effective. We hear Elbrick
writing a letter to his wife, but it is an imaginary letter of his thoughts
that describe his mental and physical state, some of his captors, his
reactions to them.
Better yet. An alarm rings.Two panicky captors appear  in Elbrick's room,
without their masks. Cut to Elbrick sitting on the toilet, looking
desperate. Why? He is in greater danger than before since he has seen
faces. A masterful bit.
When there comes a scene of love-making, born of despair as much as
attraction, between Paulo and Maria, the act itself is not shown. It is no
cliche either, since circumstances like those of the guerrillas easily
engender such relationships. The film is overall free of cliches,
artificial humor, moralizing, preaching or simplifications. The
theoretical, pragmatic, ideological problems of the Resistance, and above
all the problems of conscience among simpatico (mostly) idealists who may
have to fight violence by killing an innocent, come through well, without
needless rhetoric.
I found just one semi-goof. Ambassador Elbrick, a chic, fastidious dresser,
in one of those surreal moments of a talk with Paulo, speaks of his man in
Lisbon, the tailor who has been making elegant suits for him for fifteen
years. Yet, the morning of his abduction, we see Elbrick get out of his
ambassadorial bed and dress without taking a shower. Most unlikely, but
then perhaps the only unlikely bit in a very convincing film.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Big One, The (1997)
THE BIG ONE (1997) *** 1/2 Directed and written by Michael Moore. Produced
by Kathleen Gylnn. Cast: Michael Moore with appearances by Garrison
Keillor, Studs Terkel, Rick Neilson, Phil Knight and many ordinary people.
A BBC-Dog Eat Dog productio  released by Miramax.  94 min. PG-13 .
Did Michael Moore plot the release of his film close to that of
"Bulworth"'s? Did he contribute to the current turmoil in Indonesia? Of
course not, but his timing could not have been better.Both new films
denounce the political-big business establishment, while the Asian country
enters the argument in Moore's interviews of Nike's CEO about shoes made by
child labor paid just pennies an hour.
The initials MM long stood for Marilyn Monroe, but Michael Moore's are
becoming a close second. The contrast between the two personalities is like
Beauty Marilyn and Moore the capital-exposing Beast .The burly, paunchy,
embattled prole in baggy, slept-in clothes and his eternal baseball caps,
is perfect as a self-appointed vox populi for the masses of workers in the
United States, especially those laid off by large concerns.
The title comes from a radio interview where facetious MM proposes "The Big
One" as a replacement for the un-catchy name of our country. But it also
stands for the big corporations that make so many employees "redundant"  as
the British say, without regard to what happens to them next. That was the
theme of "Roger and Me," (1989) the wild documentary that made Moore a
celebrity as, in quest of answers, he chased after the Big Boss of General
Motors. The series "TV Nation" (1994)  lasted too little because their
special humor applied to serious subjects did not lay any golden eggs for
the network. Also in 1994, his satirical fiction feature "Canadian Bacon,"
mis-plotted and misguided was a bore that could fry but not fly. Wisely, MM
is back to the "Roger" mode, in which he's at his best in harrassing
corporations. There may be a sense of deja vu in "The Big One," but its
truths and facts are worth hammering on and expanding.
Moore became a best-selling author with his book "Downsize This!," a
collection of mocking, sharp, take-no-prisoners essays on today's America.
During the 1992 election campaign days, his publishers sent him on a
book-signing tour of close to 50 cities. Unbeknownst to them, MM had the
very bright idea of having a camera crew along to record everything, from
casual chats, to talking to groups, to his unconventional public lectures,
to his wagging his finger --always with a smiling presence -- at corporate
persons.
Embattled Moore has developed as a first-rate stand-up comic. Faithful to
his muckraking, to telling it like it is, to his protest mission, he gives
hilarious "performances" stressing the theme of Them and Us. He leaves few
stones unturned and few corporations un-stoned. Every chance he has, he
seeks out bigwigs of business (who by and large elude him), or their
spokespeople. His basic question is simply something like "Do you know what
you are doing to workers, and why do you do it?"
True, in 1992 the economy is booming in a period of fat cows, even obese
ones, but this does not help the many job-losers whose companies take their
business to places such as Indonesia or Mexico.
Itinerant evangelist  Moore cleverly starts his travels with Centralia,
Illinois, where the PayDay candy bar company causes much suffering by
closing its local works.You couldn't ask for  more pointed irony. As
Voltaire said "If God did not exist, he should have been invented." Pay Day
does exist.
There and in Cedar Rapids, Iowa, sad men, and mothers lucky enough to have
found employment,  speak of their multiple part-time jobs that exhaust them
and keep them away from their families.In Des Moines, non-redundant but
part-time, minimum -wage employees at the Borders Books store, talk of
their problems. (Later we find out that encouraged by Moore they have
unionized. This results in other Borders stores banning MM from further
book-signings and adding grist to his mill! )
The local headquarters for presidential candidate Steven Forbes provide a
not-so-irrelevant diversion about "Who he ?" The young campaign manager is
not particularly savvy about his employer, while Moore calls attention to
the fact that Forbes, as clearly seen on TV footage, never blinks, a most
bizarre condition, as per a medical specialist. Could Forbes  be an E.T.?
MM's scattershot approach is a delight. In Milwaukee, Johnson Controls made
half a billion in profits in the last three years, yet is relocating to
Mexico. Although unable to see the head honcho, Moore does send him a
mammoth-sized check ... for 80 cents, the hourly earnings of Mexican
workers, as well as a Certificate for Downsizing. In that  city too is the
head office of the temp workers agency Manpower, Inc. which, declares
Moore, is now the largest employer in the country.
In a symbolic gag in Madison, Wisconsin, MM leads to the Capitol a bunch of
welfare people who will be happy to clean, for nothing, the Governor's
office. In Minneapolis-St.Paul, chatting with a tattoed ex-convict in a
cafeteria, he is told something scary as well as surrealistic:  TWA hires,
at $2 an hour, prisoners in jails to handle by telephone some of the
airline's reservations services. Adds Moore: "Many other firms do the same:
Spalding, Eddie Bauer, Microsoft, AT&T, etc." Bear this in mind next time
you're about to disclose information to just a voice.
Moore's attempts to meet with  CEOs are met by rebuffs and evasions that
range from polite to hostile. No matter whom he talks to, it is almost
creepy to see that all  business underlings are protective of their
companies, transparently insecure and scared of saying or doing anything
that might get their heads cut off.
The answers to Moore's questions are no more than what one expects. The
alibi-mantras include "To keep the company competitive," "Our
responsibility to our shareholders," "To increase earnings." Profit is the
A to Z motive. The film could have had other titles too, like those of the
American classic "Greed" for the business side or the Russian classic
"Stalker" for Moore's methods. So, he says to a roaring audience, how about
letting GM sell crack and make even bigger money?
In Chicago there is a short parenthesis as the invaluable Studs Terkel has
MM as his radio guest. In a true meeting of minds, humor is set aside in
favor of seriousmess and eagerness. This encounter runs only for a few,
touching minutes.
When Phil Knight, the CEO of Nike, Number 3 on MM's long hit list, agrees
to a meeting plus follow-up, it comes as a surprise. Both Knight and Moore
show good humor. It leads, however, to a cul-de-sac. Knight stands his
ground, comes up with a correction ("I checked: Indonesian workers are not
12 but 14"), believes (or pretends) that Americans don't want to make
shoes. Moore bets him he can come up with 500 people willing to do it. But
at a rally in Flint, by my count, fewer than 200 show up. No wonder that
Moore's report skips this fact. At least he will contribute $10,000 to the
unemployed if Knight matches this, which the Nike billionaire does.
These are merely a few examples of the richness of the documentary's in
episodes and details. The crusader has a knack for making comedy from
painful crises and getting a lot of laughs, yet without losing sight of
plights and pathos. Though now a capitalist from royalties, he remains
faithful to his social credos, contributes large sums to the needy, even
has a deal with film distributors Miramax to give away half of "The Big
One"'s profits.
As in all movies dealing with social justice and injustices, and as in all
agit-prop, Moore's work certainly simplifies vastly complex issues. His
sole consideration, in which he excels, is the human element. Critical
reception at festivals (Toronto 97, Berlin 98) has been very good. The
general public's reactions may ultimately depend on viewers' income. Those
unemployed or seriously underpaid will love the movie. Earners of high five
or low six figures, will like it if they are socially conscious. Above this
level there may be few takers, but it's no loss of audiences, since the
very wealthy seldom have time to spend on movies.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Substitute, The (1996)
THE SUBSTITUTE 1/2 *. Directed by Robert Mandel.  Written by
Roy Frumkes and Rocco Simonelli. Photography, Bruce Surtees. Editing,
Alex Mackie. Cast: Tom Berenger (Shale), Diane Venora (Jane Hetzko),
Ernie Hudson (Rolle), William Forsythe, Glenn Plummer, Marc Anthony,
Cliff de Young, Sharon Corley, Ricghard Brooks, Raymond Cruz, Rodney
Grant, Luis Guznman, Wet al. A Live Entertainment release. 114 minutes.
Rated R (extreme violence, bad language)
Accept no "Substitute." This blackboard jungle movie has almost nothing
to recommend it.
Shale (Tom Berenger) is a mercenary soldier who's just decided to hang
up his Uzi and is visiting in Miami his girlfriend Jane (Diane
Venora).  She teaches in a high school that's like an armed camp  plus a
hotbed of big-time drug dealing. Jane, gutsy and outspoken, incurs the
wrath of the Numero Uno gang-leader who has another male animal break
her leg.
Shale wants to investigate the bad guys, who are legion. As he has
done jobs for the CIA, he knows all about fabricating credentials, or so
we are to believe. Posing as an Ivy Leaguer, he appears at the school
and takes over Jane's class as a substitute.
In the tired old formula, he discerns the humanity in some of the kids,
becomes (natch) liked by them. His methods combine strong-arm
no-nonsense and the pathetic way of speaking to the students in "their"
language, as when he explains the Vietnam War as "the gangs in the North
wanted to take over the gangs in the South." In my book this comes under
the rubric of the Power of Primitive Thinking.
What Shale's investigations uncover is corruption in high places and
low, an industrial-strength drug-ring that extends well beyond the
school, murder and other such niceties. 
This leads to the film's real "raison d'etre," and "piece de
resistance," a long, bloody confrontation between the bad guys and the
good. The latter are Shale's motley team of disbanded mercenaries, now
re-recruited in Wild Bunch or Dirty Dozen fashion. The battle is
absurdly unbelievable in its strategies, heroics and high-tech
equipment. 
The film is an Equal Opportunity production. The huge majority of the
students are minorities: black, Cuban, Hispanic, Latino, American Indian
-- and since so many of them are gangsters, the portrait of such
minorities is neither P.C. nor kind. Of course there are a few people
who act with honesty and courage, but this feels like tokenism.
This is a cheap exploitation movie that's far cry from the fine "The
Blackboard Jungle" of 1955, the movie whose title became the expression
for delinquent and defiant high schoolers. That film was seen by some
American authorities here, and especially abroad, as showing a most
undesirable slice of US life. I shudder to think what "The Substitute"
's message will be for foreign countries.
While without saving graces, the film has some performers who are better
than their material. Venora sends good vibes in her unglamorous but
appealing small part.  Hudson has presence as the school principal with
a not so secret secret. Teacher Plummer contributes some good
African-American activism.
As for Berenger, in the early days of his career, he was often referred
to as the next Paul Newman. This did not come to pass. He is far from
untalented, but he's been in insignificant movies, with just a few
exceptions: "The Big Chill," "Platoon" (he was Oscar-nominated for Best
Supporting Actor), "Born on the Fourth of July," and the little-seen
"The Field" and "At Play in the Fields of the Lord."
In "Sniper"(1993), Berenger played a military hitman, a terminator of
drug-traffickers in a South American jungle.  It was not a good film,
but if Berenger has to be cast in more action movies, good scripts and
direction could at least make him a hero a la Stallone, minus pectorals,
plus brains.

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
ANALYZE THIS (1999) *** 1/2. Directed by Harold Ramis. Written by Peter
Tolan, Ramis,
Kenneth Lonergan, based on a story by Lonergan and Tolan. Photography,
Stuart Dryburgh. Editing, Christopher Tellefsen. Production design,Wynn
Thomas. Music, Howard Shore. Produced by Paula Weinstein & Jane Rosenthal.
Cast : Robert De Niro (Paul Vitti), Billy Crystal (Ben Sobel), Lisa Kudrow
(Laura MacNamara), Joe Viterelli (Jelly), Chazz Palminteri (Primo Sindone),
Bill Macy (Isaac Sobel), et al  A Warners release. 110 minutes. R
(language, violence,sexual situations)
My favorite Sylvester Stallone picture is Oscar (by John Landis, 1991), a
free remake of a Gallic movie, itself adapted from a French play.
What does this got to do with the price of eggs? you'll ask. Quite a bit.
Analyze This bears no rleation to Stallone, but it's in the same genre
--farces about the Mob. And now it's my favorite Billy Crystal performance.
I can't say "Billy Crystal movie" since Billy, as psychotherapist Dr.Ben
Sobel, plays straight-man (sort of), sounding-board and hapless consultant
to Robert De Niro's mobster capo Paul Vitti. And you know that  De Niro is
a movie giant who is always the focus of his picture and of our attention..
Here, De Niro, elastictically using his talents, his face, his
Italian-American speech and body language, is very, very funny. So is
Crystal. So is everyone else, from supporting to tiny roles
The film was written with clockwork precision, a must for any successful
farce. Tightly scripted and directed, it does not indulge in fillers,
irrelevancies, overly broad effects or pratfalls. Director-co-writer Harold
Ramis has been an actor, a scripter, or both in many pictures, but has
directed just seven, starting with  Caddyshack (1980) then on to National
Lampoon's Vacation, Club Paradise, Groundhog Day, Stuart Saves his Family,
and Multiplicity (1996). People's reactions to humor are, of course,
imponderables, as varied  and unpredictable as their taste for food, but
for me Analyze This is Ramis's funniest movie.
It opens with a reminder of the famous gathering of vultures at Apalachin
in 1957, where the heads of Mafia families met to discuss territories,
alliances and ways to improve their profitability.
Cut to the contemporary Mafia, in which Paul Vitti is one of the biggest
capos in the East. When Vitti (which sounds like Gotti)  hesitates to
exterminate a bad guy (there are good and bad guys among the bad guys) and
finds himself crying and going through strange depressions, heart trouble
is suspected.
In  ways that  are like a comically devious daisy-chain, Vitti gets told at
a hospital's emergency ward that he suffers from panic or anxiety
syndromes. He repays the diagnosing doctor by roughing him up. Hence the
title Analyze THIS --which could have been better.
Crystal is shown in a carefully dosaged number of times --not too many, not
too few -- in  highly amusing situations with patients. The set-ups are
takeoffs of therapists and the therapied, but with kernels of truth --like
cartoons in the New Yorker.
The six degrees of separation theory works well. The links lead Vitti to
Dr. Sobel and the main subject is now reached. Uneasy, uncomfortable, even
scared, Sobel would like to get rid of his gangland client, but in spite of
misunderstandings and mutual bewilderments, an odd-couple relationship
results. (Among other things Vitti does not grasp, or else misinterprets
Sobel, his theories, his "shocking" Freudianism or high-falutin' words like
"closure").
Sobel's Jewishness is played up, but gently. So is the cameo part of
Sobel's father, the senior Dr. Sobel, also a shrink plus best-selling
author who is all wrapped up in himself and his book tour. (Bill Macy does
a terrific job of his few minutes).Vitti's Italian-American-Mafiosity is
played up too, in his case with a vengeance.
Taking along his fat, witty teen-ager son, the divorced Sobel goes to
Florida for his  wedding with blonde WASP TV reporter Laura MacNamara (Lisa
Kudrow). Guess who's coming to Florida too? Paul Vitti,who feels increasing
need for Sobel; Paul's bodyguards; and assassins sent by a rival. an
invreased  Comic mayhem and complications of all kinds follow.
The episodes cannot be revealed. There, and later back in New York,  the
doings, sayings and one-liners are non-stop laugh-getters--but  almost
never forced or cliched.Wisely too, the characterizations of the lesser
people are held to a necessary minimum, without wasting time and dialogue
on them. The filmmakers draw traits with economy. e.g. Vitti's sexual
disfunctions, his mistress, his wife, his being a family man.
Throughout, there's an incessant, humorous, deftly-incorporated stream of
allusions,  references and elements --sly, overt or rib-ticklingly blatant
--not just to real mobsters but also to Mob movies of all types, from the
Godfather saga to Woody Allen's Italian-Americans. Also parodied is De Niro
himself in roles such as the dead-serious Jewish-American gangster in Once
Upon a Time in America to Scorsese's blood-and-humor pictures of "made men"
and beyond. De Niro basks in the spoofing of his own images as distorted by
the mirror of comedy. Analyze This is at the same time an affectionate
homage to the great flicks in both serious and light  gangster genres.
One might call this a high-concept movie:"Mafioso Boss and his reluctant
Shrink bond." It's not that simple, nor is this just a one-gag film. The
main joke is so cleverly concocted that it becomes the equivalent of a
musical "tema con variazone." It maintains a light touch with its heavies
and an unforced touch with a Billy Crystal who neither clowns nor mugs.
There are no hesitations, no dead spots, no disturbing naturalism. You know
that a corpse in a car's trunk is a dummy, a joke; that the gunshots are a
fantasy. There's also a lot of toned-down Mel Brooks in this picture.
In importance and screen time, the third role is Joe Viterelli's. As Jelly,
he is Vitti's fat, pock-marked, adoring and obedient guard-dog, slow-witted
but quick on the trigger. The fourth role goes to  Chazz Palminteri's Primo
Sindone, Vitti's villainous rival.  Though  un- nuanced --he just huffs,
puffs and plots--he comes in handy for the wrap-up.
If Crystal is second --but indispensable-- banana to De Niro, the
Palminteri sub-plot is perfectly timed to bring Dr. Sobel to the fore. Soon
after a hilarious, two-seconds gag involving Crystal with some puzzling
holy water, Sobel goes to a neo-Apalachin gathering. There he  impersonates
Vitti's new consigliere. His tough perfomance is a mega-comical howl.
Analyze This is no epic saga, explosive socially-conscious film,
heart-rending drama,  message or avant-garde movie, but within its niche
it's a great, unpretentious not-just-for-dummies work. It joins easily the
roster of must-see screwball comedies.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Crossing Guard, The (1995)
     I cannot help but think that Sean Penn, for the second film he
directed (after THE INDIAN RUNNER) was inspired by Claude Chabrol's
very good and quite well-known drama, THIS MAN MUST DIE (1970).  In the
French movie, a father sets out to find and kill the hit-and-run driver
who had killed his young son.
     In the Penn film, the seven-year-old daughter of Freddy Gale (Jack
Nicholson) and Mary (Anjelica Huston) was killed by drunk driver John
Booth (David Morse).  When John is released from jail after serving six
years, Freddy sets out to kill him.  When Freddy faces John and
something goes wrong with the gun, John asks for a two-day reprieve
during which Freddy can think if he really wants to shoot him. "I'll
give you three days" is the answer.
     Neatly balancing out vengeful Freddy is guilty John.  Not merely
sorrowful and contrite but carrying a colossal burden of guilt, one
that's spelled out and underlined at every turn, one that is in fact a
kind of death wish.  We get too much of the despair of both men,
especially since John always speaks haltingly in a low-pitched monotone
that's like a big whisper.  Even in the short run, this fatigues us, as
do as too many silences pregnant with meanings that are either
repetitious or unclear.
     The movie is interesting but relies too little on script and too
heavily on the excellent photography of a master, Hungarian-born Vilmos
Szigmond, and the moody production design of Daniel Haller, whose track
record is very good. (I wonder whether Californian Haller is related to
the late, classic cinematographer Ernest Haller who died in a 1970 car
accident).  Together, those two artists create an atmosphere of
somberness and emptiness, stress night scenes, artificial light,
chiaroscuro interiors and, even in daylight, the feel of loneliness.
On the other hand, the artsy editing and acting that go from the
theatrical to the "sub-texted" are less welcome.
     More than anything, the film leans very heavily on Jack
Nicholson.  The premise here is that Freddy, who owns a small jewelry
store, went to pieces after the child's death.  He is a man with an
attitude that includes impatience with the weaknesses of others,
harshness and irascibility.  All that goes with chain-smoking and major
boozing.  Freddy's milieu is one of strip-joints, like "Dreamland"
where his bed mates work.
     Nicholson can play convincingly lonely, alienated, weird,
pugnacious and raging characters.  So convincingly, indeed, that our
familiarity with the many faces of Jack may makes us conscious of
watching acting more than life.  Yet that's not the movie's weakest
point.  The flaw here is that as a writer, Sean Penn gets too fancy,
soulful, "philosophical" and sometimes tackily low-life.  More
seriously, it is never made clear whether Freddy's desire for revenge
is its own entity; whether it came upon him early on or recently;
which came first and caused the other, the drinking or the despair;
whether or not there is history of Freddy having always been unhinged.
     The main clue we get is when well into the film, in a dark cafe,
there's a "friendly" meeting of Freddy and his now remarried ex-wife
Mary (echoes of the real-life Nicholson-Huston relationship).  She
tells him "When Eve died you became small and weak.  I needed someone
big and strong."
     More of Penn's weaknesses.  John is in the car with a pal who's
found him a job and arranged for a party with several girls.  He
suddenly asks John: "In the joint, did you get violated?" (my
euphemism).  John: "It only hurts the first time."  This exchange is
followed by cross-cutting between the party (where a woman improbably
discourses on compassion) and a fancy restaurant where Freddy has
invited three hookers.  There is much that is unnecessary and
unedifying in those sequences.  And when Robin Wright, in the
underwritten part of Jojo, plays an improbably "nice" and "clean"
artist in a society of broads, and falls for John, and speaks of his
puppy-like eyes, writer Penn is combining cliches with an unlikely mix
of societal types.
     There are some good inventions.  The quiet relationship between
John and his parents; the talkative, deranged lady who speaks to John
in a bus; the surreal sight of a stripper dressed in a Shirley Temple
outfit and singing "The Good Ship Lollipop"; a hooker serenading John
at his place via song and electronic keyboard (she must be one of those
fallen girls from better society); the amicable Freddy-Mary meeting
mentioned earlier unexpectedly climaxing with Freddy exploding:" I hope
you die.  I hope you f...g die."
     THE CROSSING GUARD is a mixed picture until the closure which is a
total cop-out, illogical in topography and timing, with too many
coincidences, clich's and sentimentality, all embarrassing to watch.  A
pity, because in spite of several arid, dull stretches, the movie has
enough going for it to set it apart from run-of-the-mill productions.

Title
Review for Latcho Drom (1993)
LATCHO  DROM  (Safe journey) (France, 1993) *** 1/2  Written and directed
by Tony Gatlif. Produced by Michele Ray.  Photography, Eric Guichard.
Editing, Nicole D.V.Berckmans. Music consultant, Alain Weber. Final song by
Tony Gatlif. Design and art work, Denis Mercier.Cast: Gypsy musicians from
8 countries. A Shadow Distribution (Waterville, Maine). 103 min. No rating.
At the Art Theater.
Many North Americans are familiar with CD-ROMs, but not with seedy Roms. In
Europe it's the other way around. Rom is what Gypsies call themselves in
their language (Romany). They slowly migrated westward from northern India
about one thousand years ago. Now they live all over the world but mainly
in Europe, which they reached in the early 14th century.
The Rom refer to all non-gypsies as "gadje," a pejorative word, the way
"barbarian" was used by the Ancient Greeks for all non-Greeks. The "gadje"
have repaid the Rom by despising them as undesirables, thieves and other
nasty things. Of course, a few films have gone to the extreme of
romanticizing the Gypsies. Get a video of a darkened Marlene Dietrich and
Ray Milland falling for her in "Golden Earrings" (it is fun kitsch).
"Latcho" sounds to me like the word for "Good" in Serbo-Croatian and other
languages; "Drom" comes from the Greek "dromos" meaning "road" and was
incorporated into the Romany language."Latcho Drom" is a wish that
literally says "Good Road," i.e. 'have a good trip." In French it was
correctly translated  as  "Bonne Route."  In any case, all versions  are
applicable to the ever-ambulant Gypsies.
Director-writer Tony Gatlif, a citizen of France born in Algeria, is a Rom.
Most of his films are on Gypsy subjects. "Latcho Drom" was followed by
"Mondo" (1996) and "Gadgo Dilo" ("Crazy Stranger) (1997). "Latcho Drom" was
produced by Michele Ray, a famous reporter and the wife of the equally
famous film director Costa-Gavras. (There is an Alexander Gavras listed as
Assistant Director too).
The movie is more theme than subject. Its non-plot couldn't be simpler.
Gatlif's cameras and microphones focus on Gypsy musicians, in Rajastan
(India), Egypt, Turkey, Romania, Hungary, Slovakia, France and Spain, main
stations in the wanderings of the Gypsies. It is beautifully photographed
by Eric Guichard ("Seven Years in Tibet") in 35mm. widescreen, with
superior sound.
Songs range from exuberantly joyous to plaintive. Vocal, instrumental , and
generally with dances, the pieces are quite different from one another. To
a specialized musicologist, there may be common threads running below the
different "numbers," but not to most listeners. The common ground is that
all of the items sound like the ethnic music of the countries they are
performed in. In simple terms, thanks to the Gypsies there's a two-way
traffic: the Rom music has been influenced by that country's music, and the
country's music, by its Gypsies. Much that would have died out of a given
land's musical heritage has been preserved in one form or another by the
Rom tradition.
The opening salvo, in India, features lavishly and ornately dressed women,
a man reciting energetic love poetry, and much else. Unlike documentaries,
there is no commentary, printed on the screen or as voice-over. Nor is
there any dialogue or viewer orientation. Nothing is identified, who the
performers are, what country they are in. What the words mean is only
occasionally subtitled.
Yet the film has impact, grows on you and involves you in odd ways. If
you're expecting what most of us think of as typically gypsy music,
initially you're in for surprises  The Rajastan part sounds Indian but not
quite. It may be somewhat familiar to the few Westerners who have seen
those Indian movies that are so popular in the subcontinent but almost
never reach western theaters. Yet even then, the gypsy sounds feel like
cousins to Indian sounds, not like siblings.
We are then transported, with no transition (as in the rest of the film) to
Egypt, where an ensemble performs an Arabic-sounding, vivacious melody on
love, in Arabic (I could not tell if this was pure or a mixture of Arabic
and Romany), with a ghaziya dancer moving rather sexily.
By the rear wall of a large cafe in Turkey, a teen-ager sings, nicely, a
Turkish-like song.The all-male clientele, with their backs to her, face
raptly the instrumentalists at the opposite end. In the streets Gypsies are
selling things. A man with a telescope sells looks at the sky. I thought of
conjunctivitis.
In Romania comes the shock of recognition as finally the music corresponds
to our notions of gypsy melodies. A solo violinist/singer celebrates - in
Romanian - the new freedom, showering the late dictator Ceaucescu with
insults. He uses a normal bow but alternates with a single horsehair that
draws eerie, fascinating sounds. Then you even meet happy Gypsies, smiling,
swaying, dancing, as  skillful  players (strings, cymbalom, clarinet,
accordion, flute) play for their own people.
A montage of a galloping horse leads to the Iron Horse, the railroad. The
rails speak of deportation (as for the Jews) by the Germans to
extermination camps. In a train car, a duet by, probably, a mother and a
daughter, has as its leitmotif "The whole world hates us -- we're always
being hunted and thrown out "  Discrimination, exclusion, disdain,
persecution are the ovewhelming themes and connecting thread of the various
"serious" pieces.
In  Hungary, the Gypsies use spoons, knives and a metal pot for infectious
rhythm. There, and in Slovakia, the musical territory becomes increasingly
familiar to our ears. In a Central European snowy landscape, barbed wire
and tattooed arms speak of Auschwitz. There's the surreal sight of the
Gypsies "camping out" atop trees. Men sing of wandering and persecution.
>From destitution to near-luxury. In France, the "gitans" have caravans. But
then two locals, one with a hunting gun, make the Gypsies leave their
encampment. In the Camargue (Southern France) where there is an annual
Gypsy Festival, there is terrific guitar and violin jazz a la  Django
Reinhardt and Stephane Grappelli. And in Spain, the Gypsies squat in empty
buildings, are evicted by the authorities who brick up doors and windows.
Yet the Gitanos sing, clap and dance for themselves (there's an amazing
boy-singer) with the joys and sorrows of Flamenco.The film concludes with a
threnody about the unwanted. It is sung by a woman on a hill top
overlooking a city's public housing -- "for whites only," I kept thinking.

Title
Review for For Me and My Gal (1942)
FOR ME AND MY GAL (1942) Directed by Busby Berkeley. Script by five
writers.  Cinematographer, William Daniels. Editing, Ben Lewis. Art
direction, Cedric Gibbons, Gabriel Scognamillo. Sets, Edwin B.Willis &
Keogh Gleason. Music director, George Stoll. Choreography, Bobby Connolly,
Gene Kelly. Cast: Judy Garland, George Murphy, Marta Eggerth, Gene Kelly,
Ben Blue, Horace McNally, Keenan Wynn, et al.
The movie is the result of the collaboration of two musical-movie greats:
director-choreographer Busby Berkeley and producer Arthur Freed. Producer
and lyricist Freed is synonymous with all those famous, big and lavish MGM
musicals. Among them: Meet Me In St. Louis, Easter Parade, On the Town,
Annie Get Your Gun, An American in Paris, Royal Wedding, Show Boat, Singin'
in the Rain,  Gigi.
"For Me and My Gal" is a backstage picture about vaudevillians, mostly Judy
Garland and Gene Kelly. It has lots of flag-waving since it was made during
World War II and deals with the WW I period. Kelly is a draft-dodger, who,
of course, gets redeemed. Basically this is routine nonsense, but made with
oomph, brio and strong production values.
The young Judy Garland has some charm and cuteness, though her voice is no
great shakes here. Curiously, Berkeley does not stage any chorines doing
his celebrated ensemble dancing. The picture is generally appreciated by
lovers of musicals, although it cannot rate at the top of the genre.
However, it should be quite appealing to connoisseurs and film historians
for the additional reason of its two debuts. This was Gene Kellyšs first
major movie role as well as the first American film of Marta Eggerth.
In  1930s Europe, the Hungarian-born (1912) Marta (or Martha) was the
undisputed queen of German and Austrian musicals and filmed operettas. She
also made some notable musicals in Italy, the UK, and France. The king in
that category was her husband and sometimes co-star, Polish-born tenor Jan
Kiepura.
In that decade, on the Continent,  Eggerth and Kiepura were household
names. They were often refrerred to as Eggerth-Kiepura, the way, in
America, one spoke of the Jeanette MacDonald-Nelson Eddy musical
couple.This was a bit odd, as in reality, in the 22 films Eggerth made, and
in Kiepura's 13, the two singers appeared together only in two, both of
1934. (They did three more in post-war Europe)  but the performers were no
longer major names)
Those figures are quite unlike those for the melodious, romantic American
duo of MacDonald-Eddy. Jeanette made some 28 film in her career, Nelson,
20. They were together in 9.
In the late 1930s, after the Nazis had annexed Austria, both singers, still
very much at the height of their popularity, fled the violently
anti-Semitic "Greater Germany" and came to America. Alas, their fame did
not travel with them. They did not do all that well in the USA.
Kiepura at least did sing opera. Eggerth was only in two pictures: For Me
and My Gal  and, the following year, again with Judy Garland, Presenting
Lily Mars.
How sad was Madame Eggerth's professional situation in America can be
measured by her all too brief role in  For Me and My Girl, despite her
being listed third in the screen credits. Early on she sings her one and
only song, inside a special railroad car equipped with a grand piano.The
voice is lovely and beautifully controlled. Those few minutes make the
movie well worth watching. Yet, somehow, Hollywood must have decided that
her box-office appeal would be too small.
After World War II, the couple returned to Europe where they made their
remaining three films together, always in the same, light, operetta-ish
format. Madame Eggerth was also in a fourth, but without her husband. None
of those movies was particularly good or a real comeback for the singers
who soon after retired.
Kiepura died in 1966. Madame Eggerth remained in New York. Some years ago,
a friend who teaches German film in an Eastern college, invited her to one
of his yearly film festivals. She impressed all with her youthfulness,
naturalness and charm. She lives in the State of New York.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Malčna (2000)
MALENA (Italy, 2000) *** Directed and written by Giuseppe Tornatore 
from a story by Luciano Vincenzoni. Photography,  Lajos Koltai. 
Editing, Massimo Quaglia. Art direction, Francesco Frigeri. Sets, 
Bruno Cesari. Costumes, Maurizio Millenotti. Music, Ennio Morricone. 
Cast: Monica Belluci (Malena),  Giuseppe Sulfaro (Renato Amoroso), 
Luciano Federico (Renato's father), Matilde Piana (Renato's mother), 
Pietro Notarianni (Professor Bonsignore), et al.  A Miramax 
co-production and release. In Italian with subtitles. 94 minutes. R 
(sex, language)
                       .
Malena is the hypocoristic form of Madalena, but there is nothing 
diminutive about supermodel-actress Monica Belluci. She has appeared 
in two dozen films, Italian and French, all unknown to me save for 
"Under Suspicion" (USA, with Gene Hackman and Morgan Freeman) which I 
tried to watch but gave up.  They were mostly minor items, not 
imported in the USA. The few that were had minimal distribution.
A bit of history. Italy's Fascist leader (Il Duce) Benito Mussolini, 
has embroiled the country in World War II. In June 1940, as  France 
was about to surrender to Germany, Mussolini, kicking France when she 
was down, joined World War II with a ridiculous attack on the South 
of France. Earlier, Italy had swallowed tiny Albania. From it, in 
October 1940 it attacked Greece which was less than half the size of 
Italy, had about one seventh of its population, and a non-mechanized 
army. But David drubbed Goliath so spectacularly that Hitler, to 
rescue its ally Italy and save face, had to send his juggernaut to 
Greece, which it occupied in April 1941.
It is 1940 and the Italian civilians may remind you of the WWII song 
sung by Bette Davis, "They're either too young or too old." That's 
most of the male population of the Sicilian seaside town of 
Castelcuto. But all, from pubescent to elderly lust after gorgeous, 
27-year old Malena.
Whether or not "statuesque" applies to her, she is emphatically a 
sight to remember. Her husband is away in the army. She lives an 
almost reclusive life, has no apparent acquaintances. But whenever 
she walks in town (which is often), we recall those Vittorio de Sica 
movies in which Sophia Loren, in Naples and elsewhere, marches in 
provocative, camera-detailed fashion that makes all heads turn. Men 
compensate for their frustrated libido with nasty remarks. Jealous 
local women are ready with catty comments.
Malena, while more ambiguously and less obviously inflammatory than 
Loren, is conscious of the stir she causes, keeps a deadpan face, and 
hardly ever speaks.
The teen-age schoolboys under her thrall make me wonder whether 
Tornatore remembered Truffaut's short film "Les Mistons," in which 
the sap rises within mischievous pre-teen boys.  Unconscious of their 
desire for a local beauty, they take out their confusion on her and 
her boyfriend, stalk them, and play silly pranks on the couple.
The kids in the movie already wear long pants--a symbol of manhood-- 
except for the younger Renato who is twelve-and-a-half and barely 
manages to join the fan club.
The youths fantasize about Malena with graphic, coarse 
comments--except, again, for lovestruck Renato who stalks her, even 
makes a peephole in her house, spies on her but never speaks to this 
divine creature. His reveries include parodies of classic movie 
scenes, from romance to gladiatorial,  "starring" himself and Malena. 
Other amusing sections include his pursuit of  long pants and a 
"grown-up" chair at the barbershop; stealing his idol's panties;  his 
mother trying to cure him by exorcism but Dad opting to take Renato 
to a bordello in which the boy selects a Malena look-alike.
The movie portrays the Sicilians as loud and excitable, in a 
post-neorealist way. Then comes a change of modes and moods. The 
comical-sexual satire shifts gears into near-tragedy. Malena's 
husband is reported dead at the front. Widows are acceptable prey. 
The old tabu is lifted for some of the lusting males. To subsist, now 
indigent Malena turns into a reluctant prostitute--and a pariah.
In July 1943 Liberation from the Germans comes as G.Is enter the 
town.  Jealous wives attack Malena for having consorted with the 
enemy. They cut off her hair --a punishment common in many countries, 
and shown in films such as "Hiroshima, Mon Amour." On an isle once 
colonized by Ancient Greece, the women beat Malena viciously, acting 
like Maenads or the vindictive Thracian women of Greek mythology.
Malena goes away, joining hordes of refugees. But later her husband 
reappears, and finally both return to Castelcuto where both Malena 
and her former accusers reach a cautiously redemptive, hesitantly 
open-ended ending.
Tornatore continues his string of first-rate movies. Fame and prizes 
(at Cannes, at the Oscars, etc.) came with "Cinema Paradiso," his 
second film. Before this was a solid first feature "Il Camorrista," 
not distributed in the US in spite of an American actor, Ben Gazzara. 
Before that, Tornatore had made several fine TV films, imaginative, 
cultural documentaries. Post-"Cinema Paradiso" came a string of 
features that were mostly excellent but still suffered from US lack 
(or spottiness) of distribution: the marvelously touching 
"Everybody's Fine," "Especially on Sunday," "A Pure Formality," "The 
Star Maker," "The Legend of 1900."
 From lyrical scenes  to a bombing raid "Malena" is splendidly shot by 
the great, Hungarian-born Lajos Koltai. The loving views of  Sicily 
compete for splendor with Malena's.  All production values are 
superior, from period costumes to Ennio Morricone's music (he is 
Tornatores's constant collaborator). The subtitling is exceptionally 
good and rich.
Shooting was in the southeastern towns of Siracusa (pop. 32,000) and 
Noto (pop. 22,000), then in Morocco, where there was sunshine while 
winter was coming to Sicily.
On the iffy side:  It is confusing that the invented Castelcuto is 
supposedly "a sleepy village" yet looks like a town.
Also confusing is the Professor, Malena's father (or father-in-law, 
it is unclear), who teaches Latin, is constantly the butt of the 
pupils'  loud, vulgar remarks about Malena. But he seems not to 
notice them, yet there's no proof that he is deaf.
An explanation may be that the film's American copies are 94 minutes 
long while in Italy they run 105 minutes.
As in most foreign movies, or for that matter American pictures that 
deal with the past, there's a dimension here that fleshes out matters 
for Italians, though perhaps not some younger ones. The references to 
the popular song "Ma l'Amore No" and to Alida Valli. The fascist 
anthem "Giovinezza." The mocking of Mussolini and his regime. The 
allusions to Italy's rout in North Africa. The post-Liberation former 
Fascists who are cynical, well-dressed and perhaps still in positions 
of privilege. And so on. But cuts and references notwithstanding, 
this is a most satisfying and original work.
Movie reviews by Edwin Jahiel are at : http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel 

Title
Review for Trial and Error (1997)
TRIAL AND ERROR ** .  Directed by Jonathan Lynn. Written by Sara Bernstein
and Gregory Bernstein, from a story by Sara Bernstein. Photography,
Gabriel Beristain.Editing, Tony Lombardo. Production design, Victoria Paul.
Music, Phil Marshall. Produced by Gary Ross and Lynn. Cast: Michael
Richards (Richard Rietti), Jeff Daniels (Charles Tuttle), Charlize Theron
(Billie Tyler), Alexandra Wentworth (Tiffany), Jessica Steen (Elizabeth
Gardner), Austin Pendleton (Judge Paul Z. Graff), Rip Torn (Benny Gibbs)
and Dale Dye (Dr. Stone).A New Line release. 98 minutes.PG-13.
"Trial and Error" can be a trial for the viewer and its execution is an
error.
The concept is OK , I suppose, and it has its moments, but not enough of
them. The Britisher who made it was a collaborator of Eric Idle of Monty
Python fame; the co-author of the superbly witty TV satire series "Yes
Minister" and "Yes, Prime Minister"; a performer; and starting in 1990, a
film director as well. His first movie, "Nuns On The Run," was a
forgettable cross-dressing comedy with some nice gags, but these were
seldom followed through. It waited a long time before it picked up speed.
The same thing happened to his next film,"My Cousin Vinny" and in the Eddie
Murphy vehicle "The Distinguished Gentleman." The tempo got reversed in
last year's "Sgt. Bilko." Its first part was excellent and lively, its
second part dragged.
"Trial and Error" does not have the rhythmic unevenness of the earlier Lynn
pictures, yet it shares their inability to make a tight, coherent whole.
(The first part of "Bilko" is an exception because it is a transposed TV
series that does not lose from being episodic).  Director Lynn seems more
at home with short spurts and sketches rather than with long distance
running.
Like "My Cousin Vinny," "Trial end Error" is a lawyer-in-the-courtroom
comedy, a bill of goods sold on the strength of "Seinfeld"'s Michael
Richards who gets billed above co-star Jeff Daniels.
As one of the 789 people in the US. who watch "Seinfeld" only now and then,
I do not  feel qualified to pass judgment on Richards's TV persona. Yet for
the sake of peace and harmony I am willing to accept the general opinion
that Richards has much talent. I am even willing to concede that he does
nicely in "Trial and Error" and that without him the movie would have been
even more boring.
Charles (Daniels) is a Yale-educated lawyer who has clerked for a Supreme
Court Justice. In his very first job he made partner in a prestigious (and,
'tis hinted, unscrupulous) law firm. The sudden rise comes because he is
about to marry blonde Tiffany, the boss's daughter. She is merely outlined
as a spoiled, air-headed socialite brat.
Charles's best man-to be is childhood buddy Richard (Richards), a mostly
unemployed actor who, from a short, funny audition we witness, is no Brando
or Olivier. He is preparing a bachelor party that gets postponed as Charles
is dispatched by his father-in-law-to-be to a no-town in Nevada with orders
to defend a relative (Benny Gibbs, played by Rip Torn) accused of fraud.
Gibbs has been selling to collectors, for well over $20 a piece,  "copper
engravings of Abraham Lincoln " that turn out to be pennies. This scam is
so dumb and preposterous that right away it removes any connection of the
movie to reality.
In Nevada, Charles finds that Richard plus a few pals have preceded him in
order to hold the bachelor party. In the local hotel's bar, and in a
sequence that is entirely forced and artificial, Charles gets in a tussle
that puts him in a bloodied up and very hazy state. Just as artificially,
by the following day, having swallowed more pain pills than prescribed,
Charles  is in no shape to appear in court.  For reasons both too phony to
explain, the two friends exchange names, with Richard posing as lawyer
Charles, and Charles as Richard's assistant.
Things happen, unevenly divided between courtroom and exterior scenes.
Developments get telegraphed non-stop from the film's opening, mostly
having to do with several blond women. The instant we meet wife-to-be
Tiffany we know that the marriage will not take place. In Nevada, when we
meet  cute, blond waitress Billie, we know that she and Charles will end in
each arms. When we watch Richard watching the distant vision of a woman on
a motorcycle, we know that another twosome will eventually materialize.
Even though the biker is hardly visible, we can guess which blond she'll
turn out to be. The ancient cliche of antagonists who end up lovey-dovey is
alive and well. What we cannot guess is the end where Charles and Tiffany
go to bed together, but the next morning
waitress Billie replaces Tiffany for good. Whether another improbability or
else a cynical bit of morals, the episode can make you uncomfortable.
Essentially the movie welds two familiar sub-genres: the impostor and the
not-to-be wedding. Operating in spurts and fits of unequal interest,
straining beyond belief its farcical elements, the courtroom shenanigans
can reach soporific levels. Curiously though, as  romantic aspects
increase,  the balance of the courtroom scenes improves. This is partly
caused by a mock-pathetic testimony by the enormously talented Rip Torn,
partly by Austin Pendleton (the Judge) whose series of reactions are
original, clever samples of increasing irritation.
A small saving grace is in the visuals of Nevada's landscape. The same
countryside also holds the odd sight (and site) of something like a
graveyard of toilets, the shooting of which is, for some reason, a means to
get rid of hang-ups. Perhaps there is a deep Freudian meaning to this. Or
could it be a belated homage to Lynn's compatriot Dr. Crapper who invented
the modern flush toilet?

Title
Review for Baby, It's You (1997)
BABY, IT'S YOU (1998 POV Documentary)  Directed, written, produced by Anne
Makepeace. Photography, Uta Briesewitz. Editing, Jennifer Chinlund & Anne
Makepeace. Music, Simon Kendall.  A P.O.V. release. Approcx  60 min.
The title has been previously used in a fiction feature (1983) , the story
of an inter-faith romance. It was the second movie written as well as
directed by John  Sayles, that superb independent film-maker. Do not
confuse it with the current film  that opens the 11th season (1998) of the
P.O.V. (Point Of View) documentary series airing on PBS.
The 1998 "Baby," by prize-winning film-maker Anne Makepeace, is an
autobiographical slice of life and time. Centering around Ms.Makepeace and
her Canadian-born husband, writer Peter Behrens, it includes a "supporting
cast" of their non-mainstream  (when not downright weird by conventional
standards) baby-boomer siblings.
Having reached their late forties the childless couple decide to have a
baby.  Says Anne : "At my age it's really hard to get pregnant the fun
way," so the two decide to undergo modern fertility procedures. These
become a medical micro-Odyssey involving body, mind and feelings.  I will
not reveal what actually happens (or does not ) since the film is, in its
way, a suspense story of private lives made public. There is a built-in
element of voyeurism as the filmed events proceeds, branches out into the
families and friends of Anne and Peter, provides a number of revelations.
To various degrees, the latter involve Anne's brother Douglas who, in Utah,
is planning to embark on polygamy and have 20 kids; Doug's patriarchically
bearded neighbor who has seven wives; Anne's hippie-ishly bearded other
brother Roger, a semi-recluse in Appalachian mountains with his company of
goats; uncles and aunts from prim New England; Peter's artist sister Mary
whose quandary parallels that of Anne in her first days in college; Peter's
sister Anne in Canada, and her lover Tanya as they adopt a baby.
Well shot by Uta Briesewicz, the film follows chronologically and
step-by-step the efforts, dashed hopes and new hopes of the potential
parents, shows a solid marriage, Anna's reflections on her past, especially
her upbringing.
In a sense, she, as the documentary's prime maker, is stalking her own
self, but with naturalness and no trace of play-acting, setting up
situations or staging anything.
Andy Warhol's dictum  that sooner or later everyone will have fifteen
minutes of fame is debatable. What is unarguable however, is that, as
"Baby" proves, the lives of all human beings contain at least one movie
subject.
It touches on family relationships, marriage, abortion, unexpected drama,
changing or new standards and mores. "To breed or not to breed? That is the
question." The belated decision to beget in mid-life, while not elaborated
upon, is obviously related speaks to the colossal growth (and siren song)
of professional women, to the race for success and financial security, to
the business and busy-ness of this waning century.
Other problems of Anne and her brethren can be laid on the doorstep of
their Yankee parents whose relations with their children were hardly
confidential, and for whom any mention of sex was inconceivable.
It's all there, both in text and sub-text, both in the banality of life and
its unconventionalities. To what extent viewers will be touched or
enlightened is an open question. The persons shown, including the offbeat
types, have no special interest per se. But the dilemmas of the
ever-increasing number of women who, unlike their parents and their
parents' parents, now decide to have a career first, then to try to
conceiveas their hair grows gray, are major problems of industrialized
nations in the last decades. Over and above discussions and arguments, it
is good that such such concerns be made vivid by the visual media.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Lola rennt (1998)
RUN LOLA RUN (LOLA RENNT) (Germany, 1998) *** Written and directed by 
Tom Tykwer. Photography, Frank Griebe. Editing, Mathilde Bonnefoy. 
Set design, Alexander Manasse. Music, Tom Tykwer, Johnny Klimek, 
Reimhold Heil. Animation sequences, Gil Alkabetz. Cast: Franka 
Potente (Lola), Moritz Bleibtreu (Manni), Herbert Knaup (Lola's 
father), Armin Rohde (Mr. Schuster), Joachim Krol ( the tramp Norbert 
von Au), Nina Petri (Mrs. Hansen), Heino Ferch (Ronnie). A Sony 
Pictures Classics release. 81 minutes. R (some merely "cartoonish" 
violence).
Overall applauded (but there are some naysayers too), Run Lola Run 
was probably made when its author was 32. Tom Tykwer had worked in 
TV, and in the realm of features had co-written a script, and wrote 
and directed two well received movies. Whether or not he'll prove to 
have been a "wunderkind" will depend on how much of his past output 
we can see (an unlikely occurrence) and what he will offer us next.
RLR is, at the very least, an interesting novelty, an unclassifiable 
work which is, above all, a stylistic exercise. The place is Berlin, 
though not identified as such and with no landmarks identifiable by 
strangers. Twenty-something Manni, a small-time courier for powerful 
mobsters boy is doing nicely and hopes to be promoted. But then the 
unexpected happens. Having delivered some goods to a buyer, and 
received 100,000 Deutschmarks (at this writing $ 52,356), he leaves 
his plastic bag in the subway when he makes a hurried exit to evade 
ticket inspectors. (OK, we all know that one always should keeps 
holding such loot with clenched fingers, but the film, being a 
fantasy, makes suspension of disbelief easy). If Manni returns 
empty-handed, the top mobster will doubtlessly kill him.
The panicked, hysterical young man phones his girlfriend Lola who 
asks him to wait 20 minutes until she gets there with the money -- 
which she does not have but somehow will get. She leaves her home, 
starts running, and runs and runs and runs.
She's in great physical form, but see above the part about suspension 
of disbelief. This also applies to the ground she covers in just 20 
minutes.
Manni is waiting for her outside a supermarket, which he said he 
would rob if Lola didn't get there on time. We keep track of this on 
a large clock which at the start showed 20 minutes to 12, and 
gradually, inexorably, suspensefully closes in on the fatal hour 
of12.  This is High Noon, Germanicized with a twist!
It's all over in 20 minutes. Which leaves us 60 more of film. What 
the director does with them is to start Scenario One all over again, 
work in--with meticulous and unpredictable spontaneity--small 
variations, increase them to larger ones. Then he  then backtracks 
and ends up with a different ending. The same goes for the 20-minute 
Scenario Three.
If I am cryptic it is that giving details, or even the main lines of 
the story (-ries) would be a killjoy. Especially since the movie's 
maker uses a full array of visual (and sound) tricks, from cartoons 
that connect to the action to split-screen, to pixillation, still 
shots, varying speeds, video, etc.
Lola in the running (and the stopping) process discovers a number of 
new things, mainly about her banker father and about herself. Again, 
I'll be cagey on the subject.
The Berlin of the film seems to be a sparsely populated, minor 
traffic city, which brought to my mind the title of the EricWolfgang 
Korngold opera The Dead City. I am guessing that the film must have 
been on Sundays or holidays. The relative emptiness of the sets makes 
it easy to keep track of Lola. Better yet, she can be always spotted 
by her distinctive, punkish hair painted flaming red-orange. The 
device is essentially similar to Haskell Wexler's, who made the 
classic Medium Cool (1969), a tour-de-force which dealt with the 
actual riots during the famous 1968 Democratic Convention in Chicago. 
Using a great deal of documentary footage, it inserted Wexler's 
actors in the streets and the crowds. For the audience to identify 
immediately Verna Bloom, Haskell had her wear a bright yellow dress 
that always stood out.
How much of a love story RLR may be does not get pictured by overt 
sentiments. There is just one small interlude of the lovers talking 
in bed. Otherwise, it is the extremely kinetic nature of the film 
plus the fact that Lola will do anything to save Manni.
Humor has always been an iffy aspect of Teutonic cinema. It does 
exist here however, but in indirect and/or played-down ways which do 
not get into the cuteness or broad effects that we find in much of 
American films these days. The funniest gag may be of Lola stepping 
out of a bank with a stash of stolen money and facing a regiment of 
heavily armed police. She is taken for a customer and taken out of 
harm's way by solicitous lawmen. And the last line in the movie, 
spoken by Manni, is deliciously ironical.
RLR, beyond showing the fickle finger of fate, has no real depth, 
carries no significant dialogue, no realistic or symbolic weight. But 
it is fresh and inventive, has a good matching musical score, 
excellent camera work, original editing (that's what makes the 
movie), and a fine musical commentary. It has avoided such 
smart-aleck shoals as pedantry, pretentiousness, pseudo-philosophy, 
pseudo-populism, and so on. On the surface, it is a light-weight job 
that could baffle audiences partial to well-made, well-told 
narratives. But it's also very clever.

Title
Review for Trixie (2000)
TRIXIE (2000) * Directed  and written by Alan Rudolph. Story by 
Rudolph and John Binder.  Photography, Jan Kiesser. Editing,  Michael 
Ruscio. .Production design, Richard Paris and Linda Del Rosario. 
Music, Mark Isham and Roger Neill. Produced by Robert Altman. Cast: 
Emily Watson (Trixie Zurbo), Dermot Mulroney (Dex Lang), Nick Nolte 
(Senator Drummond Avery), Nathan Lane (Kirk Stans), Brittany Murphy 
(Ruby Pearli), Lesley Ann Warren (Dawn Sloane),  and Patton (Red 
Rafferty). A Sony Pictures Classic release. 117 minutes. R. 
(language, violence, sex) At the Art
Richard Brinsley Sheridan's play "The Rivals"  opened in London in 
1775  and  introduced the now famous character of Mrs. Malaprop. The 
most recent, non-fictitious characters in the USA to cause mirth by 
mangling the English language include Dan Quayle and George W. Bush, 
but they can't hold a candle (or is it a flashlight?) to the 
character of  Chicagoan Trixie Zurbo, played by  London-born  Emily 
Watson of justified fame for her parts in "Breaking the Waves," 
"Hillary and Jackie " and other recent movies, plus British stage and 
TV.
She is 33 but looks like a recent teenager. She has no education to 
speak of,  she  chews gum incessantly. Her brother was a cop killed 
in the line of duty, so, perhaps for this reason, she has opted for 
being a security guard. But soon she goes to work as a plainclothes 
sleuth in a small casino, where she is on the lookout for thieves and 
such. She refers to herself as a "private defective." Which brings us 
to the real uniqueness of Dixie. Her speech is peppered, salted with, 
and in fact drowning in,  malapropisms. In this respect she is the 
undeniable gold medalist of twisted language, the paramount killer of 
English, the Lady Executioner of metaphors  and figures of speech..
"My sister is expecting a baby, but I don't know if I'll be an uncle 
or an aunt." "I won't let you drink yourself to Bolivian." "Fish or 
get off the pot." "He smokes like a fish." "A Parasite for sore 
eyes." "To grab the bull by the tail." "Do I have an ace up my hole?" 
"Getting your quarry by hook or ladder." "I wouldn't eat a steak if 
it came on a ten-foot pole." " "It's time to swallow the bullet." 
"Even if I am between a hard rock and the deep blue sea."  " I want 
to go back to square zero." And so on ad nauseam and absurdum.
This fractured English,  like a germ  is caught by other characters 
who say things like: "If I want your opinion, I'll give it to you." 
"The sword of Damocles is hanging over Pandora's box." "I make no 
bones, except this one," "Hypocrisy, not Democracy."
Writer-director Alan Rudolph has been an independent  with a maverick 
style since 1973. His nearly 20  films are a mixed bag, with some 
among those he was able to write and direct --as opposed to having to 
hire out to others as a director--having a nice following, notably 
"Remember my Name" (1978) and "Choose Me," (1984).  More recently 
"Mrs. Parker and the Vicious Circle" (1994)  (about Dorothy Parker 
and the Algonquin Round Table ) was exceptionally good,. wonderfully 
acted... and criminally neglected. "Afterglow" (1997) with Julie 
Christie and Nick Nolte, was quirkily interesting, but never got the 
public it deserved. The 1999 "Breakfast of Champions" bombed, with 
good reason.
Rudolph must have made a huge collection of malapropisms, and only 
then decided to build a plot around them. It centers around Trixie, 
her new, low-life boyfriend Dex,  shady operator Red, underage bimbo 
Ruby (Dex's ex, with a son by him), overage bimbo Dawn (but Lesley 
Ann Warren is quite attractive), shady Senator Avery,  friendly 
casino-performer Kirk, and other characters. They are invariably un- 
or ill-defined.
The plot somehow involves a murder, a mystery, sleuthing, politics 
and action, all of which make no sense, most of which are 
impenetrable, and the sum of which results in two painful hours of 
viewing. There is no single believable character around. Trixie is a 
dimwit. The crooked, hard-drinking and deep down stupid  senator's 
speeches may interest those who listen to them or read them in the 
media, because they are an assembly of actual politicos' speeches, 
with a healthy amount of Newt Gingrich quotes. As TRixie might spell 
it, it's a "hair-brained" movie all the way.
Rudolph was ever championed by critic Pauline Kael and the protege of 
director Robert Altman. The latter produced some of the films, 
including  "Trixie" which Rudolph calls ":a screwball noir." But 
then, just as  that hyenas think that their little ones are 
beautiful, Mr. Rudolph may be alone in thinking that the movie is 
what he says it is. In reality, it's such a mess. that it qualifies 
Rudolph as a red-faced film-maker.

Title
Review for Theodore Rex (1995)
THEODORE REX   Zero stars. [Credits follow text] 
This little PG went to market. This little PG stayed home...
That's where audiences ought to stay.
The movie is set in a vague future where dinosaurs have been 
re-bred by science. They co-exist with humans, have human 
speech, all other human characteristics and lifestyles. Whoopi 
is a tough cop. Eight-foot dino Theodore ("call me Teddy") is 
friendly. The two are partnered, with all the cliches of the 
buddy genre, for an investigation of "dinocide" that leads 
them to a dark plot.
The movie makes no sense. The the kids at whom it is aimed 
will understand what there is to understand (which is nothing) 
only if they are geniuses or morons. At the benefit show I 
went to, they did not react, just sat there or moved about, 
and bawled for popcorn or the bathroom.
There are several other critters in the movie, ranging from 
Dr.Who-ish to disembodied heads to things with glowing red 
eyes.  Whoopi is several pounds overweight. Teddy is the 
equivalent of the man in the gorilla suit but far less 
convincing than those apes. His head is way too big for his 
body. It is obviously cardboard or the equivalent, with just 
the eyes moving, and the mouth poorly synchronized to speech. 
The sets are uneven, some are poor ripoffs of the grungy look 
of "Bladerunner." The movie tries to be cute and funny. And 
tries, and tries...
I was told that Whoopi tried to get out of this film but after 
the fracas re: Kim Basinger, who had to pay a great deal of 
money for her independence, Ms.Goldberg had second thoughts. 
After looking and looking, I  could only find two references 
to writer-director Jonathan Betuel. He scripted the 1984 "The 
Last Starfighter" (kiddie stuff),wrote and directed the 1985 
"My Science Project." 
I cannot give more details about this movie, as it put me in a 
state of catatonia. 
CREDITS Written and directed by Jonathan Betuel. Photography, 
David Tattersall. Production design, Walter Martishius. 
Editing, Rick Shaine, Steve Mirkovich. Dinosaurs by John 
Criswell & Chris Finch. Music, Robert Folk. Cast: Whoopi 
Goldberg, Armin Mueller-Stahl, Juliet Landau, Bud Cort, 
Stephen McChattie, Richard Roundtree, Jack Riley, Peter 
MacKennzie, Joe Dalessandro, Edith Diaz,et al. Voices of 
George Newbern & Carole Kane. A New Line release. 92 min. 
Rated PG.

Title
Review for Grosse Pointe Blank (1997)
GROSSE POINTE BLANK (1997) *** 1/2 . Directed by George Armitage.Written by
Tom Jankiewicz,D.V. DeVincentis, Steve Pink and John Cusack, from on a
story by Jankiewicz.Photography, Jamie Anderson. Editing, Brian Berdan.
Production design, Stephen Altman. Music, Joe Strummer. Cast: John Cusack
(Martin Q. Blank), Minnie Driver (Debi Newberry), Alan Arkin (Dr. Oatman),
Dan Aykroyd (Grocer), Joan Cusack (Marcella), Jeremy Piven (Paul), Hank
Azaria (Lardner), et al.  A Hollywood Pictures release. 106 minutes. Rated
R (cartoonish violence)
John Cusack was about one-year old when the now-cultish gangster and
revenge thriller "Point Blank" was released. It starred that fine vulgarian
Lee Marvin.
The title "Grosse Pointe Blank" is a clever passepartout game of movie
references. Grosse Pointe is a luxurious suburb of Detroit; the protagonist
is a professional killer; he is played by polite, quiet  and "civilized"
John Cusack (a kid of anti-Lee Marvin); his nom-de-film is Martin Q. Blank,
"blank" as in bullet and as in "faceless and unseen hitman." The full name
echoes John Q. Public.
I was predisposed to enjoy that film, as a fan of the Evanston, Illinois
siblings John and Joan Cusack, great performers with opposite styles, his
calm and thoughtful, hers  ebullient and funny.
In my University of Michigan days, Grosse Pointe impressed me with its
wealthy lifestyle, mansions of automobile executives, yards full of
luxurious cars. It remained in my memory as a mythical place, like a
creation by F.Scott Fitzgerald. What an uncanny suprise it was when, in the
course of the movie, a cafe waitress recites a menu which contains a "West
Egg" omelet, a name straight from "The Great Gatsby"!
Big and small pleasures abound in the picture. Its weird action and
dialogue take off immediately with an outrageous sequence of cartoon-like
shootingss that itself is a takeoff  of movies about killers.The parody is
so smartly handled that it does not play for broad laughs nor in any way
feel like deja vu.
This is a  genuinely maverick film. Among its many early inventions is the
meeting of rival killers Martin and Grocer (Aykroyd), arranged via their
cellular phones. Their cars stop next to each other, but the cellular
conversation continues at a distance of five feet.  As the two men embrace
they keep one hand on their guns. Grocer's has the off-the-wall plan to
form a hitmen's union. When Martin refuses, Grocer decides to eliminate him.
Next comes the parody of advanced technology and movies where all the
electronics and gizmos work like magic. But a new hit fizzles and now
Martin also has after him the hitman of a dissatisfied client.
Parodying private-eye movies, delicious Joan Cusack plays Martin's goofy,
kinetic yet super-capable secretary and Girl Friday. When she dresses in a
jacket full of metal buttons, Martin addresses her as Sergeant Pepper. She
practically forces reluctant Martin to attend a tenth high-school class
reunion in Grosse Pointe.
The tempo is fast yet all the characters get a full treatment that, with
just canny, economical sketches,gives them essence, existence and novelty.
Martin visits his shrink Dr. Oatman (Alan Arkin). This sequence, and
subsequent phone calls, are models of efficacious playing and probably
Arkin's finest moment since his Captain Yossarian in that absurdist classic
"Catch-22."
The psychiatrist  has been told by his patient about his real profession.
Arkin is nervous, worried and subdued. Martin tells him he's going to
Detroit. The doctor sends him off with "Don't kill anybody for a few days.
See how it feels."  Martin: "I'll give it a shot."  The doctor: " No, don't
do that. Don't do ANYTHING."
By now we know that Martin is undergoing a psychological crisis and
questioning his "raison d'etre."  And that he will kill two birds with one
stone (not Oliver) by going to Detroit for a hit, and to Grosse Pointe for
the school reunion.
Why M.Q. Blank disappeared from circulation ten years ago, and why he will
attend the affair, are not spelled out. True to its wild and woolly nature,
the movie always either goes squarely for the absurd or else flirts with
it. We learn, however, that he is obsessed with Debi (Minnie Driver), and
that she was his sweetheart whom he inexplicably stood up at the senior
prom, leaving her stranded in her $700 dress.
The most satisfying side of this movie is that absolutely everything
happens in odd, different and amusing ways down to the killings or to
Martin being stalked by enemies: weird Government men acting illegally, Mr.
Grocer, plus another terminator.
Inventiveness is a principle but not a formula. It extends to the meeting
of Martin and Debi. She is the phone-in disc-jockey (apparently the whole
staff) of the alternative Radio Free Grosse Pointe (cf. Radio Free Europe).
For the class reunion she promises "an all-80s, all-vinyl weekend."
There are more setups, encounters and absurdisms in scene after scene.
Seldom underlined, they operate through strange little, eccentric,
off-kilter slants. Each situation is different from its equivalent in other
films. Like Martin in a mini-mart grandiosely called Ultimart, where he
befuddles the sole, young employee. (It turns out that this was where
Martin's house once stood). Like the store shootout where concealed weapons
exceed the firing capacity of military machine-guns. Parody here parodies
other parodies--something that is bound to fail, yet does not.
Many of Martin's meetings are low-key but keep the audience in stitches. He
encounters an old classmate who sells real-estate and has sold his
principles to the devil Money. He gives this man's clients an
out-of-nowhere sales pitch. He runs into a former teacher. The school bell
rings. "I must go now" says she, "They're playing my song."  His visit to
his dotty Mom in a retirement home is memorable in its do-almost-nothing
simplicity. At the class reunion, the former schoolmates have short, funny
and unforced lines. Cusack's timing and cool are letter- perfect.
The instant resumption of the affair with Debi is a charmer helped by her
broadcasting her feelings to all listeners, taking the initiative, sitting
an embarrassed Martin next to live microphones. This follows the familiar
structure of movies or TV episodes where two threads are used, in this case
the killer and the romance. But it is done with such novelty and
delightfully un-telegraphed moments that they take the edge off the
familiar, such as the  traumatisms of school reunions or the bloody
killings -- the latter always done with comic-book violence akin to the
surrealism of Jean-Luc Godard.
Between vigorous actions "GPB" takes potshots, throws darts at or suavely
mocks an array of people, values and situations, without any traces of
rancor. The tangled web of the plot has no major, logical guiding lines for
the audience, yet it piles smoothly joke upon witty line upon gag.
True, past the brilliantly clever first part, it is impossible to keep up
the level of interest,  pace and inventions. Inevitably, there comes the
time of "where do we go from here?" I was conscious of this, but even so,
it is no fatal illness. There's also a small problem with the dialogue.
Intelligently written, fast and often overlapping in cinema-verite style,
it  becomes sometimes hard to catch -- unlike the clear sound of the
Debi-Martin wet  kissess.
In the end-credits, a song keeps the faith with the movie's spirit. It is
"Matador," sung with Latin brio by, appropriately, Los Fabulosos Cadillacs.
John Cusack wrote the script with several Evanston buddies and cast at
least one old pal in the film. It is said that a camel is a horse made by a
committee, yet this movie breaks the rule and comes up with a Pegasus.

Title
Review for Birdcage, The (1996)
The Birdcage *** Produced and directed by Mike Nichols.
Written by Elaine May, based on the play "La Cage aux Folles"
by Jean Poiret, and the screenplay by Francis Veber, Edouard
Molinaro, Marcello Danon and Poiret. Photography, Emmanuel
Lubezki. Editing, Arthur Schmidt. Production design, Bo Welch.
Music, Jonathan Tunick. Cast:Robin Williams (Armand), Gene
Hackman (Sen.Keeley), Nathan Lane (Albert), Hank Azaria
(Agador), Dianne Wiest (Louise Keeley), Christine Baranski
(Katharine), Dan Futterman (Val), Calista Flockhart (Barbara
Keeley) et al. A United Artists release.118 mins. Rated R
(inoffensive sexual language)
In 1978, Edouard Molinaro, a French journeyman director, had
his biggest international hit with the gay-themed "La Cage aux
Folles." In 1980 he made a lesser sequel. A third "La
Cage...," weak, irrelevant and directed by Georges Lautner,
came out in 1985. 
The milking of the cash-cow through remakes and sequels is
common in the world's film industry but nowhere as frequent as
in US cinema. Hollywood, first and foremost re-does its own
movies. In second place, far outdistancing the rest of foreign
sources, comes a long list of American versions of French
movies.
It is axiomatic that, with rare exceptions, remakes and
sequels are artistically far inferior to the originals.
Box-office profits can be high, however.
This said, "The Birdcage" does a good job of Americanizing and
updating "La Cage aux Folles," and following the original's
plot almost step-by-step, down to details.
In both movies a longtime gay couple run a gay nightclub,   
respectively in St.Tropez ("La Cage") and in Miami's South
Beach ("The Birdcage").
The American pair are Armand (Robin Williams) who owns and
runs the club, and drag queen Albert(Nathan Lane),its star
performer. An unexpected big rock disturbs the peace of the
high-pitched but essentially contented pond when 20-year old
Val--Armand's accidental (and straight) son from his one and
only sexual experience with a woman,--announces that he will
marry 18-year old Barbara. It happens that she is the daughter
of Senator Keeley (Gene Hackman), R-Ohio, the very rightist
co-founder and Vice-Chairman of the Coalition for Moral Order.
The Senator is running for re-election. Suddenly he is all
over the media. His sidekick Senator Jackson, the Coalition's
President and other founder, has dropped dead in the bed of an
underage black prostitute. "Black!" exclaims Senator Keeley,
as this were the straw that broke the camel's back.
(For the French viewers of "La Cage" it was a clear reference
to the notorious case of a President of the French Republic.
In 1899, Felix Faure suddenly died in his bed while exerting
himself with a habitual guest, an upper-level courtesan. To
make matters worse, the bed was at the Elysee Palace, the
Presidential residence. The scandal, fanned by politicians,
had major repercussions--but this did not prevent a major
street of Paris and a Metro station to be named after
Mr.Faure).
Fleeing the press, Mr., Mrs. (Dianne Wiest) and Miss Keeley
drive to Florida to meet the family of Val, whose father is
vaguely described by Barbara as "a cultural attache'."
Val is the apple of the couple's eyes. He loves his father and
his "mother"(Albert) and is totally at ease with their
homosexuality and lifestyles. But the senatorial visit calls
for drastic measures, for an impossible job of camouflaging
the gays as straights. The deceits become the center of the
movie, complete with mascarades, confusions, double-entendres,
gags, jokes, and quid pro quos.
"The Birdcage" is a funny film. It opens cleverly with a long,
swooping shot that takes us from the sea, past the beach, to
the street and inside the club. Those places teem with people,
mostly minimally clad. More street shots will are added
throughout the film. They baffled me at times as South Beach
is supposed to be a gay hangout yet it gave me the impression
of being laden with straight couples too. Was this done in
order not to alienate a conservative public? To single out the
protagonists? 
After this good start comes the interior of the club, with a 
dancing drag chorus singing the interminable and dull "We are
Family." In the subsequent early parts, the tempo drags
compared to what I remember of "La Cage" but picks up fairly
soon and keeps its energy.
I felt rather uneasy with the portrayal of gays, mostly the
flamboyant, self-absorbed and self-pitying Nathan Lane as "a
screaming queen"--his own words. Think how "un-queenly"
Terence Stamp was off-stage in "The Adventures of
Priscilla..." and the cliches or caricatures in "The Bird
Cage" jump out at you. However,Lane does his shtick very well. 
There was also much more feeling and warmth in "La Cage,"
especially between the two partners/lovers and in their
rapport with Val.
The US version will no doubt delight a public that's looking
for something other than screen mayhem or dumb and dumber
comedies for mindless teens. Almost certainly it will cause an
outcry in some quarters. The first salvo has already been
fired in an interesting article by cultural critic Bruce
Bawer, in the New York Times of March 10: "Why Does Hollywood
Continue to Get Gay Life Wrong?"
Though disinclined to add fuel to the fire, I must point out
that "The Birdcage, "while true to the events of "La Cage,"
deviates in spirit. It takes something away from the French
matter-of-fact and affectionate mood, replacing it with over
the top political satire. Curiously, the understanding of gay
life in the less "evolved" and more "in the closet" days of
1978 had empathy that the 1996 "Bird" lacks. It is as though
the dates had been switched.
The no-holds-barred mocking of Senator Keeley is a
diversionary tactic that could not have been better timed,
given the nature and hollow speeches of politicians on the
campaign trail in the pre-election, 1996 United States. The
ridicule is far stronger and more topical than in the original
since in Europe, then as now, the Moral Order thing has been
seen as a risible quirk rather than the force it is in this
country.
The gap between gays and the Keeley couple is made even wider
because we seem to have dirtier minds than denizens of many
other lands. There, ordinary people leer much less than we do.
Think of the casualness with which nudity has been treated for
decades in European life and media, as opposed to the
prudishness of our film ratings, while at the same time sex is
blatantly exploited in the media for selling products and
services.
Note too than in "Bird" the outrageous Agador (the Latino male
maid) and Albert are shown as quite dumb. Still, they are
small potatoes compared to Mr. and Mrs. Keeley who, in plain
language, are plain idiots (she doesn't even know what a
cultural attache' is)... and very funny in their naivete'.
It's all most unreal, always at someone's expense. Yet here
comes the big BUT. As the Birdcagers are preparing for the
Senator's family (in impossibly record time), Val instructs
Armand on heterosexual procedures from changing the decor to
changing behavior. In turn Armand instructs Albert. Scenes
that could be or are offensive can also be very comical, as
when Albert is schooled in how to speak or how to put spread
on toast. A hilarious moment is the illustration of John
Wayne's walk, which, we realize, is weirder than we ever
suspected. 
Then, in the key scenes of the meeting of the two families,   
scripter Elaine May reaches comedic heights simply with the
Senator's attempts at small-talk. Another telling touch comes
when  Keeley learns that Val's parents are gay ...  and Jewish
to boot. His reaction: "You can't be Jewish!!!"
Verbal and physical farce distract the viewer from the movie's
more reprehensible aspects. So does the outrageous,
well-orchestrated ensemble acting. The hardest role belongs to
Robin Williams. This once, he acts well below the top, in 
rather sober, straight-man fashion. He does not conceal from
us his gayness,but he does not flaunt it.
No matter what the resistance to "The Birdcage" might be, the
movie's key and kernel lies in one fleeting sentence. Speaking
to Armand about his plans and college life, Val says:"I have a
role model. I'm the only guy in my fraternity who doesn't come
from a broken home." I wish this had been underlined by the
remake, as in the French model. 

Title
Review for Living Daylights, The (1987)
THE LIVING DAYLIGHTS (UK, 1987) ** 3/4 . Directed by John Glen. Screenplay
by Richard Maibaum and Michael G. Wilson.  Produced by Albert R. Broccoli
and M.G. Wilson. Photography, Alec Mills. Editing, John Grover &  Peter
Davies. Music, John Barry. Production design, Peter Lamont.  Costumes, Emma
Porteous.  SFX supervisor, John Richardson. Second unit director, Arthur
Wooster. Cast: Timothy Dalton, Maryam d'Abo, Jeroen Krabbe,  Joe Don Baker,
John Rhys-Davies, Art Malik, Andreas Wisniewski, Thomas Wheatley, Desmond
Llewelyn, Robert Brown, et al. An MGM/UA release. 130 minutes. PG.
Having been saturated for a year with the same "Coming next summer to a
theatre near you" clips of Bond parachuting onto the yacht of a gorgeous,
bored brunette, I knew that when the full movie did come to a theatre near
me, I would groan with the sense of deja suffered. Which I did, but then
something strange happened. By the end of the first thirty minutes of "The
Living Daylights," when beautiful but insipid Maryam d'Abo turned out to be
Bond's main femme focus, I missed the yachtwoman. By the end of the film, I
had decided that the sunning beauty had been one of the picture's main
assets.
"The Living Daylights" plays cutesy games with in-joke, allusive names:
Russian General  Leonid (after Brezhnev) Pushkin; General Anatol (after
Dobrynin) Gogol ; a professional killer called Necros ("Dead" in Greek);
Rosika Miklos (after movie music composer Miklos Rozsa?); Kamran Shah
(Vietnam transposed to Afghanistan ?);  Colonel Feyador (after filmmaker
Feyder, Fyodor Dostoievski, or what?) ; and more. Three female characters
are called Linda, Liz, and Ava. My best guess is that the one on the deck
may be Ava, whose improbable "real" name is Dulice Liecier.
The movie  did keep my interest at first, then steadily began to slide down
and away. It did not bore the living daylights out of me,nor did it live up
to expectations. Still, the initial interest is sustained by curiosity: how
will the new James Bond, Timothy Dalton, stack  up against his
predecessors? Sean Connery played Bond seven times (1962-1983); George
Lazenby, once (1969); Roger Moore seven (1973-1985).
Dalton does nicely, in a different way. Asuming that you want to socialize
with actors (not always a wise decision), Connery might be a warm, natural,
un-self-important, conciliatory companion. With his healthy,tongue-in-cheek
humor, he'd make a pleasant traveling companion. Moore would be a good
person to trade quips with during one of those marathon French meals where
taking oneself un-seriously, even using steady self-mockery, raise
superficiality to the level of an art form.
Dalton promises much as a relatively sober, even serious Bond, who
underplays his part and makes minimal concessions to smart-alecky, snobbish
remarks about  drinks, food, special needs or female  flesh. Where the
other Bonds reacted to everything with a wink or a witticism, Dalton seems
to pause regularly for a split second and look as though he were
considering the gravity and the implications of the new moment. Perhaps
this comes from his stage experience (it includes  Shakespeare).
His Bond is more work than play. Dalton's age is coyly skipped in all the
studio releases, but extrapolating from his biography I'd say that the man
is about 40. He is more physically fit than Connery or Moore in their later
Bond impersonations. Connery went  (ages approximate within one year) from
age 32 ("Dr. No") to 53 ("Never Say Never Again") doing James Bond. Moore,
from 46 to 58. Lazenby was only 30 when "On His Majesty's Secret Service"
came out, and certainly seemed fit. But the film was not a hit, unfairly,
in my opinion.
Dalton is handsome,but so were the other Bonds.Compared to aging,
post-1970s Bonds, his youthful looks contribute a more credible match
between heroes and physical exploits. But this is conventional thinking.
For many viewers, a younger Bond is an asset, but then, was there not a
special kind of satisfaction in seeing Connery and Moore, past their prime,
defeating in wiles and action hordes of younger enemies, while their mature
sex-appeal attracted, on the screen, so many younger women?
Even if we feel that Timothy Dalton, as a more businesslike, younger, and
more thoughtful Bond, rejuvenates and freshens up the series, the movie's
structure itself shows signs of age and fatigue. It  follows the basic Bond
structure: a top, action-filled pre-credit sequence on the rock of
Gibraltar,with spectacular stunts and special effects--an introduction
that's only semi-relevant to the main film, with  a message "Smiert
spionom" (Death to Spies) that doesn't connect too coherently to what
follows. Then come the  blue-chip credits by the constant Bond title-maker,
Maurice Binder. And at last the action proper gets going.
It ranges across many locations: Gibraltar, Morocco (played by Morocco),
Afghanistan (played by Morocco), Vienna (played by Vienna), Bratislava in
Czechoslovakia (played by Vienna), Czechoslovakia (played by Austria), and
England (played partly by the Pinewood studios).
The multiheaded plot sprouts subplots, like the Lernean Hydra where each of
the nine heads that was cut off was replaced by two more. It involves
spies, counter-spies, triple-crosses, scams, KGB defectors, arms dealers,
drug merchants, unholy alliances, mixed loyalties, M (Bond's "control),
phoney killings, Bond gagdetry by old Q, a new Miss Moneypenny plus many
Bondian trappings. Most of this is imaginative. Early on  it is quite
entertaining, but past the half-way mark, the mechanical succession of
chases, stunts, gimmickry and sub-sub-plots become indifferent and
confusing.
The twisty screen action and inventiveness pile up so much and so fast that
whatever conducting thread there is almost impossible to follow. An excess
of everything leads to audience stupor, with a resulting numbing and
dumbing of the public. Even within a context of fantasy, there is
incoherence in details. When, at the start, Bond attends a Bratislava
symphony concert, his tuxedo, in a socialist country like Czechoslovakia,
is as unlikely (and attention-getting) as a bikini would be in the House of
Commons. Later, in Afghanistan, the regal tent-house of the mujaheddin is
strictly out of the films of The 1001 Nights and other oriental dreams of
old Hollywood. Some of this may be camp or humor, but then it does not go
far enough.
The story itself at first seems to hesitate between a bona fide --even
serious -- international spy thriller and a typical Bond affair. This
vacillation is not unpleasant to observe as it  hints that the makers will
add to the film some of the weight lacking in recent Bonds. Yet, that's not
how things work out.
The movie eventually goes off in all sorts of flamboyant, arbitrary,
for-your-eyes-only directions. The lack of concentration is abetted by the
absence of central supervillain out to destroy the world if it doesn't
yield to his blackmail. Villainy here is not massive, but  rather like a
plot subdivision, centerless, with no unifying structure, true development,
growth or resolution. It is one long succession of dispersed--albeit well
handled and skilfully shot--special situations, with mini-climax following
micro-climax. It's like a mountain range of peaks where there's no single
height towers above the others and is the climber's ultimate conquest.
John Glen directed the last three Bond-Roger Moore pictures. He has an
overwhelmingly  "in-house" past, as editor, second-unit or action-scenes
director of earlier Bond flicks. His skill for individual  special effects
sequences, is dazzling. His ability for an overall conception of his films,
of structure and synthesis is not .To a well-plotted action film  "The
Living Daylights" is what a good stand-up comic's routine is to a classic,
sophisticated comedy or farce.
The movie floods you with a string of happenings, the way a compulsive
talker overwhelms you by talking as rapidly and loudly as possible. You
lose the point--if any--of the story, you miss the punchline, you get no
clear image of the characters, no feeling for the director as an "auteur,"
no feeling for the screen creatures as anything more than puppets.
"The Living Daylights" has been ballyhooed as the first Bond where the hero
sticks to  just one lady, whether in response to the New Continence (AIDS,
Neo-Conservatism) or for the sake of a new, more bonded Bond. This is not
precisely true, as there's  also the early,  charming presence of the
aforementioned yacht lady--but let that pass, since it is  is overall
obvious that Dalton's James is a great deal more Don Quixote than Don
Juan,with most of the typical Bond sneers, leers and horizontal innuendoes
gone.
Bully for Dalton, were it not for the choice of his paramour. Kara Milova
(Maryam d'Abo) plays a Czech cellist in a symphony orchestra. For obscure
reasons she has to double as a sharpooter. She is a clone of Nastassia
Kinski at her inexpressivest, cloyingest, and pallidest. If the new Bondian
monogamy is supposed to strike a blow for feminism too, Kara is not the
right spokeswoman: she merely plays fifth fiddle to James, and in her
passivity (during a fight she dumbly stands there for aeons before using a
frying pan on a villain) she reinforces the machoism of Bondism. There was
more feminism, for example, in  a sex-laden opus like "Never Say Never
Again" (Connery's last Bond of 1983), where gorgeous, evil ,
snake-throwing, explosive Barbara Carrera had an assertive,
initiative-taking presence that gave Connery a run for his gray cells and
his hormones.
With its lack of character development and overall structure "TLD" is less
than the sum of its parts, but it can still be fairly entertaining if you
don't expect a Bondian revolution. Some of the supporting roles are good,
notably the Dutchman Jeroen Krabbe's (he was recently the heavy in "No
Mercy") who, as the KGB defector, keeps playing roles within roles. Very
good too is the German Andreas Wisniewski (unknown to us, unless you've
seen "Gothic") as the Walkman strangler.  Both men wear their hair flat, a
sure clue that helps you spot movie villains these days.The more familiar
John Rhys-Davies (as General Pushkin) does little that stands out, but Joe
Don Baker, the corrupt yet infantile arms-and-drugs dealer, hams things up
with unbridled bliss and is like a caricature of Jonathan Winters playing a
demented General George S. Patton.

Title
Review for Nick of Time (1995)
     In the thriller NICK OF TIME, the ludicrously malevolent duo of
Christopher Walken and Roma Maffia select from a train station crowd
accountant Johnny Depp and his six-year old daughter Courtney Chase.
They seize them, put them in a van.  Depp is handed a revolver and
ordered to go to a big political shindig at Los Angeles' Bonaventure
Hotel.There he must kill California Governor Marsha Mason who is on a
re-election campaign.  It is 12:16 pm.  If by 1:30 the Governor is not
dead, Depp's child will be executed.
     Panicked and confused, increasingly desperate to find a way out,
Depp makes several attempts at warning the Governor, but they are all
foiled by Walken who is omnipresent.  Until, that is ... but I'm not
telling.
     There are five principles or guidelines or formulae governing the
thriller NICK OF TIME.  Not all of them work here but they all add
pizzazz and excitement to the movie.
     One principle is that political conspiracy is a subject so
believable that it can paper over at least some of a film's
impossibilities, especially a film like this one, as opposed to, for
instance, the far more credible THE PARALLAX VIEW.
     Another is "real time," where action and viewing time are the
same.  Then we get The Worm Turning, as Depp finds unsuspected
strength.  Fourth and fifth are The Countdown and The Missing Finger
principles.
     Real-time has been tried before, sometimes convincingly.  Alfred
Hitchcock's ROPE, an interesting experiment of ten-minute takes,
strains at the seams to make all its events fit the movie's running
time. "High Noon" does surprisingly well with its packing character
depiction and development in its 84 "real time" minutes.  The best
example I can think of is a sad one, since the filmmaker died so
recently.  It is Louis Malle's MY DINNER WITH ANDRE.
     The Countdown formula is in hundreds of movies.  Clocks and
watches, as in NICK OF TIME, in HIGH NOON, in DR. STRANGELOVE,
in war films, heist, escape, blackmail pictures and a host of other
genres, regularly show the hour and minutes as we near the H-hour.  It
is also done with digital countdown, as in director John Badham's own
WARGAMES.
     The Missing Finger comes from Hitchcock's THE 39 STEPS.  An
innocent visitor in London gets unwittingly involved in a murderous
spying plot, and has to flee.  Reaching Scotland, in a manor Robert
Donat blurts out to his polite host Godfrey Tearle that the ring-leader
has a missing finger. "Like this?" says Tearle, showing his
four-fingered hand.
     This fits Hitchcock's even larger principle of The Wrong Man, and
in thrillers stands for the most unlikely people turning out to be
villains.  In NICK OF TIME, outside and inside the Bonaventure, just
about everyone Depp meets or warns is in cahoots with the plot's
instigators.  The number of conspirators is incredible, whether they
are checkers with metal detectors or portable phones, a man videotaping
the meeting, people in the Governor's entourage, others at the highest
levels of the political scale.
     Helpless Depp goes from one "missing finger" to another.  When he
does find allies they are both African-American, which satisfies the
movie's political correctness and the greedy need for minority
audiences.  The helpers are successively a young woman then a
one-legged Vietnam veteran shoeshine man Charles S.Dutton.
     Most of the film is incredible.  Item: why doesn't Walken "wire"
Depp so as to hear everything he says?  Item: why Depp, watched by
Walken, thinks he can talk to Dutton undetected by Walken, simply by
covering his mouth with his fingers?  Item: why does Walken not notice
this?  Item: how does Dutton enlist aid so lightning fast and organize
resistance?  Item: what's the vision that Depp has, of successive
killings? Item: how is it that Maffia, trying to shoot the child at
close quarters in the van, keeps missing?
     The list is long.  But what would normally require impossible
suspense of disbelief gets nicely hocus-pocused from the very start by
non-stop suspense, fast action, breathless as well as imaginative
cinematography and editing.  The camera makes you almost dizzy with its
numerous shots, large variety of angles, close-ups, zooms that follow
the action.  The sound too plays effective tricks (from inaudible to
distant to echoey speech and noises) that reflect Depp's agitated
state.
     This a kinetic movie-movie,not an actors' film, so that the
performances are okay.  Except for Maffia's overdone nastiness, most of
the roles are underplayed, each with almost a single expression.  Depp
is Everyman in a nightmarish situation; Walken is satanic; Dutton
colorful but not in an insulting way; the several villainous roles are
properly impassive and you can tell right away whenever a new bad 'un
shows up.
     John Badham is a familiar name.  Writer Patrick Duncan is less
known, yet his credits include the Chuck Norris movie CODE OF SILENCE
(writer); the excellent 84 CHARLIE MOPIC (writer-director); the
little-seen, very good Kathy Bates starrer A HOME OF OUR OWN
(writer-producer).  Coming very soon: THE PORNOGRAPHER
(writer-director) and the Richard Dreyfus opus MR. HOLLAND'S OPUS.

Title
Review for Comedian Harmonists (1997)
THE HARMONISTS (COMEDIAN HARMONISTS) (Germany,1997) *** 1/2 Directed by
Joseph Vilsmaier. Written by Klaus Richter, based on an idea by Juergen
Buescher; Photography, Joseph Vilsmaier. Editing, Peter R. Adam. Production
design, Rolf Zehetbauer. Music, Harald Kloser. Produced by Hanno Huth,
Reinhard Kloos and Danny Krausz. Cast:  Ben Becker (Robert Biberti), Heino
Ferch (Roman Cycowski), Ulrich Noethen (Harry Frommermann), Heinrich
Schafmeister (Erich A. Collin), Max Tidof (Ari Leschnikoff), Kai Wiesinger
(Erwin Bootz), Meret Becker (Erna Eggstein), Katja Riemann (Mary Cycowski),
Dana Vavrova (Ursula Bootz), Susi Nicoletti (Mrs. Grunbaum), Noemi Fischer
(Chantal), et al. A  Mirama Disney release. In German with subtitles. 114
minutes.  R (racist violence)
A doubly welcome movie. It is very good. And it comes from Germany, a
country whose once glorious past in film took a tumble during the Nazi era,
except for a small number of movies. (Not all was propaganda then, contrary
to popular belief)
In the aftermath of World War II, German film, like much else, lay in ruins
and (always with exceptions) was undistinguished. In the 1960s, partly
influenced by the success of the French New Wave, there was a rebirth of
truly creative, high-quality, audacious productions, loosely labeled The
New German Cinema or The Young German Cinema (Kluge, Fassbinder, Herzog,
many others).But in more recent years (again with exceptions) there has
been a paucity of such works, mostly because the German public has ignored
the avant-garde in favor of commercial movies, predominantly American.
The not-strictly-commercial exceptions that found a public in Germany and
abroad have often dealt with the Nazi era, its preludes and aftermaths.
They are often fact-based too. The Harmonists fills that bill --with a
twist  Its focus is a group of musical performers, their rise and not
exactly their fall --since this would imply artistic disintegration--but
their dissolution within a barbaric political climate.
It  embraces the years from late 1927, during the Weimar Republic
(1919-1933) , through the mid-1930s, during Hitler's Third Reich.
Cinephiles may be glad to learn that the Weimar Republic's first President
was a socialist named Ebert, not Roger but  Friedrich.
It was time of all imaginable turmoil, social, political, of mass
unemployment, the newly  rich and the many newly poor. It was also a time
of amazing creativity in the arts, including the popular ones (see the
movie Cabaret). And a time of night life, daring sexuality, licentiousness
and excitement. For a while Berlin was the artistic the capital of Europe.
The movie tells,with some inventions and poetic license, the "true" story
of a singing/performing ensemble which became a huge hit in Germany and
abroad. Of late there has been a stage and concert revival in Germany and
the USA.
Among the innumerable, work-seeking starving artists is Harry Frommermann,
who is Jewish. This talented, despondent man reacts to the suggestions  of
Mr. Levy, an agent, with  "I'm not an actor, I'm a musician."  And it is as
a musician that he has a revelation on his Road to Damascus, so to speak.
He hears a recording by a black American group, The Revelers. A bulb lights
up in his head. Harry will try a German equivalent of that group. He places
a newspaper ad, selects five candidates (a pianist and four singers,
including a wonderful Bulgarian singing waiter), and forms an ensemble
which delivers German and American pop  and folk tunes in lively, precise,
harmonious and comical ways full of double-entendres and rakish allusions.
(They even have to explain to their Bulgarian member what "a growing
asparagus" stands for).
Call it an a capella group or a Teutonic variant of a barbershop quintet.
Someone eventually has the bright notion of baptizing it, in English
--except for the article-- Die Comedian Harmonists.
The film opens in 1935 Berlin, as the Harmonists, elegant in formal
clothes, now at the peak of their fame, sing on-stage the hit "Veronika" in
a version which includes one real instrument ,the piano, and several others
which the group imitates beautifully.
Flash back to December 1927, Harry's vision, the formation of the group,
their rehearsals, struggles, arguments, dissensions, tensions and all else
that leads to their acquiring their Harmonist identity. They rehearse for
six months, in sequences that are fascinating windows into musicality,
tactics and personalities. After a desperate deadline of an extra month,
the finally hit on the right formula.
Three of the six happen to be Jews. Among the others, the most forceful is
big, blond Robert Biberti. When push come to shove following a critical
audition by the then-nobodies, it is Robert who brazenly states to a
(presumably Jewish) impresario that he, Biberti, represents the financial
interests of the group. He ups the ante of the salary  with imaginary
offers. The impresario is not taken in, but plays along. He knows talent
when he sees  it. Throughout, Bob-the-Aryan's attitude is best described as
chutzpah.
The film is most adroitly edited, knowing exactly when to cut, never
allowing its scenes to overstay their welcome. It has lightness, humor,
effervescence.The singers are excellent. In reality, they do perfect
lip-synching to the sounds of  original  78 rpm recordings, magically
digitalized. It will fool you.
Past the early flashbacks the story continues with the Harmonists'
skyrocketing to fame, private lives and political situations. Bob, shown
living in a palatial suite, phones the concierge to ask for a call-girl in
the matter-of-fact way you ask for breakfast to be brought up. " Not too
voluptuous. She must look like a student trying to make extra money." But
then, there is another, real student, Erna. She works at the music store of
a charming old Jewish couple who remind me a bit of the couple in
Casablanca.
Harry loves Erna. Erna seems sweet on Harry. Then Bob too falls for Erna.
And so on. There are ambiguities about her, as in many other aspects of the
film. To what extent the details are truly biographical, I cannot tell.
However, rather than intrude into the story, those relationships and others
flesh it out and humanize the Harmonists. (The amusing fact is that the
actors who play Bob and Erna are brother and sister in real life).
What intrudes, and with a horrible vengeance, is Adolf Hitler and his
minions. The now renowned Harmonists have to face anti-Semitism, which
raises its monstrous head for the first time at a swimming pool. No doubt
this is a filmic simplification, since awareness of the problem must have
existed already --especially in artistic circles with their huge numbers of
German Jews.
On the other hand, the shock becomes a quake when Bob and Harry arrive at
the music store as S.A. men  (Brownshirts) break the glass (a prelude to
the 1938 Kristallnacht), tear up the place, abuse verbally and bodily Erna
and her bosses. The owners cannot understand this. They are Germans and
patriots, love the country, in the late war lost a son---all this will
pass, no doubt.
The thread of Jewish incomprehension runs throughout the film. I recently
saw the Spielberg-produced, Oscar-winning documentary The Last Days, about
Hungarian Jews. Like the German Jews, the Hungarians were so "assimilated"
that they could not imagine anyone harming them during World War II, and
they hardly believed the rumors of death camps. Until their turn came.
In The Harmonists, no anti-Semitism is shown within the group and their
circle. In fact, one of the men's girls converts to Judaism in order to
marry her lover. The wedding has klezmer music, enormous brio, and none of
the satire that one finds in many such ceremonies in American movies, by
Jewish filmmakers too. (This is no criticism. When you feel free, you can
afford to laugh at yourself).
During Hitler's early reign, Bob and Harry are summoned to the Nazi
Artists' Chamber. A high official points out to them that "half of your
people are non-Aryan," but, given their admirers in high places he'll try
to find a solution. Then he asks them to autograph one of their records.
Clever irony.
Soon after comes the request that the group go to the palatial home of
Gauleiter Julius Streicher, as rabid a Jew-hater as any, if not more (he
was hanged after the Nuremberg War Crimes trials). There, among a host of
uniformed Party members, Streicher requests  a folk song with lyrics by the
great Romantic poet Eichendorff. Harry gets physically sick, the others
say: "We'd be grateful if we don't have to sing this particular song."
I confess that I was baffled.I don't know what the upsetting reference is
here, nor how historically true this Streicher "invitation" was.
Racist tension mounts. An invitation to sing in America arrives. In New
York, on the USS Saratoga and elsewhere the group gives rousing renderings
of American songs and marches. The New World is like Paradise. Though most
Harmonists are tempted to stay there,they do return to Germany. There, the
audience at a sold-out concert is chockfull of Nazi uniforms. An
announcement that comes as a thunderbolt both to the dumbfounded performers
and the audience tells them that the group is now banned after this, their
last concert. The Harmonists deliver  one of their trademark "serious"
kitschy songs (about a bit of heaven, somewhere, sometime). Moved, the
public mobs them. True ? Invented?
The Jewish members, plus Erna, go straight to America. It's an historically
incorrect, simplified finale, but I suppose that their real peregrinations
(in Europe, even in Australia) before settling in the USA, would require
another half-hour of film. Not that it is long at 114 minutes. There are no
dead moments, no dull scenes. The movie has a lot more than meets the eye.
And what meets the ear is enchanting.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Uomo delle stelle, L' (1995)
THE STAR MAKER (L'UOMO NELLE STELLE) (Italy, 1991)  *** 1/2  Directed 
by Giuseppe Tornatore. Written by Tornatore and Fabio Rinaudo. 
Photography, Dante Spinotti. Editing, Massimo Quaglia.Production 
design, Francesco Bronzi. Music, Ennio Morricone.  Cast: Sergio 
Castellitto (Joe Morelli), Tiziana Lodato (Beata), many professionals 
and non-professionals. A Miramax release. In Italian with subtitles. 
113 minutes. Rated R (sex)
Behind his battered but professional  movie camera, Joe Morelli 
instructs his subjects: "Right profile. Left profile. Center 
profile." Center profile indeed! It makes as much sense as the 
streams of rural Sicilians who pose for what has been sold to them as 
a "screen test."
You know right away that they are all the victims of a fraud.  In 
postwar Sicily,  scam artist Joe covers villages and small towns. The 
phony talent scout arrives in a truck covered with Hollywood posters, 
its loudpseaker blaring come-ons. He sets up his equipment in a large 
tent, dazzles people with name-dropping ("great actors I have 
discovered") and especially with the astronomical earning of stars. 
He then offers to shoot screen tests that will be examined by a big 
film studio in Rome. " I promise nothing" says "Doctor" Morelli, but 
that won't kill any dreams.
He adds that a small service fee will be charged - 1,500 lire, which 
was about a dollar, not a trivial sum for impoverished Sicily around 
1950.
Naivete, ignorance, hopelessness propel the locals into Joe's tent, 
but there are as many diverse reasons as there are faces among the 
wannabees. And voices. Joe records them on what must have been the 
last of the wire-recorders. (Its high fidelity is astounding). He has 
them learn a sentence or two from "Gone With the Wind," which adds to 
the ludicrousness and comedy of the situation, one made even more 
enjoyable for those who know Italian and are aware of Sicilian 
speech. (When Joe thinks that the local cop is on to him, he is 
relieved to find out that the man just wants his own test, to recite 
The Divine Comedy" which he had translated into Sicilian).
Sicilan-born Giuseppe Tornatore's second big screen feature (he came 
from photography and then TV), was the splendid, Oscar-winning 
"Cinema Paradiso." It was a hard act to follow, but the next movie, 
the entirely different "Everybody's Fine," was a very good picaresque 
road film about a Sicilian widower. Tornatore then did an excellent 
episode in an omnibus film. Then, the 1994 "A Pure Formality" broke 
with the writer-director's Sicilianness, was an ambitious, 
semi-Kafkaesque failure. With "The Star Maker" Tornatore follows the 
hard act of "Cinema Paradiso" with  confidence and ease.  Not with a 
sequel but by working the downside of the movies'magic.
The film's early section is one of light irony and mockery. Yet in a 
tour-de-force that is not at all obvious, Tornatore's sensitive 
script and Castellitto's layered acting never allow condescension 
toward the subjects. Joe may be fleecing his customers, Joe sometimes 
mutters " Animals, dumb beasts, rednecks!" but at the same time he 
has soft spots and a  comprehension of the underprivileged. There's a 
duality here. Joe shoots his footage on outdated film, yet on the job 
he seems to have an odd sort of professional conscience.
Gradually, the film gets more serious as it goes from the amusing to 
the satirical to the pathetic. Joe is perceived as influential in the 
film trade. A penniless mother offers him her body, hoping to promote 
her daughter.  A man in a Mussolini hat, delivers a Duce-style 
harangue.  An aged veteran who never spoke after his return from  the 
Spanish Civil War,   suddenly finds his speech before the camera, 
and, in Spanish, speaks insultingly of Franco, lyrically of his 
"Fifth Regiment."
He is touching. Pathetic too is the gay hairdresser who states that 
all others, including bandits and women (sic) now have rights, but 
not the gays. Eventually though, this moment with Joe, this 
confession to the camera, result in courage and optimism, change the 
man's life for the better. Later too, Joe is reproached for hearing 
more confessions than any priest. But, like a priest,  he does nor 
intrude on privacy -- and some confessions may have a salutary effect.
The encounters are not mechanically plotted. Tornatore can go from a 
sad moment to an outlandish scene, as when, in an episode worthy of 
The Book of Chutzpahs,  bandits who rob Joe end up by paying him for 
screen tests. Or as when Joe must take pictures of a 
never-photographed, now dead, Mafia Don. The sendup of Mafiosi is a 
gem.
Pathos arrives again on the scene in the shapely form of Beata, 
convent-born and bred, age 15 or 18 (she doesn't know),a cleaning 
woman for many, including an older man who gives her the 1,500 lire 
for a screen test, in exchange of Beata giving him a look at her 
naked body. Joe, moved by her simplicity, shoots additional footage 
of her, as though -- in another key to the movie -- he himself took 
his scam for a reality. In intriguing ways, Beata now becomes, off 
and on,  part of Joe's life.
More travels through Sicily show the land's uniqueness and beauty, 
never postcardish,   never artsy,  but as glimpses on what is part of 
the action.
Joe's manipulation of his customers is a scaled down version of 
politics and exploitation.
He gives a ride to an educated doctor who tells him of a  whore who 
cheats villagers, as all others do, from the government to the local 
authorities. "We don't want those who sell dreams, like you, to take 
advantage of us." There's always a bigger fish that swallows the next 
size down. Soon, Joe himself uis victimized.
"The Star Maker," has superior photography  (especially in the tricky 
tent shots) and one of those scores in Italian movies that cleverly 
use American pop songs, "Stardust" in this case. Subtler, much less 
sentimental, nostalgic or audience-manipulating than "Cinema 
Paradiso," the new film will, for those reasons, not attain the 
earlier movie's popularity. A pity, since it speaks volumes on a 
specific society and its culture.
In a sense Joe's travels are like Gulliver's (but among the gullible) 
and even closer to the classic 1941 film "Sullivan's Travels"  which 
concluded  that the more miserable people are, the more they need to 
escape into fantasy. Like Joe's clients who have stars in their eyes 
and get their little moments of dreaming movie dreams.
Movie reviews by Edwin Jahiel are at : http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel 

Title
Review for Perfect Storm, The (2000)
THE PERFECT STORM (2000) ***  Directed by Wolfgang Petersen. Written 
by Bill Wittliff from the book by Sebastian Junger. Photography, John 
Seale. Editing, Richard Francis-Bruce. Production design, William 
Sandell. Music, James Horner. Cast:  George Clooney (Capt. Billy 
Tyne), Mark Wahlberg (Bobby Shatford), Diane Lane (Christina Cotter), 
William Fichtner (Sully), Karen Allen (Melissa Brown), Allen Payne 
(Alfred Pierre), Bob Gunton (Alexander McAnally III), Mary Elizabeth 
Mastrantonio (Linda Greenlaw),John C. Reilly (Murph), et al. 
Produced by Paula Weinstein, Wolfgang Petersen and Gail Katz. A 
Warners release 130 minutes.  PG-13.
On Halloween 1991 three huge, nasty, raging weather systems collided 
in the North Atlantic to produce a storm that has been variously 
called the storm of the century, the perfect storm (no callousness 
here, just a meteorologist's view) and other superlatives. It did a 
lot of damage at sea as well as on land.
Commercial fishing is a dangerous profession. In the film we see the 
real monument dedicated to the ten thousand Gloucester people who 
died at sea between 1626 and our day.
New Englander Sebastian Junger, who was living in Gloucester, Mass., 
at the time, wrote the best-selling book "The Perfect Storm" which 
focused on a swordfishing boat, the Andrea Gail, which ventured to 
sea at a risky time and eventually found itself in the eye of the 
storm.
The fishing season is about over. It has not been kind to Andrea 
Gail's Captain Tyne (Clooney) and his small crew. The boat returns to 
Gloucester after a last, unproductive outing. Most of their meager 
earnings goes to the ship owner (a political criticism here?). 
Captain Tyne decides to take a chance on a last sortie, in spite of 
the dangerously late season.
The first 40 or 45 minutes concentrate on the background,   the 
people of Gloucester, variously sketched portraits and relationships 
of the fishermen of the Andrea Gail. Given the total length of the 
film (two-and-a-half hours) my first reaction to this focus on people 
was that it was too little. My second reaction was "too much." My 
third and last one was "just right." Less stress would have 
de-personalized the characters. More stress might be forcing the 
dosage by getting too generous with psycho-sociological issues among 
essentially normal working-class persons.
When the boat takes to the ocean again and the results are not 
brilliant, the Captain decides to push his luck (or is it unluck?) by 
pushing on to a dangerous place called the Flemish Cap which is at 
the edge of the fishing map. It's taking a big chance, but "that's 
where the fish are."
The perilous venture is an adventure, but the fishing is a bonanza of 
swordfish worth a quarter million dollars. Then  the ice-making 
machine goes kaput while the weather turns very nasty. If the boat 
stays put and waits for better conditions, the haul will spoil. The 
men vote to return to port in spite of the weather -- which goes from 
bad to worse and from worse to unspeakably horrible.
The storm is the real raison d'etre of the movie. And it goes on and 
on. And it's a lulu, that is, a killer lulu. If, until it really 
hits, you thought that the film had its share of deja vu, the storm 
makes it a "jamais vu" ("never seen"). With a super-lavish, quite 
extraordinary use of special effects, tricks of the trade, digital 
manipulations, and the largest studio tank made even bigger, the 
images and their motions are stunning. While you know that it's all 
done with mirrors, you can't help getting gripped. The screen 
transports you from edge-of-the seat tension to nail-biting to 
heart-stopping reactions. Yes, it's only a movie, but its raw 
suspense gets scarier and scarier, what with waves reaching a height 
of one hundred feet, what with a pleasure craft, a small yacht on its 
way to Bermuda  also getting hit by the Revenge of Neptune, what with 
totally convincing and heroic efforts of a Coast Guard helicopter 
trying to save the souls at sea,  what with refueling the 'copter in 
the air... and much else which I will not mention.
It's funny how connections are made in one's mind. Somehow I kept 
thinking about The Cruel Sea. That was a best-seller by Nicholas 
Montsarrat, about convoy duty in the Royal Navy during WWII. A fine 
movie was made of the book in 1953, with a script by the great Eric 
Ambler.
Direct connections that the viewers can make after seeing the picture 
would be two different, very good one-hour programs on cable, one 
stressing the making of the movie, the other stressing the fishermen 
of Gloucester. And another private connection to me in "The Perfect 
Storm" is the memorial service where is sung "Eternal Father, Strong 
to Save" also known as "For Those in Peril on the Sea" which, with 
different words, was my school's song.
German-born director Petersen is good at "Sturm und Drang" (Storm and 
Stress) situations, and good too at motley people confined within one 
space. He did both with his "Das Boot" (1981) the best ever submarine 
film, with the fanciful "Air Force One," and does it here again, 
spectacularly. If he could show "Storm" in 3-D he'd have audiences 
bringing raincoats to the theater.
"Das Boot" was at first a very successful German TV miniseries, then 
became the major international hit. (It is, by the way, one of the 
most mispronounced titles in English, since it should sound like 
"boat" and not "boot").  Its success opened American doors to 
Petersen. There followed some ho-hum pictures, "The Neverending 
Story," "Enemy Mine, " and "Shattered." He bounced back with the 
thriller "In The Line Of Fire" starring Clint Eastwood back-slid with 
"Outbreak," and picked up again with "Air Force One."
Petersen is now an "American" director, but several of his earlier 
German movies, about 20  in 1967-78, mostly for German TV, were 
remarkable. I would strongly recommend "Die Konsequenz" (1977) and 
especially "Black and White Like Day and Night," (1978), starring 
Bruno Ganz in a fascinating, unusual work about obsession with chess, 
made just before "Das Boot." It is available from Facets (www. 
facets.org), the premier video source in the country. Like many of 
the earlier Petersen films it shows that he is not only an action 
director but a versatile filmmaker also interested in social, 
political, psychological and intimate subjects.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Billy Elliot (2000)
BILLY ELLIOT *** (UK) Directed by Stephen Daldry. Written by Lee 
Hall. Photography, Brian Tufano. Editing, John Wilson.  Choreography 
by Peter Darling. Production design, Maria Djurkovic.  Produced by 
Greg Brenman and Jon Finn. Cast: Julie Walters (Mrs. Wilkinson), Gary
Lewis (Dad), Jamie Bell (Billy), Jamie Draven (Tony) and Adam Cooper 
(Billy, aged 25).A Universal release.  90 minutes.  R (expletives)
The story of 11-year old prole Billy Elliot is set in a small town 
in Northeast England in 1984. It is a grungy place like all the 
mining towns we have seen in British films. The place is not just 
joyless, it is downright depressing. I suspect it always was but now 
things have hit rock bottom.  Margaret Thatcher has ordered the 
closing of many mines because they are losing money. I suppose the 
correct term is "not cost effective" -- like Presidential Elections 
in some countries.
What would a certain, big slice of British cinema --the biggest one, 
the one that deals with the working classes --have done without 
Thatcherism?  One wonders.
The miners, that is, practically all able-bodied men in the place, 
are striking. It's a violent strike which pits them against hordes 
of police, and vice versa.
Billy is a schoolboy (seen just one in his class) who loves all 
sorts of pop music. It makes him kinetic. He wiggles, jumps up and 
down and moves with agility. He lives with his striking miner dad, 
his striking miner older brother Tony, and his vague, senile 
grandma. His mother is dead and sorely missed by all.
Billy is a good kid, takes care of grandma and some household 
chores. He goes regularly to the local (and grungy, of course) gym 
for boxing lessons, This is Dad's will and his preparation of his 
son for a tough life. But the kid is not gifted in that direction.
One day, after messing up his pugilism, as he lingers in the gym 
Billy chances on a lady's ballet lesson for a bunch of little girls 
in tutus. Somehow drawn to that class, he manages to join it, and is 
not only accepted by teacher Mrs. Wilkinson, but quite soon 
encouraged, then specially coached by her. She knows that she has a 
fine dancer-to-be on her hands. And she becomes, sort of, his 
surrogate mom. She is a champion chain-smoker, which strikes an 
overdone note since she could hardly dance with the kid with all the 
stuff he inhales around the clock.
Then again, perhaps the black-lung disease, the scourge of miners, 
may have built up in the atmosphere some sort of immunity to mere 
tobacco. Go figure. 
The movie is discreet and does not push any of its elements. It 
moves at a slow but sensible, natural pace, even  languishing, if 
compared to the  frantic tempo of so many US films.
Dad is puzzled, at first worried that this is a sign of "poofiness" 
but comes to accept that the old status quo has changed.  Especially 
when, after some sturm und drang, Mrs. W. wants Billy to audition 
for the Royal Academy of Dance. Which he does, and which makes him 
officially a dancing apprentice.
In an awkward post-scriptum, 13 years later Dad and Tony see Billy 
dancing what I take to be a major ballet role in London, (pronounced 
Loundon).
Billy is as natural as they come the way he is played by Jamie Bell, 
who began to dance at age six, comes from a Northern town similar to 
that of the movie, and gives to his part a quietly original, modest 
and realistic shape.
He is a real find. The rest of the cast are very good. The movie 
flows quietly like the Don River with no sudden changes, no 
particularly spectacular dances. Yet the violent background of 
miners vs. police is ever present, as is the cul-de-sac future of 
the strikers. 
Curiously, the image that I remember best is that of the 
black-uniformed police, their transparent-plastic shields and their 
ominous sticks forming a massive line -- indeed, a wall--and 
starting to beat the shields in a way that's uncannily like the 
shield-and-spear natives doing exactly the same in "Zulu" and in 
"Zulu Dawn."

Title
Review for Fire (1996)
FIRE (Canada/India, 1996 ) **3/4 . Written & directed by Deepa Mehta.
Photography, Gilles Nuttgens. Production design, Aradhana Seth. Editing,
Barry Farrell. Music, A.R.Rahman. Cast: Shabana Azmi (Radha), Nandita Das
(Sita), Kulbushan Kharbanda (Ashok), Jaaved Jaaferi (Jatin), Ranjist
Chowdry (Mundu), Kushal Rekhi (Biji). A Zeitgeist Release. 104 min. In
English. Not rated.
A few days before I saw "Fire" (in December 1997) I watched on TV's "60
Minutes" or one of its clones a report on certain women - generally happily
married  loving mothers- who, one day, discover that they are lesbians.
In the bigger picture are women who are not, but become lesbians by
necessity, to find affection and happiness long denied to them. This is
what "Fire" is all about. It  focuses  on Indian women and is the third
feature by writer-director Deepa Mehta. She was born in Amritsar (India),
graduated in philosophy from the University of New Delhi, and emigrated to
Canada in 1973.
"Fire"  looks at a New Delhi family that is middle-class by Indian
standards, dysfunctional by western standards but normal by many Indian
traditional standards, and in the process of changing, by any standards.
The aged mother, Biji, has been paralyzed and made mute by a stroke. Her
middle-aged son Ashok owns a video store and a fast food place that is at
street  level in a house where the living quarters are upstairs. Ashok's
younger brother, the westernized (in superficial ways and for the wrong
reasons) Jatin, helps in the store. He often sells porno videos to
schoolchildren. Ashok's wife Radha is played by a beautiful superstar of
Indian movies. Then there's Mundu, the servant who shares in the cooking,
cleaning and Biji-sitting.
A fourth member recently added to the family is the young,
drop-dead-gorgeous Sita, Jatin's bride. In the clever, subject-setting
opening scene at the Taj Mahal, we see that the marriage was arranged.
Jatin's senior brother had told him something like "At your age, one should
be married" and that was that. Conform to tradition at any human cost.
Jatin doesn't give a hoot for Sita. He loves his Chinese mistress Julie, an
entrepreneurial hairdresser who won't marry him.  Sita is in for a
miserable life.
She makes friends with Radha who is unhappy because she cannot have
children. The doctors' explanation was "No eggs," which sounds like a
grocery sign in World War II rationing. In Radha's male-dominated,
traditional society, infertility is bad news both socially and as a
deprivation of joy. Rhada's sadness is expressed in discreet ways.
Sita, who quickly learns of her husband's paramour, submits to deflowering
many days after her wedding. The scene, like the rest of the movie, is
discreet yet it feels like a rape. It's a matter of time until the lovely
and simpatico sisters-in-law kiss, then  progress (with utter film tact) to
a stronger relationship. (The movie is big on the eroticism of foot
massages).
The "affair" comes at no surprise. Both women are widows, not mere
sports-widows as in North America, but love-widows. They do not "come out"
but are brought together the way some affection-seeking, lonely boys and
girls do in same-gender schools.
Radha has the additional misery of a husband who is thoughtful and decent,
but who is a kind of mystic, and the prize pupil of a swami who may or may
not be a phony.  I couldn't help singing to myself "Swami, how I love you,
how I love you, my dear old Swami." Ashok wants to reach a certain
spiritual level by submitting to temptations and resisting them. To resist
the lure of sex, he periodically calls his wife to his bed -and does
nothing. They have not had sex for 13 years, which may be fine for him but
not for Radha.
Ashok may be a good man, but when Radha starts flying with her own wings
and he tells her the habitual "Come to the bedroom. I have to test myself,"
the shocking reply is "not tonight." Later he states that "Desire gives
pain" and she counters "Without desire, life is not worth living."  The
sisters-in-law agree that men want to get pleasure but don't think of
giving it. It's the new India's voice.
When Jatin learns of the two women's relationship, he goes into a smug
forgive-and-forget speech, adds "but I won't stop seeing Julie," and
launches into praises of Julie's looks.  He tells Sita that she has two
choices: divorce him and suffer the inevitable troubles of divorcees, or
have a child. "What do you think?"
"I think you are a pompous fool." Jati is turned on by this new
independence of his "firecracker" wife.
The developments of the movie are connected rather heavily to symbolic
flashbacks to Sita's childhood ; to a day of fast by wives, so that their
husbands might live long (ironically, both women comply); to also ironical
interludes, one a dream that seems to mock standard Indian films, the other
a play of Lord/God Rama and his wife Sita's trial by fire, to show her
purity. Concludes Rama:" You are pure --but I still have to send you in
exile."
Small episodes, some subtle, others not, contribute to making this film a
feminist manifesto. At the premiere in the International Film Festival of
India, a man told the filmmaker "I'm going to shoot you, madam." The movie
shocked many middle-aged males, yet according to Ms. Mehta, the "scandal"
was not lesbianism but the feared independence of women. She adds that
overall, women, young men and old men were enthusiastic about "Fire."
There is even brutally direct criticism of other aspects of India, by a
Chinese immigrant who, during a meal with Jatin in a fancy restaurant,
deplores having chosen India instead of Canada or Australia.
The film has an excellent score but some problems with its photography.
Though much praised in some quarters, the camerawork suffers from what may
be excessive purism. Probably bent on imparting a realistic look to a
suffocating environment, it went to the extremes of avoiding reflectors and
extra lights, with the result that some scenes are unnecessarily dark or
murky.
This serious movie is dotted with comic relief, notably by the servant
Mundu. Watching porno videos, he delivers a hilarious onanistic scene. He
answers a  milkman who told him "You look weak these days," with "Perhaps
because you keep watering down your milk." But it is also the same Mundu
who, dismissed for obscene behavior but terribly anxious to retain his job
(no mean problem in India), spills the beans to his boss. This catalyzes
the film's wrap-up with a too neatly symbolic twist and unclear
non-closure.
The rhythm could have used more vigor, not to satisfy our western love of
speed, but to save time for more development of characters, even though the
statements of the movie about the old and the evolving India come through
very clearly.
The language spoken is "Hinglish" -- that colorful English adapted to India
and to local colloquialisms -- simply because it is the main language
spoken by people of a status and background similar to the movie's
personae.

Title
Review for Mickey Blue Eyes (1999)
MICKEY BLUE EYES  (1999) ** 1/4 Directed by Kelly Makin,Written by 
Adam Scheinman and Robert Kuhn. Photography, Donald E. Thorin. 
Editing, David Freeman. Production design, Gregory Keen. Music, Basil 
Poledouris. Produced by Elizabeth Hurley and Charles Mulvehill. 
Cast: Hugh Grant (Michael Felgate), James Caan (Frank Vitale), Jeanne 
Tripplehorn (Gina Vitale), Burt Young ("Uncle" Vito Graziosi), James 
Fox (Philip Cromwell), Joe Viterelli (Vinnie), Gerry Becker (Agent 
Connell), et al. 102 minutes. PG-13
The FBI, the media and statistics claim that the Mafia in America has 
finally lost its blood and is but a shadow of its former self. Maybe 
so. But the gangster genre in movies and TV is alive and well. The 
films are fiction, and from the looks of the recent Analyze This and 
the current Mickey Blue Eyes, the latest tendency is gansgster 
comedy. Not that it is a new genre. (Let me put in a plug for the 
very underrated Oscar (1991), from a French play. It was directed  by 
John Landis. Sylvester Stallone played Angelo Provolone)
Gangsters, lawmen, and historical events in films (both fictional and 
biopics)  are seldom accurate--though this does not harm the 
excellence of many productions. The recently deceased Mario Puzo made 
no bones about his books and scripts (The Godfather, The Sicilian, 
The Last Don, etc.) being imaginary creations based on research and 
not at all on familiarity with gangsters. So, from there to gangster 
comedy, the gap is not really big.
Here Michael Felgate (Hugh Grant) plays an urbane, very British 
auctioneer at a Manhattan house which tries to emulate Sotheby's. The 
start of the film is a most amusing auction of paintings, with witty 
remarks by Grant. There follows the lovey-dovey introduction of 
schoolteacher girlfriend Gina Vitale (Jeanne Tripplehorn), leading to 
a sequence at a Chinese restaurant, a comic imbroglio involving a 
fortune cookie. Grant proposes marriage. To his dismay and 
bewilderment, Gina, without giving a reason, refuses and runs off.
These preliminaries,  whatever their entertainment values, run  too 
long, muddling us, along with Grant. The plot, in a round-about way, 
has him meeting Gina's father Frank Vitale (James Caan) at the 
latter's restaurant. Michael is  too naive and dense to catch on to 
the blindingly obvious fact that Frank & Relatives & Friends are 
big-time Mafiosi. It takes an elucidation by Gina to reveal that the 
family is a Family, that her refusal comes from her conviction that, 
if she marries Michael, Frank & Co. will inevitably involve him in 
their activities.
Heroically in love and undeterred, Michael presses on, gets engaged, 
and unwittingly
becomes the recipient as well as the giver of "favors" with the Mob. 
The plot escalates into complications which involve paintings by a 
disturbed scion of the group, messy art auctions, a labor union, the 
FBI, money-laundering, a dotty rich old lady, the accidental killing 
of a Family member, quid pro quos regarding the presumed killer, and 
more. Several of these sections are funny while, at the same time, 
most of the black humor is forced. But neither the overall structure, 
nor any of  the single episodes is believable or convincing. What 
started out as a rather sophisticated reminder of the auction with 
Cary Grant in North by Northwest, is transformed into an unholy 
tangle of broad-to-blatant gags, incredible coincidences and an 
outrageously messy, confusing last act (the wedding).
In spite of feverish twists and action, the movie lacks 
verisimilitude, continuity and coherence. Sinews too,  partly because 
of its structure, partly because, in this aptly-named Simian 
Production, Hugh  Grant apes himself by playing the familiar dazed 
and confused, passive and predictable Hugh Grant, a boyish ninny as 
opposed to our recollections of the suave, appealing, active Cary 
Grant. Mickey is as far as can be from the holy simplicity of Alfred 
Hitchcock's productions.
Curiously, within the limits and confines of a silly movie (the title 
of which refers to a Midwestern mobster whom Grant is forced to 
impersonate), there are several bits of good acting. Paradoxically, 
while the Family members are caricatures and cliches to a great 
extent (at least to those of us who are not familiar with the Mob), 
there is some realism behind it all. And it is good to see again, 27 
years later,  another Mafia performance by James Caan who played 
Sonny Corleone in The Godfather.
The bottom line is that Mickey Blue Eyes is not a good movie, yet, 
mega-warts and all,  it is quite watchable, mostly for a plethora of 
gags. The visuals are fine, well supported by the profuse, ironical 
use of old Italian-American songs (vocals and instrumentals), mostly 
pop classics, with, if I am not mistaken, some contemporary Italian 
items.

Title
Review for Qiu Ju da guan si (1992)
     Qiu Ju (Gong Li) is of the stubborn stuff that some heroes or
saints are made of.  She is a farmer in an advanced state of pregnancy.
During a mild argument her husband was kicked in the groin by the
village Chief.  Qiu Ju, although worried that the kick may have made
her man infertile, is much more concerned by issues of ethics,
rationality and wounded pride.  From the Chief she wants to exact
"shuata," a word that the subtitles and the movie reviewers interpret
as "apology"--but the true meaning of which is "an answer, an
explanation, a clarification."
     Seeking redress, Qiu Ju presents testicular testimony to the local
authority, Officer Li.  Li ruling is a fine, but no "shuata," since
this "will make the Chief lose face." The Chief does pay reparations,
but by throwing twenty bank notes to the ground so that, he tells Qiu,
"you'll bow down twenty times," he adds new insults to the injury.
     Defiant Qiu takes her case to the nearby town, then to the
unfamiliar city,and finally to court.  The case of private parts
becomes one of public hearings.  Qiu's repeated peregrinations to
various localities become an odyssey through bureaucracy, hierarchies,
and arcane procedures.  In short, "Chinoiseries," a term that in art
parlance meant elaborate ornamentation in the Chinese style but later
came to also mean extravagant and useless complications.
     Zhang Yimou's previous movies were set in the past.  THE STORY OF
QUI JU is contemporary--not that you would know from its first
section:  it is set in rural China and could be taking place ten,
twenty, or forty years ago.
     THE STORY OF QUI JU, over and above its personal tale is a
fascinatingly realistic primer on Chinese life, ways, means and
interpersonal relations.  And it is also a discreetly handled metaphor
of the Chinese system of justice.
     Filmmaker Zhang Yimou treats his characters with a light and
kindly hand.Except for city dwellers overcharging the country folks,
there are no villains around.  If anything, the officials Qiu Ju
encounters are warm and friendly. They mean to do the right thing.
     But as Zhang has declared: "If you don't ask a question, nobody
will ever give you an answer.  You always have to fight in order that
something be done.  In China, you have to try twenty times, spend years
in order to solve the most minor problems.  To request that something
be done is the beginning of democracy.  With this film I wanted to say
that every Chinese should do the same: to fight for one's right and
discover oneself in the process."
     Zhang Yimou could have added that what makes his message a mixed
one and adds complexity to it is the notion that once you set something
in motion you never know how far it will take you.
     THE STORY OF QUI JU is an extremely Chinese movie, and a
marvelously ironical illustration of the famous Oriental "saving
face."  Yet go beyond the exoticism and you will find that the theme of
a man or a woman up against the administration is of all times and all
places.
     The movie manages to show, as for example in the opening scenes,
individuals standing out in the anonymous crowd, but without any tricks
of staging, camera placement or editing.  Yimou used only three or four
professional actors.  To his credit, you can hardly tell who is what.
He shot the many street scenes with a hidden camera - something that's
impossible in countries where release forms must be obtained from
anyone who just happens to get in he picture and is recognizable.
     The quiet techniques of THE STORY OF QUI JU are sophisticated.  I
am sure that Zhang Yimou knows his film history.  Like Jean-Luc Godard
he can delve on long takes but also use naturalistic ambient sound and
filmic shorthand.  He endows his movie with a special blend of humor
and pathos, but no bathos.  And when, at the end, he opts for the
Hollywood-style twist of reconciliation, he modifies it with a second,
original twist.
     The life of Zhang Yimou, China's leading filmmaker, reads like a
movie.  At 16, the Cultural Revolution put him to work as a farm hand
and as a laborer.  Photography-loving Zhang sold his blood to buy a
camera.  When the Beijing Film Academy reopened in 1978, he was 27.
Although he passed the entrance examinations, he was rejected as too
old.
     Like Qiu Ju, Zhang kept appealing, on the grounds that he had
waited and wasted 10 years during the Cultural Revolution.  Finally
accepted, he graduated in 1982.
     After that, the rise of his career justifies the much-abused
adjective "meteoric."  He made his mark immediately as an award-winning
cinematographer of major films, and also acted in movies.
     In 1988 he began to direct.  His first film, RED SORGHUM, won the
top prize at the Berlin Festival.  More awards, plus Oscar nominations,
followed for his third and fourth films, JU DOU and RAISE THE RED
LANTERN.
     THE STORY OF QUI JU won the Golden Lion (Best Picture) at the 1992
Venice Festival.  Gong Li, also the star of Zhang Yimou's earlier
films, won for Best Actress.

Title
Review for Feeling Minnesota (1996)
FEELING MINNESOTA **  Written and directed by Steven 
Baigelman. Photography, Walt Lloyd. Editing, Martin Walsh. 
Music supervision, Karyn Rachtman. Production design, 
Naomi Shohan.  Producers, Danny DeVito, Michael 
Shamberg,  Stacey Sher.  Cast : Keanu Reeves (Jjaks), 
Vincent D'Onofrio (Sam), Cameron Diaz (Freddie), Delroy 
Lindo (Red), Courtney Love (Waitress), Tuesday Weld 
(Nora), Dan Aykroyd (Ben),Levon Helm (Bible Salesman) A 
Fine Line release. 100 min. Rated R (language, sex, 
violence) 
There goes again this pesky rating by stars. Got to do it, 
but you don't have to consider it like a grade from 
Consumer Reports. Fact is that "Feeling Minnesota" can be 
so bad that it can get good, and so very dumb that it can 
become funny. Miss it, and you save time and money. See 
it, and you won't feel like sueing the theater.
This very motion-full motion pictureis one of those 
independent films that, contrary to their label, are very 
dependent. Dependent on trendiness, from Tarantinoisms 
to modish grunge. Dependent scene by scene 
improvisations: the writer-director, in his first 
feature,seems to have not the vaguest about what must 
come next. 
Dependent on neo-clicheism. Just as in hippie days the 
reaction to the bourgeois dress code led to jeans --torn 
at the knee if possible, --long hair and other 
accoutrements which became the new uniforms of the new 
conformism of revolt; just as today back to front baseball 
caps express reverse individualism, in certain movies 
studio cliches are often countered by new sets of 
statements, preferably absurd, and repeated from picture 
to picture. I won't give you specific examples. Glance, and 
you'll see them.
"FM" is, sort of, about a kind of sex-and-money trio, sort 
of, a Cain-Abel thing closer to a Cain-Cain, sort of, a 
sickish All in the Family.  A blondie,  Freddie (Diaz), in a 
sort of wedding dress, is pursued by a car. Red (Lindo), 
drags her violently to her own wedding to creepy Sam 
(D'Onofrio). Seems that Red (who is black) runs a 
strip-joint plus a drug operation. He accuses Sam, his 
accountant, of stealing money. He punishes him with that 
marriage. (Go figure). 
Sam's younger brother is Jjack, so named after a typo on 
his birth certificate --but really in one of the many 
efforts of a script straining for cuteness and novelty.  
Sam was always lording it over Jjack, as seen in the 
opening flashback of the two in their childhood. 
Jjack (Reeves) is a smalltime hood who can't stay out of 
jail. He surfaces at his brother's wedding, one that 
breathes low-class taste through every pore, assuming 
weddings have pores. This is nicely done, from 
outrageously ugly clothes to the kind of music that Martin 
Scorsese's Mafiosi love).
The brotherly antagonism has not abated. Jjack meets the 
new missus, he looks at her, she looks at him and, in a 
flash,  they rush to vigorous sex in the john. (Oddly, the 
film "Maybe, Maybe Not" has a similar scene early on). ) 
A the party, the boys' Mom keels over dead, is buried 
pronto. Immediately after the ceremony, Jjack and the 
bride re-engage in sex, boucing and unsafe since it is 
inside a car that rolls down, like Jack and Jill Went Down 
the Hill.
Up to now matters are kookily, sporadically amusing. 
These are followed by Jjack and Freddie sort of eloping 
and Sam going after them. The menu includes stealing 
stolen money, fights, beatings,a corpse that may not be 
corpse, other niceties.  Weirdly, much of the action takes 
place in contiguous places, a motel out of "It Happened 
One Night," a restaurant, etc. 
Things get exponentially looser and more unplanned. 
Freddie, an ecdysiast, dreams of joining the chorus girls in 
Nirvana, which for her is Las Vegas with its four-dollar 
steaks and other goodies. As funny a line as any comes 
when she vocalizes her desires.  Sitting with Jjack by the 
dirtier-than-in-"Diabolique," empty pool of a third-rate 
Minnesotan motel,  she yearns for the Vegas pools "with 
water in them." 
Later, in the midst of troubles, mayhem and confusion, 
Jjack returns to his and Freddie's room with a jovial "Hi, 
honey, I'm home!" which, given its usual Family Values 
context, also becomes funny. 
The main performers are good, but handicapped by all 
being idiots. Dan Aykroyd is miscast against type as a 
dishonest cop. Still,  somewhere in this salad there's the 
kernel of a possibly good idea, but it gets lost in the 
nonsense, sketchiness, incoherence and other Achilles' 
heels of the story. Many heels. Just count the characters 
and multiply by two.

Title
Review for Beach, The (2000)
THE BEACH  * (2000) Directed by Danny Boyle;Written by JohnHodge, 
based on the book by Alex Garland. Photography, Darius Khondji. 
Editing, Masahiro Hirakubo. Production design, Andrew McAlpine. 
Music, Angelo Badalamenti. Produced by Andrew MacDonald.  Cast: 
Leonardo DiCaprio (Richard), Virginie Ledoyen (Francoise), Guillaume 
Canet (Etienne), Robert Carlyle (Daffy), Tilda Swinton (Sal), 
Paterson Joseph (Keaty).A  20th Century Fox release. 120 minutes. R 
(drugs, sex)
The long e (ea) as in Beach, is pronounced by many native speakers of 
other languages (even by persons who speak fine English) in such a 
short manner that The Beach becomes the Bitch.
Leonardo DiCaprio could be DiCapriocorn. But he's the darling of 
teens, which fact is reinforced by audiences getting younger and 
younger, as do,  compared to many earlier decades, performers on the 
screen.
Di Caprio is said to have been 20 million for his role.
The movie, made by the Scottish team that gave us "Trainspotting," 
is a kind of perverse Swiss Family Robinson, all the more Swiss given 
the holes in the cheesy script.
Generation Xer Richard (changed from the book to an American) is yet 
another 20-something who's searching for himself, in Thailand. 
Bangkok, the sex-for-sale capital of the world, attracts some 
(otherwise) quite respectable adults, including couples, including 
persons with deep pockets.
It also attracts many among the Young, the Dumb, and the Druggies. 
It's like the 1960s (and some of the 70s). Hippies experimented with 
substances, got together in communes, did all sorts of non-conformist 
things. Except that when millions do  non-conformist thing they ipso 
facto adopt a new conformism.
Bangkok is (as shown or implied here) a dismal center of vices, or 
oddities such as offering tourists to drink snake blood -- which 
Richard does.
Even more dismal is the seedy (that's an euphemism) flea bag hotel 
he's staying in. There he is approached by "Daffy Duck," who seems to 
be vaguely British, is stoned out of his head, befriends Richard. 
Briefly, because he kills himself. But not telling Richard about a 
Forbidden Island not in the tourist guides. The place is Paradise, 
with all its exquisite beaches, Technicolor lagoons and stuff, and 
with enough cannabis growing to last one a lifetime. Returning to his 
so-called room after Daffy's suicide, Richard finds on the door a 
handmade map of Paradise.
He will go there, of course. And he asks Francoise and Etienne a 
French couple next door (he hardly knows them) to come along.
They make the trip. But not before Richard, who is getting dumber and 
dumber, slips a copy of the map under the door of two other 
Generation Xers. (Don't ask).
I'll skip the itinerary. By going to a legal, open-to-the-public 
island neighboring their destination, the Idiot Three manage to swim 
the waters leading to Paradise.
The first thing they see is an immensity of cannabis plants. The 
second is a bunch of sinister, heavily armed locals, whom they evade.
Next stop is a commune of perhaps two dozen non-angels. They live 
--or so they think -- an idyllic life, are sort of self-sufficient 
(but not really), play a lot, do soccer, cricket, smoke dope by the 
ton, tattoo themselves and presumably have mucho sex. But there are 
no scenes of copulation. And rather coyly, hardly any male or female 
naked bodies (where it matters). It 's no topless French Riviera. 
Absent too are: AIDS,  pregnancies, doctors, dentists, condoms, you 
name it.
 From the air (don't ask) the island looks like a lamb chop. I don't 
think this symbolizes anything. Newcomers and resident aliens are all 
constantly dumfounded by the scenic beauty of the place. There is 
even a waterfall whose top comes in handy for a Butch Cassidy 
mega-jump.
They commune-ists have made a deal with local peasants (the heavily 
armed guys) who live off the lucrative sea of grass:  the foreigners 
can stay, but never, never add new people to the commune. Why the 
locals have settled for this arrangement  makes no sense.
The commune is sort of led by a gal called Sal. Not particularly 
pretty,  thirty-something , therefore  older than the other womens, 
she is the top (and sole) authority.
The three new people are accepted. Richard and Francois become a 
twosome, to the detriment of her French lover Etienne. Richard 
becomes a hero for battling and killing a shark. (A kill-joy point 
out it was a mere baby shark). He makes a dumb "philosophical" speech 
about sharks and how to face them. (Do NOT try this at home or 
underwater).  All is hunky-dory, except that Bugs (note the 
cartoonishness of names - pure infantilism). who is Sal's man, does 
not like Richard who in turn mistrusts him.
Lisa takes off for one her periodical trips to the nearest town, 
called something like Kopenyang. I can't remember. She asks for 
Richard to go with her.  The commune people order all sorts of 
things, from vittels to body oil to cigarettes to tampons and more. 
Fact is too that the town is full of sleazy youths of all sexes, from 
the West (or the East, if you think of America) who are carousing, 
dancing, making out, drinking and doping. Richard calls his folks, at 
home. Where does the shopping money come from? Never mind.
Coincidence! It goes without saying that you've been expecting it. 
The two boys for whom Richard left a copy of the famous map are 
there, with two girls. How to prevent them from going to Paradise? 
Never mind.
Richard and somewhat spinsterish-looking Sal have sex .It is 
prudishly shown on a tent's surface like Chinese shadows. Here comes 
the great line of this cinematic masterpiece. Sal, about to go to 
sleep, tells Richard to do the same "Because tomorrow morning I may 
want some more sex."
The island starts becoming Paradise Lost  upon ther return from the 
shopping trip. Francoise smells a sexual rat (R & S), is not pleased. 
Richard lies. Someone has a terrible problem with a tooth. (or 
perhaps that was before the trip?) Two or three men are attacked by 
sharks. A survivor, horribly mauled, disturbs the Happy Family with 
his cries.of agony. So they put him in distant corner of the beach 
and resume their fun and games. In spite of abundant Christian 
symbolism (prayers, crosses, etc.) the men and women are totally 
self-centered. (Richard's compassion will however, illustrate his 
humanity. After all, he is Leonardo). The two couples with the map's 
copy camp across the water. They are a dangerous no-no.
Sal mercilessly orders Richard to guard the beach, keep an eye on the 
potential intruders, keep them away no matter at what cost. Richard, 
alone in his outpost, goes bananas, hallucinates, eat a bug, has 
visions, also goes native a la Kurtz in "Apocalypse Now," a film 
referred to more than once. But he is a sub-Kurtz. The four kids raft 
over. The farmers with automatic weapons take care of them. Oh, the 
horror, the horror.
But worry not. An exodus from Paradise finds Mr.DiCaprio alive and 
well -- well, alive anyway -- and ready for another astronomic 
paycheck.
This movie about post-hippie retards is ludicrous and unpleasant. The 
exotic photography is fine. The music is not. It loads on 
generic-romantic sounds which come up on the least provocation.
It's like the experienced person who gave this advice to a new 
director: "Whenever you don't know what to do, throw in the 
Hallelujah chorus from Handel's "The Messiah.""
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Entrapment (1999)
BY EDWIN JAHIEL
ENTRAPMENT * 1/2  (1999) Directed by Jon Amiel. Written by Ron Bass
& William Broyles, based on a story by Bass and Michael Hertzberg.
Photography, Phil Meheux. Editing, Terry Rawlings. Production design,
Norman Garwood.Music by Christopher Young. Produced by Sean Connery,
Hertzberg and Rhonda Tollefson. Cast: Sean Connery ("Mac" aka  Robert
MacDougal), Catherine Zeta-Jones ("Gin" aka Virginia Baker),Ving Rhames
(Thibadeaux), Will Patton (Cruz), Maury Chaykin (Conrad Greene), Kevin
McNally (Haas) Terry O'Neill (Quinn). A 20th Century Fox and Regency
Enterprises release. 105 minutes. PG-13
It's like a bad hair day.With high expectations you enter a newer, much
talked about beauty salon. You exit  looking terrible. Fluffy is good but
uglifying fluffy is not. You go to the movie Entrapment  in a positive
state of mind since no matter what he plays, Sean Connery is appealing
simply "because he's there" --like Everest . Also, because last July,
co-star Catherine Zeta-Jones made a strong American debut in The Mask of
Zorro.
Among more esoteric criteria, there's curiosity as to what Brit-born
director John Amiel hath wrought. His feature debut Queen of Hearts (UK)
was excellent; his next films ,U.S. made were the quirkily original Tune in
Tomorrow; Sommersby ( the remake of The Return of Martin Guerre), and
Copycat , both ho-hum; The Man Who Knew Too Little, a fizzle.
Producer-writer Ron Bass has scripted or co-authored Rainman, Gardens of
Stone, Sleeping with the Enemy, The Joy Luck Club, and more .Lately he
perpetrated What Dreams Come True. William Broyles co-wrote Apollo 13. The
reputation of the technical crew (cinematographer, designer, editor, etc.)
is solid. And it is the techs who are the real makers of Entrapment. Q: For
better or for worse?  A: for worse.
In the opening sequences, a totally masked human being dives a huge
distance from the top of a New York skyscraper down to the outside of a
large picture window. The creature uses incredible gadgetry and carries on
its body enough super-high-tech gizmos to build a Ferrari. The break-in
nets a Rembrandt painting.
Right away the outrageous gadgetry is like a warning sign to the viewer. At
first, like a yellow traffic light.  In the next few minutes it turns red.
Expectations are rapidly discouraged.
Cut to the big insurance company which will have to shell out $24 million.
Investigator Gin talks her supervisor Hector Cruz (pronounced Cruise) who
pants discreetly in the presence of the beauty, to let her go after the
thief.
Videos of an auction confirm that the robber has to be the master of them
all, the  mega- I.Q. Mac. The videos are providential, as everything else.
Nothing ever goes terminally wrong. Name the place, time, planning,
operation, method,equipment, throughout the flick all work with the
precision of an atomic clock -- and to the detriment of even a shadow of
believability. More discouragements for viewers.
In London, Gin stalks Mac, Mac stalks Gin. When they get together Gin
declares that she was the robber of the Rembrandt. "Now can be a good time
for you and I to discuss something" says  suave Connery, whose smoothness
does not extend to the English grammar. They join forces for a series of
feats-- but not feasts for our brains.
Gimmickry keeps bombarding us. It replaces what logically should have been
the step-by- step development of heists, scams and such, from conception,
to planning, to modus operandi.. We are placed before "faits accomplis."
All this involves double- and triple-crossings, mistrusts, Mac's princely
castle in Scotland, a call-box that just happens to be in view of the
mansion (Mac predictably monitors Gin's call to her boss), the reaching of
an exposition by underwater means.The duo remove their diving outfits to
appear in public in impeccable formal clothes.They perpetrate a  highest
-tech robbery of an invaluable Chinese mask. All this keeps the viewer at
arm's length, uninvolve, without a stake in the game.I have nothing against
techno-flicks, even think fondly of some, like the wrongly disparaged
WarGames. But man cannot live by computer chips alone.
The couple take off for Kuala Lumpur, in Malaysia, for what will be a
climax of a scheme of Gin's. At the start of the new millennium, via
computer strategies, big money establishments will  find themselves eight
billion (with a b) dollars lighter.
What surfaces is a) a case of aesthetic blindness. Looking at the
backwaters of the city, Gin warbles "Isn't it beautiful?" (My answer :NO!
); b) the reappearance of diverse characters, all even less than
unidimensional; c) the main action. It  takes place during the Millennium
revelry at, in, and between the interconnected twin towers of the tallest
building in the world. All this is beyond the possibilities of sane
descriptions. The phony wrap-up, a  happy ending that, while not hi-tech,
makes no sense, is strictly from hunger.
Matters are so incredible that they veer from ridiculousness to script
stupidity. I realize that this entire turmoil is supposed to be amusing,
but my funny bone was paralyzed. A few good moments are overwhelmed by the
mechanical nature of things. It's not just Missions Impossible but also
Suspense Impossible. At least, whether bored or not, the viewers won't be
offended by the picture. That's a teeny plus.
(There may be an exception, though. Actor Ving Rhames, who seems to be
Mac's main purveyor of high-tech stuff --but wait-- is, I hear, highly
principled, moral and religious. Yet he plays the movie's sole purveyor of
cascading four-letter words. It jars).
What about love and sex, you'll say? By moviedom's Ten Commandments there
has to be mutual attraction. For a change, it is made into a hesitant
flirtation, a "pas de deux" miles away from the instant bonding of James
Bond and his cuties. But then, if filmmakers go for cliches, they ought to
have the courage of their convictions. Too little time is devoted to
romance.At one point, Rhames reminds Connery "Hey, you're 60." In reality
he was 68 when the film was made, and made with an uncomfortable, secret
awareness of his true age. The couple is handled diffidently, as if with
roadsigns that warn "Dangerous Curves. Reduce Speed."
James Bond was a bedding-downer, not a lover. But 23 years ago, in Robin
and Marian, the aging, scarred, battle-weary  Robin (Connery) and the aging
nun Marian (Audrey Hepburn) gave us a splendid, beautiful, moving love
story. With a little more daring, while never talking to the mind,
Entrapment could have spoken to the heart  had it propped up its awfully
dull dialogue and un-propped the stage props.
The overwrought, cartoonish, supra-tech nature of the yarn dehumanizes
everything. By comparison, it  makes even the James Bond adventures feel
realistic and rich in characters. Here however, total and unstoppable
incoherence takes us from plain yawns to giga-yawns. It can be dangerous if
you also feel like gagging.The solution is for your brain to gag and your
jaws to yawn.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Wild Boys of the Road (1933)
WILD BOYS OF THE ROAD (1933) Directed by William A. Wellman (Wild 
Bill), a major Hollywood filmmaker among whose better movies are 
Wings (1927, on WWI fliers and romance) which received the first ever 
Oscar for Best Picture; A Star is Born (1937), Nothing Sacred (1937, 
an all-time classic screwball comedy), Beau Geste (1939), The Light 
that Failed (1939), the disturbing The Ox-Bow Incident (1943, about a 
kangaroo court), The Story of G.I. Joe (1945), Battleground (1949), 
The Happy Years (1950), Westward the Women (1951), Across the Wide 
Missouri (1951), The High and the Mighty (1954).
Wild Boys was produced by the Warner Brothers studio which was 
relatively small, but by far Hollywood's most socially-conscious and 
realistic. To this day its percentage of "serious," often grim, often 
classic films is far above those of other companies.
This is a deep Depression movie. In an unnamed, midwestern small 
town, Eddie (Frankie Darro) and Tommy (Edwin Philips) are best 
high-school chums. Tommy's life seems more affected by hard times 
than Eddie's: he has no father;  his mother ekes out a living by 
renting rooms, but is riddled with debts and menaced with eviction. 
Eddie Smith has loving parents. His father (the familiar character 
actor Grant Mitchell) seems to be one of the rare locals with a job 
at a concrete factory. Eddie is rather insouciant and even plans to 
helphis pal Tommy. But Mr. Smith gets suddenly laid off.
Eddie sells his beloved jalopy for $22 which he gives his father -- 
but still, both he and his friend are conscious that they are burdens 
on their folks.They decide to look for work by climbing on a freight 
train and join the multitude of those who ride the rails. In a wagon 
they meet a boy who turns out to be a girl, Sally (Dorothy Coonan). 
For the same reasons of unburdening her people, she's trying to get 
to Chicago and a beloved aunt.
The trip is hard. In South Chicago  railroad police and officials 
decide their fate. In some ways this reminds me of the post WW II 
movies where the Nazis select Jews at rail stops, sending them right 
(to immediate death) or left (forced labor and slower death). But 
this is 1933 and there are elements of kindness by the selectors.
Nonetheless, it's a hard life for the riders, who, in this film, are 
not adults but all boys-- except  Sally.  The three friends reach 
Chicago and the aunt who welcomes them. But in her apartment she is 
running a speakeasy (probably, since Prohibition, 1919-1933, may 
still have been in effect) and a bordello (but this is merely 
suggested fleetingly). Within seconds of the young people'  arrival 
the police raid the place. So it's back to the trains.
They wander about the midwest. Not far from Columbus, Ohio they are 
brutally (but, another point here, not sadistically) ejected, and so 
on. But Tommy loses a leg to an oncoming train.
Later the boys form a kind of community near a city dump, with a 
certain amount of organization, team spirit and efficiency. They are 
all kind to Tommy. Eddie even gets him an artificial leg.
There, and on the trains, there is a tiny minority of black kids. 
Interestingly, although the Negro boys stick together, there is not a 
whiff of racism, discrimination or enmity among the white majority. 
But again, the city police is ordered to close down the place. They 
do it without nastiness, even when the boys pelt them with stones. 
However, calling in fire hoses signals the end of this chapter.
Back on the rails, the three friends reach New York City -- where 
things come to a climax. A couple of men offer Eddie five dollars (a 
fortune!) to give a note to the cashier of  movie-house that plays 
"All Talking Pictures." Predictably this a hold-up note. The police 
come, arrest the young trio, take them to court.  Yet this leads to a 
hopeful, semi-happy ending thanks to a humane, understanding and 
helpful Judge.
The film's title is a bit misleading for today's audiences.  The boys 
are wild in the sense of wandering, outside-normal-times society. 
There's nothing wild with the meaning of nasty, brutal or bad, about 
them.
The major nasty episode (other than the lost leg) is like a quick parenthesis.
A railway police fellow finds a lone girl in a wagon and attacks her. 
I cannot remember whether this was Sally or someone else. The entire 
scene is treated discreetly so that it is not even certain that she 
was raped, although one suspects this.
The man in this case is played by an uncredited Ward Bond. Bond had 
roles, from tiny to major supporting ones, in a huge number of 
pictures. He came into his own because he was, supposedly, a college 
friend of John Wayne's, in whose pictures he was time after time.
Frankie Darro who plays Eddie never reached fame and glory, in spite 
of small roles in many films. A short fellow, to the best of my 
memory he played more than once a jockey (and a venal one) and more 
nasty guys than good ones.
Sally is played by Dorothy Coonan. She is a pretty, most appealing 
girl. Yet except for very few, uncredited bit parts, she was never a 
performer. But she did marry director William Wellman in 1933, the 
year of Wild Boys. He had been married thrice before. Ms. 
Coonan-Wellman produced seven children.
The movie is warm, carefully avoids being entirely downbeat, in fact 
leans on the side of being positive. Its realism is mitigated by a 
kind of optimism that would not turn off audiences. Yet it is still a 
solid, topical, touching and valid portrayal of disastrous days. 
(Edwin Jahiel)
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Musketeer, The (2001)
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten
 Universal Pictures/Miramax Films
 Director:  Peter Hyams
 Writer:  Gene Quintano, novel "The Three Musketeers" by
Alexandre Dumas pere
 Cast: Catherine Deneuve, Mena Suvari, Stephen Rea, Tim Roth, 
 Screened at: Sony Lincoln Sq. NYC 9/4/01
   When Rudyard Kipling exclaimed in 1889, "Oh East is East and
West is West and never the twain shall meet," he could not have
seen Peter Hyams swashbuckler, "The Musketeer,"  but
somehow he must have known that if director/cinematographer
Peter Hyams were to attempt a marriage of the Western
swordplay in the classic Dumas pere tale with Eastern
oscillations, a swift divorce would follow.  For this version of the
action drama situated in Seventeenth Century France, Hyams
seeks to put his original spin by piggy-backing on the wild
success of Ang Lee's "Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon," but
instead of employing crackerjack choreographer Yuen Wo-Ping--
who performed similar chores on "The Matrix"--he utilizes the
talents of the second-tier dance-director Xin-Xin Xiong, whose
claims to fame include jobs as stunt-and-action coordinator on
"Time and Tide," "The Blacksheep Affair," and "Double Team."
   If East does not meet West in "The Musketeer," all would not
be lost.  Unfortunately, the film is as tasteful and inspiring as a
17th Century French crepe served at Lutece restaurant in the
year 2001.  Not that swashbuckling is necessarily outdated
today, particularly when there's a whole generation of young
movie buffs who never had the pleasure of watching Errol Flynn
before he deteriorated into the murk and fog of illegal drugs,
heavy drinking and chain smoking when still in his forties,  or
Tyrone Power, who could have used his incredible good looks to
bring "Solomon and Sheba" to life had he not died in Madrid
while filming the Biblical epic.  What's wrong with this version is
just about everything: there are narrative gaps, inane
performances by actors who mumble their words as though
thinking appropriately enough in French but verbalizing in
English, poor scripting, an editing nightmare, generic music, lazy
direction, and ho-hum choreography.
   What should give the Dumas classic--as interpreted in as
shallow a manner as possible by Gene Quintano's screenplay--
its verve, its pizazz, its charm would be a more than simply perky
performance by the lead actor in the role a guy with aspirations to
become the most famous of King Louis XIII's elite guard,
D'Artagnan.  But when Justin Chambers, spotted for his more
appropriate role in Barry Levinson's "Liberty Heights," says the
most famous of Dumas's line, "All for one and one for all," the
audience would not be blamed for thinking he's talking about the
weather.  Though he has boyish good looks, he's hardly the
magnetic type that would appeal instantly to the equally
antiseptic Mena Suvari in the role of the French queen's
chambermaid, Francesca, but who was born instead to excel in
the more suitable guise of the object of Kevin Spacey's lust in
"American Beauty."  As Francesca, Ms. Suvari comes across in
this modernized adaptation as a liberated woman who, when
accidentally spotted naked in her bathtub by a blushing
D'Artagnan, teases, "Haven't you ever seen a naked woman
before?"  Yet she turns flush when D'Artagnan in a moment of
forgetfulness appears to her in frontal nudity (his back to us in
the audience) and turns around, shocked, though not without
some admiration of the man's supposed accoutrements.
   "The Musketeer" begins when young D'Artagnan witnesses the
violent death of his unarmed father, a former musketeer, in the
arms of the vicious Febre (Tim Roth--who is terrific and  the only
fellow in this film worth watching).  Vowing to seek revenge, he
gets his chance fourteen years later as a grown man seeking
admittance to the legion of the king's guards.  "The Musketeer"
turns road-and-buddy movie as D'Artagnan begins his odyssey
to Paris (the southwestern French town of Sarlat standing for the
City of Lights in the 1600's).  Meeting up with a less-than-colorful
stack of opponents, he cuts his way to the capital, searches out
Aramis (Nick Moran), Athos (Jan Gregor Kremp) and Porthos
(Steve Speirs), the most elite of the elite guards, finding them
demoralized, without commission.  Allying up with Francesca, he
moves to save the queen--who has been captured by the
conscience-less Febre.
   You come to a movie like this for swordfights, but instead of
seeing an Errol Flynn duplicating his first swashbuckling role in
Michael Curtiz's 1935 film "Captain Blood," we get the usual
MTV-style editing backed up by David Arnold's incredibly banal
score, with the result that we wonder why Mr. Chambers needed
to develop his fencing talent for a whole month as he claims to
have done.  Nor do we quite understand the role of Cardinal
Richelieu (Stephen Rea--who was a lot better in his Irish roles 
such as "Danny Boy" and "Michael Collins and in his element in
"The Crying Game").  Worst of all is the role spun out by director
Hyams for the great Catherine Deneuve, given first credit despite
her minuscule part as the queen of France--who at one point
disguises herself as a commoner, plays cards with the
unwashed, and knocks over one of her enemies with her bare
hands and legs.  Deneuve, already smarting from being woefully
miscast as a factory worker in Lars von Trier's "Dance in the
Dark," does not help her rep any in this travesty.
   Go ahead.  See the movie, then rent a video of "Captain
Blood," and watch how Errol Flynn, also in his first role as a
fencer, is shown in a better light fifty-six years ago than Hyams is
able to conjure up with all of today's special effects techniques at
his disposal.
Rated PG-13.  Running time: 98 minutes.  (C) 2001 by
Harvey Karten, film_critic@compuserve.com

Title
Review for Boy with Green Hair, The (1948)

THE BOY WITH GREEN HAIR (USA, 1948) *** Directed by Joseph Losey. 
Written by Ben Barzman and Alfred Lewis Levitt from a story by Betsy 
Beaton. Produced by Stephen Ames. Executive producer, Dore Schary. 
Photography, George Barnes. Editing,  Frank Doyle. Art Direction, 
Ralph Berger & Albert S. D'Agostino. Music, Leigh Harline. Cast: Pat 
O'Brien (Gramp), Robert Ryan (Dr. Evans), Barbara Hale (Miss Brand), 
Dean Stockwell (Peter Frye), et al. An RKO studios production. In 
Technicolor.  82 minutes
A war orphan suddenly acquires green hair and becomes a pariah.The 
film was made near the start of the Un-American Activities Committee 
(and the MacCarthyite) witchhunts. It was director Losey's 
(1901-1984) first feature.  And writer Barzman's (1911-1989) last 
work in Hollywood. Blacklisted, he continued in Europe, where soon 
Losey also exiled himself. At 1983 retrospective in France, Barzman 
said that he had been impressed by the first two Hollywood films 
against antisemitism, Crossfire and Gentleman's Agreement. Though he 
had started out to write about war orphans and the evils of war, the 
script expanded into a  fable on racism and discrimination.(For the 
producers it was also good publicity for Technicolor).
People ask, in the movie, as voice-off: "Would you like your sister 
to marry someone with green hair?"  Slowly the young hero understands 
that his peculiarity is no accident, that he is one of the chosen to 
tell the world about the horrors of war. One of his lines was "War is 
bad for children" which later became a Peace movement slogan "War is 
bad for children and all living things."  According to Barzman, 
Howard Hughes , who had bought the RKO studio, wanted Stockwell to 
add: "That's why we need the strongest army, air force and navy in 
the world," but  the young actor refused. Both Barzman and Losey had 
impressive careers abroad.
The film was produced by humanitarian-idealist Dore (i.e. Isidore) 
Schary (1905-1980) and for several years a major force in Hollywood. 
His prolific record (as producer as well as script-writer) included 
many a "liberal" movie. It was quite a contrast with the record of 
righti-leaning Howard Hughes.
At a police station cops ask a kid with shaven head to give his name. 
He stays mute. Enter doctor Robert Ryan who manages to make him speak 
after treating him to a milkshake and hamburger. The boy's story is 
told in flashback.
In World War II, young Peter's parents had gone to London to help 
children. They were killed during the Blitz. The boy was not told of 
this, but was shuttled from relative to relative, with no success. 
Finally he goes to his grandfather, former vaudevillian Pat O'Brien, 
who is very sweet and super-Irish -- though his strong accent comes 
and goes.
[We get, alas, treated to one of his singing numbers, and another one 
later, with kids in a car, as they go around collecting things for 
war relief. O'Brien is also supposed to be a singing waiter, but we 
see none of this. On the other hand, Nature Boy ("There was a boy..." 
etc) the signature song of the film, is rather corny but at the same 
time it does stay with you.]
The boy decides to stay with grandpa, is rather happy, has nice 
Barbara Hale as school teacher Miss Brand.  School walls have photos 
and posters of war relief, especially of kids affected by war. A 
classmate tells Peter that a boy in a photo looks like him. "He does 
not" says Stockwell. "Yes, he's also a war orphan like you." Peter 
has a fit, beats up the other kid,-- and is told the truth by grandpa.
He's happy again. One morning, as he is washing his hair, it turns 
green.  This curiosity makes townspeople uncomfortable. (The milkman 
loses customers as some say that the milk did it). Parents tell kids 
to shun Peter, since the green  may be catching. Kids mock him.
Miss Brand tries to help. Peter runs away, is chased by kids. One of 
them, treacherously, has him give him back his glasses, then grabs 
him). He escapes, meets a "tableau vivant" of kids from posters, 
where one tells him his hair is a mark to tell people that war is bad 
for children.
He goes around preaching this, which makes people even more 
uncomfortable. He then shaves his hair.
In many ways this low-budget movie is naive, because it is on the 
"childish" side, and, as I remember it, a bit slow. Yet it is 
undeniably touching and a big contribution to tolerance.  Stockwell 
is obviously the star; O'Brien comes second in importance; Hale's and 
Ryan's parts are small.
On top of the anti-war message, the movie opposes antisemitism, 
racism,  discrimination, and, overall, being suspicious of people who 
are "different."
Of course, in the punk days to come, green hair would have caused no 
stir at all !!!
1) Barzman had a co-writer (whom he did not mention in Paris, but 
that's par for course!). I cannot tell what the other writer's 
contribution to the script was.
2) Both Barzman and Losey were confirmed liberals -- hence different, 
like Peter. And one of Barzman's five earlier films was the fine, 
patriotic, World War II, John Wayne vehicle Back to Bataan (1945)
3) Director Losey had started with stage productions. His big hit in 
New York theater was Bertolt Brecht's Galileo Galilei, which 
--significantly-- also tells of the astronomer who was also 
"different." The Italian genius (1564-1642) among his many 
astronomical discoveries, had insisted, against Copernic's theory, 
that the earth circles around the sun. This upset the current - and 
religious - beliefs that the earth was the center of the universe and 
everything moved around it. Getting in trouble with the Church 
authorities, Galileo was forced to recant. But, it is said, on his 
deathbed he exclaimed "E pur, si muove!" ("Still, it moves!")
4) Losey went on to a multi-faceted film career in the UK, France and 
elsewhere abroad. In cinephile circles he was, and still is, 
considered one of the greatest film-makers anywhere.
5) Videos of this film are hard to find. At Chicago's Facets 
Multi-Media, my best source, it is  at this writing ( 6 October 1999) 
out of print as a sales item. But one can call (free) the rentals 
department at 1-800-532-2387 to see if this title is available for 
rent.

Title
Review for Island of Dr. Moreau, The (1996)
THE ISLAND OF DR.MOREAU ** 1/2.  Directed by John 
Frankenheimer. Written by Richard Stanley and Ron 
Hutchinson, based on the novel by H.G.Wells. 
Photography,William A. Fraker. Editing, Paul Rubell. 
Production design, Graham "Grace" Walker. Costumes, 
Norma Moriceau. Special creature and makeup effects, 
Stan Winston. Music, Gary Chang. Produced by Edward 
R. Pressman. Cast: Marlon Brando (Dr. Moreau), Val 
Kilmer (Mr. Montgomery), David Thewlis (Edward 
Douglas), Fairuza Balk (Aissa), Ron Perlman (Sayer 
of the Law), Temuera Morrison (Azazello), et al. A 
New Line release. Cinema. 105 minutes. Rated PG-13 
but can frighten many youngsters. 
One hundred years ago the visionary writer H.G.Wells 
published "The Island of Dr. Moreau" in which a 
scientist transformed animals into something like 
humans.
In 1933, the novel was  filmed as "The Island of 
Lost Souls."  The ruler of the remote Pacific Island 
was played by Charles Laughton as a merciless, 
whip-cracking plantation owner. With talented gusto, 
he hammed up his verbal and body English. The film 
was once banned in Britain for its vivisection 
scenes, tame by today's standards. According to 
historian Carlo Clarens, "Wells openly repudiated 
the picture as a vulgarization of his novel." But 
then both book and movie were more effective as 
horror than as science.  
Its director Erle C.Kenton was a prolific, minor 
figure who tried various genres, including comedies 
with W.C. Fields or Abbott and Costello, 
Frankenstein derivatives, whodunits. Some were 
pretty good  but Kenton is only remembered for 
"Moreau", his "magnum opus."
The Don Taylor remake in1977 went back to the Wells 
title, starred Burt Lancaster, lasted 34 minutes 
longer, was more serious and eager, played pretty 
well but did not dethrone its predecessor.
Now the second remake has a director who came in on 
a "troubled" picture.  John Frankenheimer was one of 
the major new filmmakers of the 1960s, with good to 
excellent films in a variety of genres and with an 
almost unbroken  string of successes : "The Young 
Savages" (with Burt Lancaster); "Birdman of 
Alcatraz";  the legendary, paranoid political 
thriller "The Manchurian Candidate";  the military 
conspiracy thriller "Seven Days in May" (Lancaster, 
Fredric March, Kirk Douglas); the WWII adventure 
"The Train" (Lancaster); the racing story "Grand 
Prix"; the haunting, sinister sci-fi rebirth 
thriller "Seconds," one of the best pictures of the 
decade and possibly Rock Hudson's top role; "The 
Fixer"; "The Gypsy Moths."  
There was a decline in the 70s, except for "The 
Iceman Cometh," "French Connection II," and "Black 
Sunday" (1977).It continued into the 80s and early 
90s, when Frankenheimer made only about six 
features.
The fans of the director were pinning their hopes on 
"Dr. Moreau." Alas, this is not a comeback movie.  
It is not bad, but it just isn't good enough either. 
In it, David Thewlis (who triumphed in "Naked") 
plays Edward Douglas, an Englishman on a U.N. 
mission and the sole survivor of a plane crash in 
the Malay Sea. (The aquatic parts and all else are 
shot beautifully by veteran, versatile master 
cinematographer William Fraker, now 73). 
Rescued by the mysterious Val Kilmer, Thewlis is led 
to the island where he becomes a guest-prisoner. He 
discovers that Nobel prize-winner Dr.Moreau (Brando) 
had been there for 17 years, after being thrown out 
of the USA by animal righters. Kilmer, his factotum 
for 10 years, is ambiguous, takes drugs, perhaps 
aspires to become the new Moreau. He gives a 
wickedly good imitation of Brando.
Moreau works with genetic engineering, creating 
beings from "animals fused with human genes," in 
search of the perfect homo sapiens. He fabricates 
horrible-looking monsters, a gallery of mutants with 
endless combinations like parts of two animals along 
the human side. He calls them "my children."  His 
only near-total  accomplishment is beautiful Aissa, 
but even she needs regular potion fixes so as not to 
regress into savagery.  
The Law of the isle is a vegeterian version of Thou 
Shalt Not Kill. Infractions, unlike in the original 
movie in which the critters were punished by torture 
in The House of Pain, are dealt with through  
electronic implants. With a touch of a button in his 
remote-control gizmo, Moreau can send a culprit 
writhing in pain. 
Soon, the frightened, disgusted Douglas, along with 
the frightened and illogical Aissa (doesn't she know 
that without her doses she'll revert to a beast?) 
try to escape and are caught. Then the beast-people, 
do the Spartacist thing and revolt... Then Douglas 
discovers files and vials with his name on them. 
Then....
The movie is rich in visuals and effects, many of 
them splendidly computerized.  But they are 
counter-productive in their excess. Past the 
well-handled first part, you can't see the forest 
for the trees, the continuity becomes messy,  many 
incoherences enter the film. Metaphors abound--the 
expected ones like "Don't tamper with the work of 
Nature," "Don't fool with evolution," "There is a 
beast inside each human." Yet more specific 
connections to our waning century's crucial issues 
of DNA, gene-splicing and the like, are buried under 
the confused/confusing script. 
What is new and positive are the movie's funny 
aspects, whether planned or not.  Marlon Brando is a 
hoot. His first public appearance is in a 
Brandonmobile, the analog to the Popemobile. Sitting 
high, looking like a Kabuki Buddha, a Deity with a 
huge tent-hat and veils, Marlon even blesses his 
flock from above. Perhaps the filmmakers also had in 
mind a Rajah nodding to his subjects from atop an 
elephant? 
Brandon, thinking that his Moreau is allergic to 
heat and sun rays, convinced Frankenheimer that 
because of the destruction of the ozone layer, the 
doctor's  face had to be marmeladed over with a 
white, oozy sunscreen. A howl. That's not all. 
Moreau's mumbo-jumbo explanations are 
tongue-in-cheek. Outrageously and ludicrously 
delivered, they're quite comical.
We wonder where all this state-of-the-art medical 
and electronic equipment came from, and was bought 
with what money? But 
leaving logic in the Malay Sea, we can enjoy every 
single scene with Brando. He sits at a grand piano, 
with his smallest "son" (a dwarf's dwarf in size-- 
how did they do it?) at a child's piano that belongs 
to the Guinness Book of Records as the minusculest 
functioning grand ever. Together they tinkle away a 
four-hand rendition of Chopin's Polonaise No 6. They 
are very pleased with themselves. 
Later, when the now carnivorous humanoids invade the 
room and bang on the pianos, Moreau, trying to 
soothe them, tells them that the sounds are most 
interesting: "Reminds me of a man called 
Schoenberg... 12-tone music." He proceeds to attempt 
calming the savage breasts with Gershwin's "Rhapsody 
in Blue."
Watching this re-remake you seesaw between high camp 
and monstrosities, including a scene that brings to 
mind Nazi crematoria.  Animal lovers will be 
saddened at the moral and physical uglification of 
beasts. When Moreau's Law ceases to work, it's the 
law of the Jungle that prevails, but by now we all 
know that this law, once maligned, is an exquisitely 
complex, beautiful construct.
The movie could use much more simplification on one 
hand, subtlety and complexity on the other, instead 
of ending up as just a Grand Guignol spectacle. 
Still, Brando's screen time is worth the price of 
the ticket. In French, super-artists are called 
"sacred monsters." That's what Brando still is, 
especially here.

Title
Review for Man Without a Star (1955)
MAN WITHOUT A STAR (1955)  Directed by King Vidor. Written by Borden Chase
and D.D. Beauchamp from the novel by Dee Linford. Photography, Russell
Metty. Editing,Virgil W. Vogel. Art, Alexander Golitzen, Richard H. Reidel.
Music, Joseph Gershenson.  Cast: Kirk Douglas, Jeanne Crain, Claire Trevor,
William Campbell et al. 90 minutes.
King Vidor was a major figure who even in his lesser films invariably had
very fine moments, mostly of stress. These were photographed with powerful
use of camera angles, swooping shots, and imaginative juxtaposition of
sight and sound.  "Man Without a Star" is a case in point, and though not
at the top of the Western-filled 1950s (a period that tried to bring new
depth and scope to the genre), it does a most creditable job of a fairly
familiar situation.
Easygoing rider Dempsey Rae ( Kirk Douglas), an ambulant cowboy, takes a
greenhorn kid (Campbell) under his tutelage, to his (Dempsey's) future but
only temporary sorrow. He gets involved in a war between Open Spacers and
Barbed Wirers.  He hates the wire which "is catching up with me again."
The movie is uneven, has contrived parts, prettified situations, and one of
those awful 1950s openings where balladeers or crooners (in this case
Frankie Laine)  sing awfully, miserable  songs with miserable lyrics.
The barbed-wire, don't fence-me-in  symbolism  is heavy-footed.  But there
are many gratifying aspects:  much convoluted, tense and  tight action with
original twists and moments  The camera work is beautiful. Director of
photography. Russell Metty did three fils for Orson Welles: "The
Magnificent Ambersons,"(with two other cinematographers), the visually
amazing "Touch of Evil, " and "The Stranger." Some of his other credits
include Howard Hawks' "Bringing Up Baby," John Huston's "The Misfits," and
"Spartacus" for which Metty was awarded an Oscar.
As for Kirk Douglas, his part and performance are variants of something he
can do blindfolded, the role of the champion who won't bend.
Jeanne Crain, the female lead, was primarily a sweet thing or a pretty
ingenue. Her filmography is a mixed bag, her roles were on the thin side
--with one outstanding exception:  in Elia Kazan's "Pinky," a sensitive,
gripping, courageous and pioneering drama released in1949.  Crain  played
Pinky, a very light-skinned black girl who passes for white. Otherwise, in
much of her work I find beautiful Jeanne seldom fully convincing or
interesting.
In "Man Without a Star" her unexpected casting  as an opportunist -- even
her first name, Reed, is masculine -- is original  and works out rather
well.  The supporting cast includes such  reliable character actors  as
Richard Boone, Jack Elam and Jay C. Flippen. Other female parts went to the
excellent, earthy Claire Trevor and to the exotically named Mara Corday.
The latter  worked almost exclusively in B-films, (to put it charitably,
since many were C-pictures)  In "Man" her performance may or may not be
notable, but the movie itself was the best she ever appeared in. (Edwin
Jahiel)

Title
Review for żQué he hecho yo para merecer esto?!! (1984)
WHAT HAVE I DONE TO DESERVE THIS? (Que He Hecho Yo Para 
Merecer Esto?)(Spain,1984*) Written and directed by Pedro 
Almodovar. Cinematography, Angel Luis Fernandez. Art 
direction, Pin Morales, Roman Arango. Editing, Jose Solcedo. 
Music, Bernardo Bonezzi. Cast: Carmen Maura, Angel de 
Andres-Lopez, Veronica Forque, Gonzalo Suarez, Chus Lampreave, 
Juan Martinez, Miguel Angel Herranz, Amparo Soler Leal, Luis 
Hostalot. A Tesauro and Kaktus coproduction, released by 
Cinevista. In Spanish with subtitles. 100 minutes. No rating.
Pedro Almodovar, who has been emerging in the 1980s as the 
naughty boy of Spanish cinema, may baffle you with WHAT HAVE I 
DONE..., but he will also amuse you and instruct you. The 
film's mixed-genre is  something that unsettles habitues of 
commercial spectacles. Although our desire to classify what we 
see makes us wonder where exactly this movie fits (from scene 
to scene--and within scenes --it swings from farce to drama 
and from comedy to tragedy), the unorthodox effects build up 
into a coherent absurdist whole, somewhat like a play by 
Eugene Ionesco.  
Gloria is a woman in her thirties. She would be attractive 
were she not so harried. She lives in a  cramped apartment 
within a monstrous low-cost housing development. Co-existing 
around her is a gallery of individuals, each of whom is    
outrageous in a different way, each of whom is worked into the 
plots and subplots of the movie. 
There's Antonio, the chauvinist pig taxi-driver husband who is 
hung up on German songs by Zarah Leander (the darling of the 
Nazi era) ; who has a talent for imitating handwriting; who 
once forged some letters of Hitler to a mistress, when he 
(Antonio) was a chauffeur in Germany and sleeping with his 
lady employer. 
There's the older son who deals drugs and the younger son who 
goes to bed with his classmate's father. There's Antonio's 
stingy old mother (played with filmic effrontery by a young 
woman in opaque glasses) who's hung up on sweets and mineral 
water ("with  lots of bubbles") and sells part of her stock to 
her son, as needed. 
Across the hall is sexy Cristal, Gloria's only friend and a 
whore. Another neighbor is a seamstress who hates her former 
husband and takes it out on her cherubic little girl. The 
child has telekinetic powers.
If movies had a face, this one would have a deadpan 
expression. In a series of off-the-wall crises, the film 
proceeds imperturbably, treating the most outlandish or 
immoral events in casual fashion. Ill-husbanded Gloria, long 
on household slavery and short on household  money, also works 
as a cleaning woman. She pops uppers to steady her nerves. As 
the picture opens, she has a sexual encounter of the LAST 
TANGO IN PARIS school. Later, one of her husband's fares who 
also  happens to be one of Cristal's clients, hires her for 
himself and his brother. The man is a failed writer whose wife 
is another failed writer as well as  a kleptomaniac. He 
hatches a plot involving Antonio and another Nazi forgery. His 
brother,  a psychiatrist who ought to be seeing a 
psychiatrist, counsels an impotent police inspector who is in 
and out of everyone's life.  
Gloria lets a pederastic dentist adopt her junior  son so that 
the youngster may have a better life. Grandma adopts a lizard 
and baptizes him "Money," the most important thing in life. 
That's only part of the criss-crossings where each individual 
gets by hook, crook , or  arbitrariness, involved with several 
others, but is hardly involved in any concern for others. It 
takes a while for us to  sort things out  in those concentric 
circles, to realize that the shifting  center of the movie is 
Gloria, to see  that the main point is a feminist one about 
the still-unliberated woman in Spain. Women may have come a 
long way since Franco died, but they still have a much longer 
way to go.
Almodovar, performer, cartoonist, writer and filmmaker, 
conducts his movie like a series of  mad  yet cool 
improvisations. WHAT HAVE I DONE.... may remind you in some 
ways of  underground features, of the work of   American 
director Paul Bartel, of  gonzo journalism, of the dark humor 
of Bunuel and other Spaniards, but it is essentially an 
original work.  
The French New Wave--by now old  but staging a welcome 
comeback via contemporary  imitators in Britain and 
elsewhere--may also come to mind, with for example, 
Almodovar's   asides on top of asides. Some of those are 
obviously relevant. Others are indirectly relevant, like the 
very funny parodies of  neo-Hispanic TV commercials which 
comment on the ludicrousness of the media and the way they 
stultify the public. Others yet (like a man who makes car 
noises) look like inventions that were too good to pass up--so 
why not throw them in? 
As you watch this film, you may go through different stages, 
including one where you think that there's overkill, but keep 
going and the purposes of Almodovar's exaggerations fall into 
place. Paradoxically, as matters become increasingly surreal, 
social criticism becomes increasingly real. I will not reveal 
all the ins and outs of the plot, but when a hambone and 
police investigators get involved, not only does this in with 
the opening sequence in a "kendo" (martial arts) academy, but 
also with a once-famous black humor story by Roald Dahl, first  
printed in the New Yorker magazine many years ago.* 
In keeping with  its subject(s), the film has  provocative 
tastelessness at times, and always a voluntarily garish look, 
from the amateurish  opening credits in strong, primary 
colors, to its defiant use of unsophisticated lighting 
set-ups.  The closing shots of the building complex may or may 
not be a reference to Godard's  denunciation of soulless 
low-cost housing and living in his film ONE OR TWO THINGS I 
KNOW ABOUT HER. But anyone who knows European public housing 
will see the validity of those simple, emblematic images. 
In speech and deed,  there's much bawdiness, with parodistic 
sex scenes and Rabelaisian glee at bodily functions and 
references to them. The subtitles try much too hard to render 
the Spanish slang  into English slang, with unintentionally 
funny results and misspellings: you get sonny for Sony, smak 
for smack, nitwuit, or cryptic things like " my j'ug." 
WHAT I HAVE DONE is not a "finished" product by ordinary 
standards. I say this as a compliment to its 
convention-defying nature ,  to its maverick power, the method 
in its madness, and the consistently ironical view of a world 
which is askew. 
It is certainly one of the most interesting films shown in the 
US in 1988.     
 -------------------------------------------------------
Review written in 1988. 
* 1996 addenda: 
(1) Many sources in US film guides give it erroneously a 1985 
release date. 
(2) The Roald Dahl story and/or its main trick found their way 
into TV programs of the Alfred Hitchcock Presents type, as 
well as in features. 

Title
Review for Mallrats (1995)
     The most imaginative part of MALLRATS comes with its opening
credits, which are blatantly sexual comic book pictures--and that's
not too imaginative either.
     The biggest laugh in MALLRATS, from an audience of 11-12-year-olds
assembled in rows 15 and 16, came when the two protagonists-buddies
consult a fortune teller who bares her top and exhibits three nipples.
(Number Three, of course, is a fake, but the boys are taken in).  Even
then, it was only size 4 or 5 laughter on a scale of 1 to 10.
     The view of American youth in MALLRATS tries to be funny, which it
isn't.  It might have been a satire of slackers and mall culture but it
isn't that either.  It's plain dull and just a series of nails in the
American coffin.
     The filmmaker is Kevin Smith, whose feature writer-director debut
was CLERKS, an original, plotless comedy of people in and around a
convenience and a video store.  The absurdist, slice-of-life,
desultorily conversational and pointedly scatological CLERKS was a hit,
though I had my reservations about it.  MALLRATS, done in the same
spirit and with some of the same actors (Smith himself playing Silent
Bob), is a flop.
     It has something of a plot, vague and disjointed.  T.S. (notice
the scatology of the name) (Jeremy London) has been dumped by his
fiancee Brandi (Claire Forlani) for reasons too dull to mention.
Brodie (Jason Lee), has been dumped by his girl Rene (Shannen Doherty)
because, in bed,  he is more interested in video-games than in sex.
(Let's not even talk about love).  The two men (men?) find solace in
doing what any red-blooded idiots will do.  They go to the Mall.
There, a subplot has them trying to sabotage that day's forthcoming
game show, a kind of Dating Game, which is produced by Brandi's father,
a youthful but bald creep.
     The movie's comedy is below sitcom level, the dialogue, action and
characters are of no interest, except perhaps to people under twenty
with a mental age under six.  Since those people neither read film
reviews nor put any credence in adult judgments, MALLRATS might just
have a career, even though it is exceptionally thin and dull in every
way.
     The best that can be said is that, at the mall, Smith places a fat
young man who stares at a sort of pointillist painting which, looked at
with concentration, reveals a sailboat.  But the poor fellow stands
there and stands there and can't see a thing.  Not a bad gag, though
thoroughly milked.
     Another "funny" item is about a fifteen-year old girl who is
presumably so bright that she's a senior.  She is writing a book about
orgasms and researches by sleeping with men right and left and
videotaping the activities.  Her language is raunchy even by  Kevin
Smith standards, standards that use the alphabet from the A-word to
perhaps some Z-word, though the N-word is not heard.
     The fun and games are uncoordinated and slipshod.  The film might
have used updated Marx Brothers strategies instead of applying a
para-CLERKS style which relies on frail crutches instead of tempo,
energy or the occasional witticism.
     There are also other inconsistencies.  In her letter of
resignation, so to speak, Brodie's girl lists his defects.  Brodie
thinks that "callow" is the only nice thing in the letter, yet he will
occasionally use a hi-fallutin' word.  We also think for a long time
that Brodie and Co. are high-schoolers, but are told at the end that
they are college students.
     Somehow, comic-book author and icon Stan Lee shows up, gives sage
advice to Brodie.  It might have been amusing, it is merely
artificial.  And here and there are tentative take-offs, but these do
not take off.

Title
Review for G.I. Jane (1997)
In his June 18, 1997 Champaign-Urbana, IL News-Gazette column titled "A
Smooth Name Switch," editor Tom Kacich wrote: "Miami University in Oxford,
Ohio, is named in honor of the Miami tribe of American Indians, which gave
up the rights to most of their Ohio homeland in a 1795 treaty. Most of the
approximately 1,700 Miami now live in Oklahoma."
After a series of name changes, in 1928 Miami U. began calling its athletic
teams Redskins. In 1972, a formal resolution by the tribe  reinforced an
already existing relationship with the University. But times and
perceptions change. Last July, the tribe sent the school a new resolution,
politely asking for the discontinuance of the name Redskins by the end of
academic year 1996-97.
Within three months the Trustees had accepted the suggestion. Soon after, a
new nickname, RedHawks, was adopted. No fuss, no muss, no bother. Civility
on both sides.
By comparison, the Chief Illiniwek case at the University of Illinois has
been a battleground for some time. This is the main (but by no means
parochial) subject of the excellent film "In Whose Honor," a new entry in
the high-quality P.O.V. (Point of View) series of non-fiction films by
independent filmmakers -- the kind of series that would probably have never
materialized were it not for PBS. (Last week's amusing P.O.V. was about the
maverick, now admired now ridiculed filmmaker Henry Jaglom).
It airs on WILL-TV  at 7 pm, Tuesday July 15.  At  8 pm, simulcast on
WILL-TV and WILL-AM 580 radio, comes a Talking Point follow-up discussion
--and no doubt, argumentation -- with comments by guests and call-ins. It
will be a hot time in the old town that night.
The documentary is being broadcast nationally. In addition to its general
importance, it has many levels of appeal for our community. It is topical,
it was mostly filmed here, Jay Rosenstein (its maker as  producer,
director, editor, co-cinematographer, chief bottle washer) is a UIUC
graduate. Still at the University, he teaches at the National Center for
Supercomputing Applications and is also a multimedia producer. Long may he
stay with us.
"American Indians are human beings, not mascots," is one of the refrains
that sum up the film as well as the feelings of many -- Indian or not --
across the nation, who have been successful in having several sports teams
abandon their Indian nicknames and paraphernalia.
The Illiniwek "cause celebre," slowly caught fire when Charlene Teters, a
Spokane Indian, came to the UIUC campus in the late 1980s as a graduate
student in Art. Soon after, she took her children to an Illini basketball
game. The mother and the children were dismayed, shocked and upset by the
dancing-prancing-twirling Chief Illiniwek.
Attractive, articulate and eloquent  Ms. Teters, is often on camera,
describing lucidly how and why she and many others feel that the Illiniwek
type of activities, symbols, regalia, mascots plus many inauthenticities
are blows to Indian pride and self-esteem as they constitute non-respect of
important rituals.
In interviews with American Indian personalities, we even learn that
genuine drumbeats are like heartbeats and not as conceived by Hollywood. (I
believe that what popularized the phony beats was the outrageously kitschy
"Indian Tom-Tom" sequence in the 1936 Jeanette MacDonald-Nelson Eddy hit
film "Rose Marie," from a famous operetta. This hit movie has to be on TV
these days since Jimmy Stewart had one of his early roles in it).
The documentary has many scenes that were started some years ago, as it
followed on the Urbana campus the outraged, originally unsupported
Charlene. She ran a one-person campaign against the Chief, picketed games,
spoke of the demeaning the Native Americans. Though shunned, even vilified
by some students, she went on doggedly, insisting that since symbols of
Indian culture meant so much to the Indians, they ought not to be treated
lightly, as entertainment.
There is much coverage of the situation, including a person at a football
game who, reacting to the pressures to eliminate Chief Illiniwek, states
that  "People shouldn't cave in to out-of-state foreigners."
No one caved in among the Trustees, the alumni, the fans or the officials.
The Trustees, like Susan Gravehorst (one of the participants in Talking
Point), wisely are not presented as insensitive foes of Charlene, but as
sincere partisans of the status quo. Mrs. Gravehorst cannot imagine how the
Chief "who deports himself with such dignity and such solemnity ... can be
perceived as a racial insult or slur." The Chiefs themselves are pleasant,
clean-cut fellows, also convinced that their "characters" actually honor
the Indian people.
The controversy is followed in detail, in ramifications that include
financial aspects,  politics, shifts by the U of I attitudes. It gets
amplified as Charlene becomes a  national leader in the cause, and is seen
in rallies and protests in other cities where games use Indian names and
symbols.
The common-sense solution is that while most pro-Chiefers are honestly
persuaded that their opponents are wrong and far too touchy, so long as a
clear majority within an ethnic minority feel so strongly and do not
consider themselves honored,  so long as abolishing the Chief does not
wound persons or institutions, the fracas could be ended quickly and gently
with the stroke of a pen. Remember Miami.

Title
Review for Deep End of the Ocean, The (1999)
THE DEEP END OF THE OCEAN (1999) ** 1/2 .Directed by Ulu Grosbard. Written
by Stephen Schiff from the novel by Jacquelyn Mitchard. Photography,
Stephen Goldblatt. Editing John Bloom. Production design, Dan Davis. Music,
Elmer Bernstein. Producers, Kate Guinzberg,Steve Nicolaides. Cast: Michelle
Pfeiffer (Beth Cappadora)), Treat Williams (Pat Cappadora),Whoopi Goldberg
(Detective Candy Bliss), Michael McElroy (Ben), Ryan Merriman (Sam), Cory
Buck (Vincent at 7), Jonathan Jackson (Vincent at 16), Alexa Vega (Kerry at
9), Michael McGrady (Jimmy Daugherty), John Kapelos (George Karras),Tony
Musante (Angelo), Rose Gregorio (Rosie), Lucinda Jenney (Laurie), John
Roselius (Bastokovich), Brenda Strong (Ellen), K.K. Dodds (Theresa) et al.
A Columbia release. 105 minutes. PG-13
Since eyes are so important (The Mirrors of the Soul, said Ingmar Bergman,
in his most quoted line), I've been focusing on them and putting them in
categories for people in the public eye: strabistic, exophthalmic, small,
beady eyes etc.
The largest group deals with strabismus (cross-eyes), a condition which is
mostly found among actresses and, interestingly enough, often gives them a
sexy look. Karen Black, Madeleine Stowe,Jenny Jones,Geraldine Fitzgerald,
Virginia Mayo (micro-strabistic), Frieda Inescort, Norma Shearer, Jane
Greer, Dyan Cannon, Sandy Dennis, Barbra Streisand, Madeline Kahn, Nanette
Fabray, Juliette Lewis, Lauren Hutton, Rachael Lee Boggs ( She's All That,
1999) and others. Among the men we find Leslie Howard, Lima Nelson,
Christopher Lambent, Michael, Burt.
I won't go into the other classifications, except to say that this study,
subsidized with millions in governmental and private grants, is still in a
preliminary stage. Its tiniest category is "crying eyes." I have been able
to come up only with two actors: Sylvia Sidney.in older times; and Michelle
Pfeiffer in this generation.
Ms Pfeiffer is a wonderful actress and a beauty with class. I've always
sensed that her eyes were sad--and not only in moments that call for
sadness. Over and above screen parts and moods, I am sure that the eyes had
it.
The whites of her eyes are tinged with pink. So are the eyelids. Given her
attractive features, Ms. Pfeiffer gets a lot of close-ups.Time and again,
she looks like someone who is about to cry or has just finished crying.
The Deep End of the Ocean confirms this.Beth (Pfeiffer), is what makes the
movie with her unending sadness. I was continuously conscious of the pink.
Beth, a freelance photographer,is the happy wife of restaurateur Pat. They
have three children: Vincent, 7; Ben, 3; baby girl Kerry. They live in
Madison, Wisconsin. The year is 1988.
For a high school reunion of the class of 1973, Beth drives to a Chicago
hotel with all her brood.There, in the packed, high-decibel lobby, she goes
to register after leaving the younger kids in the care of the 7-year old.
When she returns, Ben has vanished. In spite of able police -- men and
women under the high-ranked Candy (Whoopi Goldberg),-- of volunteers,
posters and eager efforts, the three-year old is never found.
The portrait of a devastated family, with Beth as the central focus, is
powerful. Pfeiffer's despair is entirely convincing, totally wrenching.
>From bleeding --metaphorically--from all her pores she falls into a near
indifference which at times skirts catatonia. Beth is at the point where
she almost goes off the deep end -- which does not, however, justify the
dull title of the novel and of the film.
The family unravels, not in major, theatrical ways, but deeply nonetheless.
A typical scene has Beth in her bedroom, oblivious that the baby is crying.
Vincent goes to help the infant. But on his way out he pushes a vase that
crashes on the floor. Dysfunction follows duty.
Nine years later, the Cappadoras are now in Chicago where Pat opens a new
Italian restaurant. Vincent, at 16, is a rather bad, sullen boy, even
dislikable -- until you consider his peculiar family circle. Beth, still
doleful-looking, seems to have recovered somewhat, She's resumed some of
her photography.
Here begin the improbabilities. Sam, an unknown, 12-year old neighboring
boy, nice and polite, shows up, offering to mow the Kappadora's lawn. Beth
almost immediately recognizes him as the vanished Ben. She takes pictures
of him. With a speed that would make Kodak happy but puzzle photographers
who work out a basement darkroom, she develops the photographs, juxtaposes
them with old ones of Ben, and voila! Proof positive.
It turns out that Ben had been abducted by an unstable friend of Beth's (I
got a bit confused here), who then married nice Greek-American George
Karras. She later committed suicide. But Sam loved his "mother" and his
adoptive father. When the authorities ascertain that Sam is Ben and return
him to his biological parents, the young boy is not happy. Nor is George
who adores the kid and is as devastated as the Kappadoras were back in
1988.
(Incidentally, between Madison '88 and Chicago '97 Michelle Pfeiffer,
though a little more gaunt, has not changed or aged a bit!)
The Ben-found part is followed by Ben-lost-again as he sneaks back to
George Karras. In Act IV however, the boy, upon reflection, returns to the
Kappadoras, at least for now. It's a mixed picture: no guarantees, no
commitment on his part, no closure to the saga.
What's involved in these off-on proceedings strikes me as the result of
having a script that unavoidably shortens the original, a hefty,
best-selling novel. The cuts sometimes lead to choppiness and
simplifications.
On the other hand, I like the fact that the director does not invest in
excesses of sentimentalism. Belgian-born Ulu Grossbard has been a
successful stage director who occasionally makes forays into motion
pictures. His first feature, The Subject was Roses (1968) was a fine
adaptation of a Pulitzer prize winning play. His third, Straight Time,
starred Dustin Hoffman as a paroled convict in a milieu of powerful
supporting actors. It was impressive. True Confessions, Falling in Love and
Georgia were not hits but each had remarkable elements.
To  bring  together the rebellious Vincent and the confused Ben,  the film
uses as fact and metaphor, driveway basketball competition. The young men
are very good as players (actors) and as players (ball). The device works
well  -- yet I'd have to see the movie again to decide whether this is a
clever gimmick or a true dramatic touch.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for In the Company of Men (1997)
IN THE COMPANY OF MEN *** 1//3.  Written & directed by Neil LaBute.
Photography, Tony Hettinger. Editing, Joel Ploch. Music, Ken Williams,
Karel Roessing. Cast: Aaron Eckhart (Chad), Stacy Edwards (Christine), Matt
Malloy (Howard), Jason Dixie (intern) et al. A Sony Classics release. 93
min. Rated R (language,sexual aspects)
You don't need special effects or the supernatural to make a horror movie.
"In the Company of Men" is perhaps he most horrifying film of the year, yet
it's all done with naturalism, minimalism and three main characters in
"real" though anonymous sets.
The plot is diabolically simple. Ten years out of college, two old
classmates work for an unspecified firm's headquarters in an unspecified
city as junior or middle executives. We meet them in an airport lounge, one
of those bland, anonymouss, faceless spaces where business people can be
found. The anonymity applies throughout to buildings, offices, cubicles,
restaurants, etc., not to mention dark suits and white shirts. One of the
men is Chad, who looks like one of those cookie-cutter ex-Joe College
"boys" that some people go for --but then some people also go for Joe
Camel. The other is Howard, shorter, vaguely nerdy-ish, wearing glasses. He
outranks Chad in the firm.
They are waiting for the plane to take them for a six-week stay at a branch
of their outfit, in a non-specified city. (F.y.i. the end credits thank
Fort Wayne, Indiana). Howard is nursing an ear bitten, it  would seem, by
his now alienated fiancee (or perhaps wife). The movie does have the nasty
habit of trying to be so coyly generic, in the special sense of "this can
apply to anyone, anywhere," that it  can get counterproductive. It
distracts the viewer by holding back bits that, if given,  would not have
tainted the "purity" of the script.
Chad is a misanthrope, a hater of everything he can name, from the
machinations of the world of business to his stab-you-in-the back
colleagues to ...you name it. He is also someone who seems to think of
himself as a Don Juan, and is a misogynist seducer. (That's no
contradiction by many interpretations of Don Juan). Right now, he is
seething because it would appear (note how prudently I phrase this) that
his current girl friend has jilted him.
At the airport and on the plane, working himself up to a sickly level of
fury, he hatches a plan and enlists the less polemical Howard's
collaboration. To take their revenge on women, they should cast around for
a good subject during their six-week tour of duty, both of them seduce her,
then discard her. "She'll be reaching for the sleeping pills within a week
and you and me, we'll laugh about this until we're very old men." This is
like extermination camp talk by the SS.
 Howard, albeit less sanguine, goes along. At the new work-place, their
victim is spotted: Christine, a pretty temp typist who has been deaf since
age eight but can speak haltingly, slowly, with those special intonations
of deaf persons.
The men go to work on her, dating her without letting her know that they
are colleagues. Chad turns on the charm, or what passes for charm, while
ridiculing the woman's speech to his buddy. Awkward Howard is more polite
about her yet at first shows subtle lechery. After he has complimented
Christine on her looks, heating her say she has a sister, he knee-jerkily
pops the question: "You have any pictures?"
Back at the office, it's all friendly talk with miscellaneous colleagues
and badmouthing the same as soon as they're out of the room. Politics
reign. Hypocrisy and insecurity reach Mach 3. Sexist jokes abound. Cruelty
to man and women is the order of the day (and the week, and the years). To
put it simply, the two men are crude,callous louts. Could many other men be
far behind?
The movie is the first film effort by Neil LaBut, a known playwright. In an
interview he has made some statements that prove to me how differently
creators and critics can interpret things. "The film has a lot of laughs."
I didn't see any, riveted as I was by the nastiness on the screen. "Then
the situation turns vicious. I love the idea of pulling people in and
turning on them. For instance, seducing them into thinking that Chad is
amusing and even charming, only to leave them shocked when they discover
later just how much of a viper he really is." I can't see this. Chad is a
sickening fellow from the start. You don't have to wait for him to
humiliate a black trainee, or to cheat in business matters on his pal
Howard to realize this.
The film's structure calls for seven divisions, from Week One through Week
Six, plus A Few Weeks Later. Each section fades to black and the next one
is announced by aggressive, ominous, indeed scary drum beats. The camera
remains mostly static, with shots that often distance us from the subjects.
This may be partly the result of a tiny budget of $25,000, if you believe
the information, which one should generally not do with low-cost
independent productions, since the smaller the sum announced the more
admiration is engendered. But there is also a stage strategy, Brechtian
perhaps, to keep the villains at arm's length.
As the seductions or tentative relationships proceed, there is much
ambiguity about who may be sincere or not, and there develops definitely an
unforeseen situation which leads the men to lie to each other.
More, I will not reveal, but take my word for it, it is very well handled
and, as the trend goes of late, without real closure. It was a hit at the
last Sundance Festival, even as many hated its characters, although the
news of "very controversial" seem like hype for the more logical "very
discussed."
The casting and acting by the lead thespians, not big names but
experienced, is superior. Stacy Edwards, who is not deaf, gives a terrific,
tour-de-force performance, quiet and entirely convincing
I am a bit confused by the penultimate sequence, when the now demoted
(courtesy of his buddy) Howard visits Chad in his new apartment and where
something to do with decamped girl friend Suzanne comes up. But setting
aside iffy spots, the movie is a powerful indictment of certain men and
above all of the mentality that our cutthroat world generates within a
corporate society (note the word "company" in the title) where the goal,
from Academe to Politics to Zoos, is "get there, keep  the job and climb
the ladder, no matter how." That's the sad story, not of Chad and Howard,
but more generally of Calvin Coolidge's dictum " The business of America is
business."

Title
Review for Family Man, The (2000)
THE FAMILY MAN (2000) ** Director, Brett Ratner. Writers, David 
Diamond, David Weissman. Photography, Sante Spinotti. Editing, Mark 
Helfrich. Production design, Kristi Zea. Music, Danny Elfman. Cast: 
Nicolas Cage, Tea Leoni, Don Cheadle, Jeremy Piven, Saul Rubinek, et 
al. A Universal release. 125 minutes. PG-13.
Another Opera (with suds). Its  Overture.is in 1977 at  Kennedy 
Airport. Jack (Cage) is off to a one-year internship in a major 
London  bank. The camera  focuses on him and his girl Kate. (Leoni) 
as the mike picks up their gloppy kisses in surround-sound stereo. 
Kate has premonitions, begs Jack not to leave--but he does.
Jump ahead 13 years. Kate is out of the picture. Jack is a 
mover-shaker on Wall Street, Ferrari-driving, chic, fast-talking, 
authoritarian. He's  called a meeting on Christmas eve to finalize a 
financial coup.
Next morning, he wakes up in his regal apartment with a beautiful 
call girl at his side. She departs. He greets the day joyfully, 
bellowing atrociously the aria "La Donna e mobile," selecting his 
suit from a enormous collection of  priced-through-the-roof outfits.
Later he goes to a convenience store in which bum-like Cash (Don 
Cheadle.) irrupts to redeem his winning lottery ticket. Accused of 
having doctored it he goes wild, pulls out a gun. Jack intervenes and 
makes a deal with Cash. (Cheadle is very good, as is the whole 
sequence). The bellicose fellow will turn out to be a sort of angel 
whose  mission is to give Jack the chance to see what other road he 
might have taken.
The morning after Jack wakes up in a tatty house in a New Jersey 
suburb.. It is his house, complete with wife of 13 years Kate ( 
hardly aged) and kids. He labors at his father-in-law's tire store, 
consorts with working-class people, has a K-Mart. wardrobe. etc. Is 
this a fall  from grace?
The Family Man's schlock for the holidays is a feelgood fantasy in 
the lineage of excellent movies like It's a Wonderful Life, Here 
Comes Mr. Jordan, the latter's remake Heaven Can Wait (with Warren 
Beatty), plus a slew of others, some good some bad. The genre is 
crowd-pleasing but tricky to make and as delicate as thin crystal.    
Hours before this movie's preview I had watched Cocteau's enchanting 
Beauty and the Beast which has its own, its fairy-tale logic. But The 
Family Man is a juggling act, awkward, often trite, with a plot that 
keeps painting itself into corners.  The screenwriters must have had 
long bull-sessions about what to do next (which is a mess) and how to 
wrap things up (which is even messier).
Jack, conscious of both his lives, hates everything about his "new" 
one and his semi-blue collar existence. Yet this milieu of "little 
people" is supposed to be a good life, while that of the tycoons is 
bad.           
Story holes come in avalanches. Just one example. Kate is a 
low-income lawyer with social consciousness. She does pro bono 
(uncompensated) work for those in need. But since both she and Jack 
graduated from Law School, whatever turned him into a tire salesman?
You can bet your life that Jack will falling love with Kate and the 
kids. But then he wants to have his cake and  eat it, which tangles 
matters artificially and makes our suspension of disbelief grow 
exponentially.
There are some good (and/or funny) bits, including the couple's young 
daughter who  thinks that Jack is not her father but an 
alien clone--shades of the Invasion of the Body Snatchers  (Lite). 
But the tortuous plot and deja vu, by-the-numbers performances, are 
more for viewers who think "movies" rather than "cinema." --and 
that's not a snobbish remark. Cheadle's role is much too short and 
vague. Nicolas Cage is an actor I like, but I have the feeling that 
he has accepted too many roles that encourage a sameness in 
performing them. Here, in a variant of the (apocryphal?) judgment for 
Fred Astaire's first screen test, the verdict might be: "Can't sing. 
Can't dance. Can act a little."
On the other hand, Tea Leoni does grace the picture. There's a chance 
connection with her first ever role, in Switch, where a man dies and 
returns to earth as a woman. Leoni's was a bit part. Small roles 
followed in  A League of their Own and others. Then she was 
third-billed in Flirting with Disaster" and second-billed in Deep 
Impact. The predictable mass appeal of The Family Man will make her a 
star. But for my money, I'll stick to my favorite holidays movie, A 
Christmas Story.

Title
Review for Diabolique (1996)
DIABOLIQUE  (1996) * Directed by Jeremiah Chechik. Written by 
Don Roos from the (uncredited) French film "Les Diaboliques," 
itself based on the Pierre Boileau & Thomas Narcejac novel 
"Celle qui n'etait pas" ("The woman who wasn't"). Photography, 
Peter James. Editing, Carol Littleton. Production design, 
Leslie Dilley. Music, Randy Edelman. Cast: Sharon Stone, 
Isabelle Adjani, Chazz Palminteri, Kathy Bates, Spalding Gray, 
Alan Garfield, Adam Hann-Byrd, Shirley Knight.  A Morgan Creek 
film released by Warner's.115 minutes. Rated R (violence)
Recently, in a benevolent mood I wrote that Hollywood remakes 
are generally worse than the originals, with some exceptions. 
"Diabolique" reminds me that I was too kind, that the enormous 
majority of remakes are bad. And they can stink when you know 
the orginal, like the classic thriller-suspenser by 
Henri-Georges Clouzot, "Les Diaboliques" of 1955.
The plot. A boarding school for boys somewhere in the 
mountains of Pennsylvania, within easy driving distance to 
Pittsburgh. The establishement was inherited by Mia (Adjani) 
who suffers from 1) a weak heart and 2) lousy husband Guy 
(Palminteri). He is the headmaster, rules the roost, abuses 
Mia, has as a mistress Nicole (Stone), whom he regularly beats 
up. 
The two women are teachers and friends. The school is a manor 
that ought to be shabby and run down, but that's not made 
clear. Shabby, because Guy is also an s.o.b. who skimps on 
food, feeds the kids and the staff disgusting things. He 
doesn't even have the swimming pool cleaned. ("Dirty pool" 
applies both literally and figuratively to the plot). The 
women, fully aware of each one's relations and relationship 
with Guy, decide to kill him.  
End of plot so far as this review is concerned. For two 
reasons. First, because what little you might get from the 
movie depends entirely on the twists and gimmicks. Second, to 
honor the memory of Mr. Clouzot, his wishes must be followed. 
When his film was shown there was a final "don't divulge the 
end" plea to the audience.
That's probably where Alfred Hitchcock got the idea of doing 
something like this for his "Psycho." Hitchcock loved "Les 
Diaboliques" and its source book. Unable to get permission to 
remake it, he used another novel ("From Among the Dead," which 
some critics wrongly translate as "Between Deaths"), by the 
same writers, and made "Vertigo," a gem with an improbable 
plot.  
The new version follows its model in bizarre ways. Many parts 
are copied scene-for-scene, other not. Even when copied, those 
sections always manage to do something stupid or cheap. 
Consistent with Hollywoodmania for sex and violence, the 
remake heavily insists on both, while the original was subtle 
on sex and had more shocks, suspense and surprises than 
violence. Like Hitchcock.
In the French film, the mistress was the excellent, already 
famous Simone Signoret; the wife was the unknown Vera Clouzot, 
then the director's wife. Signoret had presence and nuances. 
Clouzot was a born victim totally subjugated by both Signoret 
and Paul Meurisse, the husband. 
Here, Sharon Stone mercilessly overdoes her hardness and 
cynical repartees, so much that she telegraphs plot 
developments. She's so hard that SS could easily play an SS 
guard. 
Tarted up with heavy makeup, tight clothes (selected by 
herself) in terrible taste, with tops that never miss a chance 
to show her breasts, she's like a floozy. In the movie's 115 
minutes she does not once crack smile. How mechanical.
Adjani, at the start, has a full nudity scene. Her body is 
beautiful body, not just for a 40-year old but for any woman. 
But it is used only as a cheap, gratuitous come-on. She has 
minimal expressions and in general is a ninny. 
As in the French film, Nicole is the strong one of the pair, 
Mia by far the weaker. But she lacks the wispiness, the 
convincing frailty and ill health, the helplessness, the 
pathetic religiosity of Vera Clouzot. 
The school's staff is very small. Spalding Gray and the fine 
Alan Garfield have microscopic, irrelevant parts, unlike those 
of their atmosphere-enhancing French counterparts. The latter 
help set the mood for the women's fatal decision. The remake 
makes a flat mess even of the model's superior dining room 
scene, where rotten fish was served. 
Nobody is more than skin-deep in version 2. While we don't 
need full-fledged background records or psychological 
analyses, all characters are paper thin.
Thrown in are two young men who are doing a promotional video 
for the school. It's plain padding. Thrown in too is an overt 
lesbian relationship instead of the original's hints.
Worse yet, Adjani has a scene where, after being disgustingly 
insulted by Palminteri, she revels in a kiss, with absolutely 
illogical and uncharacteristic passion. Cut to vigorous sex 
.. but wait, this is between Stone and Palmenteri! 
The French police inspector was played by talented veteran 
Charles Vanel, who, I am told, was the model for Lieutenant 
Columbo. Vanel, like Signoret, had a weighty presence. Here, 
to feminize the movie, he's replaced by private investigator 
Cathy Bates. Her presence is depressing, her sleuthing 
improbable. 
Bates is addressed as "detective," as in " What do you think, 
detective?" I've never heard this turn of speech before. Her 
character's name is Shirley. There's another Shirley in the 
cast, the likable actress Shirley Knight, in another 
depressing role. The odd thing is that she is not even 
mentioned in the blurbs given to the press. Sic transit...
Now to Mr. Palminteri and all that Chazz. Where the original's 
Meurisse was a diabolical, malevolent snake, Palminteri is 
just a coarse, crass, vulgar brute. It's like replacing a 
sports car with a dumpster.
The cardinal sin is the doctoring up the French film's climax, 
one of the cleverest, most unexpected and startling in the 
history of movie thrillers. Be prepared for more cheap and 
dumb turns, false twists, Grand Guignol and additional 
crassness.
The camera-work is OK though overdone and showy. Hitchcock 
would never have tolerated it. Strange too are the close-ups 
of Adjani that often elongate her face, like an El Greco 
painting or a CinemaScope film projected through  a regular 
lens. Beats me.  
The film is soporific. Instead of being an edge-of-the seat 
affair, it is a bottom-of-the-seat proposition. The torpor is 
intercut by the music's sudden bursts of energy, drumbeats and 
all, with imitations of Hitchcock scores by the great Bernard 
Herrmann.
Get the French film or most any Hitchcock movie.

Title
Review for Malčna (2000)
MALENA (Italy, 2000) *** Directed and written by Giuseppe Tornatore 
from a story by Luciano Vincenzoni. Photography,  Lajos Koltai. 
Editing, Massimo Quaglia. Art direction, Francesco Frigeri. Sets, 
Bruno Cesari. Costumes, Maurizio Millenotti. Music, Ennio Morricone. 
Cast: Monica Belluci (Malena),  Giuseppe Sulfaro (Renato Amoroso), 
Luciano Federico (Renato's father), Matilde Piana (Renato's mother), 
Pietro Notarianni (Professor Bonsignore), et al.  A Miramax 
co-production and release. In Italian with subtitles. 94 minutes. R 
(sex, language)
                       .
Malena is the hypocoristic form of Madalena, but there is nothing 
diminutive about supermodel-actress Monica Belluci. She has appeared 
in two dozen films, Italian and French, all unknown to me save for 
"Under Suspicion" (USA, with Gene Hackman and Morgan Freeman) which I 
tried to watch but gave up.  They were mostly minor items, not 
imported in the USA. The few that were had minimal distribution.
A bit of history. Italy's Fascist leader (Il Duce) Benito Mussolini, 
has embroiled the country in World War II. In June 1940, as  France 
was about to surrender to Germany, Mussolini, kicking France when she 
was down, joined World War II with a ridiculous attack on the South 
of France. Earlier, Italy had swallowed tiny Albania. From it, in 
October 1940 it attacked Greece which was less than half the size of 
Italy, had about one seventh of its population, and a non-mechanized 
army. But David drubbed Goliath so spectacularly that Hitler, to 
rescue its ally Italy and save face, had to send his juggernaut to 
Greece, which it occupied in April 1941.
It is 1940 and the Italian civilians may remind you of the WWII song 
sung by Bette Davis, "They're either too young or too old." That's 
most of the male population of the Sicilian seaside town of 
Castelcuto. But all, from pubescent to elderly lust after gorgeous, 
27-year old Malena.
Whether or not "statuesque" applies to her, she is emphatically a 
sight to remember. Her husband is away in the army. She lives an 
almost reclusive life, has no apparent acquaintances. But whenever 
she walks in town (which is often), we recall those Vittorio de Sica 
movies in which Sophia Loren, in Naples and elsewhere, marches in 
provocative, camera-detailed fashion that makes all heads turn. Men 
compensate for their frustrated libido with nasty remarks. Jealous 
local women are ready with catty comments.
Malena, while more ambiguously and less obviously inflammatory than 
Loren, is conscious of the stir she causes, keeps a deadpan face, and 
hardly ever speaks.
The teen-age schoolboys under her thrall make me wonder whether 
Tornatore remembered Truffaut's short film "Les Mistons," in which 
the sap rises within mischievous pre-teen boys.  Unconscious of their 
desire for a local beauty, they take out their confusion on her and 
her boyfriend, stalk them, and play silly pranks on the couple.
The kids in the movie already wear long pants--a symbol of manhood-- 
except for the younger Renato who is twelve-and-a-half and barely 
manages to join the fan club.
The youths fantasize about Malena with graphic, coarse 
comments--except, again, for lovestruck Renato who stalks her, even 
makes a peephole in her house, spies on her but never speaks to this 
divine creature. His reveries include parodies of classic movie 
scenes, from romance to gladiatorial,  "starring" himself and Malena. 
Other amusing sections include his pursuit of  long pants and a 
"grown-up" chair at the barbershop; stealing his idol's panties;  his 
mother trying to cure him by exorcism but Dad opting to take Renato 
to a bordello in which the boy selects a Malena look-alike.
The movie portrays the Sicilians as loud and excitable, in a 
post-neorealist way. Then comes a change of modes and moods. The 
comical-sexual satire shifts gears into near-tragedy. Malena's 
husband is reported dead at the front. Widows are acceptable prey. 
The old tabu is lifted for some of the lusting males. To subsist, now 
indigent Malena turns into a reluctant prostitute--and a pariah.
In July 1943 Liberation from the Germans comes as G.Is enter the 
town.  Jealous wives attack Malena for having consorted with the 
enemy. They cut off her hair --a punishment common in many countries, 
and shown in films such as "Hiroshima, Mon Amour." On an isle once 
colonized by Ancient Greece, the women beat Malena viciously, acting 
like Maenads or the vindictive Thracian women of Greek mythology.
Malena goes away, joining hordes of refugees. But later her husband 
reappears, and finally both return to Castelcuto where both Malena 
and her former accusers reach a cautiously redemptive, hesitantly 
open-ended ending.
Tornatore continues his string of first-rate movies. Fame and prizes 
(at Cannes, at the Oscars, etc.) came with "Cinema Paradiso," his 
second film. Before this was a solid first feature "Il Camorrista," 
not distributed in the US in spite of an American actor, Ben Gazzara. 
Before that, Tornatore had made several fine TV films, imaginative, 
cultural documentaries. Post-"Cinema Paradiso" came a string of 
features that were mostly excellent but still suffered from US lack 
(or spottiness) of distribution: the marvelously touching 
"Everybody's Fine," "Especially on Sunday," "A Pure Formality," "The 
Star Maker," "The Legend of 1900."
 From lyrical scenes  to a bombing raid "Malena" is splendidly shot by 
the great, Hungarian-born Lajos Koltai. The loving views of  Sicily 
compete for splendor with Malena's.  All production values are 
superior, from period costumes to Ennio Morricone's music (he is 
Tornatores's constant collaborator). The subtitling is exceptionally 
good and rich.
Shooting was in the southeastern towns of Siracusa (pop. 32,000) and 
Noto (pop. 22,000), then in Morocco, where there was sunshine while 
winter was coming to Sicily.
On the iffy side:  It is confusing that the invented Castelcuto is 
supposedly "a sleepy village" yet looks like a town.
Also confusing is the Professor, Malena's father (or father-in-law, 
it is unclear), who teaches Latin, is constantly the butt of the 
pupils'  loud, vulgar remarks about Malena. But he seems not to 
notice them, yet there's no proof that he is deaf.
An explanation may be in the fact that the film's American copies are 
94 minutes long while in Italy they run 105 minutes.
As in most foreign movies, or for that matter American pictures that 
deal with the past, there's a dimension here that fleshes out matters 
for Italians, though perhaps not some younger ones. The references to 
the popular song "Ma l'Amore No" and to Alida Valli. The fascist 
anthem "Giovinezza." The mocking of Mussolini and his regime. The 
allusions to Italy's rout in North Africa. The post-Liberation former 
Fascists who are cynical, well-dressed and perhaps still in positions 
of privilege. And so on. But cuts and references notwithstanding, 
this is a most satisfying and original work.
Movie reviews by Edwin Jahiel are at : http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel 

Title
Review for Sweet and Lowdown (1999)
SWEET AND LOWDOWN *** 1/2  Written and directed by Woody Allen. 
Photography, Zhao Fei. Editing, Alisa Lepselter. Music arranged and 
conducted by Dick Hyman. Production design , Santo Loquasto. Produced 
by Jean Doumanian.  Cast: Sean Penn (Emmet Ray), Samantha Morton 
(Hattie), Uma Thurman (Blanche), Anthony LaPaglia (Al Torrio), Brian 
Markinson (Bill Shields), Gretchen Mol (Ellie), et al. A Sony 
Pictures Classics release. 95 minutes. PG-13. At the New Art Theater
Woody Allen can do no wrong? Wrong. But he's done right so many times 
that he is a beacon of filmmaking. As in "Sweet and Lowdown."
The picture relates and shows part of the life of Emmet Ray, a 
fabulous jazz guitar player of the early to mid- Thirties,  But the 
man never existed. He is an invention, a construction, a fabulation, 
even though several aspects of him and his life have been gathered 
from a number of stories about real musicians.
Telling the audience about Emmet are interspersed talking heads of 
real people, supposedly all jazz specialists. Some are indeed 
connoisseurs: Woody Allen himself, Ben Duncan, Nat Hentoff,  Douglas 
McGrath.  Others are not.
It is not something new for Woody. This work is the kissin' cousin of 
"Zelig," and of fantasies in which jazz or pop music plays a major 
role: "Radio Days," " Bullets Over Broadway," etc. It is also variant 
of the structure of "Broadway Danny Rose" whose life-story was told 
in reminiscences by showbiz people.
The fictional Emmet Ray was, by his own accounting and those of 
others, the second best jazz guitar player in the world, after the 
legendary  (and real) Django Reinhardt. Django was a gypsy, born in 
Belgium but a French star for all practical purposes. A childhood 
accident - a fire - had deprived him of three fingers in ome hand, 
yet his playing was stupendous. To this day, he is a deity, 
remembered by millions. His pieces are played by thousands (in Django 
style) in Reinhardt groups.
He was such a cult figure for Emmet that the latter fainted on the 
two occasions he was in the same place as the gypsy. (There's a 
wonderful twist on this late in the movie).
Emmet was all musician. Outside his performances he was not a model 
to follow. Indeed, "lowdown" fits him well. He was undependable and a 
pain for those who hired him to play. He always spent way above his 
means, and blithely even resorted to pimping to supplement his 
income. He was a kleptomaniac. He hustled people (as in a small-town 
amateur contest, shown in the movie). He drank a lot, did drugs .But 
he did have friends, including black musicians. He was totally 
oblivious of the color line.
His quirks included love of trains, train-yards, and  going to city 
dumps to shoot rats with a pistol. He liked elegant suits and 
expensive cars. (Note the gorgeous $4,000 big  Packard convertible, 
and enjoy the imaginative, Munchausen-like way he got the money for 
it!)
Above all, it is his obsession with Django that hovers around him 
from the first to the last scenes. But he was so good that his 
Django-mania becomes a wonderful reminder that true artists always 
want to surpass themselves. That one can be a scoundrel and an artist 
at the same time is a true-to-life leitmotif throughout the movie.
At some point, Emmet and his best pal are in Atlantic City for a gig. 
Girl-hunting on the boardwalk, they meet statuesque Ellie and her 
rather mousy friend, the laundress Hattie. Flipping a coin Emmet gets 
stuck with Hattie --who turns out to be mute and who will become his 
companion for a long stretch.
Her treatment in his hands is not exactly nice. Some people see in it 
a case of misogyny transferred from Woody to Emmet. I don't buy that. 
First because Woody's misogyny is no proven fact. Secondly because 
Emmet shows that everything about him is overshadowed, even 
preempted, by his love of music. What autobiographical sides of 
Woody's are obvious here are a passion for jazz and a passion for 
filmmaking.
Unlike so many Woody creatures, Emmet is the non-intellectual "par 
excellence." No metaphysics, no deep (or even shallow) thoughts. No 
developed language skills,  no culture other than musicianship. Emmet 
is an instinctive being. So are almost all others, including Hattie. 
Including too the gunman Al Torrio who later in the film becomes the 
lover of Emmet's wife. No, not Hattie, but socialite Blanche who 
likes to slum, thinks she is a writer, and entraps (or does she?) 
Emmet.
The movie's great joys are three. The structure. The superb hot jazz 
music. And the fantastic performance by Sean Penn. He is economical, 
non-flamboyant, not even terribly much developed (but what would 
there be to develop?), yet three-dimensional and unforgettable in his 
intensity with and for the guitar. He wears a funny little mustache 
which must be a reference to Django's own. (Several of Reinhardt's 
personal traits, such as undependability, have been worked into Ray's 
character).
Among the earliest pieces we hear are some Django recordings (four 
star stuff) and a splendid Howard Alden rendition of "Speak to Me of 
Love" (Parlez-moi d'Amour), a gem of a song made into a classic by 
the French singer Lucienne Boyer. There's irony in the early use of 
this first piece --whether planned or just a lucky choice I do not 
know. In either case, it is a fitting overture to a tale in which no 
one speaks of love, except for voiceless Hattie who speaks it with 
her face.
The ratio of thirty-four pieces to the movie's 95 minutes is 
heartwarming, a pleasure for all, a major treat for connoisseurs, a 
feast for those who, like Woody Allen, are enamored of such oldies.
And how magnificently does Emmet Ray play his guitar!  It goes 
without saying that it is not Sean Penn who makes the sounds. But he 
was coached to perfection by Dick Hyman and by virtuoso guitarist 
Howard Allen (whose playing we hear) so that his body language and 
his plucking fingers (shown in many closeups) look entirely genuine. 
What the movie does is to go back to the old-style special effects 
that fool you -- without computers or techno-tricks.
The acting by all is excellent, with top, Oscar-worthy honors going 
to  Sean Penn and Samantha Morton. She is another throwback, to the 
actresses of silent days. Which movie star she will remind you of 
depends on your familiarity with old cinema. In a juicy tidbit (and 
in-joke) Hattie is "discovered" by a Hollywood studio and given a bit 
part as Norma Talmadge's sister. It does not pan out.
It is worth noticing that Allen's visual strategy (aided by a great 
Chinese cinematographer who is not yet 40) includes the sparse use of 
closeups, perhaps in order to avoid thrusting emotions at the public, 
and to let it decide through the framing of people within contexts of 
period surroundings, mood and music. This adds to the fact that Woody 
Allen has made a work in which sights, and especially sounds, ought 
to enchant mature and/or informed audiences. In more than one sense, 
the older the listener, the better.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Queen of Hearts (1989)
QUEEN OF HEARTS (UK, 1989) ***  Directed by Jon Amiel. Written 
by Tony Grisoni. Photography, Mike Southon. Editing, Peter 
Boyle. Production design, Jim Clay. Costumes, Lindy Hemming. 
Music, Michael Convertino. Cast: Vittorio Duse, Joseph Long, 
Anita Zagaria, Eileen Way, Vittorio Amandola, et al.  A 
Cinecom release. 103 min.  Not rated but in the PG area.   
A mini-saga of a family of  Italian immigrants in London, 
"Queen of Hearts" opens with a wonderful, dialogue-less 
sequence, like something recollected from an old-fashioned 
silent drama. In an Italian village,  Rosa, promised to the 
butcher's son Barbariccia , runs away with her true love 
Danilo in a scene worthy of "The Perils of Pauline." 
We next meet the couple in England, with several kids and 
Rosa's mother. Ten-year old Eddie narrates the movie, from his 
point of view, a perception which mixes fantasy and  fact.  
The Luccas start out small but become  modestly prosperous 
when, one Christmas,  a talking pig head on a platter advises 
ineffectual Danilo, a waiter, to gamble. Danilo parlays five 
pounds into enough to buy The Lucky Cafe.
The film follows with obvious affection the life of the Luccas 
within an Italian enclave in London. Beyond small  character 
skits nothing major happens,until spurned ex-fiance 
Barbariccia shows up, with loads of money and shady 
connections. Bygones are bygones, says he, but he's  really on 
a vendetta and tries to ruin Danilo. Not to worry: Eddie is 
watching and he devises a complex scheme to save the day.
The movie is low key, played with reserve, a more British than 
Italian trait. It has improbabilities, anachronistic clothes 
and artifacts -- but one must remember that nearly everything 
is filtered through the boy's imaginative memory. 
This is  the first theatrical feature by Jon Amiel who  has 
been much praised for his British TV movies and series , 
notably "The Singing Detective." "Queen Of Hearts" feels like  
a transition  between the small and the big screen.  Possibly,  
Amiel tried to do for Italians in Britain  a little of what 
"My Beautiful Laundrette" did for immigrant Pakistanis.  
The film has pleasantly original aspects, yet also has 
connections to earlier movies: it is like a glimpse at the 
sunny side of "The Godfather,"  uses  comedy in the spirit of 
the Ealing Studios movies of the late 40s and 50s, and ends 
like  "The Sting."
These factors come together nicely though not flawlessly.  
There are some gratuitous or padded passages, especially after 
Danilo's father joins the family. Past the early parts and 
noticeably in the mid-section, there is slackness and gauche 
connections. The camera work is lively, with flourishes and 
spirals like those of a brilliant cinematography student let 
loose with professional equipment, but more probably this may 
be the influence of stylists like Ken Russell, with whom 
director of photography Mike Southon has worked .
In spite of some imperfections the movie spins its story with 
charm, uses a lovely  score --a hybrid of Fellini movie-music 
and  Verdi operas -- and  has  soberly appealing, unfamiliar  
actors from Italy and England.  
After "Queen," John Amiel made the quirkily original "Tune in 
Tomorrow" and "Sommersby" --the Hollywood remake of "The 
Return of Martin Guerre." 

Title
Review for Moonlight and Valentino (1995)
     A combination of coincidence and trend has just brought us at
least three new American movies either directed by women and/or with a
nearly all-female cast: Diane Keaton's UNSTRUNG HEROES, David
Anspaugh's (HOOSIERS) MOONLIGHT AND VALENTINO, and, by Australian
Jocelyn Moorhouse (PROOF), HOW TO MAKE AN AMERICAN QUILT.
     In MOONLIGHT AND VALENTINO a bunch of relatives and/or friends are
trying to support college poetry teacher Elizabeth Perkins after her
(also academic) husband is killed in a yuppie accident: a car hits him
as he jogs.
     MOONLIGHT AND VALENTINO is a would-be tearjerker.  The problem is
that the tears are on the screen and not in the audience, unless you
count tears caused by boredom.
     The script, from a play by Neil Simon's daughter, suffers from
uninteresting everything: characters, acts, facts and dialogue.  A lot
of useless yakety-yak here makes the sluggish pace even slower.  The
talk is of time-killing trivia.  The death-in-the-family treatment is
far inferior to that in UNSTRUNG HEROES.  The roles are dull and
artificially constructed--much less attention-getting than those in
HOW TO MAKE AN AMERICAN QUILT.
     The consolers are themselves in need of drastic straightening out
too.  The ladies bond, de-bond, re-bond.  A hefty Whoopi Goldberg, a
pottery maker, is unstable, with pathological fears about her husband
leaving her.  Gwyneth Paltrow, still mixed up from the long-ago death
of her mother,  spots a kooky, perpetually hat-wearing student of her
sister Perkins.  The movie telegraphs with hammer-blows that a new
twosome is in the making.  And as Paltrow has troubles with her
virginity, she first shows her body to Big Sis who decrees "You're a
knockout.  You should never wear clothes." Then she asks Sis for advice
on how to moan during sex.  Perkins obliges. ( I am not making any of
this up).  And to think that they now blame the Internet.
     Kathleen Turner--whose best role by far was in SERIAL MOM--is
photographed in terribly unflattering ways, with the focus on her oddly
soft nose, while she has an un-dimensional, vague part as a
self-centered, hard-nosed business exec.
     It takes 29 minutes into the film  (during which time you waste
your energy deciphering matters) to establish relationships or
unscramble who's who and what's what.  Even then things are not always
clear.
     The neighborhood seems to be bucolic suburbia--with too many
pretty landscape shots--of the "On Golden Pond" school.  For some
reason, sentimental family gatherings in movies are located in the East
of the United States, unlike the enormous majority of other subjects
that all take place in California. (Ph.D. thesis, anyone?)
     Perkins teaches a three-minute class (sic).  She also injects
Francois Truffaut in her lectures, for no discernible reason.
Distraught Perkins (the very actress who was recently quoted as
deriding Demi Moore's nudity in movies) takes a bath.  The mixing of
pathos and nipples is counterproductive, distracting indeed, as it is
known from statistics that 94.67 percent of men are voyeurs to some
degree.
     Turner turns out to be the former stepmother of Perkins and
Paltrow, whose father, at the funeral reception, is coyly told by his
ex that she needs a hug and kisses.  He replies "Here's my kiss, and
you fax me your hug."  That's the movie's best line.
     Except for Paltrow's new boyfriend, the main male presence is Bon
Jovi's.  He is a house painter, an Italian who speaks no English, and
whose buns inflame the women's libido.  They discuss them openly, until
the man turns out to be a real Yankee. (Score one for sitcom humor).
His name is wrongly believed to be Valentino, hence the awkward title.
The other part of the title comes from Bon Jovi showing up at night to
paint the Perkins home.  Why night?  He's a romantic, which leads of
course to intercourse that speeds up Perkins' healing process. (He also
relaxes Perkins by teaching her how to eat pizza with her fingers).How
exciting.  There is a mystery  however: is why change the house color
from a perfectly nice gray to the color of regurgitation?
     The bottom line in this film is that everyone, but everyone, is
uninteresting.  Not only is everyone unconvincing, but everything
stultifies us with boredom, down to the heavy, lachrymose musical
score.
     Capping all this, the "good-bye to Ben" (Perkins' defunct spouse)
finale has all the women, with painted faces, coming to terms with the
past by doing a kind of witchcrafty ritual at night, in the cemetery,
with loud music and song plus up and down dancing.  Then a magic rain
falls.  Ugh!

Title
Review for Bounce (2000)
BOUNCE (2000) **  Directed and written by Don Roos. Photography, 
Robert Elswit. Editing, David Codron.Production design, David Wasco, 
Music, Mychael Danna. Produced by Steve Golin, Michael Besman. Cast: 
Ben Affleck, (Buddy Amaral), Gwyneth Paltrow (Abby Janello),  Joe 
Morton  (Jim Weller),  Natasha Henstridge (Mimi) ,Tony Goldwyn (Greg 
Janello), Alex D.Linz (Scott Janello), David Dorfman (Joey Janello), 
Jennifer Gray (Janice Guerrero), Caroline Aaron (Donna Heisen) et 
al. A Miramax release.106 minutes. PG-13
In "The Opposite of Sex" (1998) his first film as both director and 
scenarist, writer Don Roos had composed an offbeat, blackish comedy. 
Now, in his second feature, he gets closer to the melodrama-for-TV 
genre, which is acceptable but even without commercials tends to 
become a yawner.
Los Angeles hotshot advertising executive Buddy (Affleck), having 
closed a great contract in Chicago, is flying home. As bad weather 
makes for delays and cancellations at O'Hare, Buddy kills time at an 
airport bar, garrulously chatting with two strangers: Greg (Goldwyn) 
who is anxious to get back to his wife and kids in L.A., and sexy 
businesswoman Mimi (Henstridge) who is going to Dallas.
Even in the age of AIDS, brief encounters are tempting. When, with 
the briefest economy of means, Mimi signals Buddy that a night of 
sex would be welcome, he generously gives his ticket to grateful 
Ben. But the Infiniti Airlines plane crashes.
The film, moving from fast sex to the old twist of mistaken 
identity, switches to the confusion of who's who and to the agony of 
Ben's wife Abby (Paltrow). Those sequences are effective. So are 
those of Buddy who is suffering from massive survivor's guilt.
Matters become colorfully dramatic. The airline, which happens to be 
a client of Buddy's firm, has it produce outrageously and phonily 
sentimental TV commercials which mourn  the crash victims - for PR 
reasons of course. The commercials are revolting, both to us and to 
Buddy whose personal involvement make him  aware of their crass 
nature for the first time in his career no doubt. With its 
additional mix of business and ad-people's lingo, the script scores 
good points as an expose. 
Alas, artificiality sets in. Buddy now drinks heavily. He attends a 
major do of publicity firms. He gets top honors for "his" airline 
commercial. His drunken acceptance speech points the finger at his 
trade. It's too much, too phonily Hollywood.
Buddy undergoes a cure for drinking. Cut to some time later. 
Permanently sober, Alcoholics Anonymous member Buddy is back in 
business.
He feels compelled to do something for Abby, the widow he has never 
met. Guess what? Right. She turns out to be attractive, appealing in 
the awkward, rookie ways she tries to sell real estate. She says she 
is a divorcee. Why?  That's what gave me the most food for thought. 
Is it a sign of the times that a divorced person is more appealing 
to the opposite gender than a widowed one?  Is there a curse on 
people whose spouses have died? And to think that the 1934 
Astaire-Rogers musical "The Gay Divorcee" came from the play "The 
Gay Divorce" but the Hollywood Code  demanded the change!
Abby has no idea of what connects Buddy with her husband's death. He 
keeps mum on that subject. But guess what again? The two are 
mutually attracted. Buddy gets her a big deal with his firm. He 
likes her is good with them --the old cliché. Their relationship 
escalates to love. They kiss at 50 minutes into the movie.
I hate to say it, but up to now, save for some sequences, the film 
has been dull. The twosome's episodes have been played in the lowest 
key of anything I remember on the screens of the AD. 2000. This 
would have been a virtue, had  the script managed to combine it with 
discreet psychological excitement. But even when at 70 minutes the 
big crisis comes, the movie stays dull.
The performances are, grosso modo, competent, even good. But the 
basic situations and developments remain artificial and 
unconvincing. Not the least aspect of this is a courtroom twist in 
which the stewardess who had originally accepted Ben's gift boarding 
pass and ticket is being chastised.
Next time a nice flight attendant breaks a rule in your favor, think 
twice before asking her or him.

Title
Review for Ley del deseo, La (1987)
LAW OF DESIRE (La Ley del Deseo) (Spain, 1987) *** 1/4.  
Written and directed by Pedro Almodovar. Photography, Angel 
Luis Fernandez. Editing, Jose Salcedo. Costumes, Jose Maria 
Cossio. Decoration, Javier Fernandez. Cast: Eusebio Poncela, 
Carmen Mayra, Antonio Banderas, Miguel Molina, Manuela 
Velasco, Bibi Andersen, Fernando Guillen, Nacho Martinez, 
Helga Line, et al. Released by Cinevista (theatrically) and 
New Yorker Films (non-theatrically). In Spanish with 
subtitles. 100 minutes. No rating. 
When years ago I revisited Italy, what impressed me most was 
that Italian women had suddenly become so beautiful and so 
chic that they were almost stealing the thunder from 
Parisians. When I returned to Spain after Generalissimo 
Francisco Franco's death (1975), a rise in street pulchritude  
was also evident. What really struck me though was that people 
were now talking openly in the cafes and that sex magazines 
were hanging on kiosks like leaves on the trees of a rain 
forest. It was astonishing but not unusual. Those things go 
together, as reaction (and overreaction) to generations of 
traditionalism, prudishness and repression . 
These days in Madrid there is something that the media call a 
movement, and have baptized "La Movida," a no-holds -barred 
flowering of swinging art and lifestyles in which filmmaker 
Pedro Almodovar figures with outrageous prominence.  
LAW OF DESIRE is Almodovar's sixth and latest feature. His 
WHAT HAVE I DONE TO DESERVE THIS? which was recently shown in 
the US, opens in a martial arts academy with the impromptu 
lovemaking between a charlady and a stranger.  
LAW OF DESIRE 's start is an even greater provocation to the 
squeamish, with a prolonged autoerotic scene by a man.  You 
may call it  graphic or  not-so-graphic as it does leaves 
enough to the imagination--it's a matter  of semiological and  
semenological interpretation, and of cultural standards. 
Having, however, produced his initial shock, "enfant terrible" 
Almodovar seems satisfied and tones down the descriptions in 
the balance of the movie. 
This first scene turns out to be a movie-within-a-movie, and a 
hit with its Movida-type public. The film's maker is Pablo 
Quintero, a writer-director of plays and films, and an idol of 
the avant-garde Madrilenos.  
Pablo is a homosexual, although in his case and those of his 
companions, there are strong hints of bisexuality too. He is 
promiscuous, but, as I see it, not so much in absolute terms 
than as a form of autoeroticism, the psychological equivalent 
of the opening scenes. Just as any artist--including 
Pablo--wants to be admired, the private/public Pablo also  
wants to be desired. This is a rather messy state of mind. 
To complicate matters further, Pablo is also in love with 
young Juan who responds yet is not quite sure that it's the 
way to go for him. To complicate the complication, Pablo has a 
beloved sister, Tina (Carmen Maura) who used to be his brother 
before he-she had a sex change. (Maura is perfect in her 
sexual ambiguity). 
Tina has taken over the peculiar raising and education of a 
little girl, Ada, who, along with Tina, is prone to some 
delightfully kooky religious spasms. 
Ada really belongs to another Ada, her mother, who used to be 
Tina's lover but is now searching for the perfect mate in 
Italy. Ada Senior is the most beautiful woman in the film. I 
thought for a moment that she was Ali MacGraw. Later I found 
out that she is Bibi Andersen, spelled almost like the name of 
an Ingmar Bergman star. Later yet I was told that Bibi is a 
famous transvestite in Madrid.
More to come. ( I'll do what I can, even though I keep 
laughing as I write these lines. They have to be written 
because, in the odd, fragmented way people and events are 
presented, it takes a long time for them to sink in and be 
sorted out.) 
Pablo and another admirer, Antonio, the son of a well-to-do 
politician, pick each other up. Antonio has slicked down black 
hair, so brilliantined that it's like the surface of a 78 rpm 
phonograph record. (This must be an in-joke, a throwback to 
the looks of  male Spanish stars in films of earlier days).
Antonio is--or was until now--heterosexual. Pablo initiates 
him in the love that dare not speak its name, but shouts it 
from the rooftops in this movie. For Pablo this is another 
exercise in conquest (he's of the race of the Conquistadores), 
but for Antonio it's a "coup de foudre, " "l'amour fou" of the 
old surrealists, "el amor brujo" (love the magician). 
Antonio becomes insanely jealous of Juan, finds him in the 
country and kills him. In the meantime, Pablo has given his 
sister the stage part  in Cocteau's one-woman play, "The Human 
Voice," (which became Giancarlo Menotti's "The Telephone").
After Juan's murder the film shifts into a silly story of 
police detection, with black humor clues all over. (The 
critics have by and large decreed this second part weaker than 
the first, but I find it, on the contrary, a funny 
reinforcement to the movie's campiness). It's handled  
Spanishly, yet also like one of those French thrillers that 
imitate US thrillers. The movie advances in a series of 
intended howlers, getting lurider and insaner by the minute. 
Antonio destroys a piece of evidence,(a garish shirt which is 
just like Pablo's) while finding phony alibis for his snoopy 
German mother. Comic  inspectors suspect Pablo and search his 
place. The senior man finds coke. It's not enough for 
evidence, so he snorts it. He also has this advice for his 
young companion:" To be a good cop it is not enough to be 
unscrupulous, you got to have a sense of humor."  
Pablo, disconsolate at his boyfriend's death, smashes into a 
tree and suffers (or does he really?) from amnesia. At the 
hospital, trying to bring back his memory, Tina out-lurids the 
lurid with the tale of her past, her love affair with their 
father who had Tina (Tino?) become a woman, took her to 
Morocco, then dropped her, leaving her with a distrust of men. 
Except that now she's found her ideal, who turns out to be 
Antonio, which leads to a superbly ridiculous, Wagnerian 
ending. 
In between we have also witnessed  a bizarre  interview by one 
of the ugliest women in Spain (or is she a man?);  a queer 
rehearsal (or was it?) of "The Human Voice";compromising 
letters by Juan signed "Laura P";an erotic gag of Tina asking 
to get doused by the hose of a street-cleaner; a befuddled  
priest; plus many more Almodovarian grotesqueries.  
Almodovar claims he's a romantic making romantic films. I 
won't argue the point, since he works marginally along the 
lines of the melodramas by Douglas Sirk in  Hollywood and  of 
R.W. Fassbinder in Germany,  while at the same time mocking 
them as well as overheated movies by other directors. Even his 
titles  reflect this.Naming his films LABYRINTH OF PASSION or 
LAW OF DESIRE is an irreverent homage to those hard-breathing 
flicks that were reined in by the "good taste" of older times. 
But in Amodovar there's little of Sirk's commercial eagerness 
or of Fassbinder's despair and masochism. The Spaniard is at 
peace with himself and contemplates a world (his own) with a 
tongue within a cheek that must stretch from Castille to 
Catalonia. 
Not only does Almodovar include a film within his film, he 
keeps throughout a running commentary (sometimes too indirect 
to be grasped immediately) about himself and the main film he 
is making. Serious points are not absent, but these  are 
somewhat obscured by Almodovar's demented inventions. 
Typically, these are set in garish surroundings and shot in 
garish color. To what extent the architecture and interior 
sets of this movie are intentionally awful, I cannot tell.I am 
ready and eager for the next movie by Almodovar, but not for 
his designer to redecorate my house. 

Title
Review for Hannibal (2001)
HANNIBAL (2001) ** 1/4 . Directed by Ridley Scott. Script byDavid 
Mamet, Steven Zaillian, based on the novel by Thomas Harris. 
Photography, John Mathieson. Editing, Pietro Scalia.  Production 
design, Norris Spencer. Music, Hans Zimmer. Cast: Antony Hopkins (Dr. 
Hannibal Lecter), Juliane Moore (Agent Clarice Starling), Ray Liotta 
(Paul Krendler), Gary Oldman (Mason Verger), Giancarlo Giannini 
(Police "comissario" Rinaldo Pazzi), Francesca Neri (Allegra Pazzi), 
et al.  Produced by Mr. and Mrs. Dino Di Laurentiis and Mr. Scott. An 
MGM/Universal release. 131 minutes. R (for horrendous horror)
It's been ten years since "The Silence of the Lambs" attracted and/or 
pleased sadists, masochists, and many "normal" viewers.
It was the second Hannibal Lecter film, the first one being the good 
"Manhunter" (1986)  directed by Michael Mann, with Brian Cox as 
Hannibal.  "Silence" (1991) was directed by Jonathan Demme, with 
Anthony Hopkins as HL. In "Hannibal," made a decade later --but is 
set seven years after "Silence" -- Sir Anthony resurfaces.
He is older but not markedly so. He has not lost any of his suave 
madness, his canniness, and his vigor. But he did lose Jodie Foster, 
whose FBI agent is now played by Julianne Moore. Although JM, when 
not at work, is somewhat sexier than JF, her role is shorter and 
partly lost within the meanderings of the new movie. She is also more 
chic, with Gucci shoes, elegant dresses and a peekaboo outfit which, 
no doubt result from Lecter's sneering putdowns of her cheap 
outfits-- long ago, in "Silence."
All three films came from novels by Thomas Harris, all had major, 
talented directors. The current movie is bound to make a lot of money 
while raising a lot of critical eyebrows.
The plot, simply and simplistically sketched out. FBI agent Clarice 
has led a raid which left five dead. Newspaper headlines shout that 
she holds an FBI record for corpses (shades of Waco.)  She gets 
unfairly reprimanded by her superiors led by a slimy, arrivistic 
Department of Justice apparachik (Liotta). The man also has it in for 
her because she refused his sexual advances. "Your badge and your 
gun" follows as she is temporarily suspended.
In a mansion to end all mansions (actually the Biltmore Estate in 
Asheville, North Carolina) zillionaire Mason Verger (an unbilled Gary 
Oldman), horribly-plus (and then some) disfigured because of Lecter 
(don't ask), now wants to get the doctor, cook and eat him. He has an 
astronomic price on Lecter's head, alive but not dead, since he wants 
to cook and eat him. We later learn that he is employing some native 
thugs in Italy.
In Florence (Italy) Hannibal, in baroque splendor, lives the peculiar 
life of a scholar who badly wants the curatorship of a superb museum. 
He'll do anything to get the post and his other desires, from 
academic to extra-curricular. Lecter lectures (sic) impressively on 
literary, artistic and other germane subjects.  How he got all that 
scholarship is a mystery. But then, the word "lector" meant, at least 
in Church Latin, "reader." We must assume that Hannibal practiced 
reading voraciously, that he was a polymath, that his I.Q. rose to 
stratospheric heights. Even so, in stretching our credulity this 
beats Tarzan's command of English.
When a high-ranking Florentine cop with an insufficient salary and a 
gorgeous young wife --always a dangerous combination-- gets wind of a 
mysterious source (but we know it is Mason) will pay three million 
dollars for the delivery of Lecter, Inspector Pazzi gets going.
The movie diversely canters, trots or gallops non-stop from one 
situation to another but is always on the move. A huge number of 
energetically timed setups and scenes, fast cuts and nick-of-time 
interventions amount to filmic shorthand in direction and editing.  .
The best thing in the film is, for me, the splendid sights, sites and 
photography, notably of Florence exteriors and interiors which are 
genuine yet nothing like the city that locals and visitors know. It's 
often  dank, forbidding, crepuscular, always splendid and arresting. 
Production designer Norris Spencer, save for his work on Scott's 
"Thelma and Louise," was unknown to most of us, as was cinematogapher 
John Mathieson until he shot Scott's "Gladiator, "   Director Scott's 
own style is  also obvious here, especially as "Hannibal"'s look has 
much in common with that of the nearly twenty-years old "Blade 
Runner."
Why Hannibal chose Florence puzzled me until I realized that the 
infernal doctor had chosen the city of Dante. Not only is "The Divine 
Comedy" lurking around, but Dante's "La Vita Nuova" shows up in a 
nice bit of opera composed by Patrick Cassidy.  The excellent Hans 
Zimmer wrote the rest of the score.
Italian culture set aside, or better yet, woven into the film, the 
results are still pop pulp that tries to spook us. Fine. Lecter's old 
slurp-slurps and much of his anthropophagy have given way to a 
suspense thriller and detective story. Fine again, except that the 
story is so muddled and full of holes, so ambitious and bloated with 
obscurities, improbabilities, impossibilities. ludicrous  and useless 
twists, that the desired shock effects are neutralized.
A pity. And there's nothing to replace the "The Silence of the Lambs" 
terrifying (but not physically violent) scenes of Jodie Foster 
conversing in prison with Lecter through a bullet-proof glass 
partition, and the growing ways in which those two affect  each other.
Nothing exceeds like excess.  "Less is more" was the revolutionary 
slogan of the Bauhaus school which introduced so much modernism to 
art and design in the 1920s, from buildings to kitchen tools.
Ridley Scott -- in the wake of his senior compatriot  filmmaker Ken 
Russell -- must believe that "more is more." (Not an unexpected 
stance given Scott's background in advertising and commercials) 
Excess can be positive, as it was in Scott's "Alien" -- but with a 
non-sci-fi thriller Hitchcock's "sancta simplicitas" is a must.
Some attempts of humor are well hidden. We guess right away what will 
happen to Inspector Rinaldo Pazzi, but few will realize that Pazzi 
means "crazy" in Italian. And in the film's penultimate, gory and 
entirely unbelievable sequence of human cooking (in the Hannibalian 
sense) the camera briefly pans to the spine of a book --  "Vegetarian 
Times."
The movie's end is so ghoulish, extreme and scientifically phony that 
it is giggle-making rather than scream-inducing. It can't hold a 
candle to the increasing, real fears about mad cow disease. And
the awkward, unsatisfactory final scene is so open-ended that it 
screams "another sequel is coming."
For a relative antidote to Ridley Scott's extremism, may I suggest 
that you watch his first feature, "The Duellists" (UK, 1977) a very 
good, visually stunning adaptation of Joseph Conrad's story set in 
Napoleonic and post-Napoleonic times.
Movie reviews by Edwin Jahiel are at : http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel 

Title
Review for Last Days of Chez Nous, The (1992)
THE LAST DAYS OF CHEZ  NOUS (Australia, 1992) *** Director, Gillian 
Armstrong. Producer, Jan Chapman. Writer, Helen Garner. Photography, 
Geoffrey Simpson. Musi, Paul Grabowsky. Production design, Janet 
Patterson. Cast: Lisa Harrow, Bruno Ganz, Kerry Fox, Miranda Otte, et 
al.  A Fine Line release. In Australian without subtitles. 99 
minutes. Rated R (sexual subject matter).
"The Last Days of Chez Nous" had its international premiere in 
February 1992 at the Berlin Festival, and opened in New York in March 
1993.  Arriving locally unannounced and unpublicized, it will pass 
unnoticed and depart quickly. A pity, since it is an interesting, 
intimist, non-commercial, post-feminist work by world-class 
Australian women figures: director Gillian Armstrong ("My Brilliant 
Career," "Mrs. Soffel"), producer Jan Chapman ("the Piano"), 
novelist-screenwriter Helen Garner.
Dysfunctional families, always a subject of films, have been 
particularly stressed (internationally) in recent years. This movie's 
group consists of Beth (Lisa Harrow), a fortyish novelist; her French 
husband J.P. (the Swiss actor Bruno Ganz); Annie (Miranda Otte), her 
teen-age daughter by an earlier marriage; Beth's much younger sister 
Vicki (Kerry Fox of "An Angel at My Table") and two elderly parents.
There are tensions between husband and wife, openly aired in their 
"modern" relationship. She is appealing, talented, reliable yet 
insecure. He is a free soul, ego-centered and insensitive, who 
derides everything Australian. The daughter is sweet and caring.
The marriage teeters. Into this mixed picture comes Vicki back from a 
European trip. A flaky, infantile airhead, unemployed and pregnant to 
boot, Annie will "have a relationship" with J.P. during a trip that 
Beth takes in the outback with her father in an effort to come to 
terms with the old man's constant criticism that has distressed Beth 
throughout her life and, in a more complex way is mirrored by J.P.'s 
reproaches and outbursts.
This is the skeleton of the film, not very original but particularly 
well fleshed -out by the accumulated episodes and details. In the 
opening scene, Vicki, schlepping her suitcase, enters her sister's 
home. Everyone is out. She spots her homecoming cake, gobbles a big 
slice and seconds later is vomiting.
There is a profusion of good touches --in fact it is their aggregate 
that makes the film. Remarkable too is the picture's non-male (yet 
not anti-male), non-Hollywoodian point of view. In a dark way, 
matters of behavior and dialogue are refreshingly cliche-free. The 
film's pervasive but not overwhelming  female stance extends to the 
visuals. The women are not cover girls but real people, with splotchy 
legs, freckles,wrinkles, blemishes, imperfect teeth. And the main 
setting, the house, is claustrophobic and messy, in a lived-in rather 
than in an artily "dressed" way.
The messiness extends to the presentation of the characters who are 
initially to unscramble, a puzzle abetted by often murky Aussie 
accents and by the lack of any background given to the principals. 
Partly though, the unclarity of who's who is planned,  to show the 
shifting relationships.
Beth is supposedly a successful writer (although given her modest 
house you wonder how much authors are paid in Australia), and both as 
an artist and a person she is convincingly shown as particularly 
sensitive and vulnerable. Deftly and sympathetically portrayed, hers 
is a well-rounded portrait.
J.P., on the other hand, is underwritten. Aside from his French 
speech, accent and love of cheeses and wines, we are in the dark as 
to his past and present life, occupations or professions -- or for 
that matter about what makes J.P. tick. He represents, perhaps, to 
those inferiority-complexed Australians around him, a glib, 
sophisticated European, but this is too superficial to make a dent in 
us, the audience. He may be a volatile Continental, but enough is 
enough.
Some problems of exposition aside, "The Last Days of Chez Nous" is an 
affective, sorrowful movie. More than most Australian films it is 
also an unappetizing portrait of Down Under in every way: cities and 
streets,  interiors of houses or cafes, motels, nature, ill-dressed, 
dour and unintellectual people. It won't send the viewers rushing to 
a travel agency, but the portrayal of its principals, notably Beth, 
is realistic, striking and well-crafted.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Sahara (1943/I)
SAHARA (1943)  Directed by Zoltan Korda. Written by John Howard Lawson,
Korda and others. Photography, Rudolph Maté. Music, Miklos Rosza. Cast:
Humphrey Bogart, Bruce Bennett, J. Carrol Naish, Lloyd Bridges, Rex Ingram,
Richard Nugent, Dan Duryea, et al.
In these days of World War II movies (Saving Private Ryan -The Thin Red
Line- fine documentaries on the History Channel, etc.) my strong interest
in the subject made me watch for the nth time that oldie-goodie, Sahara.
This WW II actioneer set in North Africa was inspired from an incident in
an older Soviet film, which incident it transposes. The British are
retreating from Tobruk. American tank commander, Sergeant Humphrey Bogart ,
cut off behind the lines of the retreating British, tries to reach the main
force, with a motley crew of Americans, British and Africans, plus two
prisoners.  They must outfox the Germans and find water. At the well, the
small group will try to delay an advancing enemy battalion of 500.
1943 was smack in the middle of a time that went for strong and simple
movie heroics. Bogiešs: łWe have only one purpose, to save ourselves to be
able to fight again˛  sums up the good and the bad of the film.
The vigorous action-and-survival story is well directed by Zoltan Korda,
well shot by Rudolph Mate, well co-written by John Howard Lawson. Rudolph
Maté was an ace cinematographer with an impressive list of credits. He
later turn to directing. (Offhand, I think that his D.O.A. --the
prototype-- is his most original film). Other Sahara credits are excellent.
It was a strong team.
The three cosmopolitan Hungarian Korda brothers (Zoltan, the director;
Vincent, the art director; Alexander, the director and mega-producer) had
their long, important last part of their career in Great Britain.
Zoltan, directed there not too many films, but these included the masterful
paean to the Brits and their Empire, Four Feathers (1939), designed by
Vincent, produced by Alexander. In fact, Alexander contributed enormously
to the genre I think of as "England as Brittania."
It is a fact too that without Alexander Korda (and Alfred Hitchcock),
British cinema in the 1930s would not have become a major player.
Lawson, a major Hollywood scriptwriter, was a leftist whose work included
patriotic American films. He became one of the Hollywood Ten victims in the
post-war days of witch-hunting Senator Joe McCarthy.
The production values of Sahara are very good. And Bogart is Bogie in fine
fettle. He had been doing war films since Across the Pacific (1942) --which
may not be on the rosters of notable films, but which I think is great in a
pre-campy way.  Well worth seeing. Casablanca came out in later 1942.
Four, count'em, Bogiepics came out in 1942!
Back to Sahara. It's fine and dandy but it has a seeming weakness: the
well-meaning, (inevitable in its day, but now dated) propaganda in the
dialogue. It gets especialy silly with Giuseppe (J .Carroll Naish), the
"nice" Italian prisoner of war who feels like a caricature. Among other
things, he delivers to the nasty German co-prisoner a long, very scripted
and patriotic anti-Nazi speech. It is more than doubtful that anyone ever
spoke that way. Today, if anything, it is almost like comic relief.
But it's not all that simple. 1943 was the year of the meeting (January 14)
of Britain's Prime Minister Churchill and US. President Roosevelt in -- yes
!!! --Casablanca, to discuss among other plans, the invasion of Italy.  The
Allies invaded Sicily on July10, 1943.  On September 3, Italy signed an
armistice. On October 13, Italy declared was against the Germans.
"Sahara" was released, cannily, on November 11, 1943,  Armistice Day (later
Veterans Day). Great timing!
I do not know the exact dates of the movie's conception, writing, and
shooting, but-- again, most cannily-- it is clear to me that the whole
thing was a preparation for, if not an echo of,  the Italian events. With
so many  Italian-American GIs fighting and dying for the U.S.A, Hollywood
was always mindful to sing the praises of its huge Italian-American
population. The twist here is to extend the spirit of democracy to
Italian-Italians and pave the way for an USA-Italy entente.
So, politically, it was not, at the time, all that silly to have placed all
those good sentiments in the mouth of "amico Italiano" Giuseppe.
J. Carroll Naish, by the way, was a prince among supporting actors. He
played an incredible number of roles in which he was everything from a
Latin- American to a Greek, a Frenchman, an Indian-Indian, an American
Indian (Sitting Bull), an Arab, a Chinese, and more.
The gag (unverified by me) is that this New Yorker born of Irish parents
played every nationality except an Irishman!
With many more virtues than flaws, Sahara is still among the better war
movies.  Three Oscar nominations include Supporting actor (Naish) and
Cinematography. It was often imitated, notably as a Western,  The Last of
the Comanches (Edwin Jahiel)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Dirty Rotten Scoundrels (1988)
DIRTY ROTTEN SCOUNDRELS (1988) *** 1/4  Directed by Frank Oz. 
Produced by Bernard Williams. Executive producers, Dale 
Launer, Charles Hirschorn. Screenplay, Dale Launer, Stanley 
Shapiro, Paul Henning. Photography, Michael Ballhaus. Music, 
Miles Goodman. Production design, Roy Walker. Editing, Stephen 
A. Rotter, William Scharf. Costumes, Marit Allen. Cast: Steve 
Martin, Michael Caine, Glenne Hadley, Anton Rodgers, Barbara 
Harris,  et al.  An Orion Picture. 110 minutes. Rated PG .
"Dirty Rotten Scoundrels" is the latest exception to the 
commonly held opinion that movie remakes are never as good as 
the originals. It is a thoroughly reworked remake of the 1964  
movie "Bedtime Story," which was a weak comedy starring  
Marlon Brando, David Niven and Shirley Jones. On the contrary, 
"Dirty Rotten Scoundrels" is most amusing and excellent in its 
scenario, direction and pacing. It is sure-footed 
entertainment, tightly controlled yet consistently maintaining 
an air of spontaneity. The performances are top-notch, from 
the principals' to those of the supporting cast. The 1988 
version is infinitely superior to its model.     
Michael Caine plays a suave, elegant  gentleman who, with the 
complicity of police chief Anton Rodgers (a convincing 
Frenchman for a change), fleeces rich women in the French 
Riviera town where he resides in luxury. The tricks are so 
imaginative that they raise  Caine from the level of con man 
to that of a veritable con artist.    
Caine's territory is invaded by another scoundrel, small-timer 
Steve Martin. Martin is uncouth, looks like an unkempt "Europe 
on Ten Dollars a Day" tourist in sneakers and baggy chinos, 
acts like a parody of American not-so-innocents abroad. The 
contrast between the aristocratic, low-key Caine and loud 
vulgarian Martin is like that between The Prince and The 
Pauper. But appearances are deceiving: the yokel Martin is a 
real and present danger to Caine's business.So, when the Brit 
fails in his efforts to get rid of this menace, a "modus 
vivendi" must be found... 
"DRS" has a wealth of clever situations and twists which keep 
going at a steady, clippety-clop pace, with nary a dead 
moment. From the start, the tone of a comic scam is immensely 
aided by having as Caine's first victim the terrific Barbara 
Harris. She was the con woman in Alfred Hitchcok's last 
picture, "Family Plot." Her presence here is a delightful 
homage to the Master. 
There are many more fine in-jokes and references to other 
movies. You don't have to catch them all to enjoy this film, 
but connoisseurs could  double their pleasure when those parts 
come up. Caine, while creating a new, original persona, is  
also obviously a Cary Grant figure ( notably that of "To Catch 
A Thief," which was also set on the French Riviera). He does 
an imitation of German-Swiss psychiatrist, a type familiar 
from older  Hollywood farces including Marx Brothers and 
Hope/Crosby pictures.
Martin produces a simian Jerry Lewis number. The Caine-Martin 
relationship could remind you of those animated shorts where 
an indestructible Roadrunner keeps reappearing unexpectedly...
The casting of Caine and Martin was inspired. The chic 
Britisher is like an aging Don Juan; the dishevelled American, 
like  an aging child. In the film's clever fundamental 
reversal--which operates almost like a funny scam on the 
audience--the typecast plebeian and Cockney Caine (Alfie, 
Harry Palmer, etc.) has been turned into a quiet, patrician 
gentleman. 
The changes, however, are not methodical. Martin is still the 
same old Steve. He retains his familiar wild and crazy 
character, but at the same time he is made into such a loud, 
grating interloper, that in the Caine-Martin confrontation our 
sympathies are with classy Caine. 
Since so much of the public's enjoyment hangs on the 
developments, twists and double-crossings of this movie, I 
will only mention that the basic plot principle (which works 
very well ) is that of multiple stings where the con men 
practice their scams both on outsiders and on each other. Few, 
if any, of those turns are predictable. You will, for 
instance, be lulled into the belief that American women (the 
scoundrels' customary targets) are all simple-minded, 
provincial an naive creatures, but just you wait! 
Another surprise is that the movie is unexpectedly asexual and 
free of conventional romantic entanglements. It does not deal 
with men as males and women as females, it is no battle of the 
sexes but a  battle of wits and of steadily escalating 
inventiveness. 
"Dirty Rotten Dirty Scoundrels" has three scriptwriters, of 
whom two were the scenarists of "Bedtime Story." This fact 
alone should   normally guarantee a pedestrian remake. 
Remarkably though, the way in which the 1964 text was 
rewritten is appealingly fresh. And while physically (with 
genuine location sets and crisp photography) the film is an 
update to the end of the 1980s, in spirit it is a return to 
the buoyant, airy and good-humored movies of the 1930s. 

Title
Review for Out-of-Towners, The (1999)
THE OUT-OF-TOWNERS (1999)  *  Directed by Sam Weisman. Written by Marc
Lawrence, based on the screenplay by Neil Simon. Photography, John Bailey.
Editing, Kent Beyda. Production design, Ken Adam. Music, Marc Shaiman.
Produced by Robert Cort, David Madden, Robert Evans, Teri Schwartz. Cast:
Steve Martin (Henry Clark), Goldie Hawn (Nancy Clark), John Cleese (Mr.
Mersault), Oliver Hudson (Alan Clark),, Mayor Rudolph Giuliani (himself),
et al. A Paramount release. 91 minutes. PG-13
There was a time when it was chic and trendy to dismiss the work of Neil
Simon. I hope that this particular snobbery exists no longer. The man's
output is prodigious, his talent is superior, and his duds are minimal. At
their best, movies scripted by Simon have resulted in great comedies or
mixed-genre films. At their non-best, among the least well received -- even
though it does have its partisans--- is The Out-of-Towners (1970) directed
by Arthur Hiller.
Neil Simon's script is his most unpleasant.  Ohio executive Jack Lemmon and
wife Sandy Dennis go on a business trip to New York. Everything goes badly
from the start and escalates without respite. Most of these frustrations,
taken singly or in smaller installments, are all too familiar -- but here
they are so mercilessly and artificially piled up that they reach a level
of cruelty. And a major flaw is that the couple is dislikable, with Lemmon
a  grating idiot, from the opening scene on. In this black humor however
are some quite entertaining parts which would make me give the picture a
sadomasochistic grade of  C.
Still, I see no reason for a remake of this item, especially the way it is
handled by heavy-handed direction and a bad script that's not Simon's but
based on the old Simon scenario. All my comments on the 1970 opus apply to
the 1999 edition, except that now the couple is no longer dislikable. They
are merely indifferent and without personality.
This time, the Ohioans George and Gwen Kellerman have been more WASPishly
rebaptized Henry and Nancy Clark, married for 27 years. Their daughter has
gone East, to school then to miscellaneous problems. The lachrymose parents
are putting son Alan on the plane to Europe. The nest is empty. Henry, an
adman, is about to leave for a job interview in New York City, but what he
hasn't told Nancy is that he's been fired from his present position.
He boards his plane... and guess who comes in minutes later? Yes, Nancy,
who's decided to come along and who makes a most idiotic appearance. (I'll
spare you details). This is the start of an odyssey for the Clarks. The
plane has to land in Boston, their luggage is lost, they miss the train to
NYC, hire a talking car (sic), mess up directions, crash into a fish
market. Next, they get robbed in the Big Apple. The misadventures of the
moneyless and hungry Clarks hit an endless series of strident lows which
include suspicious people, an S & M hooker, a ferocious Rottweiler, a
sex-therapy meeting in a church, a ride in a holdup getaway taxi, a night
spent alfresco in Central Park where Henry gets booked by cops for indecent
exposure, and more and more. And yet more.
There is a sort of anchoring point. It is the hotel where the reservation
were made. It is lorded over by Manager John Cleese, fawning, flattering,
priggish, imperial, bossy, haughty, and unbearably rude once he finds out
that Henry's hidden emergency credit card has been maxed out (by their
daughter). The hotel is revisited later in ways impossible to sum up.
It's not funny. Viewers who travel a lot could identify with some of the
journey's mishaps  but their outrageous accumulation here is neither
surreal (as in a Laurel and Hardy movie) nor real. If you got involved in
this film and its protagonists you might factually feel pain -- which, in
any case is a no-no in farces where you have to keep your distance and
laugh in the knowledge that all this couldn't really be. But  this movie
loses you on both sides. You don't get involved and you don't get amused.
Just bored by this incessant overkill.
Much of this is tasteless, crude and coarse. When the couple sneaks into
the hotel bar so as to fill up on freebie snacks, and Goldie Hawn is
approached by a horny traveler, the way she plays along is unlikely, tacky
and unpleasant, as it what follows.
But I'll say this much for Goldie. She's still cute. Never a classic
looker, she's wondrously  youthful at  54, exactly the same age as Steve
Martin's. Her secret is between her and her doctors, but the result is
amazing. She was, by the way, in Seems Like Old Times, another Simon movie,
while Martin starred in The Lonely Guy, also directed by Hiller, the
original The Out-of-Towners helmer.
The remake is as mechanical as can be. Its continuity is a mess. One
example. After 24 hours of catastrophes, frustrations, and their longest
night ever, the couple should by all rights smell to high heaven, look
unkempt, filthy, dishevelled. Not so, especially Goldie who is still nicely
coifed and in pressed clothes.
For many viewers critical of the picture, the saving grace will be John
Cleese as Mr. Meursault. Not for me. The overkill extends to his character
which is overloaded, including the fact that Cleese is a
crypto-transvestite, another mechanical gimmick to allow Goldie to
blackmail him. Cleese is patterned, with blinding obviousness, after his
Basil Fawlty  in the superb British TV series Fawlty Towers. But that was
then (1975-79) and this now.  On television he was the spoof of an
irascible hotel owner. Here he too is on automatic drive as he spoofs a
spoof, something that almost never works.
The few  onscreen minutes, at the start, of newcomer Oliver Hudson (as Alan
Clark, the son) are nice and show promise.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Wilde (1997)
WILDE (UK, 1997) *** 1/3   Directed by Brian Gilbert. Written by Julian
Mitchell,
from the book "Oscar Wilde" by Richard Ellmann. Photography, Martin Fuhrer.
Editing,
Michael Bradsell. Production design, Maria Djurkovic. Music, Debbie
Wiseman;  Produced by Marc Samuelson & Peter Samuelson.  Cast: Stephen Fry
(Oscar Wilde), Jude Law (Lord Alfred
 Douglas), Vanessa Redgrave (Lady Speranza Wilde),Jennifer Ehle (Constance
Wilde), Gemma Jones (Lady Queensberry), Judy Parfitt (Lady Mount-Temple),
Michael Sheen (Robert Ross), Zoe Wanamaker (Ada Leverson), Tom Wilkinson
(The Marquess of Queensberry).
A Sony Classics release. 116 minutes. R (sex, full rear male nudity)
Because I take for granted that Oscar Wilde the writer, the man and his wit
are familiar to the film's potential public, I will not go into a general
intro. Wilde's homosexuality (a crime under English law until the late
1960s), his famous affair with Lord Alfred Douglas, and the ensuing trials
that finished off poor Oscar, have made him a "cause celebre" --if I am not
mistaken, the first of that nature in modern history. Understandably,all
this has made of Wilde a patron saint of gay artists.
Among the many cinema genres, few can be as difficult and as vulnerable to
criticism as the biographical picture. Biopics are compromises. To relate a
life -- or part of one -- and remain faithful to history in two hours of
film is an impossibility, one that is even nastier than screen adaptations
of major novels. Condensations, simplifications, selected episodes are
unavoidable.
A case in point is the set of biopics directed by William Dieterle in the
1930s and early 1940s. They were all reverent works on major figures: Louis
Pasteur (with Paul Muni, Oscared), Florence Nightingale, Emile Zola (Best
Picture 1937, also with Muni), Juarez (with Muni), Reuter (with
E.G.Robinson), Dr. Erlich (Robinson) Well-made, using major actors in both
main and supporting roles, these works were big popular hits in their time.
But today, with  audiences and critics, movies in that style would get a
much more cautious reception. Even the sacrosanct epic "Napoleon" (1927, by
Abel Gance) might be --but is not-- faulted for historical inaccuracies.
Dieterle and his likes represented the old school of biopics. After a
transition period (e.g. Wilson, The Desert Fox, Viva Zapata) came the new
school, in which no two of the better films followed the same strategy.
Creative and unconventional treatments days were given so such masterful
works as --and I cite a few pell-mell --Raging Bull, Van Gogh, Chaplin, Joe
Hill, Lenny, Lawrence of Arabia, Malcolm X, Tous les Matins du Monde,
Vincent and Theo, Stevie, Camille Claudel, Rosa Luxemburg, Hanussen, An
Angel at My Table, Ed Wood...
Although Wilde, was not an easy item to tackle, it acquits itself
honorably. There must have been good rapport between director and writer.
Brian Gilbert, who made the funny, witty Vice Versa, the underrated Not
Without My Daughter, then Tom and Viv, opted here for a Masterpiece
Theatre/Ivory-Merchant style, unrevolutionary but fitting the subject.
Versatile novelist-playwright Julian Mitchell is the author of many
scenarios, including those of Arabesque, Another Country, Vincent and Theo,
August (the directorial debut of Anthony Hopkins)-- not to mention nine
episodes of that civilized delight, the Inspector Morse TV series.
Mitchell had already worked on another gay theme I know of, in his
prize-winning stage-play  Another Country which is about  1930s students
public-school students for whom homosexuality was trendy. Years later, as
in the notorious Guy Burgess and Donald Maclean case, several government
officials were found spying for the Soviet Union. A very good film was made
of this. It starred Rupert Everett. The script was by Mitchell.
For the current movie --the third about Wilde--  Mitchell  based his
scenario on the admirable biography by Richard Ellmann. The great scholar
and critic  finished this long labor of love as he was dying of Lou Gehrig'
s disease.He died in March 1987. The book appeared in early 1988. There is
no way for a film script to reconstruct a 680-page volume. The scenario
wisely opted for  selective choices and inspirations. It is faithful to
Ellmann's belief that Wilde was as original and major  a writer, and a
cultural influence, as he was a man who invented his own public persona, as
wit, esthete, dandy, poseur, society lion and, among much else, a sly
critic of the middle and upper classes of England, the very people who were
the butt of Wilde's plays yet applauded them.
The film does not go into Wilde's Irish and English past and upbringing. It
plunges right away into an already established Oscar who marries Constance.
His wife, in older parlance "gave him two boys".
Robert Ross, a younger houseguest, reveals to Wilde that he (Oscar) is
really a homosexual. A relationship starts between the two. It is followed
by others, culminates in the love affair between Wilde and handsome, some
20 years younger Lord Alfred Douglas ("Bosie").
It's a bizarre affair. Oscar's love is steadfast, while the capricious,
self-spoiled Bosie blows hot and cold, introduces Oscar to lower class
people, often insults, hurts, exploits, taunts him and is despicable. He
flaunts their couple in public,also taunts his father. The latter, played
by Tom Wilkinson --who has a very different role in The Full Monty-- is
here the wealthy Marquess of Queensberry, a crude, rude, violent sportsman
whom Bosie hates. (He is the same Lord Queensberry after whom the basic
codes for boxing were named, although another sportsman wrote them).
Delightful is the movie's inclusion of some aspects of Wilde's enormously
growing fame as a playwright, plus much Wildean humor, wit, and the
expected Wildean thoughts and epigrams. But concurrently as well as
exponentially, we see the sadness of the man's public and private life, the
unavoidable troubles and scandals. The tragedy, latent throughout the
writer's life, now springs out of the closet. It becomes all the more
painful to watch since Wilde is a most likable fellow, generous to a fault,
and never really inflicting harm or hurt on others.
Actor Stephen Fry is an uncanny match for Wilde. He even looks like him,
though taller, less rotund, and with a face not so soft as in the
photographs of Wilde. Fry, also a writer and a wit, temperamental,
unpredictable, rather sweet, openly gay, is a rare case of perfect casting.
Superior too is the casting of Lord Alfred Douglas and that of  Robert
Ross. Robbie remains through thick and thin Oscar's true friend and helper,
and the voice of reason.
Because we know how everything comes out, the earlier and/or some lighter
scenes are made suspenseful as we wait for the axe to fall. And we wish
that the so-smart Oscar had not been so dumb as to be prodded by Bosie into
initiating that terrible libel suit against Queensberry. If there was a
time when "don't ask, don't tell" was the best possible advice, it was in
Victorian days.

Title
Review for Wedding Planner, The (2001)
THE WEDDING PLANNER  *  (2001) Directed by Adam Shankman. Screenplay, 
Pamela Falk, Michael Ellis.  Photography, Julio Macat. Music, Mervyn 
Warren. Cast: Jennifer Lopez (Mary Fiore), Matthew McConaughey (Steve 
Edison)   Bridgette Wilson-Sampras (Fran Donolly),  Justin Chambers 
(Massimo), Judy Greer (Penny), Alex Rocco (Salvatore Fiore), Joanna 
Gleason (Mrs. Donolly),  Charles Kimbrough (Mr. Donolly), et al . A 
Sony release. 101 minutes. PG-13
"Veni, vidi, vici" said Julius Caesar, "I came, I saw, I conquered." 
Re The Wedding Planner, I came, I saw, I was monumentally bored.after 
he first reel. In the latter, Mary (Lopez) is the powerhouse top 
handler in a chic firm of wedding consultants in San Francisco. The 
early sequences are amusing. She runs a wedding with the modern, 
technological efficiently of a three-star general. Self-assured and 
fully aware of her value to the firm, she is gunning for a 
partnership. The scenes are fast-moving and fast-talking, like a 
throwback to classic screwball comedies such as Twentieth Century, 
Bringing Up Baby or His Girl Friday.
But her private life, while minutely organized, is empty. Then, while 
planning the highly profitable wedding of heiress Fran, in a forced 
development a street accident causes Meeting Cute with pediatrician 
Steve (McConaughey). In a mega-coincidence  of the kind that give  a 
bad name to movies, romance raises its head as soon after Steve turns 
out to be is the fiancé of client Fran.
An unlikely quid pro quo is reinforced by shovelfuls of artificiality 
in plot, cardboard characters, relationships, antagonisms, 
side-events ... Another thread has Mary's father Salvatore  (Alex 
Rocco), surprise her with the arrival from Italy of Massimo (Justin 
Chambers) a childhood playmate. As absurdities escalate, Massimo 
wants to marry Mary. His role is useless, gratuitous and plain 
stupid. His Italian as well as his Italian-accented English are 
atrociously false, as are daddy Salvatore's.
Shots, scenes and sequences pile up in a gauche, unintegrated script. 
The movie is like a cut-up cadaver that they are trying to make whole 
with stitches. There is no forward movement, no impetus, no suspense, 
no guessing in all this flab. You can see everything coming from Day 
Two as the "developments" increase to Himalayan heights of dumbness.
In the finale, the Lopez character and the pediatrician will be the 
new couple. Predictable. But it makes no sense that she blames 
herself for having been a control freak. She was simply doing her 
job.  All this is nap-inducing with the force of five Tylenol-Plus.
There's an embarrassment of choices in attributing film guilt to the 
makers. A first-time director whose trade is choreography; a novice 
writer and her inexperienced collaborator; a regiment of producers, 
executive producers and co-producers; a plethora of companies ( the 
credits read: A Sony Pictures release of a Columbia Pictures and 
Interme presentation of a Tapestry Films/Dee Gee Entertainment/IMF 
production in association with Prufrock Pictures.) Too many cooks?
The screening of this feature was preceded by three unpromising 
previews. The Wedding Planner confirmed that after the mostly awful 
summer 2000 movies, and after their subsequent replacement by some 
good films year-end items (the usual pre-Oscar race), bad movies are 
back to reinforce the dismal norms of Hollywood.
By coincidence, a couple of hours after seeing The Wedding Planner, I 
caught on cable Gregory Nava's 1997 biopic "Selena," with Jennifer 
Lopez in the title role. It is about the Tejano singer who was 
murdered in 1995, at age 23, just as she was becoming a household 
name. It is just a good movie --but it  feels even better when 
compared to The Wedding Planner.
A trivial note: Fran is played by the former Bridgette Wilson who 
married tennis player Sampras and now goes under the hyphenated name 
Wildon-Sampras.
A non-trivial note: for her role Lopez was paid 9 million dollars.

Title
Review for Cider House Rules, The (1999)
THE CIDER HOUSE RULES *** 1/3. Directed by Lasse Hallstrom. Written 
by John Irving, based on his novel. Photography, Oliver Stapleton. 
Editing, Lisa  Zeno Churgin. Production design, David Gropman. Music, 
Rachel Portman. Produced by Richard N. Gladstein. Cast: Tobey Maguire 
(Homer Wells), Michael Caine (Dr. Wilbur Larch), Charlize Theron 
(Candy Kendall), Delroy Lindo (Rose), Paul Rudd (Wally Worthington), 
Jane Alexander (Nurse Edna), Kathy Baker (Nurse Angela), Kieran 
Culkin (Buster), Kate Nelligan (Olive Worthington), Erykah Badu (Rose 
Rose), Heavy D (Peaches) et al. A Miramax release. 125 minutes. PG-13
John Irving's novels are fat, have surprises and asides, can meander 
in interesting ways, and add fantasy to realism. Three have been made 
into films  : "The World According to Garp," (script by Steve 
Tesich);  "The Hotel New Hampshire," (script by Tony Richardson); and 
"Simon Burch" (adapted very freely from "A Prayer for Owen Meany" 
with a script by that film's director Mark Steven Johnson)
Irving has not been happy with the films, as he details in his "My 
Movie Business: A Memoir."  He took matters into his own hands by 
doing the scenario of "The Cider House Rules," a project for 13 
years. His script is only a smallish part of the novel, which has 
been pruned, cut, simplified and made into a most appealing, original 
movie. You have to see it in order to understand how its title-- a 
bit precious and esoteric perhaps-- works out. Were Irving starting 
from scratch, the film might have been simply called "Homer Wells."
It takes you swiftly from the 1920s (when Homer was born) to 1943-45 
the years of its major "action," although some hurried reviews make 
it begin in the 1930s. Michael Caine plays Wilbur Larch,  who 
apparently is not just the M.D. but the loving and beloved ruler of 
the St.Cloud's orphanage in Maine.
What once was probably a millionaire's rambling mansion at the end of 
an unpaved road, has been housing a number of parentless (or 
unwanted) children for years. There are not so many of them so that 
the building is cracking at the seams, yet for reasons not stated but 
easy to infer
( pedagogical, psychological, practical-- such as heating) the kids 
are concentrated in a large dormitory. It reminds one of "Zero for 
Conduct" or "Au Revoir les Enfants" more as a contrast than a 
similarity since the place is a loving, caring one. None of those 
aspects is spelled out in the classically lean script, but it does 
not have to be.
The oldest child --shown as a young man throughout most of the film 
--is a boy who was twice adopted and twice returned--for no valid 
reasons. He has been "baptized" Homer Wells by Dr. Larch. The 
surrogate father and son bond between Homer and Wilbur is a thing of 
beauty, not deja vu movie-formulaic, not gloppily sentimental, not 
artificially colorful. It is always touching and attention-holding.
As the senior orphan, quietly and efficiently, Homer has become the 
doctor's assistant to the point of having Larch say "I've taught him 
all I know." Like Larch, the young man loves the children and, in a 
sense, has become their teen-age father. The tiny staff (at least 
what we see of it) of the establishment is simply the doctor, Homer 
and two un-fussy, un-glamorous, dedicated nurses. Ther doctor and one 
of the women have a relationship.  so fleetingly and delicately shown 
that it warms you up.)
Homer can do anything the doctor does, except that he refuses to 
participate in abortions. These  are illegal. Larch is in some demand 
--by word of mouth, we suppose. He justifies performing performs them 
as an alternative to the women getting butchered up by back-street 
abortionists. Is it divine coincidence? The role that brought Michael 
Caine to prominence was that of Alfie in the eponymous story of an 
amoral  Cockney seducer who even arranges an abortion.
All this takes place in the first part of the movie. Toby Maguire and 
Michael Caine are superb  in  warmth, restraint,  as distinctive, not 
hammed up characters. Caine's long list of roles in dramas, action 
movies, comedies, psychological films, science-fiction, etc. etc. has 
included spies, con-men, professors, military heroes, spies, cops, 
gangsters, and everything else imaginable. His acting here may well 
be the jewel in his crown. His New England accent is excellent -- but 
just in case some people get picky, when answering a boy's questions 
about his past the doctor adds "before that I was an immigrant" 
"What's an immigrant?" says the child. "Someone who does not  live in 
Maine."
Maguire has an un-sonorous -even a tad raucous--voice, gives an 
almost minimalist performance, yet paradoxically he covers a wide 
emotional range  The children are terrific. They are not miserable; 
they are not Dickensian victims (in a clever touch they are read 
"David Copperfield" in installments); they are surrounded by 
affection. Yet they would all love to be adopted, to have a "real" 
family. A touching sequence where children try  to hook might-be 
parents with broad smiles is a gem.
America is in World War II. In a Ford convertible, Wally,  a young, 
volunteer lieutenant who flies the lethal Burma Run, drives up with 
his girl Candy. She's two-months pregnant. All goes well. Following 
the operation, Homer hitches a ride with the couple. He wants to 
experience the outside world. He's never seen the sea (in Maine!), a 
lobster, or a movie other than a beat-up print of "King Kong" that is 
projected to the children over and over. Or any girl of Candy's age 
and looks.
Wally gets him a job picking apples (hence the cider) on his mother's 
farm, not too far away, along with a group of black itinerant workers 
who show up at every season. And as his new friend Wally returns to 
the war in Asia, Homer finds in Candy (the daughter of a nearby 
lobster fisherman), a friendly guide. She teaches him how to drive; 
she shows him a drive-in theater; he sees his second movie 
("Wuthering Heights") which rather puzzles him: "It's no King Kong!")
The second part concentrates on Homer away from St. Cloud's, yet it 
does cut back to the orphanage, its happenings, its sorrows, Dr. 
Larch's strange, often funny maneuvers to fool the Board of Trustees 
and keep a kind of status quo. And meanwhile, back on the apple farm 
and the shores of the Atlantic things happen, things that will go 
even beyond a kind of coming-of-age for Homer. The first section was 
beautifully unrushed. The second picks up in speed but still without 
haste. It has some symmetries with the earlier sections, some 
predictable but fascinating nonetheless. The production and 
photography are of a high order that spreads out the Americana side 
of the story without making it "picturesque."
The choice of  Lasse Hallstrom as the director was  inspired. He is 
the Swede who made the near-classic  "My Life as a Dog" (Sweden, 
1985) and in the USA,  "Once Around"" What's Eating Gilbert Grape" 
and "Something to Talk About." His work,  character-driven, shows 
exceptional empathy for children and young people.
Even more than usual I am avoiding clueing in the readers to plot 
developments. Just see the movie. The late Francois Truffaut would 
have loved it. It matches almost uncannily his views of love, 
children, grown-ups who understand them, and adults doing the right 
thing and the wrong thing.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Happy, Texas (1999)
HAPPY, TEXAS (1999) ***  Directed by Mark Illsley. Written by Ed 
Stone, Illsley, Phil Reeves Photography, Bruce Douglas Johnson. 
Editing,   Norman Buckley. Production design, Maurin Scarlata. Music, 
Peter Harris; Produced by Illsley, Rick Montgomery and Stone. Cast: 
Jeremy Northam (Harry Sawyer), Steve Zahn (Wayne Wayne Wayne Jr.), 
William H. Macy (Sheriff Chappy Dent), Ally Walker (Josephine 
McClintock), Illeana Douglas (Ms. Schaefer), M.C. Gainey (Bob), Ron 
Perlman (Nalhober), Mo Gaffney (Mrs. Bromley), Paul Dooley (Judge), 
et a. A  Miramax release.  96 minutes.  PG-13.
"Happy, Texas" is set in the kind of place that goes by in a wink if 
you happen to drive through it.  Its motto is "a town without a 
frown." And the movie justifies it. It is also remarkable in many 
ways. It is a first film by its director (42-year old Mark 
Illsley).and the co-writers. Their previous credits in showbiz are 
minimal, even microscopic. What we have here is The Bunch That Came 
from Nowhere and certainly got somewhere.
The movie they made is loads of fun, improbabilities and 
impossibilities. But then, it is a comedy-farce, a genre that is not 
confined by verisimilitude. At the same time, while farce often has a 
lining of nastiness, even cruelty, this one does not have a mean bone 
in its body, while, additionally,  escaping the temptations of a 
feelgood picture.
The unreal plot has two convicts, Harry and Wayne, minor criminals 
and pals, plus a third one, a killer, returning to the penitentiary 
from road building. A vehicular accident frees them. The buddies 
snatch a motor home whose owners, in dire straits, will not report 
yet as stolen so as to get the insurance money. The escapees are 
(don't ask) somehow led by a sheriff (William H. Macy) to Happy, in 
the lawman's mistaken belief that the duo are the long-awaited 
organizers of Happy's Eighteenth Annual Beauty Pageant for pre-Teens.
It  happens that the genuine organizers are a gay couple, so that 
Harry Sawyer and Wayne Wayne Wayne must assume both professional and 
sexual identities. You get the drift by now. Everything is, and will 
increasingly become, a tangle of quid pro quos which is carried out 
with much brio and with the audience's willing suspension of 
disbelief. Helping the spectators is the overall kindness of Happy's 
denizens, their total lack of anti-gay (the word they use is 
"homosexual") prejudice, and, of course, love.
There are two appealing women in this tall tale, Josephine, who runs 
a diminutive bank that looks like something from an old Western; and 
schoolteacher Ms. Schaefer, whose pupils are the pageant's 
performers. (I must say here that this is not really a beauty pageant 
but a talent competition with other towns, a fact that gets us to 
avoid thoughts of a certain, murdered beauty queen).
 From the start the two buddies have started planning a robbery of the 
bank. The execution of this deed is Harry's job. Wayne gets stuck 
with training the kids. But what happens is --yes, a cliche, but so 
sweetly handled here-- that rapidly Harry and Jo (whose boy-friend is 
an on-off fellow)  are mutually attracted, while. more slowly, the 
same happens to Wayne and Mrs. Schaefer.
A third element, nicely worked in, is Sheriff Chappy, a very sweet 
fellow who discovers that he is attracted to Harry. And a fourth 
element, much later, is the reappearance of the third escaped convict 
who also wants to rob the bank while Harry and Wayne have second 
thoughts about it.
Does all this make sense? Not a bit, but who cares? The performers 
are all likable. The accents are fine, including Jeremy Northam 
(Harry Sawyer), the British actor recently seen in "The Winslow Boy" 
and in "The Ideal Husband."  Steve Zahn (Wayne), with his overgrown 
mustache and sideburns, and his redneck accent, is a model of 
vulgarity. Do notice that after his fling with Illeana Douglas, she 
shaves him, he loses his hickish looks and much of his low-class 
accent. A good, subtle touch.
Also subtle, during the weird courtship between Harry and Jo, is that 
he, her best friend by now, fixes her hairdo and makeup. This brings 
on a perceptible but un-showy progression of her looks from pleasant 
to beautiful.
The amorous sheriff is also subtly depicted, and so on. On the other 
hand, the film gets tangled up in too many directions which muddy the 
waters, especially in its second half.
When the only villain in the story (the nasty convict) takes 
hostages, robs the bank and has outside authorities come in, the 
slightly wounded sheriff says "I'm a little confused."
So might also say the public. What is a gay bar (or at least a Gay 
Night of dancing) doing in such a tiny town? Where did Wayne learn 
how to use a sewing machine? How do the kids get to be so so well 
prepared that they give a delightuful performance in the pageant. And 
more. But even then, even with a few dead spots, the movie's warm, 
inventive nature wins over the potholes of the plot.
Note: If you wish to see a splendidly comical satire of beauty 
pageants, get "Smile" a 1975 picture directed by Michael Ritchie, 
starring Bruce Dern.

Title
Review for Mille et une recettes du cuisinier amoureux, Les (1996)
A CHEF IN LOVE (LES MILLE ET UNE RECETTES D'UN CUISINIER AMOUREUX) ** 4/5
Directed by Nana Djordjadze.Written  by Irakli Kvirikadze, adapted by Andre
Grall.Photography, Guiorgui Beridze. Editing, Vessela Martschewski and
Guili Grigoriani.Production design, Vakhtang Rouroua andTeimour Chmaladze.
Music,Goran Bregovic.Produced by Marc Ruscart. Cast: Pierre Richard (Pascal
Ichac), Micheline Presle (Marcelle Ichac), Nino Kirtadze (Cecilia
Abachidze), Teimour Kahmhadze (Zigmund Gogoladze), Jean-Yves Gautier, Ramaz
Tchkhikvadze (Anton Gogoladze) A Sony Pictures Classics release. In
=46rench,Georgian, Russian, subtitled. 99 minutes.  PG-13.
A nominee for this year's Best Foreign Film Oscar, this Georgian film
(Georgia as in Caucasus, not Atlanta) is a co-production of many European
countries, notably France. Its French title means "The Thousand and One
Recipes of a Chef in Love."
It is natural for France to have played a major role in the making of
"Chef," since it  has been the major co-producing force for movies from the
former Soviet bloc. It is also the nation that, before and after the
dissolution of the USSR, best showcased Georgian cinema. My all-time
favorite festival, that of La Rochelle (France), some years ago devoted  a
huge portion of its program to Georgian films. These were accompanied by  a
large, lively and merry band of Georgian filmmakers who were not too
different from some of the characters in "Chef."
The Chef is Frenchman Pascal Ichac, played against type by the comic actor
(also writer, director and producer) Pierre Richard, familiar from his
roles in pictures such as "The Tall Blond Man With One Black Shoe,"" La
Chevre," and "Les Comperes." These are part of a large number of French
comedies that Hollywood has been remaking in the 1980s  and 1990s. In
general the adaptations are much inferior to the originals. The latest is
the  unsuccessful "Father's Day" (1997), from "Les Comperes"  of 1984.
Richard is almost unrecognizable in "Chef." Hirsute, and with his usual
naivet=E9 replaced by wordly sophistication, showing all of his 62 years, he
plays a jack-of-all-trades and master of many. He is a bon vivant,  has
been a rou=E9, a parasite, a gigolo, an opera singer  and, crucial to the
film, a gourmet and master cook whose legacy is a celebrated book of
recipes.
The movie is told in flashbacks of Ichac's adventures in Georgia during a
few years following the Great War. The ancient kingdom of Georgia was, as
per the Georgians, founded in antiquity by Jason and his Argonauts.
Eventually dominated by Turks and Persians, then annexed to the Russian
Empire in the 19th century,  after the Soviet Revolution Georgia emerged as
an independent state from 1918 to 1921.
En route to Tbilisi (a.k.a Tiflis), the capital, in a first-class train
compartment world-traveler Ichac meets  Princess Cecilia Abachidze,
appealingly played by Nino Kirtadze. (Georgian names end in  -dze, in  -ani
or in  -vili -- as in Dzhugashvili , later changed to Stalin,  or like
Kalikashvili). Both Cecilia and Pascal are sophisticates, free souls and
charmers. Pascal produces vintage wine out of his bags and a sumptuous,
unbelievable buffet out of nowhere. Who can remain unimpressed?
Pascal  could almost be the young lady's grandfather, but he is so lusty
and interesting that instant electricity is generated. The two become
lovers and go through colorful adventures.
Pascal's extraordinary palate and sense of smell allow him to concoct
culinary masterpieces. One day, at the Opera, his uncanny olfactory
abilities sniff out the gun-powder of a hidden bomb destined for Georgia's
President. He saves the man's life, the two become fast friends. Pascal is
allowed to open a restaurant in Tbilisi. Maniacally devoting his talents to
international and something like New Georgian cuisine to it, Pascal makes
of his "New Eldorado" a world Mecca for gourmets -- sometimes at the
expense of time spent with Cecilia.
Even so, he is very much in love with her, as well as with gastronomy and
life.
Asked by the President why a restaurant in Georgia and not in a Western
capital, Pascal simply states that he has fallen in love with the country.
Well he might. Georgia is a small country with an immense variety of
natural beauties. Its people are creative, artistic, have a lust for life,
drink, eat, sing, dance and do everything with energy. (Perhaps it is the
secret of their record longevity). They may also seem  slightly mad. All
this fits Pascal perfectly.
The short life of independent Georgia comes to an end when in 1921  the Red
Army and Bolshevik apparatchiks swoop down and take over.The Georgians of
today have always felt a totally separate identity from that of the Soviet
Empire. They declared their sovereignty in 1989 and independence on April
9, 1991. Georgian cinema, before and after the break, has been a major and
different entity within the Greater Russian system. In "Chef" the Bolshevik
invasion becomes another opportunity for criticizing Soviet culture.
The invaders are shown as uncouth military, opportunists, bullies,
barbarians or sexual deviants, although the caricatures do stop short of
cliches. The fate of  Cecilia, Pascal and Haute Cuisine becomes a tangle
that I will not reveal
The movie was directed by Nana Djordjaze, who looks  like her heroine
Cecilia. Ms.Djordjaze came to prominence in 1986 when her  "Robinsonada, Or
My English Grandfather" won the Camera d'Or (for best first feature) at the
Cannes Film Festival. Her husband, screenwriter-director  Irakli
Kvirikadze, did the script for "Chef." His films are excellent, especially
"The Swimmer" (1987)  Grand Prix At The San Remo Festival.
"Chef" has a lot of originality, creativity, local color, humor,
character-centered and historical details and first-rate production values.
It also has a number of structural problems, mainly, like the Revolution, a
lack of discipline.
The flashbacks from Paris-now to Georgia-then are a bit precious and lead
to a convenient  and rather ho-hum revelation. There is, however, the
exquisite bonus of Micheline Presle, the star of "Devil in the Flesh"
(1947). As Parisian Marcelle Ichac, the niece of Pascal, and   a
contemporary food photographer who cooks her own scrumptious culinary
layouts, at age 74 Miss Presle is an incredibly radiant, vigorous beauty.
Overall the film is loosely episodic and often lacks clear points of view.
There is a general vagueness as to its who-what-where-whens.  Until the
Reds invade, one is hardly conscious that a World War had occurred or that
a major revolution had taken place in Russia.
At the risk of nitpicking, I believe that many of the automobiles used by
the Red Army in 1921 are later models, even classic 1930s cars. On a basic
level is the fact that in a movie celebrating food, one does not get a true
sense of cuisine or follow the actual preparation of dishes. Pascal and his
staff are mostly shown bustling about and throwing things around.There are
no visual  kitchen glories as in "Babette's Feast," "Eat, Drink, Man,
Woman," or "Big Night."  We hear details of some of  Ichac's 1001 recipes,
but they are no substitute for sights that makes us salivate. The wider
frame of  love, life, politics,tragedies and the pursuit of happiness can
be counter-productive to the "eat, drink and be merry, for tomorrow we die"
thread.
All the same, in spite of faulty coherence and excessive to-and-fro-ing,
the basic frame of the picture is an original, often fascinating
experience. For gourmets of celluloid, i.e. connoisseurs, there is also a
series of in-jokes, of tongue-in-cheek, esoteric filmic and historical
references, as in the choice of names like Ichac, Lilli Lieftenstahl or
Madame Kollontay. This work may not make it into the Pantheon of food
movies but otherwise it is a very good addition to offbeat and to Georgian
cinema.

Title
Review for Mac (1992)
MAC  (1992) *** Directed by John Turturro. Written by Turturro and 
Brandon Cole. Photography, Ron Fortunato. Production design, Robin 
Standefer. Editing, Michael Berenbaum. Music, Richard Termini, Vin 
Tese. Cast: John Turturro, Michael Badalucco, Carl Capotorto, 
Katherine Borowitz, Ellen Barkin, Olek Krupa, John Amos, et al. A 
Samuel Goldwyn release. 118 minutes. R (language).
Filial love, autobiography, pride in craftsmanship, family relations, 
labor ethics and changing times coalesce in "Mac," the first feature 
directed by John Turturro.
As an actor Turturro made his mark in several films, notably in three 
by Spike Lee and two by the Coen brothers. His major breakthrough 
came in the latter's "Barton Fink," for which he received the Best 
Actor Award at the 1991 Cannes Film Festival. The following year, 
also at Cannes, Turturro won the Camera d'Or (Golden Camera) prize 
for "Mac", as best first film.
"Mac" is inspired by the life and the values of Turturro's own 
father, a first generation Italian immigrant who was a carpenter 
before he became a contractor, and with whom John worked on summers 
and vacations.
The film had been Turturro's project since 1980. The movie script 
evolved into a play (co-written with playwright Brandon Cole) of 
which many scenes were staged by Turturro in various small New York 
theaters. But no film producer could be found until Nancy Tenenbaum 
("sex, lies and videotape"),  who had turned down the project several 
times, met with Turturro and, impressed, not only took over the 
production, but talked him into directing the movie.
"Mac" opens in Queens, at the wake for Papa Vitelli in 1954 
(Turturro's father actually died in 1988), who leaves three sons, Mac 
(Turturro) the oldest, Vico (Badalucco), and Bruno (Capotorto) the 
junior.
Of the three, Mac is like a reincarnation of the old man, and 
inherits from him the principle that "There's only two ways of doing 
things. The right  way and my way. And they're both the same." The 
principle involves uncompromising standards of workmanship that, in 
Mac's case, turn into a veritable obsession.
The brothers go to work for contractor Olek Krupa who practices 
shortcuts -- beams spaced too far apart, fewer nails used, and the 
like. Mac's brothers, though disapproving, accept the status quo, 
especially as they have other fish to fry: Vico is a girl-chaser and 
Bruno an aspiring artist as well as a ladies' man.
Mac however eventually rebels (quite violently) and like his Papa and 
Turturro's own goes from carpenter to independent contractor, with 
his brothers. The film follows the work and travails of the outfit in 
the style of "verismo,"  roughly the Italian term for naturalism, 
which in the 1940s led to the neo-realism of Italian cinema and in 
turn influenced Italian-American  directors like Scorsese or Coppola.
Unadorned reality permeates the film. The price of this authenticity 
is that the characters are not fabricated, hence are not particularly 
interesting. But this is made up by the suspense inherent in the 
building trade, with the menace of financial debacles, physical 
dangers, graft and abuses. There are major accidents and lesser 
irritations, like a worker named Joey who is a real Sloppy Joe but is 
protected by his Union representative.
The culmination of Mac's idealistic tunnel-vision is the building of 
four finely-honed houses. The tragedy is that they won't sell, for 
reasons explained in the movie.
More than his brothers, it is Mac's girl, later his wife Alice 
(Katherine Borowitz, Turturro's wife in real life) who counsels and 
encourages him, shows good sense and genuine flair for business 
deals. I cannot tell whether this character is invented or, like much 
in the movie, comes from models. But
strong Alice is a refreshing change from the submissive movie spouses 
of Italo-Americans, before and after the 1950s.
To his credit, Turturro does not overplay his ethnic hand. The 
Sicilian-American atmosphere is inescapable, with macho boys, heavy 
accents, underlit, furniture-choked interiors. But colorfulness per 
se is avoided: no pasta, no cutesy sentiments, no shouts (except for 
the unseen, probably senile mama who screeches from her room), no 
family feuds, no Mafiosi.
At the same time, the predominantly Italianate teams of workers 
include other races and ethnicities. Characteristics are kept, the 
melting pot is more of a mixing pot,  and there is often a true 
feeling of proletarian solidarity.
As the Vitelli Bros. business develops in lurching fashion, comes 
dangerously close to bankruptcy and then bounces back modestly. 
Mac's perfectionism gradually alienates his brothers. They finally 
quit the partnership and the Old World standards, while joining, so 
to speak, the post-war half of the century, a time of sellers rather 
than builders. The disgusted Mac sums up the1950s boom while 
unwittingly prophesizing the excesses of the 1980s : "There are men 
who can do, and men who can talk."
I wonder whether or not Turturro has been remotely affected by films 
like "On the Waterfront" of 1954, the year when "Mac" begins, or 
better still, Italian movies like Francesco Rosi's classic exposé of 
crooked real-estate developers, "Hands Over the City" (1963), with 
Rod Steiger.
Yet no matter what the influences "Mac" is not  derivative. 
Throughout, it remains an actor's movie, with a stress (sometimes an 
over-stress) of closeups of faces, something that might also be 
called a TV technique, yet a system that great filmmakers such as 
Ingmar Bergman can render totally cinematic.
Initially rather slow, the tempo later picks up, notably when Mac 
passionately and heedlessly overbids against his former employer; 
when at last virtue is rewarded by the sale of all four houses; or 
when,  in a scene of  near-Shakespearean pathos, the other brothers 
go their own way.
Also to Turturro's credit, the picture, unlike Mac's building, does 
not attempt to be a "well-made" film with all the rough spots sanded 
down, all characters explained, problems solved, and questions 
answered.
The driven Mac , undoubtedly a pain to live with, is not particularly 
appealing. But the message is. As Turturro said in a 1992 interview: 
" This is a very American film, very large in spirit, that says: to 
build something means something -- and that the most important thing 
a person can do is leave a mark on the world in a simple but 
significant way."

Title
Review for Planes, Trains & Automobiles (1987)
PLANES, TRAINS AND AUTOMOBILES (1987) *** 1/4  Written, produced and
directed by John Hughes. Cinematography, Don Peterman. Editing, Paul
Hirsch. Music, Ira Newborn. Cast: Steve Martin, John Candy,  Laila Robins,
Michael McKean, Kevin Bacon,  Dylan Baker, et al. A Paramount release. 93
minutes. Rated R.
Bete noire [from the  French. Literally "black beast] : a person, situation
or thing strongly detested or avoided: bugbear.
For Steve Martin, an ad executive who tries to get from New York home to
Chicago for Thanksgiving, the Odyssey of his trip is bad enough without
having to put up with the companionship of a slob, curtain-ring salesman
John Candy.  Candy is his "bete noire."  For this critic too,  Candy has
been a "bete noire" in movie after movie.  But a funny thing happened on
the way to Chicago. As the odd couple approaches the Windy City, Candy
ceases to be a "bete noire" both for Martin and for me.
John Candy  isn't about to replace Laurence Olivier -- or even Oliver Hardy
(few fat comics ever reach the top), but within his specialized persona he
finally comes into his own  in Planes, Trains And Automobiles.
Martin's troubles begin when he tries to catch, in the Manhattan jungle, a
cab to the airport . They increase exponentially during the movie's
one-and-a-half  hours. Candy, in the next seat on the plane, attaches
himself to Martin. When the plane cannot land at  O'Hare and ends up in
Wichita, willy-nilly the overage yuppie and the proletarian  have to face
together a picaresque series of detours through the Midwest. All involve
misadventures, frustrations and delays, and most means of transportation,
including a garish taxi, a missing rental car, and another one that catches
fire. Martin  cannot stand Candy, periodically abandons him, but fate
throws them back together again as they share all imaginable catastrophes,
from sleazy motel rooms to having their money stolen by burglars.
The basic comedy of the film is  that of an odd couple having to face the
many traumas of modern transportation gone haywire. Those ordeals are so
true that the less you have travelled the more you will laugh. But chances
are that  if you 're a frequent traveller the movie's  chain  of horrors
and frustrations will make you shiver rather than giggle. What
writer-director Hughes depicts is firmly embedded in reality, with minimal
exaggerations.
Hughes' view of a traveller's  America is quite jaundiced. What he does
with  New York is nasty, with people like a lawyer who gives up his cab
only after Martin has bid up to $75, or like a thoroughly bitchy
stewardess. Mid-America fares poorly too as Hughes works into his scenario
much physical ugliness of people and places.
Looking at it in this way, it doesn't really amount to comedy. But Hughes
is a canny fellow who knows which  tricks of the trade will work on mass
audiences. His movies are what Sara Lee heat-and-serve croissants are to
the real, pastry-shop product. Not the best but  reliable. So the trick in
this movie is to go beyond the ordinary and into the outlandish by adding
to  the travails of travel a mismatched duo. Otherwise, the incidents of
this trek, when taken item by item, could be too depressingly familiar to
induce any kind of mirth.
This particular notion (which is not like Neil Simon's The Odd Couple) is
not new to the movies. Its twist is to chain together (literally or
metaphorically) unlikely or antagonistic companions, who by journey's end,
will be friends or lovers. Frank Capra did it in It Happened One Night.
Alfred Hitchcock did this in The 39 Steps, with fugitive Robert Donat
handcuffed to Madeleine Carroll. Stanley Kramer shackled Tony Curtis to
Sidney Poitier in The Defiant Ones. Cop movies do it all the time these
days,  mostly with interracial partners.
I suspect that P,T & A works on the audience in different ways. For some
early-laughing viewers, past a certain point, the accumulation of
misfortunes may become mechanical. For others (including  myself) it is
precisely when the  pile of troubles becomes monstrous that  the movie
becomes really funny, because it  shifts from the realm of the almost real
to that of the almost unreal simply through the sheer weight of incidents.
This turning point is, for me, roughly when Martin, stranded on the tarmac
of the St.Louis airport  and unable to find his rented car, goes into the
familiar Steve Martinish flailings and contortions. Until about that time,
Martin has uncharacteristically been more of a straight man to Candy, more
re-actor than actor, from the opening scene of the movie.
John Candy himself may seem to be pretty consistent with (though much
better than) his previous parts, but there is in fact a major change. He
has stopped clowning and  artificially calling attention to himself. He is
not a comic any more, he is the unredeemable slob. But his good nature and
resilience slowly gain Martin's    grudging sympathy, and perhaps the
audience's. The film throws in some last-minute pathos --an old cinematic
ploy that Hughes uses to pull  the wool over the eyes of  audiences willing
to suspend logic in favor of a nice warm feeling. Does anyone  really
believe that The Slob That Came to Dinner will remain  forever Martin's
friend? But then this film is coming out during the holiday season, when we
all pretend that this is a wonderful life.
Please Note: Do not leave your seat during the end credits. There's a
clever post-scriptum right after them.
Written December 23 1987. Minimal revision  April  5 1999.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Bewegte Mann, Der (1994)
MAYBE... MAYBE NOT (DER BEWEGTE MANN) (Germany,1994) 
Written & directed by Sonke Wortmann, based on the 
comic books "Der Bewegte Mann" and "Pretty Baby" by 
Ralf Koning. Photography, Gernot Roll. Sets, Monika Bauert. 
Production manager, Norbert Preuss. Costumes, Katharina 
Von Martius. Music, Torsten Breuer. Songs by Palast 
Orchester. Producer, Bernd Eichinger. Cast : Til Schweiger 
(Axel), Katja Riemann (Doro), Joachim Krol (Norbert), 
Rufus Beck (Waltraud), Antonia Lang (Elke), Armin Rohde 
(Horst), et al. An Orion Classics release. In German with 
subtitles. 93 min. Rated R (most explicit sex talk)
My best friends are Inuit, but among the other best 
friends some are German, of the post W.W.II generations. I 
don't want to hurt them, but it is a well-known fact that, at 
least in the area of cinema,  "German Humor" is an 
oxymoron. The dictionary definition of this word is "A 
rhetorical figure in which incongruous or contradictory 
terms are combined, as in a deafening silence and a 
mournful optimist." Or, as some slanderers put it "military 
intelligence."
Given the huge historical role of pre-Nazi German cinema 
and, starting in the 1960s, the quality of the New or Young 
German cinema, it is amazing that German comedy has 
been so low on the international totem pole. There have 
been very few exceptions, and even then nothing that 
could place German comedy at a rocket's throw of 
American, U.K., Italian, Spanish, Japanese, Yugoslav, Czech, 
Hungarian, Irish, Senegalese, Australian, etc. comedies.
Now comes "Maybe..." which opened in Germany around 
September 1994, became a monster hit there, made 
locally a cult figure of its main actor Til Schweiger ... and 
took two years to cross the Atlantic. Will it finally break 
through the humor barrier for Germany?
The movie opens charmingly. In a cabaret, couples are 
dancing to songs of the 1920s and 1930s, including "Arme 
Gigolo." The sounds, style and ambiance almost fool you 
into thinking that the setting is way back when. Then 
comes the shock of modernization. 
Axel, a hunk of a waiter, exchanges glances with a dancing 
woman.As soon as that song is over, the two of them are 
found in the toilet, copulating with energy. (Interesting 
how the other film I review this week, "Feeling Minnesota," 
has an almost identical scene at the start).  
In the next cubicle, Doro, Axel's live-in girlfriend, hears 
the commotion, stands up on the seat and tells Axel, who 
has cheated on her repeatedly, that this is the end and 
that he's out of her apartment.
Seeking a temporary lodging, Axel fails repeatedly.  His 
quest ends at a homosexual acquaintance's apartment 
during a bull-session of a gay study group discussing 
female sexuality. 
Their talk is graphic, explicit, specific and detailed to an 
extent that I cannot recall from any other film. It also 
Teutonically serious, which, depending on your attitude, 
can make this funny, ludicrous or plain coarse. The movie 
is interspered with very frank language which includes a 
minute descripton of a gay man's one and only experience 
with a woman. The R-rating means a hard R, but on the 
other hand, there are no same-sex visuals anywhere.
Straight Axel becomes immediately the 
not-at-all-obscure object of the gays' desire. Doro, in 
revenge, tries to make out with a man, but cannot (an ugly 
scene where the man insults Doro). Axel is taken to a 
party of drag queens gotten up to the limit.  He becomes 
everyone's dream-boy, takes everything in stride, is not 
especially shocked. On the contrary, he looks around 
amusedly but not ironically, even strikes a friendship with 
quiet, sweet and rather timid Norbert.
The party, like much of the film, is shot in those garish 
colors that German cinema often favors. Drunk by 
evening's end, Axel accepts Norbert's hospitality until he 
finds something. There is no sex between the two. When, 
the next morning, Norbert and his other apartment 
-mates are shown, it's a total transformation. In their 
business suits, and without any queer mannerisms, they 
are just ordinary citizens.
Axel's peregrinations continue while Doro finds out she is 
pregnant by Axel and won't have any of her co-workers 
advice to get rid of the baby. Axel and Norbert go to pick 
up Axel's stuff from Doro's apartment. In an intricate way 
that cannot be described simply,  the two men find 
themselves respectively semi-naked and fully naked. 
Doro's impromptu return (how dumb can the man be?) 
panics the new friends. Discovering Norbert in a closet 
and in his birthday suit, she concludes the inevitable. Yet, 
what with Axel's fumbled protests, the nagging doubt 
remains. Is he bisexual, gay or straight? Maybe... maybe 
not.
This theme is carried to the end. The comics that are the 
source of the film had a gay point of view. The movie 
changed this into making Axel a straight who gets 
embroiled in a sexual farce. In the hard-to- translate  
German title, "bewegt" means "moved," as when someone 
crosses and recrosses the boundary between straight and 
gay. 
The plot thickens in classic bedroom-farce fashion, with 
coincidences,  confusions and quid pro quos that we 
accept willingly. It leads to a reconciliation and to the 
wedding of Axel and 9-month pregnant Doro. New 
complications arise when Axel and former high school 
lover Elke meet and make a date that eventually moves to 
Norbert's apartment. Axel pretends it is his but says 
things like "The bathroom? It is over there -- I think." 
More farce involves vegetarian Norbert's new companion, 
a butcher who justifies the saying "Never ask how sausage 
is made," and other inventions. Predictably, the birth of 
the child (with additional comic mix-ups), brings a happy 
ending. 
The movie has a valid subject, the possibility of 
friendship between straights and gays. It also deals in 
almost documentary, wild but sympathetic fashion, with 
gay life, treated with relative naturalness. But the 
story-line is uneven and meandering, the humor is 
adolescent bathroom stuff.  The new darling of the German 
masses, Til Schweiger, as Axel is pretty much of a dimwit 
stud.
The movie lacks anything approaching subtlety. Acting, 
situations and most characters are broad, done bluntly 
and heavily. Where calming pauses are needed, we get 
near-hysteria. Where mood would do, we get a mysterious 
sexual spray. Where wit is called for, we get a mix of lead 
and concrete. Whether all this is compensated by a 
number of laughs and insights is for each viewer to decide.

Title
Review for Tarzan and the Lost City (1998)
TARZAN AND THE LOST CITY (1998) *  Directed by Carl Schenkel; written by
Bayard Johnson and J. Anderson Black, based on the "Tarzan" stories created
by Edgar Rice Burroughs .Photography, Paul Gilpin . Production design,
Herbert Pinter. Editing, Harry Hitner. Music by Christopher Franke.
Produced by Stanley Canter, Dieter Geissler and Michael Lake. Cast: Casper
Van Dien (Tarzan), Jane March (Jane),  Steven Waddington (Nigel Ravens). A
Warners release. 105 minutes. PG.
Statistics differ and are unreliable. Still, the champion fictional
character in movies is Sherlock Holmes, with about 200 films, followed by
Dracula (ca.150), and the Frankenstein monster (ca.100). Figures for
Tarzan, though most confusing, probably exceed 100 if the count includes
parodies, oddities and the many productions made in India.
The original "Tarzan of the Apes" (1918) was Elmo Lincoln  (born Otto Elmo
Linkenhelt,1899-1952) who went on to more T-movies, then to just bit parts.
The first major  sound-era Tarzan --and still the most popular --was
Johnny Weissmuller (Peter John Weissmuller, 1904-1984)). Both men were
Americans (Indiana-born Lincoln's first profession was as an Arkansas
cop).Weissmuller was born in Pennsylvania --although one source  says it
was in Rumania, near Timisoara, and from parents of Hungarian nationality.
It is said that he was a sickly boy who took up swimming on the advice of a
doctor. He studied at the  University of Chicago, became Olympic swimming
champion (5 gold medals) at the 1924 and 1928 games, held a profusion of
world records and had already acted before he made his first T-movie,
"Tarzan, the Ape Man" (1932). It was a big hit, and,to this day remains one
of the best Tarzan films.
Tarzanophiles rate the 1934  sequel "Tarzan and his Mate," with Weissmuller
and Maureen O'Sullivan, as the premier Tarzan movie. A recent re-viewing on
AMC confirms this judgment. The film is vibrant. Some of the special
effects may be transparent, but several others are quite sophisticated and
others yet, impressive even today: such as the mutliple prides of lions and
the face-offs between explorers and beasts. And of course there's the
lovely, initiative-taking O'Sullivan, as a sexy and thinking Jane. She is
glimpsed more than once in the buff, something unusual in those days of
restrictions by the Hollywood Code.
I believe, though not all critics do, that the summit of screen Tarzanism
came with he 1984
"Greystoke: The Legend of Tarzan, Lord of the Apes." It was revisionist,
perhaps even post-modernist, humanistic, ecological, sociological, touching
and  technically a tour-de-force.
Enough of prolegomena. In the just-released "Tarzan and the Lost City,"
John Clayton, Lord Greystoke (a.k.a. Tarzan) is in 1913 Suffolk, about to
wed Jane, when he is sent by telepathy a vision, a cry for help by his
never-forgotten African friends. He takes the first boat to Africa.
The natives are the victims of depredations,violence and murder in the
hands of merciless whites led by Nigel Ravens. Ravens, though just vaguely
shown as a scientist-explorer-mercenary,is clearly a  vile, shifty-eyed
plunderer who will do anything for riches, from capturing animals to
killing humans for precious stones or gold. His ultimate aim is to find the
lost city of Opar with its legendary treasures.
After a six-week voyage, Greystoke is in Central Africa (shot in South
Africa). Soon after, Jane surprises him by showing up. She carries a nice
wardrobe and her brother's pistol. Much smooching ensues. It will continue
punctuating the action, which is politically correct as the blacks are
good,the Europeans bad, save for a friend of Tarzan's who, of course, has
to die.
The adventures that follow totally lack credibility, even by Tarzanian or
cartoon standards. Minor examples: Tarzan breaks in two a heavy rifle on
his knee; poisoned by a snake, he lies unconscious, is covered by a huge
swarm of bees, recovers magically; he takes Jane to their old tree-house
where they dance the Blue Danube Waltz played on an intact phonograph.The
record is scratchy, then swells into DTS multi-stereo. The bad 'uns get a
machine-gun but miss the couple, while pistol-packing Jane hits
bull's-eyes, among the other abundant bull in the story. When trekking with
the baddies, as their captive, she suddenly appears with a fresh, clean
blouse. Etc.
The film is muddled, incoherent in writing, editing. continuity and
staging, heavy-handed in every way. And the characters talk at the other
characters, not to them.
With the discovery of Opar, which is like a Mayan pyramid, dumbness
skyrockets. Anything arbitrary or preposterous goes. The tale switches
gears into magic. Special effects take over. Morphing reigns: statues into
drum-beating automatons, statues into warriors, bones into warriors (and
vice-versa), something into a colossal cobra, the movie's audience into
somnambulists.
Casper Van Dien (Tarzan) is an American whose main claim to fame was in
"Starship Troopers";   Brit Jane March (Jane) debuted in Jean-Jacques
Annaud's "The Lover," her only good film to date. Van Dien is homo sapiens
pectoralis. March is toothsome, and then some. Considered from any point of
view, "TLC" is a messy pot-pourri whose only  interest is  some beautiful
vistas and many impressively painted tribesmen. The initials TLC could have
also stood for Tender Loving Care, but there's none of it lavished on the
movie.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Dream with the Fishes (1997)
DREAM WITH THE FISHES (1997) ** Written and directed by Finn Taylor.
Photography, Barry Stone. Editing, Rick Le Compte.Production design, Justin
McCartney. Music, Charles Raggio. Cast : David Arquette (Terry), Brad Hunt
(Nick), Kathryn Erbe (Liz), Cathy Moriarty (Aunt Elise), Patrick McGaw
(Don), J.E. Freeman (Nick's father). A Sony Pictures Classics release. 96
min. R (drugs, sex, language)
For Sony Pictures to put "Dream With the Fishes" in the "Classics" group
is a bit of a stretch. A small picture in budget and production values, it
is also small on ambitions. But it is a somewhat offbeat buddy movie,
perhaps bizarre for the 1990s but quite close to certain films of the
hippie days.
Scriptwriter and now first-time director Finn Taylor has concocted a
relatively brief encounter of two youngish men from different backgrounds.
Terry is a "suit," a sad-sack accountant-type (with my apologies to that
profession). We get no details or explanations about the man, his
character, or his life, but it is clear that unspecified insecurities,
sexual frustrations and such have made him very lonely. Whether a result of
those deep seated problems or of others, Terry has become a binocularized
voyeur. From his apartment he spies on the apartments across the street,
catching especially female nudity. It is joyless, unexciting voyeurism
rather than "Rear Window" curiosity or esthetic appreciation and
gratification.
Soon we meet Terry on the Golden Gate Bridge as he prepares to jump. By an
unlikely movie-coincidence, Nick, a stranger whose girl-friend Liz Terry
"voyeurizes" most, is around on the bridge.He talks him out of this manner
of suicide, suggesting with some black humor better ways. He takes him to
his place. Terry blurts out that the death of his wife in a car accident
had made his life meaningless. (It's not that simple but I'll keep mum).
After some unconvincing stuff involving Terry's watch, it is traded with
Nick for a bottle of sleeping pills. But after swallowing them, Terry
changes his mind. When his stomach is pumped he finds out that the pills
were multi-vitamins.
The undead Terry is furious at Nick. (Why? A good question since "practical
joke" aside, Terry had balked before suicide). He finds out that Nick has
an unnamed disease and only weeks to live. One thing leads to another.
Nick, wishing to fulfill his fantasies before he dies, proposes that Terry
bankroll him and join him in living life "on the edge." This will be good
for both men. The ultimate bonus is that Nick promises to kill Terry at the
end of their explorations.
The Kevorkianish pact is a done deal. It's all the more incredible as
earlier Terry apparently wanted to go on living. Or did I miss something?
It was perhaps the method (suicide-by-pills) he had rejected.
The two new companions embark on a small-scale series of desultory
wanderings that hardly deserve to be called a Micro-Odyssey. Early on, high
on acid, they go to what's like an amusement park. Unless you know San
Francisco and identify Fisherman's Wharf it could be anywhere.(The same
goes for all settings). The episode is a stoned variant of the old
boy-dates-girl and my oh my, aren't amusement parks fun! A fortune-teller
tells Nick : "In three weeks you'll be given the job of protecting the life
of all the fishes." Since "to be with the fishes" means -- at least in
gangster films-- that a victim was executed and thrown in the waters, the
expression is none too relevant here.
Life on the edge is a pathetic affair. It involves bowling in the nude
(with women); visiting Nick's Auntie, a retired stripper; seeing Nick's
alienated father; meeting an old failure of a pal; and other such
unexciting activities. They crest with Nick, nearing his end, trying to rob
a bank in the nude.
In my notes I often find the word "uninteresting." That's what all the
characters are. Realistic-naturalist--untheatrical acting can be a good
thing but loses its value when characters and situations lack interest.
The strongest element here is death, which was called "the ultimate
obscenity" by, I believe, writer Albert Camus. No matter to whom it comes,
death is death. In movies, audiences rejoice at the death of villains. In
movies at least, death becomes more affecting, pathetic or tragic when it
happens to heroic characters, good persons, innocent individual or masses,
or simply to interesting persons. And even with many negative types, there
can the sadness of those left behind. In "Dream" there's very little of all
this. We also sense that Nick will not be really missed, even by Liz whom
he marries on his death bed.
Terry alone will miss him. The finale combines an unlikely bit about
Terry's watch and the predictable conclusion that Nick's life-affirming
love of just being, will make a new, unsuicidal man of Terry. However, the
movie's moving side is that step-by-weird-step, true friendship has grown
between the two protagonists. Shown without sentimentality, this is the
film's main value.
Technically "Dream" is fuzzy. Whether deliberately, to go for a realistic
look in defiance of studio precision, or from amateurishness, I can't tell.
Camera movements can be jerky, colors often poor or washed out, the
lighting inadequate. Work like this one that strive for a semi-documentary
look (e.g. using just existing light), would be better off in black and
white that tolerates contrasts better. Yes, I know that, sadly, viewers
generally do not like black and white. But many connoisseurs do, and this
is a film that will be seen by art house, not mainstream, audiences.

Title
Review for Dîner de cons, Le (1998)
THE DINNER GAME (Le Diner de Cons, France 1998) *** 1/2  Written and 
directed by Francis Veber, adapted from his play. Le Diner de Cons. 
Photography, Luciano Tovoli. Editing, Georges Klotz. Produced by 
Gaumont International/Alain Poire  Cast : Jacques Villeret (Francois 
Pignon), Thierry Lhermitte (Pierre Brochant), Francis Huster (Just 
LeBlanc), Daniel Prevost (Cheval), Alexandra Vandernoot (Christine), 
Catherine Frot (Marlene), Edgar Givry (Cordier), Christian Pereira 
(Sorbier),  Petronille Moss (Louisette Blond). A Lions Gate release. 
in French  with subtitles  80 minutes. Not rated. (If so would be 
PG-13)
A masterful French rib-tickler is the best farce of the year. It  has 
also earned a major BQ award by the BBNMM Foundation -- which has no 
statutes, dues, newsletters or meetings. BQ stands for 
Brevity+Quality. Its symbol is a burrito, a small donkey.. BBNMM 
means Bring Back the Ninety Minute Movie.
Hollywood remakes of films are big business. Most of those are of 
earlier Hollywood movies. Next come French movies, especially 
comedies. Within this category, Francis Veber--the playwright, 
scriptwriter and film director-- has been involved in a record number 
of remakes. He directed some of them: The Toy, The Goat, Three 
Fugitives, etc.  He Americanized several of his own scenarios  : A 
Pain in the A... became Buddy, Buddy; The Tall Blond Man with One 
Black Shoe became The Man with One Red shoe; La Cage aux Folles 
became The Birdcage; My Father the Hero kept its title;  Les Comperes 
became Father's Day, and others.
Francis Veber's play Le Diner de Cons was a boulevard play in Paris 
(roughly, the equivalent of a Broadway), and a huge hit.  Opening in 
1993, it had a run of hundreds of performance over two-plus years to 
four (depending on the source). Jacques Villeret played Mr. Pignon, 
as he does in the film version. The movie adaptation is almost 
totally faithful to the stage-play which it airs out minimally and 
sagaciously.
The film was also a smash-hit in France in 1998.  Its huge public 
came second only to Titanic's. It is almost ironical that this 
unspectacular, David-sized farce, was the main competitor to a 
behemoth, a Goliath among productions.
The major difference from stage to screen is that the American title 
was toned down to The Dinner Game. The French title translates as The 
Dinner of Idiots.  Literally "con" has a sexual meaning but it is 
used overwhelmingly with no vulgar connotation, since its  stands for 
"a fool, an imbecile, a creep, an idiot, an obnoxious man" and such. 
"Game" will do nicely, however.
The game --said to have been played by some in real life-- is this. A 
bunch of well-heeled, aging yuppies and practical jokers (farceurs, 
in French), meet regularly for dinner. They keep on the lookout for 
some poor benighted soul, a dum-dum, nitwit,  fool of some kind who, 
unsuspectingly, will entertain them at his expense. Whoever 
discoverers the biggest fool wins a prize. It is a cruel game, but 
then farce can be a cruel genre.
Publisher and man about town Pierre Brochant thinks that he has found 
the ultimate idiot in the person of Francois Pignon. (Pignon, is a 
funny name in French, and  discreetly symbolic, like those of some 
other characters. This aspect is lost on non-native speakers but 
that's of minor importance).
Pignon is employed at the Finance Ministry, which also, like our IRS, 
is in charge of taxes. This means that it deals with tax-evasion  and 
cheating, which makes it a menace to the perpetrators. But short, 
stout and moon-faced Pignon is a nice, sweet, simple fellow whose 
pride and joy is the building of scale models of important buildings, 
statues, bridges and the like, with matches and glue.
Brochant invites, sight unseen, the naive,  overwhelmed Pignon who 
comes to Brochant's ritzy apartment, so that the publisher can take 
his discovery to the group dinner. But hours before Pignon's arrival, 
Brochant, while playing golf, badly twisted his back and can hardly 
make it to the reunion. How sad! (Although the un-realism of farce 
makes  even back-sufferers laugh).  Pignon turns out to be better 
than anyone's wildest dreams, a world-class champion among fools.
The two men will never make it to the dinner. Brochant, after his 
initial amazement and hilarity at the little man's personality, will 
attempt repeatedly to get rid of him. Not only the bad back tortures 
him, but also Mrs. Brochant's call that she had left her spouse.
The news spread fast, followed by other, often hilarious 
complicationss that involve other characters too. All this in the 
presence of Pignon whom Brochant simply cannot shake off. Solicitous, 
kind-hearted, understanding Pignon whose own wife had abandoned him 
two years ago, is bent on being helpful. But whatever this 
well-meaning born bungler does or says -- to anyone --only worsens 
the mess and the confusions.
At various points, Brochant willy-nilly uses the services of his 
guest. Yet as soon as something positive emerges from this odd 
couple's collaboration, it is transformed by the well-meaning Pignon 
into a new screw-up.  Eventually, when he discovers to his utter 
sadness the truth about his dinner invitation, he generously 
continues his attempts to assist Brochant, whose meanness is exposed 
and who begins to feel guilty.
Pignon, in short, is that old and none-too-rare character, a Holy 
Fool. But clever Veber, instead of lapsing into sentimentality keeps 
his cynical-satirical edge alive to the very last scene.
Essentially the movie is "simply" about two men,  a speakerphone and 
an answering machine. Not so simply, in a main setting which is not a 
bit claustrophobic, it adjoins to the two anti-heroes a handful of 
perfectly and economically used comparses
Most memorable is Cheval (horse, in French) Pignon's colleague and 
friend, a sanguine, jolly fellow enlisted to help Brochant-- but he's 
also a bloodhound tax inspector ... and Brochant has not declared his 
collection of art.
( Could the name Cheval also be an in-joke, a reference to the 
real-life postman Cheval whose "naive" sculptures remind you of 
Douanier Rousseau's paintings and Antoni Gaudi's work?)
Veber's inventiveness is superb. He is clearly an inheritor of that 
greatest of all farce playwrights, Georges Feydeau (1862-1921)  whose 
wild comedies of La Belle Epoque (mostly bedroom farces and variants, 
and still revived in France and abroad), are the funniest imaginable. 
These are merciless yet un-cruel satires, splendidly timed and 
dialogued, minutely plotted, absurdist within realistic frames, and 
built with the precision of the best Swiss chronographs.
At his best, Veber shares those traits. Also like Feydeau, even when 
dealing with potentially scabrous set-ups and send-ups, he maintains 
a certain elegance, old-fashioned yet updated to late 20th century 
mores and manners but neither vulgar nor gross-out, the way film 
comedy increasingly is.
Though well subtitled, The Dinner Game's dialogue cannot have the 
full humor and impact of the spoken lines. Nor is the opening song 
untransalted. And, on the phone,  Pignon's "Belgian" accent 
--something the French think is most funny-- as he pretends to be a 
movie producer (don't ask), of course does not come through to 
non-Francophone audiences. In my case, the only unbelievability was 
the easy parking of cars before Brochant's chic building -- a miracle 
in choked up Paris.
There is, however, a mother lode of reparteee, gags, and qui pro quos 
that come through with absolute clarity. The proof of this is that 
Veber plans a Hollywood version of the picture, as The Schmuck's 
Dinner, most likely starring (shudder) Robin Williams.

Title
Review for Pornographer, The (1994)
THE PORNOGRAPHER ***. Written & directed by Patrick Sheane Duncan. 
Produced by Michale Nolin, Julie Bilson Ahlberg. Photography, Michael G. 
Wojciechowski. Production design, Vincent Jefferds. Editing, Joan 
Zapata, Troy Takaki, Rick Blue. Music by & with Don Schiff.  Cast: Jason 
Tomlins  (Greyson Robey), Nicholas Cascone (E. Conrad Zabo), Melora 
Hardin (Sasha Leon Hoffner), Margot Kidder (Irene), Hector Elias (Oscar 
Ramirez), Alix Koromzay (Angel),  et al.  A Charlie Mopic Co. 
Production. Ca. 105 mins. Not rated (language, sex).
"The Pornographer" is original and interesting.  It has its share of sex 
scenes, but not obscenely shown. It is not pornography or sexploitation,  
not basically about pornography proper (or improper), not a moralistic 
expose. Rather, it is about power and its abuses. Or, as writer-director 
Duncan puts it:  "Pornography really is the exploitation of other people 
on every level."  
Connie the pornographer is not the central character. That place is 
reserved for his old friend Greyson, an artist who seems to have reached 
a pinnacle of fame and fortune, while Connie, once a filmmaker with a 
future, now makes a precarious living from "adult movies," saving money 
by shooting in Greyson's vast studio, the film's main venue. (Do not 
worry, things are neither static nor stage-like).
There are many people who orbit around Greyson, notably writer Sasha. 
She is brought in by Greyson's agent who arranges for her to follow 
Greyson everywhere so as to write a strong article about him for the 
influential magazine of her father,a self-centered man. Reluctantly(or 
is it a game?) Greyson accepts, yet does not treat her too well. But 
then, he treats everyone in arrogant, exploiting fashion, from a 
wealthy, naive lady for whom he's doing an aggressive iron gate,  to a 
young model who provides him with sex and a collage that becomes "his" 
work. 
He also employs a Hispanic day laborer. Oscar's stories of woe about the 
unspeakable crimes of a military dictatorship, become Greyson's 
productions. Oscar is also skilled in putting together some of those 
works, yet he is paid just minimum wages.
What comes through in the film's inexorable march is the Portrait of the 
Artist as a Monster, an egotist with insecurities that he hides from his 
own self. In ways I must not detail, hating himself, he hates others, 
loves humiliating them.
Connie too orbits around Greyson. In a surface-only paradox, it is the 
pornographer who has a big heart, who cheerfully and secretly takes care 
of dying-of-AIDS ex-lover Irene (Margot Kidder, for most of us the only 
familiar name in the movie), and who falls desperately, touchingly in 
love with streetwalker Angel. 
"The Pornographer" has surprising density and an acute understanding of 
human strengths and weaknesses. It is at the other extreme of the many 
High Concept Hollywood movies that can be summed up in one sentence. 
Given space, one could relate the picture to some extent, but even this 
would miss both essence and nuances. It would give away far too many 
developments and surprises, including real pscyhological and behavioral 
suspense. I will only ask the reader to remember two principles: that of 
old Latin saying "homo hominis lupus" ("man is a wolf to man")  and that 
of the Creator as Destroyer.
The movie is very well acted by convincing non-stars. Its symbolic 
accoutrements fit it in realistic fashion. The visuals are not overdone, 
yet they are striking, can evoke both loneliness and rage, artistic 
trendiness as well as a twisted view of life, and a kind of nihilism 
that fits in with the disabused mood of the 1990s.  The Greyson Robey 
pieces, all eloquent, were created by production designer Jefferds. 
There are solid and valid insights into the psyche. Note Oscar's story 
about the beautiful woman who after her husband had been taken away by  
soldiers, stood every day at the village square with a picture of her 
man. Its violence dovetails with the brutality of much Western art and, 
of course, the degradation of pornography. There are strong echoes here 
of Argentina's "Mothers of the Plaza de Mayo." Occasionally we can spot 
some deviously ironical references, such as Sasha plotting to take over 
her father's magazine. Her family name, Hoffner, recalls that of the 
Playboy mogul who turned over his empire to his daughter.
The movie was shot in 16 mm and on a mini-budget but doesn't look it. A 
few times I had to strain for dialogue audibility, the result, perhaps, 
of the tricky fine-tuning  in the unfamiliar format of the preview 
print. 
Some information about writer-director Patrick Duncan.  His films 
include : the Chuck Norris vehicle "Code of Silence" (85, writer), the 
first film ever directed by University of Illinois alumnus Andy Davis 
who later made the mega-hits "Under Siege" and "The Fugitive"  --- "A 
Home of our Own" starring Kathy Bates (93, director and writer)---"84 
Charlie Mopic" (89, director, writer)-- "Live! From Death Row" (made for 
TV, 92) (director,writer)---"Nick of Time" (95, writer) --- Mr. 
Holland's Opus (writer)---the prize-winning HBO series "Vietnam War 
Story" (producer, writer of several episodes) --- the TV documentary 
series "Medal of Honor" (co-writer, director) --- the TV film "Live! 
>From Death Row."  Almost all of the above have received high critical 
praise.
Note: "The Pornographer" has a 1993 copyright, was shown at the 1994 
Sundance Festival, but was released in January 1996.

Title
Review for Vie ręvée des anges, La (1998)
THE DREAMLIFE OF ANGELS (LA VIE REVEE DES ANGES, France, 1998) *** 1/2
Directed by Erick Zonca. Script & dialogues, Zonca, Roger Bohbot, Virginie
Wagon. Photography, Agnes Godard. Editing, Yannick Kergoat. Sets, Jimmy
Vansteenkist. Music,Yann Thiersen. Cast: Elodie Bouchez (Isa), Natacha
Regnier (Marie), Gregoire Colin (Chriss), Jo Prestia (Fredo), Patrick
Mercado (Charly). A Bagheera production (Paris). A Sony Pictures Classic
release. 113 minutes.  Rated R (sex)
It's a French film. A very good French film. A very French French film.
And, to boot, a first feature by a Frenchman, then 42, with a rather
unusual name that more often than not misspelled:  Eric, Erik, Erick,
Zonka, Zoncka, Zonca. His background is unusual too. Born in Orleans in
1956, while still in high-school he decided to become a filmmaker. He moved
to Paris at age 16, discovered American cinema, took acting lessons,
survived via odd jobs. At age 20 he moved to New York, spent three years
there, survived via odd jobs, married a dancer from the Merce Cunningham
Company, took more acting classes, discovered European (including, very
much, French classical cinema). Back to Paris for two years' study of
philosophy and more odd jobs. At age 30 he entered movies as an apprentice.
He then became an assistant, later directed TV documentaries and, beginning
in 1992, three short films, all successful on the festival circuit. But
glory seldom comes from shorts.
It arrived with a bang when Dreamlife and its makers received a slew of
nominations at the 1998 Cannes Festival, where its two protagonists shared
the Best Actress prize. Ms Bouchez, a veteran of many films, is in
increasing demand, and was in another, very good film at Cannes, also a
first feature called Louise (Take 2). Ms Regnier is a newcomer. At the 1999
Cesar awards (French Oscars), the movie was Best French Film,  Elodie
Bouchez Best Actress, Natacha Regnier Most Promising Actress. At the
European Film Awards, Mr. Zonca won as European Discovery of the Year, the
two ladies as Best Actresses. At the Viennale, the movie was The
International Critics Association's choice.
Dreamlife has no plot by Hollywood standards. A penniless drifter, the
rather petite 21-year old Isa (for Isabelle), carrying all her possessions
in a huge backpack, wanders into the industrial city of Lille in Northern
France. She hopes to stay with a male friend, finds out he's left town,
somehow spends a cold night in Lille (there are tiny clues that it is the
post- Christmas season). Her attempt to pick up some francs by making
postcards from magazine pictures leads to a casual encounter (a marvelous
Yugoslav who has a daughter her age) who finds her a sewing job in a
minimum wage clothing factory. Isa's skills being zero, she gets quickly
fired, but not before meeting a co-worker, Marie, also 21.
Hesitantly, Marie puts up Isa in "her" good apartment, one that she is
minding for a mother and a daughter who, after a car crash, are comatose in
a hospital. By degrees, Isa and Marie form a  friendship--in fact more
camaraderie than affection-- though having impecunity in common are
otherwise different from each other. Isa, who flashes generously her big ,
dark eyes and a sunny, toothy smile (Ms Bouchez's trademark), is adaptable
and comfortable with her ambulatory life. We learn only little about her
past. A scar over an eyebrow (apparently put there at Bouchez's suggestion)
keeps catching our eye and making us wonder how it got there? Violence
against Isa? A tomboy accident?
Pretty unsinkable and optimistic, she recalls a bit Godard's My Life to
Live, in which Nana (Anna Karina), forced to survive through prostitution,
still thinks that life can be beautiful. But unlike Godard, Erick Zonca
will not analyze, philosophize, expatiate or ask the incessant questions
that hallmark Godard's work. Dreamlife is entirely "what you see is what
you get."
There's also a strong, loving streak in Isa. She discovers and reads, in
the apartment, the diary of Sabine, the daughter. Next thing you know, she
is visiting regularly the vegetable-like Sabine at the hospital (the mother
had died) where she speaks to her as if in the belief that this will help
her get well. It's a wonderfully touching invention .
At the other extreme, slender, taller Marie is are rebel with  a huge,
misanthropic chip on her shoulder. (It is later explained partly by her
background, partly as the not unusual dissatisfaction among the French
working class). Isa, strictly from hunger yet laughingly takes on the very
temp job of dressing ridiculously (in the cold street), putting on
roller-skates and advertising sandwich-boards. Marie, however will not. She
is not amused. She thinks, correctly but impractically, that this is
demeaning work. She is always very conscious of the humiliations of life.
Yet she's also capable of fun and games.
Trying to crash ticketless a rock-concert, the girls are blocked by two
tough-looking bouncers (and bikers), thin Fredo and corpulent Charly. What
starts as antagonism ends up as sweet friendship, which extends to Marie
sleeping--but not having an affair --with Charly. She's keeping her options
open.
The main option comes in the person of Chriss (sic), a young man who is
what the French call "papa's son," a spoiled fellow whose family has bought
him a night-club (the very one where the bouncers work) and more. What
really matters here is that Chriss is a cad. When Marie is caught
shoplifting, he rescues her. In spite of her hostility extending also to
him, she yields, goes to bed with Chriss, begins a short-lived but
calamitous relationship which is punctuated by very real humiliations,
which is never explained, in which stages of abandon alternate with  stages
of clenched teeth. One thing is fairly clear: that Marie herself does not
know what she feels except that the wealthy man will be her ticket out of
misery. How naive.
The Chriss business puts a wedge between the girls. Isa, who at first
seemed to be a lightweight in the brains department, proves to be
realistic, perspicacious and anxious to open Marie's eyes to her
self-destruction. It all falls on deaf, hostile ears...
The movie is beautifully made in all respects, and with a strong sense of
economy of means. Photography is done smoothly with super-16 cameras which
allow for flexibility, the following of characters, and a near-documentary
look. Style, script, editing, acting, real sets too are under the sign of
economy as well as palpable intimacy in the collaboration of all involved.
The film is not manufactured, instead,  it records life. It also bucks the
contemporary trend of movies begetting movies, of the past-
movies-awareness that was the gift to us by the French New Wave but went on
to become mere fashion (viz. Tarantino and hordes of Sundance-ish films).
Here movie-consciousness does not replace life-consciousness. There are no
riffs on past pictures. Yet Dreamlife is eminently French.
For one thing, it is character and relationship oriented. For another, it
deals with the working class, which diversely gets labeled as proletarian,
blue-collar or low-class. The paradox (a staple of French cinema), is that
the rich, petty bourgeois Chriss is in reality very low-class ethically.
Clearly too, the classic French cinema that Mr. Zonca paradoxically
discovered in New York, has marked him. He updates the "poetic realism" of
(mostly) the 1930s with its stream of "Popular Front" movies that
celebrated loners among the common men and women, that had their own streak
of "miserabilism," and that never quite came to a halt. Witness some of
Robert Bresson's works and, even closer to our day, Agnes Varda's Odyssey
of a female drifter in Vagabond (1985).
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Courage Under Fire (1996)
COURAGE UNDER FIRE *** Directed by Edward Zwick. 
Written by Patrick Sheane
Duncan. Photography, Roger Deakins.Editting,Steven 
Rosenblum.  Production design, John Graysmark. 
Music, James Horne. Cast:  Denzel Washington (Lt. 
Col. Nathaniel Serling), Meg Ryan (Capt. Karen 
Walden), Lou Diamond Phillips (Monfriez), Michael 
Moriarty (General Hershberg), Matt Damon (Ilario), 
Seth Gilliam (Altameyer), Bronson
Pinchot (Bruno), Scott Glenn (Tony Gartner) and 
Regina Taylor (Meredith). A TCF release. 116 mins.  
Rated R (wartime violence)
The serious specialties and interests of the key 
makers of  "Courage Under Fire" almost guarantee 
quality in this film. Edward Zwick  journalist, 
editor (The New Republic, Rolling Stone), worked on 
TV (features, co-creating "Family," 
"thirtysomething," "My So-Called Life") and directed 
"About Last Night," "Glory," (where Denzel 
Washington figured prominently ), "Legends of the 
Fall." 
Vietnam veteran  Patrick Sheane Duncan is the 
writer-director of the excellent Vietnam film "84 
Charlie Mopic," produced and wrote several episodes 
of HBO's "Vietnam War Story," co-wrote and directed 
the documentary series "Medal of Honor." He has 
other credits too, including the script of "Mr. 
Holland." 
 "Courage" is a fine film, although  I wonder 
whether or not it will remain in our memories. Few 
movies, even good ones, do, for complex reasons. In 
"Courage," Denzel Washington plays tank commander 
Lt. Col. Serling who, during the Gulf War, leads his 
men in a night attack. The men are very macho, 
slightly Hollywoodized. The Allied Coalition is not 
referred to--granted that this war was led by the 
US. This was my passing thought as, somehow, I 
remembered "Objective Burma"  which had the Brits 
howling that in their very own theater of war,  
Errol Flynn and Co. were depicted as the major 
fighters! 
Just nit-picking. Another nit is that in the thick 
of a well-shot and choreographed battle, we see 
Arabs on camels improbably taking in the sights from 
atop a high sand dune. My last nit is that our 
soldiers speak of Ay-rabs and Eye-raqis, the way GIs 
said Eye-talians in WWII. 
During the fray's confusion, the Colonel gives an 
order that results in the death of one his friends. 
Friendly fire has always been one of the tragedies 
of combat -- and seldom mentioned in movies.
Cut to the post-Gulf Pentagon where Serling, though 
exonerated, drags the burden of a terribly guilty 
conscience. His superior, General Hershberg, orders 
him to review the case of Capt. Karen Walden (Meg 
Ryan), a Medevac pilot posthumously nominated for 
the Medal of Honor for her "courage under fire."  A 
female soldier so honored is a first, one that 
reflects on the new army and public relations. It is 
also press and political fodder as well as 
vote-getting from feminists. (An obnoxiously 
opportunistic White House staffer seems to rejoice 
at all this). 
Serling is expected to produce a quick rubber-stamp 
for the nomination, but, taking his job seriously 
(doubly so because of his own trauma), he 
investigates  conscientiously among the survivors of 
the Captain's crew-- and keeps running into 
inconsistencies, gaps and   contradictions. 
The situation has been compared to that of the 
famous "Rashomon" You can see why, yet the 
connection is tenuous. In the Japanese classic four 
unconnected people told different stories of the 
same event because of different perceptions and 
memories. In "Courage,"
it is the interpretations that are different, for 
reasons I will not reveal. All the while, flashbacks 
illustrate the many faces of Capt. Walden, each one 
as told by  a different interviewee. (It's of course 
a good old device. See "Citizen Kane" for its best 
illustration).  
Denzel Washington is more than a star. He is one of 
our top actors and in his unassuming ways, a screen 
presence. His facial and body expressions fill very 
well a small but powerful range of feelings: private 
pain, a deep belief in the honor of the Army, a 
dedication to truth. Even when almost commanded to 
drop the investigation, Serling remains like a quiet 
bulldog that won't let go. His methods are simple, 
both logical and intuitive, efficacious. Although he 
is no Hercule Poirot or Lieutenant Columbo, he has 
Columbo's double-checking mindset. When, like Peter 
Falk, he says casually: "OK. One more question," you 
can see that he is on to a new clue.
There are moments of highly-charged emotion, yet on 
the whole the film does not come through as really 
engaging or affecting. I can't tell exactly why on a 
single viewing, but I believe that this is caused by 
the movie's very polish and high production values, 
the neat, predictable outcome, and the ambitious 
editing that zig-zags more than necessary.  
Would-be impassive yet warm Denzel Washington 
carries the movie  with the help of  Matt Damon who 
excels in a nuanced role stretching from jocular and 
naive to tortured soul. Lou Diamond Phillips has a 
melodramatic, over-the-top but effective part. The 
acting by most others is, at a minimum, competent. 
Reviewers have split into  I-hate-Ryan and 
Ryan-is-great camps. Again, after just one screening 
I can't really take sides but my impression of Meg 
Ryan was that she did all that was expected of her. 
In spite of people lying to, and authorities leaning 
on Serling, this is a decent picture in the moral 
sense. Essentially it is the story of a suffering 
man,  of a woman he never met, and of convincingly 
shown reactions of soldiers under extreme pressures. 
The battlefield events are well-handled, done with 
technical virtuosity but without gung-ho heroics or 
graphic and gratuitous violence. The political and 
the women-in-arms aspects are incidental. At the 
same time, there is a solid subtext that could bear 
the title of a famous 19th Century French book, 
"Military Grandeur and Servitude."

Title
Review for Impostors, The (1998)
THE IMPOSTORS (1998) ** 1/4.  Written & directed by Stanley Tucci. Prodcyed
by Beth Alexander & Tucci. Photography, Ken Kelsch. Editing, Suzy
Elmiger.Prodcution design, Andrew Jackness. Music supervisor, Margor Core.
Music, Gary DeMichele. Music consltant, John Head. Cast:  Cast: Oliver
Platt (Maurice), Stanley Tucci (Arthur), Alfred Molina (Jeremy Burtom),
Lili Taylor (stewardess Lily), Tony Shalhoub (the Communist First Mate),
Steve Buscemi (Singer Happy Franks), Allison Janney (Maxine/Maxi), Isabella
Rossellini (Deposed Queen/Veiled Woman), Campbell Scott (Head Steward
Meistrich), Teagle Wrougere (the Sheik), Billy Connolly (gay Scots tennis
player Sparks), Dana Ivey (Mrs.Essendine), Hope Davis (Emily, Miss
Essendine), Richard Jenkins (Johnny, the French gangster), et al.  A Fox
Searlight release. 102 minutes.R (I have no idea why)
Film, TV and stage actor Stanley Tucci had made his debut behind the
cameras, co-writing and co-directing "Big Night," one of the best  pictures
of 1966. He also co-starred in it. The Impostors, where he shares top
billing with Oliver Platt, is Tucci's first solo directorial effort. And
that's what it is, an effort. A likeable (but with limitations),
well-intentioned spoof of Hollywood screwball comedies and farces of mostly
the 1930s and early 1940s.
Platt (Maurice) and Tucci (Arthur), are Depression-era, unemployed stage
actors (or would-be actors, it is unclear) and almost literally starving.
They find themselves impersonating stewards on a transatlantic liner going
to France. The main action of the film involves a crew and passengers,
mostly off-the-wall characters inspired by stock types in old comedies.
The Impostors uses up its best scenes early. The opening is an all-silent,
nifty parody of pals Arthur and Maurice having coffee in a lovely outdoor
cafe, getting into a pretend fight in public, stabbing each other with
stage (fake) knives. Why this? It is open to interpretation. The duo may be
practicing the "realism" of their art as thespians, or trying to get out of
paying for their coffees, or both. It is an amusing sequence, although it
goes on for too long.
Then the buddies take turns as, in their shoddy room, they rehearse various
stage emotions and reactions. A hopeful visit to a producer (Woody Allen,
uncredited) gets nowhere as Allen's rich wife phones to tell him that she
is dumping both him and her financing the play. In a bakery, they scam the
owner into providing free samples of pastries in an energetic, rather
inventive scene, but also a bit messy in its writing as well as protracted
by farcical standards.
They somehow end up with the baker's gift of tickets for a performance of
Hamlet starring big-name thespian Jeremy Burtom (Alfred Molina). He is a
ham actor they detest and who performs in alcoholic stupor.
In a bar, after the show, Maurice publicly caricatures Burtom, the latter
walks in, all hell breaks loose, the pals are chased by cops, hide in a
ship's container, wake up the next morning as unwilling stowaways on board
the liner ...and have to pose as stewards.
So far, so good, in spite of flaws. The big balance of the film is on the
ship. It uses the old formula of motley characters within an enclosed
space, something that can be found in many genres, from war films
(foxholes, submarines) to public transportation (John Wayne and others in
John Ford's Stagecoach; Murder in the Orient Express; the ship in the Marx
Brothers' A Night at the Opera; etc. etc.), to Grand Hotel-type movies, to
the Towering Inferno, and on and on...
Among the passengers, who shows up but  Burtom, the pals' Nemesis, who
spots them and adds to the complications, of which there is a Niagara.
Almost all caused by characters who by and large already are, or become
impostors, in one way or another. (They are played by good New York
actors). The First Mate speaks an invented Eastern European language, is a
dedicated Red who plans to blow up the ship;  a couple (man and woman) of
French "aristocrats" are in reality underworld figures; a society widow
hides the fact she's destitute and pins her hopes on her wallflower
daughter finding a rich husband on the ship; an incognito, veiled lady is a
deposed queen who turns out to be the ship Captain's long-lost love;  and
more. Others, presumably authentic, are a black African sheik; stewardess
Lily who loves a fellow steward but is pursued by the Nazi-like Head
Steward; a suicidal singer (Buscemi) who will be saved by love; etc.
There are problems with all this. There is a plethora of characters, all of
whom are almost totally undeveloped, even by farcical standards. Their
interactions and interrelationships are nonexistent, or at best, arbitrary.
The continuity, also arbitrary and haphazard feels like a series of
improvisations which must have been great fun for the cast and crew but
less so for this viewer. Some funny bits (there are several) get weakened
by the script's cavalier construction.
On a basic level, The Impostors has been caught in a double trap. It
ignores the fact that  comedy is very hard to write and execute. Think of
the famous 19th century actor who on his deathbed,addressed his loved ones:
"Don't cry for me. Dying is easy, comedy is hard."
Comedy needs well-crafted dialogue (absent here).Think of the superb
Preston Sturges films which The Impostors faintly echo. Farce has to be
constructed like clockwork. Even the successful exceptions to such rules
(the Marx Bros, Monty Python) have a hidden logic/illogic that make for a
feeling of improvisation but are the fruit of experience.
Then there is the other major trap. You cannot parody with real success
what is already a parody. Many a clever writer-director have failed at this
in their take-offs of established comedies and of "serious" genres that
contain humor, such as Hitchcock movies. Here, I have the same feeling I
might get from a printed column that tries to imitate Dave Barry's.
The Impostors spoofs elements of so many older films that the question is
"which genres does it NOT spoof?" And why is this done so spottily in this
movie? Take the shot of many people inside a closet. Unlike its model,
Groucho Marx's cabin in A Night at the Opera, it does not go to
rib-tickling, outrageous extremes and has no true context. The film,
unbridled in its movie-consciousness, piles on too much, as if following
the "more is more" principle.
There are compensations, however. Film buffs will be kept busy figuring out
the in-jokes and the quotes from or allusions to older movies.(The
references to silent films are also intensified by the use of intertitles,
some funny, others forced).
Tucci and Platt are obvious neo-Laurel and Hardy, strictly in appearance
and not in their characters and rapport. Their fake doctors probably issue
from A Day at The Races. Tucci brings the movie's sources up to later
decades at least twice.He has the gay character utter a variant of Joe E.
Brown celebrated last line in Some Like it Hot (1959)  He is smitten by
Jack Lemmon (as a girl) who tells him "I'm a man" to which the
imperturbabale Brown replies "Nobbody's perfect."
In another instance, Tucci also may well have been thinking of Francois
Truffaut's Shoot the Piano Player (1960) in which a character says
something like "That's true. I swear it on my mother's head," and we see a
silent-movie-type insert of an old lady keeling over.
The look of the ship is in clever opposition to the Titanic-style luxury of
real and movie ocean liners. Interiors are stagy, even tacky, portholes
show a painted sea that does not move, the floor of corridors is linoleum,
and so on.
Several other details are nice. Perhaps the best visual is the makeup of
Alfred Molina,  whose Jeremy Burtom at first looks like a dead ringer of
the boozing John Barrymore. Then the likeness disappears.
Inexplicably, the press information's credits says zero about the music and
those responsible for what is a most winning aspect of the film: the choice
of lovely period tunes, many using bandoneons (a type of concertina).We are
treated to Hispanic classics--Siboney, La Cumparsita , Adios
Muchachos...The black Sheik is passionate about his original 78 rpm shellac
record of the French  Parlez-moi d'Amour (Speak to Me of Love), a huge hit
for decades, sung and made famous by Lucienne Boyer. And Steve Buscemi's
rendition of The Nearness of You is surprisingly good.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Liar Liar (1997)
LIAR LIAR ** Directed by Tom Shadyac.Produced by Brian Grazer.Written by
Paul Guay & Stephen Mazur.Photography,Russell Boyd.Production design,Linda
DeScenna.Editing, Don Zimmerman.Music,John Debney.Cast:Jim Carrey(Fletcher
Reede),Maura Tierney(Audrey Reede),Justin Cooper(Max Reede),Cary
Elwes(Jerry),Anne Haney(Greta),Jennifer Tilley(Samantha Cole),Amanda
Donohoe(Miranda),Jason Bernard(Judge Marshall Sevens),Swoosie Kurtz(Dana
Appleton), et al. A Universal release. 87 min. PG-13.
A little Jim Carrey goes a long way. A lot of Jim Carrey goes a little way.
Even just 87 minutes of him. Still, "Liar Liar" has a watcher-friendly,
funny premise. I suspect that it is a retread of "Nothing but the Truth," a
1941 Bob Hope vehicle in which Hope, a stockbroker, bets that he can tell
just the truth for 24 hours. That was an amusing flick, a  remake of a 1920
then a 1929 movie,
Carrey plays Fletch, a trial lawyer without any ethical principles. Lying
has become second nature to him and has extended into his personal life
too. Somehow this also produces a non-stop joker and jokester in Fletch,
whether in public or private life.
The notion that lawyer and liar are not only sound-alikes but synonyms is a
perfect one in our days of lawyer jokes as the bashing of lawyers
flourishes --and as the lawyers laugh themselves sick on the way to the
bank. The device of a parallel plot that involves Fletch's son Max, sweet
ex-wife Audrey (Maura Tierney) and her current beau Jerry, is soupy
padding. It comes in handy however as Fletch who has promised to be at
Max's fifth birthday party, again breaks his word, inventing excuses. When
Max makes a wish that his dad tell just the truth for one day, and
magically the wish comes true, this sets everything in motion.
To climb the legal ladder and become a partner in his law firm, Fletch
tells one and all what they want to hear. He has just taken the case of
buxom Samantha's divorce settlement, a
serial adulteress who wants half of her millionaire husband's fortune, even
though she's not entitled to so much according to her prenuptial contract.
Jennifer Tilley plays her like an updated Gloria Grahame, vacuous and with
her cleavage seeming to increase by the hour.
Telling the truth may shame the devil but not in this case. It's a
mega-case of Liar Liar Pants on Fire. Since the mess it makes of Fletch's
life is supernatural, there is no active lesson for the man, no opportunity
for examining one's conscience. The plot attempts a Band-Aid treatment to
bring this about, a new Fletch --but it is unconvincing.
When the big change hits he had just spent a night with his colleague, the
gorgeous Miranda (Amanda Donohoe). "How was it?" she inquires the next
morning.  "I've had better " he replies, sending Miranda into a paroxysm.
Later he explains his reasons to Audrey. He didn't really want Miranda
"...but she's a partner and I thought I'd help myself by making her
squeal." ( Draw your own conclusions about the PG-13 rating).
That a happy ending will reunite Fletch, his ex and his boy is a foregone
conclusion. That the ending would be so dumb (Carrey on a motorized loading
ramp chasing a plane on the runway), is cheap stuff. The film's interest,
such at it is, is to watch and hear how the lawyer will handle his
temporary total inability to lie.
This is accomplished through Carrey's sounding and behaving abnormally, but
looking  normal in a would-be chic designer suit that's too wide and too
padded. Carrey goes through manic displays of behavior, contortions and
twists of his elastic frame, twists and grimaces of his rubber face,
shouts, groans and the whole lexicon of low, lower and lowest physical
humor. He even gives a new dimension to "bathroom humor" when, at the
trial, unable to lie, he takes refuge in the men's room where he beats
himself up.
In many ways, Carrey's  is an anachronistic performance. Here Jim Carrey is
blatantly the direct descendant of Jerry Lewis and Red Skelton, yet oddly,
while  Skelton, Lewis and such are now passe, Carrey is fashionable, at
least among viewers who bask in the obvious. This is not to say that there
are no funny bits about. But whatever inventiveness there is becomes
tedious, monotonous and repetitious.
If only the film had not been so hysterically and totally Carrey-centered;
if Carrey had been on Prozac to lessen his manic hyperkineticism; if he had
modeled himself partly on the great comedians' (viz.Bob Hope) delicate
balance between the normal and the outrageous; the movie might have been a
lot more human and a lot less jerky-mechanical.
One reason for my going to this film was to see the talented Swoosie Kurtz
in the small part  the lawyer for Tilley's husband. I have been waiting
forever for her to marry Patrick Swayze and become Swoosie Swayze. One
positive result of watching Carrey was to have the importance of big,
shiny, obvious teeth brought home again. So I called my dentist for a long
overdue cleaning appointment. Really.

Title
Review for High Fidelity (2000)
HIGH FIDELITY (2000) *** 1/2  Directed by Stephen Frears. Screenplay, 
D.V. DeVincentis, Steve Pink, John Cusack, Scott Rosenberg, based on 
the eponymous novel by Nick Hornby. Photography, Seamus McGarvey. 
Editing, Mick Audsley. Production design, David Chapman, Therese 
DePrez. Music, Howard Shore. Music supervisor, Kathy Nelson. Cast: 
John Cusack (Rob Gordon), Iben Hjejle (Laura),Todd Louiso (Dick), 
Jack Black (Barry), Lisa Bonet (Marie De Salle), Catherine Zeta-Jones 
(Charlie), Joan Cusack (Liz), Tim Robbins (Ian), Chris Rehmann 
(Vince),  Ben Carr (Justin), Lili Taylor (Sarah), Joelle Carter 
(Penny), Natasha Gregson Wagner (Caroline), Sara Gilbert (Anaugh), 
Bruce Springsteen (Himself). A Touchstone Picture released by Buena 
Vista. 113 minutes. R (language)
The astute title "High Fidelity" has many meanings. The music is 
pre-hip hop or rap. The characters entranced by vinyl albums (when 
not critical of them) are Generation Xers who cult-ivate (sic) the 
sounds of their adolescence. It's fitting, because they are in a 
state of suspended youth even though the age of the 
principals-on-screen is about the same as the age of the 
principals-in-life. John Cusack was born in 1966, Jack Black in 1969, 
etc.
Rob (Cusack) owns and vaguely runs Championship Vinyl, a store of 
used records on a Chicago street that gets little pedestrian traffic. 
He has two employees. They were hired for three days a week but are 
there all the time,which tells you something about their passion for 
certain kinds of music and their nonexistent private life or other 
interests. The store looks well-stocked with records but is woefully 
un-stocked with customers. How it and its three people survive, how 
the stuff is bought, how rent, taxes or utilities are paid is a 
mystery. But the movie, like its characters, is above such mundane 
considerations.
It is, however, an excellent filmization of a popular book, and a 
seamlessly credible transposition to Chicago of the original novel's 
setting in London. Many, often lengthy passages of the book's text 
are quoted. The trick is to have Rob address directly the audience. 
No stinting here.
What gets the whole thing going is that Rob's longtime live-in 
girlfriend Laura (Danish actress Iben Hjejle) suddenly fed up with 
his messiness, immaturity, lingering childishness and other such 
characteristics, walks out on him.
The store's male trio are music-on-vinyl geeks. "Geeks" falls on some 
people's ears with a negative connotation. But then some geeks can be 
endearing. They may be living in a strange world of their own, but at 
least they have a passion for something, be this computers, toy 
trains, stamp collecting, dancing... the list is endless. The three 
men's musical knowledge is encyclopedic. Rejoice, geeks in the 
audience! You can hear some 60 songs, though mostly in excerpts.
The Championship Three are idiosyncratic. Bulky Barry combines a 
haughty attitude of Papal infallibility in pop music matters,with 
rude intolerance for tastes he does not share. Fragile, mumbling, 
timid, bald-pated Dick is a masculine wallflower. Moody Rob seems to 
be in a semi-trance-like state which melds indifference,worries, 
whining and self-irony. The trio, especially the two helpers, judge 
people by their musical tastes. It's like "tell me what you like and 
I'll tell who you are and if I'll like you" -- a valid criterion in 
many situations.
What all those men share is the mania for making lists of the top 
five albums in categories that range from life, love and death to 
abstruse topics.
Laura's departure triggers in Rob a flood of self-centered questions. 
His thoughts in the book become in the movie direct addresses to the 
audience. And the listomania makes him create his own top five worst 
breakups with the women in his life. Supplemented by voice-overs, his 
speeches are a messy mass of analyses, self-pity, puzzlements, alibis 
but also self-criticisms in which he does not spare himself. All are 
beautifully done, amusing rather than pathetic, indeed often 
hilarious. They alternate between lucidity, myopia, good and bad 
faith, and are illustrated by compact, colorful flasbacks of his 
romances, from his teens onwards.
Rob's tales of his amorous discomfitures are briefly interrupted by a 
one-night stand with singer Lisa Bonet. It does not light the man's 
lantern of self-knowledge but he does gain confidence. In 
entertaining sequences he  visits old flames who tell him (I forget 
if it is in some cases or all) that he was the one who broke up the 
affairs. This is followed by a temporarily renewed relationship with 
one ex, a recently jilted neurotic.
What Rob wants most is Laura's return. She has moved in with a New 
Age legal guru (Tim Robbins) who specializes in resolving conflicts. 
This adds to the film's ironies, as Rob is trying to resolve his own 
conflicts. His talking to the viewers is a form of "I am my own 
shrink," but then, self-surgery is no easy process.
I cannot divulge what happens next, but one does suspect that there 
is no   true closure since Rob is not a leopard that can change his 
spots. It does not take reading between the lines either to realize 
that by higher standards, none of Rob's girls was interesting enough, 
and neither was Rob. He deserved whatever he got. Laura however is a 
cut above the rest and gets more vignettes than the others.
The movie rests overwhelmingly on Cusack's shoulders, even though 
Todd Louiso's and Jack Black's very well played weirdoes, bring fresh 
comic relief. It is more than a film with Cusack, it 's a Cusack 
film, with  It has the same genuinely maverick, 
absurdist-realistic-humorous ambiance as the previous all-Cusack 
"Grosse Pointe Blank."  Of the four scenarists of each movie, three 
are the same in both. In those pictures,as well as in others, a 
variety of Cusack personae emerge, often different from one another 
yet with a base of effortless likeability that makes the low-key 
actor stand out. He stays with you the way  high-key Jack Nicholson 
or Dustin Hoffman do --and far more than most performers of Cusack's 
age group.
The breaking of the Fourth Wall (Cusack's direct speeches to us) is 
handled with convincing efficiency. The device can be dangerous, 
precious or annoyingly artificial. It worked well with Michael Caine 
in "Alfie" (1966) which for many people was the first movie to use 
this approach. But it already existed, as in olden days, funny 
movie-shorts, especially Robert Benchley's "lectures." In Jean-Luc 
Godard's innovative  "Breathless" (1959)   actor Belmondo very 
briefly speaks directly to us, and so on.
This brings me to my wondering whether or not there are Godardian 
influences here. The Frenchman's films overflow with questions spoken 
by their characters. Ultimately we get Godard himself thinking aloud. 
There are other whiffs of Godard, especially Rob's early "Did I 
listen to pop music because I was miserable, or was I miserable 
because I listened to pop music?" This very pattern abounds in 
Godard's paradoxes.
The movie is, after "The Grifters" (USA, 1990), Cusack's  second 
collaboration with British director Stephen Frears. Frears knows how 
to bring characters to life, how not to mess up scripts or interfere 
with his actors' talents. In England, his first dozen pictures and 
several later ones  were TV productions moved rapidly to theaters. 
This no doubt played a major role in Frears's sense of economy of 
budget, story-telling and construction. Subsequent titles  include 
"The Hit,' "My Beautiful Laundrette," "Sammy and Rosie Get Laid,""The 
Snapper," and in the U.S "Dangerous Liaisons," "Hero."
"High Fidelity" proves that Cusack and Frears were made for each 
other. More, more!
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Whole Nine Yards, The (2000)
THE WHOLE NINE  YARDS *** (2000) Directed by Jonathan Lynn. Written 
by Mitchell Kapner. Photography, David Franco. Editing. Tom Lewis. 
Production design, David L. Snyder. Music,  Randy Edelman. Produced 
by David Willis and Allan Kaufman. Cast:  Bruce Willis (Jimmy 
Tudeski), Matthew Perry (Oz Oseransky), Rosanna Arquette (Sophie), 
Michael Clarke Duncan (Frankie Figs), Natasha Henstridge (Cynthia), 
Amanda Peet (Jill),   Kevin Pollak (Janni Gogolak), et al. A Warner's 
release. 100 minutes. R (violence)
"Joie de vivre" (the pleasure of being alive) finds its complement 
here as the Joy of Killing, the pleasure of whacking others. Both 
joys coexist.
"The Whole Nine Yards" is a comedy (better yet, a farce) of murders. 
Funny films with corpses are a sub-genre of which the British "Kind 
Hearts and Coronets" with Alec Guinness may well be the most 
illustrious ancestor. Gangster comedies are not uncommon either. Even 
so, this new picture has so much to offer in characters that it is 
enough original and demented to create its own sub-sub-genre. That it 
has touches of Coen Brothers movies (and perhaps "Pulp Fiction") -- 
whether planned or a coincidence, conscious or not -- does not remove 
a thing from its novelty.
I don't think I've laughed so much at mayhem since John Waters's 
"Serial Mom" of 1994. Or chuckled along with the audience instead of 
feeling annoyed at giggles I find totally unjustified.
In a neat, higher (but not highest) income suburb of  Montreal (the 
real city, not a studio fake or a stand-in) dentist Oseransky, aka 
"Oz," lives miserably with his French-Canadian wife Sophie and the 
latter's first abandoned, then widowed mother.The ladies are nasty 
critters who bitch at hangdog-faced Oz for being this unheard of 
creature, a dentist with financial troubles.
Beautiful Jill,  Oz's dental assistant, was recently hired as it 
turns out (this is worked cleverly into the plot). She's lively and 
speaks to Oz with strange familiarity (there's a reason for this, 
too).
When a man moves in next door to the Oz home, the dentist recognizes 
him (don't ask) as  Jimmy "The Tulip" Tudeski, a contract killer with 
17 corpses to his credit. He had been a witness against his own 
Chicago Hungarian (sic) acolytes in the  deliciously named the 
Gogolak Gang.
Jimmy got away with just five years in prison. When released he 
haughtily refused the Witness Protection program.
Things get enormously complicated. Jimmy takes a shine to the 
trembling Oz. Greedy, imperious Sophie, convinced that the vengeful 
Gogolaks must have a put a price on Jimmy, dispatches the spineless 
Oz to Chicago so that he'll get a finder's fee.
What develops in the Windy City is enormously complicated as well 
funny. There is a kind of Commedia dell'Arte spirit of improvised 
situations, though I suspect they were carefully scripted.
The maze of characters who are not what they seem to be, and then 
some, includes a  huge black man (Michael Clarke Duncan of "The Green 
Mile") with delivers punches while beaming. He  towers over little 
Oz. The gang's leader Janni Gogolak speaks in a comically weird 
accent. Statuesque beauty  Cynthia adds more complications, has not 
had sex for five years (!) and is ... (no,  I won't reveal that).
When Oz returns to Montreal things get even more tangled up, what 
with Sophie having offered a contract on her husband (insurance money 
makes him  worth more dead than alive) to Jimmy, then to someone 
else. What with starry-eyed Jill meeting Jimmy and confessing that 
her dream was to become a hit-woman. What with escalating 
complications.
  It's a perfect cast: Amanda Peet, terrific, adaptable, likable. 
Matthew Perry, splendid as a victim-to-be mouse that does not roar. 
Bruce Willis, with his extraordinary cool. Rosanna Arquette with her 
phony accent. Natasha Hendridge who goes beyond the decorative. 
Michael  Duncan and his black humor. Kevin Pollak with his Pythian 
menaces.
The chain of people who want others whacked makes this is a  comedy 
of  killing grounds -- but its loony unreality, its super-spoof mood, 
defuse the violence. The complexities of this demented tale might 
confuse you, assuming you wish to apply logic -- but the brio is such 
that you don't give a hoot about who, what, where, when, why,  or how.
Some will call this a film noir, but it isn't really. Nor do its 
mostly sunny photography and sets use the traditional 
light-and-shadows and fog-and-rain "noir" look.  Even the excellent, 
discreet but effective score is light.
British  (born in Bath) actor-director Jonathan Lynn, schooled at 
Cambridge, and a nephew of Israel's Abba Eban, was, in the 1980s, the 
creator of the great, ironical Brit TV series "Yes, Minister" and 
"Yes, Prime Minister."  His feature debut was with "Clue" (1985).. 
There followed "Nuns on the Run,"" The Distinguished Gentleman,"" My 
Cousin Vinny,"" Greedy,"" Sgt. Bilko," and "Trial and Error." That's 
definitely a very mixed bag, from bad to mediocre. One factor in 
common which seriously weakened those movies was uneven tempo. The 
infectious "The Whole Nine Yards" has a first-rate, non-stop rhythm 
as well as many other virtues, including a first produced script by 
the otherwise unknown Mitchell Kapner. It's  a huge upward leap for 
Jonathan Lynn.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Thinner (1996)
STEPHEN KING'S THINNER *   Directed by Tom Holland. Written by Michael
McDowell and Holland, based on the book by Stephen King. Photography,
Kees Van Oostrum. Editing, Marc Laub. Production designer,Laurence
Bennett. Music,Daniel Licht. Produced by Richard Rubinstein & Mitchel
Galin.Cast: Robert John Burke(Billy Halleck),Joe Mantegna(Richie
Ginelli),Lucinda Jenney(Heidi Halleck),Joy Lenz(Linda Halleck),Kari
Wuhrer(Gina Lempke),Michael Constantine(Tadzu Lempke), Stephen King(the
pharmacist),et al A Paramount release. 93 min. Rated R.
(language,violence,a sexual act,ghoulish faces)
Famously, the socialite wife of William S.Paley (he founded CBS) once
decreed that "You can never be too rich or too thin." I don't know about
rich, but too thin won't do. This film is proof of this. 
The title may be confusing to some readers who may take it as a
declaration that writer Stephen King has lost weight. Wrong. It's lawyer
Billy Halleck, the tall (fat?) story's grossly overweight protagonist
who does.
In court, Billy has just won for his mobster client Richie Ginelli. As
he drives home, his wife Heidi, until now frustrated in intimate
relations by  Billy's bulk,is elated. Sitting next to her husband,she
tries again.(It's unlikely given the man's heft, but let it pass). In
the throes of sensuality, Billy hits and kills an old gypsy lady who's
crossing the street uncautiously. In one of many messy plot elements,
it's unclear to what extent Billy is at fault. Thanks to a well-disposed
judge and a friendly cop, he is found not guilty -- except in the eyes
of the gypsies.
The old woman was the daughter of 106-year-old Tadzu, who proceeds to
put a curse on Billy by touching him and mumbling "Thinner!" The lawyer
starts losing weight with miraculous speed. Though puzzled, he is at
first pleased, until he realizes that he is thinning down to nothing, no
matter how much food he stuffs into himself. The malediction has also
affected, with ghoulish results, the judge and the cop. Billy embarks on
a search for Tadzu, to have him take off his curse...
"Thinner" is at least the 25th King story made into a feature film, not
counting television items. Some movies are good or very good: "Carrie,"
"The Shining," "Christine,""Stand by me," "Misery," "Dolores Claiborne,"
"The Shawshank Redemption," and perhaps "Cujo." None of them had a
screenplay by King. Most other King-inspired and/or written films range
from mediocre to miserable. 
As to the fidelity of the various screen adaptations, I cannot judge.
Having attempted a few times to read a King story,I was defeated by
writing of the potboiler kind that disregards style and grammar and is
of the school of "This was given to my wife and I." Sure enough, in
"Thinner" Billy declares "He put a curse on Cary and I." The curse may
also have been for using bad English.
"Thinner" starts well. The prosthetic and makeup devices that take Billy
from a balloon to a rail are sometimes detectable, yet most skillful. 
Billy's daughter Linda gives a cute imitation of Marlon Brando as the
Godfather. (Minor mystery. Billy is on the pale side, his wife is a
blonde, but Linda daughter looks Brazilian or something close).  A
witness says that Billy "was sober as a judge... " (pause) "...Judge." 
Tadzu's greatgranddaughter Gina is a gorgeous, sexy gypsy given to
come-ons followed by irreverent gestures.This just about covers the fun
part of the film. 
As the movie leaves its long prologue for the realm of horror, it falls 
apart. Some bits are predictable: a disfigured man presses Billy to
accept his gun, Billy refuses, leaves the house and -what d'you know!-
we hear the expected revolver shot. Worse yet, there is an accumulation
of loose ends, gaps, holes and abysses of logic,continuity and
arbitrariness --even by the elastic standards of fantasy flicks.
In these days of celebrating cuisine ("Babette's Feast," "Tampopo" "Eat
Drink Man Woman" "Like Water for Chocolate" etc. and the recent "Big
Night"), "Thinner" is a bulimic, anti-food concoction  which, however,
does not push itself far enough into the surreal realm of eating with
the black humor of, say, "La Grande Bouffe." 
There is, however, an encouraging side to the movie. Some people would
like to meet a furious gypsy who, unlike Tadzu, is not totally
vindictive and would merely make them shadows of their former selves.
Then they could start feasting and gorging from scratch. What a happy
thought.

Title
Review for Third Miracle, The (1999)
THE THIRD MIRACLE (1999) *** Directed by Agnieszka Holland. Written 
by John Romano and Richard Vetere, based on the novel by Vetere. 
Photography, Jerzy Zielinski. Editing,  David J. Siegel. Production 
design, Robert De Vico. Music, Jan A.P. Kaczmarek. Produced by Fred 
Fuchs, Steven Haft, Elie Samaha. Executive producers, Francis Ford 
Coppola, Ashok Amritraj, Andrew Stevens.Co-producer, Don Carmody. 
Cast: Ed Harris (the Rev. Frank Shore), Anne Heche (Roxanna), Armin 
Mueller-Stahl (Archbishop Werner), Barbara Sukowa (Helen O'Regan) 
Charles Haid (Bishop Cahill), Jean-Louis Roux (Cardinal Sarrazin), 
Ken James (Father Paul Panak), Caterina Scorsone (Maria Witkowski), 
et al. . A Sony Pictures Classics release.119 minutes. R.(drugs, 
prostitution)
Been there, done that? Not on your life! "The Third Miracle" is, for 
my money, more original than other films of its genre, the genre 
being movies which deal with miracles and/or faith, whether of the 
blatant "The Exorcist" type, sentimental like "The Song of 
Bernadette," offbeat like Rossellini's "The Miracle," etc.
"TTM" is not remotely akin to any of the above, or any other film 
about religion. Outside all sub-genres it is, among other things, a 
sort of mystery tale (and a Mystery Play in the medieval sense), a 
detective story, an exploration of the self and of others.
I found it fascinating, beautifully made, and while complex on many 
levels, not confusing. It major focus is Father Frank Shore (Ed 
Harris) who, having undergone a crisis of faith, went to live as a 
layman in Chicago's lower depths, where a colleague from his diocese 
tracks him down
Recalled by his bishop,  Father Frank is given a demanding 
assignment. He is, in the Church's language, a "postulator," a priest 
whom a cardinal appoints to evaluate candidates for potential 
sainthood. Three confirmed miracles are a prerequisite. The 
postulator prepares what might be compared to a painstakingly minute 
legal dossier. This may eventually be submitted to the Church's upper 
echelons.  In turn, the judges may or may not forward the case to 
Rome.
This theological thriller has a solid thread in the person of Father 
Frank whom we follow through his steps and the arcane procedures of 
the Church. The putative saint was Helen O'Regan  (Barbara Sukowa) 
who had come to America from Central Europe after World War II. She 
is said, convincingly, to have cured a girl from lupus. The statue 
the girl prayed at is now been shedding tears and attracting masses 
of mostly working-class Polish-Americans from neighborhoods which 
look (in the director's words) like battlegrounds.
Frank's previous investigations has earned him the nickname of The 
Miracle Killer as he debunked one (or more? it is unclear) cases. 
This has affected him and added to his depression.
Now Frank is shaken up when he has the statue's tears examined 
scientifically, and they turn out to be genuine blood. He also meets 
Helen's daughter, the cynical and colorful Roxanna (Ann Heche). She 
is a non-believer who resents her late mother's having cared more for 
the masses than for Roxanna.
The character and personality of the young woman, her antagonism, 
then her  rapport with Father Frank; the trails the priest follows; 
the  types of people he encounters, his duel (so to speak) with a 
Church committee, are a weird kind of Odyssey. Some people may find 
the film meandering. Not I.  It held my attention at all times. I can 
only surmise that some Catholics could be entranced by matters they 
may know little about. But I also think  that non-Catholics as well 
as agnostics, atheists may find the proceedings exerting a strong 
pull.
A huge factor in all this is the magnificent performance by Ed 
Harris. A complex, complicated, changing man of -- metaphorically 
speaking -- many faces which are also one face, Harris delivers 
acting that is as good as any I have ever seen in what is a 
devilishly difficult and demanding role He is never ingratiating, but 
shows un-showy kindness to the lower classes, including drug addicts, 
peddlers, and prostitutes. His outspokenness with his fellow-priests 
as well as his superiors is not cockiness, but from the heart. He is 
smart, he is quick, he is flawed -- and he knows it. There's a basic, 
deep decency in this man. He has weaknesses, but also practices the 
ancient Greeks' rule of "know thyself."
The rest of the cast lends excellent support to Harris, whether by 
connection with him or by disconnection. The church people seem -- at 
least to viewers who do not have an inside track to them -- 
warts-and-all realistic and human in individual ways.
Are there major flaws in the movie? I think that this a matter that 
spectators will decide on an ad hoc basis. Some viewers may be upset 
by, or feel indignation at Father Frank's carnal lust (I won't 
elaborate). Others may be impressed by the priest's frankness.I 
thought that scenes of Frank's immersion in  wintry waters (as 
symbolic re-baptisms?) were over-the-top. On he whole, however, this 
is the sort of film that one cannot judge for others.
A possible irritation is the portrayal of Archbishop Werner, Frank's 
opponent during the deliberations. It is overdone, makes that prelate 
the heavy of the piece. He is played by the admirable Armin 
Mueller-Stahl who speaks very clear English, but is endowed here with 
the thickest Teutonic accent of his non-German career.
Director Agnieszka Holland presumably is not religious  but has her 
own fascination with the Catholic Church and the subject of miracles, 
which she has studied assiduously for this movie
Born in Warsaw, Poland, in 1948, Holland, the daughter of a Jewish 
father and a Catholic mother, studied cinema at the famous FAMU film 
school of Prague, worked much with, and learned much from Andrzej 
Wajda, the master filmmaker just honored at the Oscars 2000.
She became a prominent member of the Polish New Wave. Her bitter 
movies in Poland were often censored, at least one of them was 
forbidden during the long Russian occupation. In the mid-eighties she 
moved to Paris. Since then she has made "Bitter Harvest" starring Ed 
Harris, about the political killing of liberal, pro-Solidarity Father 
Popieluszko. Then came the multiple-awards winner "Europa, Europa" in 
which an Aryan-looking Jewish boy is drafted in the Nazi army. 
"Olivier, Olivier," "The Secret Garden,""Total Eclipse," and 
"Washington Square" followed.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for October Sky (1999)
OCTOBER SKY (1999) *** Directed by Joe Johnston. Written by Lewis Colick,
based on the book "Rocket Boys," by Homer H. Hickam Jr.. Photography, Fred
Murphy. Editing, Robert Dalva. Production design, Barry Robison. Music,
Mark Isham. Producers,  Charles Gordo,  Larry Franco. Cast: Jake Gyllenhaal
(Homer Hickam), Chris Cooper (John Hickam), William Lee Scott (Roy Lee),
Chris Owen  (Quentin), Chad Lindberg (O'Dell), Natalie Canerday (Elsie
Hickam), Laura Dern (Miss Riley) et al. A Universal release. 100 minutes.
PG
>From the title, this somehow sounded to me like a Russian film, probably
because the classic movie on the 1917 Russian Revolution, Ten Days that
Shook the World, is called October in Russia. But October Sky is not a
Russian movie. Yet it all started with the Soviet Union launching, on
October 4, 1957, the first satellite ever, Sputnik.
The Space Age began in a sensational way. Sputnik made the Russians proud
to the point of haughtiness. It  scared Cold War America. It gave a huge
boost to the US. space program. And, as in millions of places on earth, it
had the whole population of Coaltown, West Virginia, crane its collective
neck to watch that incredible point of light travel in the October sky.
The boost was not limited to American and other  scientists. In Coaltown,
for example, it fired up the imagination of  high schooler Homer Hickam,
the son of John and Elsie. Coal mine superintendent John radiated
authority, brooked no nonsense or errors from his men, and was totally
devoted to his profession.
Coaltown was just that, a small, modest community where just about all
males were coal miners and all the fathers took for granted that their sons
would become miners. Because Homer's brother Jim was a local football star,
he might get an athletic scholarship after graduation. But Homer? He did
play football but regularly got creamed by the other teams. He took his
punishment  bravely, unflinchingly, stoically,  like a real mensch -- a
term that would puzzle Coaltowners.
As Homer, Jake Gyllenhaal is likable, nice-looking, well-mannered but
essentially just a face in the crowd. Sputnik changes all that. It becomes
for him something like his  Road to Damascus, where Paul the Apostle had
his sudden revelation that made him a Christian. Homer, encouraged by his
teacher Miss Riley, sets out to build a working rocket.
He enlists two of his schoolmates, both "regular guys," then Quentin who
has a high I.Q.,  is exceptionally strong in many areas of science, reads
voraciously and experiments. As the class --if not all of Coaltown's --
nerd ( "a geek" say the students), he is shunned by others as a weirdo. He
keeps to himself. Even Homer's two original collaborators are surprised by
his choice of a fourth musketeer.
But the team is a good one, bonds quickly, works well. They are nicknamed
The Rocket Boys by a population which in its majority sees the fellows as
nutty, time-wasting eccentrics engaged in "all that nonsense,", the very
words of Homer's father.
The kids are not discouraged. Homer doesn't say "I Have a Dream" but could.
Against the odds, the quartet scrounge for materials, build one rocket
after another, meet failure after failure, but also make progress,
doggedly, as they learn from their mistakes --until they triumph. All the
while, the unexpected keeps happening, as does, in Homer's life and
travails, the semi-expected, the inflexible opposition of his dad. Thank
God for the understanding of his sweet, smart and helpful mother, warmly
played by Natalie Canerday..
Since I do not know the source book, the best seller memoir "Rocket Boys"
by Homer H. Hickam Jr. who went on to become a science engineer at NASA, I
cannot tell which poetic-filmic liberties the movie took. Homer Hickam is
said to have been pleased by the movie.
Bits of audience manipulation are unavoidable, but no drawbacks. One
example. A nice metal-worker who had been helping the boys suddenly quits
his job to become a miner. He is older but he has debts and can earn twice
as much by going down the shaft. The scene is touchingly true. But then, as
he checks in (or is it out?) he hangs up his miner's medallion No 723 on a
board. The camera zooms in on it. Any experienced filmgoer will tell you
that something bad will happen later, and that the camera will re-zoom on
tag No 723.
The main shooting was in the town of Petros, Tennessee, in the Knoxville
area, since  Coaltown is no more. The reproduction of the place, times and
people is superior. What also emerges in a near-documentary way is the
hard, pathetic life of the coal mining community. The miners and their
families seem to take their lot  for granted. It is late into the film when
Union protests emerge. Even so, there is little that is militant (the Us
vs. Them --the mine owners-- element) in the story.
The characters have been beautifully cast. Laura Dern as the school
teacher, a smart, helpful and unprovincial West Virginian has a supporting
(in every sense) role which takes her into new directions. Ironically,
Chris Cooper, as Homer's able but intransigent and anti-union father,  had
the lead role as the United Mine Workers'  strike organizer (and hero) in
historically true Matewan (1987), that superb  film by John Sayles about
the coal-mine wars in Matewan, West Virginia, during the 1920s.
Most everything rings true in this realistic yet feel-good picture. It is a
family movie in the  sense of its PG rating, and a family movie in its
depiction of the Hickams.  But the inevitably sad background of the miners'
life not only is not underlined but it is balanced by a great deal of
upbeat parts and humor concerning the Rocket Boys. They are the first to
admit that "we're just a bunch of hillbillies," yet they pursue a dream
that is as far from redneck-ism as can be.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Michelangelo: A Self Portrait (1990)
MICHELAGNIOLO,SELF PORTRAIT (1989) Produced and directed by 
Robert Snyder.Written by Michael Sonnabend. 85 minutes. Not 
rated.
A plastic,masterful documentary on Michelangelo in which the 
artist narrates his life, works and times through the voice of 
director Robert Snyder, MICHELAGNIOLO (a Tuscan spelling) is a 
most moving  and impressive spiritual and artistic experience. 
The composite text is drawn from Michelangelo's diaries,many 
other writings, conversations with contemporaries like 
artist-writer Giorgio Vasari (who had  also been an apprentice 
to Michelangelo) and the works of Dante . 
The images and the sound amount to a combination 
autobiography, a guided tour of Renaissance art, descriptions 
and exegeses, I suspect that the film also draws on uncredited 
sources, like Vasari's LIVES OF PAINTERS and modern 
scholarship. More, and without invalidating the great quality 
of this film, I have suspicions about its genesis, suspicions 
that set me doing detective work.
The official information is full of deserved, admiring quotes. 
It states too that Robert Snyder, (b. 1916) was awarded the 
1951  Oscar  for Best Documentary Feature ( presumably his 
first film) for THE TITAN: STORY OF MICHELANGELO. The facts 
are different:
In the beginning was MICHELANGELO, DAS LEBEN EINES TITANEN 
(The Life of a Titan) a documentary by an experienced 
specialist in art films, the German Curt Oertel. This film , 
which "avoided the double trap of hagiography and museography" 
and used light, photography and camera movement in a new way, 
was a model work. It was a German-Swiss coproduction, shot in 
Switzerland, and released in March 1940. 
Later, the great American documentarist Robert Flaherty 
reedited Oertel's footage, prepared an English commentary 
(read by Fredric March) "while being vague about the original 
source of his materials," and THE TITAN was released in  the 
USA in 1950." For this reason the film is usually referred to 
as a Flaherty film, which it is not. Credit is long overdue to 
Oertel, whose techniques have had enormous effect on 
subsequent films of this type made for both the commercial 
cinema and television." (David Stewart Hall: FILM IN THE THIRD 
REICH, 1969) 
The Academy Award records show that the Oscar went to "The 
Titan (Robert Snyder, producer)" and in 1950 rather than in 
1951. Flaherty died in 1951. Snyder then went on to making 
other documentaries on artists (Pablo Casals, Henry Miller, 
etc.) and others, like THE HIDDEN WORLD, on insect life. 
The new MICHELAGNIOLO is an updated remake, in color (with 
black-and-white sections) of the black-and-white THE TITAN .  
Screen credits mention that the black-and-white excerpts comes 
from the Oertel movie (which they date wrongly as 1939)  but 
nothing else. 
For the new version, the original plans called for 
distinguished actors from each culture where the film would be 
distributed to appear on screen intermittently and do the 
voice-over. This impractical, illusion-destroying idea was 
replaced by just Snyder's raspy voice which provides a 
credible thread in spite of a most American pronunciation of 
some words,e.g."Il Divino" becoming "Eel Deveeno" . 
This is an inside job. Just as we see and feel how 
Michelangelo would take a block of stone and make the statue 
latent in it emerge, the film,with its wealth of 
documentation, its techniques of three-dimensional 
photography, loving close-ups of details and the like, gives 
us the kind of analytical and synthesizing awareness that the 
unguided mind alone cannot follow in reality and that the 
viewing at a distance cannot capture sufficiently. 
The life of Michelangelo is traced with spellbinding images 
and narration, from his childhood to his "Pieta" sculpted at 
age 21; his "David" finished three years later; his constant 
relationships with the Medici and the Popes.
Michelangelo's struggle, over decades, with the megalomaniac 
Pope Julius II who forced him to paint the Sistine ceiling 
(while Michelangelo kept protesting " I am not a painter") and 
charged him with the nightmarish plans to make a monumental 
tomb for him (Julius); the artist's constant harassment with 
impossible  architectural commissions by other Popes; his 
return to the Sistine chapel to do the Last Judgment 30 years 
after the Creation; the turmoil of the Reformation, the 
Counter-Reformation, Savonarola, Civil wars (Michelangelo was 
a general, against his old patrons the Medici); the process of 
creativity -- at least as much as can be grasped -- come 
through beautifully. So does the artist's lifelong pull by, 
and alternation, between pagan and religious works; or the 
censorship concerning nudity, which made Michelangelo give the 
ultimate reply: "So, clothes are nobler than the body and 
shoes nobler than the foot?" 
Worried as I am about MICHELAGNIOLO's true paternity, I cannot 
deny that the work is not only 85 minutes of fascination but a 
totally humbling experience too.

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
ENEMY OF THE STATE ** 1/2  Directed by Tony Scott. Written by David
Marconi. Ohrograohym Dan Mindel. Editing, Chris Lebenzon. Production
design, Benjamin Fernandez. Music, Trevor Rabin & Harry Gregson-Williams.
Produced by Jerry Bruckheimer. Cast: Will Smith (Bobby Dean); Gene Hackman
(Brill); Jon Voight (Reynolds); Lisa Bonet (Rachel Banks); Regina King
(Carla Dean); Ian Hart (Bingham); Jake Busey (Krug); Barry Pepper (Pratt);
Gabriel Byrne, Tom Sizemore, Jason Robards (the Congressman); Jason Lee
(photographer Zavitz), et al. A Touchstone release. 128 minutes. R
(violence)
On Friday the 13th my computer's display crashed terminally. On Friday the
20th, the computer was still disabled - so when, that day, I saw Enemy of
the State, the contrast between my electronic reality and the film's
flawless, dazzling magic made the movie both a techno-wonder and a
techno-thriller.
Congressman Jason Robards intends to vote against a Telecommunications
Security and Privacy Act.  Reynolds (John Voight), who is high up in the
NSA (National Security Agency), unable to change the Congressman's mind,
takes the easy way out. He has the man killed in a park, before his
(Voight's) eyes.
By one of those coincidences that transform films into movies, the murder
is recorded by a video camera hidden in the area by photographer Zavitz
(Jason Lee) who was monitoring geese. When he examines the footage and
alerts a magazine editor, his phone call is intercepted. The NSA apparently
bugs and monitors every human on this planet.
Immediately a chase begins, and not a wild goose one. Reynolds army of
computer-whizzes see and hear everything. Armed agents pursue the
photographer. As he   flees, by an amazing coincidence he runs into his
long time-no-see college classmate, labor lawyer Bobby Dean (Will Smith)
who is shopping for lingerie in a shop a la Victoria's Secret with
provocative Class 3 seductresses as saleswomen.
It's a blitz-meeting. The first thing Bobby does is -- improbably-- to give
his visiting card to Zavitz, who, in turn, secretly slips into Bobby's
purchases a diskette he has made of the incriminating video.
Zavitz dies. The God-like computers clue in the pursuers as to the
diskette. Bobby becomes their prey. It's like the familiar Alfred Hithcock
trick of The Wrong Man, except that unsuspecting Bobby does not realize
that he is the Right Man. Get my drift?
The lawyer is spied upon and hunted down. Bugs are planted on his clothes,
his shoes, a transmitter that duplicates his Mont Blanc pen, another that
duplicates his watch, etc. NSA's stock most likely includes bugs in Viagra
pills, toilet paper rolls, wedding rings, toenail clippers and all else.
Instant images and sounds show up on banks of monitors that also are hooked
up to cars, taxis, trucks, helicopters and a dedicated satellite 155 miles
up. Such astounding technology makes you a) suspend your disbelief;  b)
suspend it some more; c) wonder why Saddam Hussein has not yet been
terminated.
Actor Will Smith has declared: "You can be followed, watched, listened to
wherever you go; there's nothing the Government can't do. And the
technology we use in the movie is actually 10 years old. Fot this film, we
went to the CIA. We saw a recorder that you can implant in one of your
tooth fillings. We saw satellite surveillance of poppy fields. All the
technology that we show in the film exists for real. The concept of privacy
is obsolete."
Who am I not to believe him? I'll have to be cautious though next week,
when I see Nick, my dentist. But then, if there's nothing the government
can't do, why can't it govern?
Anyway, the NSA people or their equivalent either  must be furious or are
laughing themselves sick. Can't guess.
If the computer screens are crystal clear, the plot is not. At the end
Voight is revealed as a rogue super-spy, yet I can't decide whether his
henchpeople are co-conspirators or believe that they are kosher patriots.
Early on, during a sequence of long-distance miking  it became obvious that
the whole thing was derivative of Coppola's masterful The Conversation, but
done here in silly ways bereft of humanity, filmed like an MTV montage and
not involving the audience. So, who, later, pops up but Gene Hackman, the
tortured anti-hero of The Conversation!
He turns the movie's techno-jokes into one big inside joke.
Hackman, a techno-genius and former NSAer,  teams  up with Will for
defense, counter-attack -- and a happy ending.
I have revealed almost nothing of the gimmickry and the twists. These are
as numeorus as the bytes of your computer. At random, they include and
involve quid pro quos; vengeful Mafiosi; the luscious Lisa Bonet as Will's
college swetheart and now his informer; Will's wife, son and lapdog; Will
as a human fly; Will without pants; Will puzzling (and amusing) an Oriental
couple in their hotel room; a hotel fire; explosions; a mysterious can
driver; a sort of humongous "French Connection"-ish (which starred Hackman)
chase in a tunnel  and beneath it; split-second changes; and so on ad
infinitum and ad absurdum.
"Non-stop" takes on a new meaning. So do "techno-over-skill  and overkill."
Nonsense goes from mega to giga. Whatever truths are present, they are
treated so lavishly that they make King Kong, Mothra, Spielberg's dinosaurs
and James Bond feel real; by comparison the Enigma encryption machine of
World War II and the amazing spy-gadgets and surveillance of STASI (the
East German all-pervasive secret police) feel like advanced toys.
The realities behind Enemy of the State -- and I don't doubt that there are
several --go so much overboard that the movie becomes a fantasy whose
cautionary aspects are defanged.
As in the James Bond hyperboles, the silliness has a lining of humor which,
along with the exaggerations, does help pass the time. Will Smith is very
good. He performs with self-confidence, a twinkle in his eye, and no
mugging for the lens. His type of humor and cool reminds me of Eddie
Murphy's, minus the grin; or, going way back, of Clark Gable's, minus the
smugness.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Looking for Richard (1996)
LOOKING FOR RICHARD *** 1/2 .Directed by Al Pacino. Narration written by
Pacino & Frederic Kimball. Photography, Robert Leacock. Editing, Pasquale
Buba, William A. Anderson & Ned Bastille. Music, Howard Shore. Produced by
Michael Hadge and Al Pacino. Cast: Alec Baldwin (Clarence), Al Pacino
(Richard III), Kevin Conway (Hastings), Kevin Spacey (Buckingham), Estelle
Parsons (Margaret), Winona Ryder (Lady Anne) and Aidan Quinn (Richmond);
interviews with Kenneth Branagh, Kevin Kline, James Earl Jones, Derek
Jacobi, John Gielgud,Vanessa Redgrave and many others.A Fox Searchlight
release.109 minutes.PG-13
Al Pacino's first movie as a director is an original, mesmerizing
exploration. The Richard of the title is Shakespeare's character Richard
III as well as the eponymous play. Pacino has made a documentary about a
stage production-in-progress, one that involves himself as director and as
actor in the title role, plus a host of other people: performers in this
production as well as performers not in it, but who have experience with
Shakespeare and opinions to share; writers; producers;  consultants;
scholars... the list is long. It even includes people casually met on the
street and who are queried about Shakespeare or their lack of knowledge of
the Bard. (Many amusing reactions occur).
You don't have to look closely to realize that this labor of love is a
busman's holiday. It must have occupied free snatches of time over a period
of years. There are clues to this, such as the changing looks of some
participants, the presence of actress Viveca Lindfors who died in 1995, or
the Pacino's hirsuteness that can differ from one scene to the next.
What  Pacino and Company try to do is to unscramble Richard III by
approaching it with as much understanding and as many insights as possible.
The result is a crazy quilt that explains, elucidates, discusses,
simplifies or sometimes complicates matters as they crop up. This may have
been like haphazard patchwork so far as the filming goes, but the excellent
and very hard editing has given hidden logic and relatively coherent
structure to this fascinating chaos.
>From the start, the method in the madness becomes apparent. "Now is the
Winter of our discontent" is analyzed and explained in terms of the War of
the Roses, the Yorks and Lancasters. Later the iambic pentameter is
illustrated (as a response to  Pacino's falsely naive question) via amusing
da-da-dee-dums.
A refrain pops up often, to the effect that "this is a very complicated
play," which it is,  not only for the director and the actors but for
audiences, especially lay, what with the many characters in a dedalus of
ambitions, real or false alliances, overt or covert enmities, and the maze
of history as Shakespeare saw it. So far as I remember, the word "complex"
is used either little or not at all, and rightly so: the play which is
there are either few or no mentions of "complex,"  in the discussions, and
rightly so.
The text is submitted to deconstruction, from which hang the
interpretations ,so that Shakespeare becomes attainable and more
"enjoyable" from artistic,esthetic,poetic,psychological and historical
points of view. The result is that staggering genius of the Bard is better
felt and comprehended yet, in a paradoxical way, even more mysterious. And
even though sometimes scholars are pitted against players, there is a
common ground of admiration for the playwright.
As Pacino says ( I imagine this applied to both actors and audiences), "You
don't have to understand every word. You get the gist of it." This brings
me to "Looking for Richard" as a film for non-native-English speaking
audiences. It was shown at Cannes last spring,where it was complimented,
but I have my doubts as to the comprehension of it via subtitles. The
language of Shakespeare plus the vernacular of the discussions require
linguistic familiarity. They make of "Looking" the opposite of silent
movies and their universality through images and simple intertitles.
On the other hand, thanks to the back-and-forth shifts between stage,
backstage and real life, the mechanisms of stagecraft are so unveiled that
the effect is one pure Brechtian distanciation, reinforced (for some
viewers) by Richard becoming a precursor of the villain in the parable by
Bertolt Brecht "The Resistible Rise of Arturo Ui," in which a gangster
gains power in Chicago.
There are several views of what the purpose of "Looking" is. One opinion is
that Pacino, who has distinguished himself on the stage (including many
performances as Richard), was anxious to prove his theatrical skills to the
wide public that knows only the movie side of him. This may be the case,
but would that such polite vanity were more common and result in many more
"intellectual" and literate movies!
Another belief holds that "Looking"  is an introduction to Shakespeare
which, by stressing the humanity of the performers and demystifying
"difficulties" makes the play accessible to neophytes. I cannot share this
perception. It seems to me that a beginner, the street-person as it were,
or a young student, may identify with or at least recognize certain
universals in the Bard, but will not get the full impact. I believe that,
willy-nilly, Pacino is talking to the already converted -- though not
necessarily the specialists -- whose eyes will open more both to
Shakespeare's work and to the actors'.
I also see "Looking" as a direct-approach (and subsequent choices in
editing) work  of the cinema-verite school,  a documentary about a play
that, in its day, was, in its action and plot (though not its language) a
precursor of a  "film noir," with its dark moods, twists, murders and
treasons.
What we see of the "finished" Richard III is only a fraction of the
stage-play. It comes to us in fragments, yet cleverly shows a number of
telling, full episodes, such as the murders of Clarence and of Hastings or
the killing of the Princes in the Tower -- all riveting, all powerfully
suspenseful and touching.
Among the many bonuses of the film is its healthy discussion of the
American feeling of inferiority vis-a-vis the British when it comes to
doing Shakespeare, a feeling that lies a great deal in differences of
accents and intonations. I only wish someone had mentioned that the
performers of Shakespeare's day did not speak BBC or Oxbridgian English!
Here, not one actor falls into the trap of trying to sound ersatz-British,
nor, happily, does anyone have a regional accent, whether from  Brooklyn,
the South, the West or New England. It all comes down to a convincing
demonstration that Americans can deal with Shakespeare without having to
tend apologies.
If anyone had been told that Pacino would employ familiar movie people
(Kevin Spacey,Adan Quinn,Alec Baldwin, Winona Ryder and others), the first
reaction would have been "How incongruous!" if not "How dumb!" Yet, in
spite of this novelty of casting, those performers are surprisingly good
and convincing. If nothing else, "Looking"  revolutionizes our
preconceptions, our expectations and widely-held beliefs that our own movie
actors cannot shift from screen to stage the way the British have been
doing for close to one century, to their advantage and to the benefit of
both media.
The experienced Pacino plays with a great deal of nuances as he searches
for "his" Richard. Sometimes, like the movie Pacino (say, the son of
Godfather Brando), he is hollow-eyed, contained and menacingly quiet. But
often too he reclaims his Italian-American ancestry and the passion that
goes into flamboyant outbursts.
The atmosphere of the film is one of fascinating peeps into the
collaborative nature of plays. This is not devoid of humor. For example,
Kevin Spacey, whether as a civilian or in costume, maintains a delightful
look of skepticism or irony. Pacino shows a big, heavy book, "The Annotated
Shakespeare" and puns on "The Anointed Shakespeare." And when King Edward
finally dies, he lies in state with coins over his eyes, like a Mafioso
Capo.

Title
Review for Little Voice (1998)
LITTLE VOICE (UK,1998) ** 1/2. Directed and written by Mark Herman, based
on the play łThe Rise and Fall of Little Voice˛ by Jim Cartwright.
Photography,   Andy Collins. Editing, Michael Ellis. Production design, Don
Taylor.Music and arrangements, John Altman. Produced by Elizabeth Karlsen.
Executive producers, Stephen Woolley, Nik Powell. Co-executive producers,
Harvey Weinstein, Bob Weinstein, Paul Webster. Co-producer, Laurie Borg.
Cast: Jane Horrocks ( Little Voice), Michael Caine (Ray Say), Brenda
Blethyn (Mari), Jim Broadbent (Mr. Boo), Ewan McGregor  (Billy), et al.. A
Miramax release. 96 minutes. R (language)
Wasn't it George Bernard Shaw who said that "America and England are two
nations separated by a common language"?  Little Voice, set entirely in a
seaside town of Northern England (Scarborough was used) and among working
class people (even if they don't work) is linguistically one more addition
to the UK. filmmakers' passion for cockney, regional, plebeian and other
accents that are a far cry from BBC or Oxbridge English.
American ears strain, viewers ask their neighbors "What did she say?" and
much of the dialogue is lost. That's why some films have had re-recorded
sound tracks for export, or, in the case of the great Ken Loach's Riff-Raff
and his current My Name is Joe, were subtitled--in English.
It's not all that bad with LV (Little Voice) because the speeches are not
deathless. One also gradually gets over some of the talk hurdles as the
movie unreels.
The film is based on a much-liked play especially written for Jane Horrocks
(of TV's Absolutely Fabulous), specifically to showcase her unquestionable
talent for voice and above all song imitations.
Brenda Blethyn plays widow Mari, a motor-mouth tarty tippler with a
piggly-wiggly neighbor for best friend and colleague at the fish market.
Mari's daughter is a young woman, LV, a kind of recluse in the modest
home's attic. She's modern only in one respect, being--what
else?--dysfunctional in an odd way. Since the death of her dad (when, I
cannot tell), she has inherited his collection of recordings, mostly of
American pop and Hollywood songs. She plays them by the hour, looks up at
Daddy's photograph, puts more records on the player.
One would think she is a mute, until incidents such as the electricity
(hence the machine) going out, make her burst out in amazing vocal copies
of Judy Garland, Edith Piaf, Shirley Bassey, Billie Holiday, Marilyn
Monroe, Ethel Merman, Marlene Dietrich, Barbra Streisand and more.
A small-time promoter named Ray Say (Michael Caine at his Cockney best) who
seems to have hit bottom, in spite of his big, red, American convertible,
has been among the many lovers of Mari. He comes to town on business,
engages in carnal preliminaries with the ardent Mari, but gets distracted
by hearing LV's voice. "Eureka!" he exclaims, "we all got it made!" (Not
his specific words but that's the general drift).
He sets out to convince and cajole the more-than-reluctant LV to sing in
public. This, of course, is what we're all waiting for. But it takes about
the first 45-50 minutes of the movie to get there. Even then, it's just a
try-out that panics the shy girl. It will be another 20 minutes until she
appears on a stage, doing a beautiful, impressive selection and, in an
unlikely way, having already mastered showbiz garb (a clinging sequined
dress), manners, gestures, body-English.
The rest of the story is just a frame for LV. Generic, with a number of
nice or interesting or semi-eye catching or indifferent bits, by and large
it's nothing to sing about.
The performers are very good. Michael Caine cannot be otherwise.   Brenda
Blethyn, that-woman-you'd-like-to-shut-up, shows a new aspect of her
talent. A notable UK stage and TV actress, she came to films in The Witches
(1990), played the Rev.Maclean's wife in A River Runs Through It (1992),
zoomed to fame and prizes for Secrets and Lies (1996). She's been in
movie-demand ever since.
Rising young star Ewan McGregor (Shallow Grave, A Life Less Ordinary, The
Pillow Book, etc.) was a lead in LV director-adapter's Mark Herman second
feature (this is his third), the charming Brassed Off.
Here McGregor has a smallish role as a telephone repairman who falls, for
whatever reason (shyness in common?) for the girl. At the end, in the Fall
of LV (not tragic) he takes her up where he keeps pigeons. These fly way,
symbolizing freedom, just as Marlon Brando's did in On The Waterfront.
The singing is the main reason to see the picture. I am also pleased by the
British affection for old songs, mostly American. This places LV marginally
in the line of Terence Davies's splendid, moving autobiographical movies
about songs and films bringing solace to otherwise hard, somber
working-class existences: Distant Voices, Still Lives (1988) and The Long
Day Closes (1992)
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Yi ge dou bu neng shao (1999)
NOT ONE LESS ( Yi ge dou bu neng  shao) ( China, 1999) *** Directed 
by Zhang Yimou. Written  by Shi Xiangsheng, from his novel. 
Photography, Hou Yong. Editing, Zhai Ru. Art director, Cao Jiuping.
Music, San Bao. Cast: Wei Minzhi (Herself), Zhang Huike (Himself), 
Tian Zhenda (Mayor Tian), Gao Enman (Teacher Gao), Sun Zhimei (Sun 
Zhimei), Feng Yuying (Television Station Receptionist), Li Fanfan 
(Television Host). Produced by Zhao Yu. A Sony Pictures Classics 
release. In Mandarin (with English subtitles).  106 minutes.
The American director Joseph Von Sternberg (1894-1969) comes to mind 
as I think of the Chinese director Zhang Yimou (b.1951). Sternberg 
"created" Marlene Dietrich in the "Blue Angel" and six additional 
films (1930-35), the high point of his career. Their relationship 
went beyond cinema. Zhang Yimou's feature debut "Red Sorghum"  was 
also that of actress Gong Li. The two were an "item" for about 8 
years as he directed her in the highly successful, "Ju Dou," " Raise 
the Red Lantern,"
"The Story of Qiu Ju," and "To Live" for a total of 7, including the 
unfamiliar (to me) "Codename Cougar." Their last collaboration, 
"ShanghaiTriad" (Yao a yao yao dao wai pei qiao) had mixed reviews. 
Zhang-ites hope that now Pygmalion minus Galatea will not, as in 
Sternberg's case, result in declining popularity.
"Not One Less" may put those fears to rest, although Zhang changed 
style and content so radically that comparisons are not valid. His 
early career was as a cinematographer. All his films until now have 
powerful, creative visuals. But  here, the customary, delicate 
bravura (not an oxymoron) of  often saturated colors, their 
orchestrated, eye-arresting scenes, give way  to utter simplicity. 
Made almost like a documentary, the pictures is  a cousin of 
cinema-verite and Italian neorealism.
The village of Shuiquan seems to be in the middle of nowhere, but as 
it turns out, is 3-4 hours by bus from Beijing. What makes one think 
"boondocks," is generalized poverty and the fact that we see very 
little of the place. The images are predominantly of a run-down, 
one-classroom, one-teacher schoolhouse and of dusty dirt roads around 
it.
Teacher Gao is leaving for a month to attend his ailing mother. Wei, 
age 13, an elementary school graduate, has been hired as substitute 
teacher. She's not much older than her pupils. And she does not know 
much more than they do. The idea is to band-aid the emergency.. Wei 
will receive 50 yuan at some point (which keeps eluding her) for a 
month's work. It's essentially a kind of baby-sitting, just keep the 
kids in class.
According to today's exchange rates, one yuan equals 12 US cents. At 
the village, once can of Coca-Cola is either one or two yuans. Wei's 
50 yuans come to $6.
Given the dire shape of the place, students who need to work for 
their families or elsewhere drop school alarmingly fast --from 40 to 
28 since the school year began. This menaces the subsidies to the 
school (such as they are!). Teacher Gao warns Wei to hold the line. 
He sweetens this by promising a bonus (10 yuan) if all 28 kids 
remain. "Not One Less!"
The conditions at the school, and, surely, in the village, are 
dismal. Wei and some kids (who is not clear) sleep in a horrid room. 
Where their food comes from is also unclear. Chalk is rationed: one 
per day. When some chalk trampled on , it is a catastrophe. There are 
no books. Wei copies the lessons on the blackboard. She admonishes a 
child  not to write too large or press too much since it uses up too 
much chalk.
In Part Two of the film, a 10-year old boy, Zhang Huike, smart, 
lively and prone to trouble-making (pitifully mild by American 
standards) stops coming to school. His widowed mother is in debt. 
Zhang went to the big, unnamed city to find work. Through 
brick-moving the class collects   minuscule sum for Wei to go to the 
city and search for the boy. It is unclear whether she does it to 
keep the students at the 28 level, or to get her bonus --For a Few 
Yuan More.
Her small adventures follow, there is a rather unlikely happy ending. 
As Wei reaches the end of her rope, she is told to take her case to 
almighty TV. The stumbling block is an autocratic, 
bureaucratic-to-the-letter receptionist. But a manager ex machina 
saves the day. Wei goes on a telecast, with a typically chatty, 
elegant anchorwoman. The newness of it all literally dumbfounds Wei. 
She freezes, says nothing.
The boy is found, he returns to the village with Wei and a camera 
crew. But TV micro-celebrity and a gift of tons of chalks solve 
nothing. End-titles tell us that a million children a year drop 
school for work. It's a false figure. Reality is ten times higher. 
But since this is a criticism of China's system, and since director 
Zhang Yimou has often had troubles with the government and censors, 
he lowered the figure to what authorities would deem acceptable.
In Italian neorealism the movies did not hesitate to show or denounce 
evils by individuals as well as the state. Matters are much more 
careful and balanced here, a bit as in old Soviet movies. The TV 
station bureaucrat receptionist is scolded, and it another bureaucrat 
who is helpful. The kindness of strangers gets some credit as a 
restaurant helps hungry Zhan, although this is done primarily to 
avoid his bothering the customers. You may glimpse a chic woman or 
two but contrasts are kept down. No discotheques, no pricey stores. 
You sense the movie's political prudence.
What's new and interesting is that almost all the characters are 
non-actors who use their real names ands who do in real life what 
they do on the screen --starting with Wei who was chosen from an 
enormous field of candidates. What is most successful is how well, 
starting again with Wei, all those non-professionals fit their roles 
and situations. Were that the movie could give a big boost to the 
casting of amateurs. If this escalates the multi-million-dollar 
salaries of stars could go the way of the walls of Jericho. Fat 
chance.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Everyone Says I Love You (1996)
EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU(1996) *** 1/2 Written and directed by Woody Allen.
Photography, Carlo DiPalma. Editing, Susan E. Morse. Music arranged and
conducted by Dick Hyman. Music performed by Dick Hyman and the New York
Studio Players. Chorus, The Helen Miles Singers. Choreography, Graciela
Daniele. Production design, Santo Loquasto. Costumes, Jeffrey
Kurland.Produced by Robert Greenhut. Cast: Edward Norton (Holden), Goldie
Hawn (Steffi), Woody Allen (Joe), Alan Alda (Bob), Gaby Hoffmann (Lane),
Natalie Portman (Laura), Drew Barrymore (Skylar), Natasha Lyonne (DJ),
Lukas Haas (Scott), Julia Roberts (Von) and Tim Roth (Charles Ferry), David
Ogden Stiers (Holden's father) et al. A Miramax release. 97 minutes. Rated
R (Prudishly, illogically)
Q. I know that this a Woody Allen musical, his first. Isn't this unusual?
A. Unusual in that movie musicals have almost disappeared, but not
surprising since the film comes from Woody.
A. Allen ( born in 1935)  is  a first-rate jazz clarinetist with a passion
for popular music, especially that of his youth, which includes film music
and the music in films. Remember that in the many years before the advent
of rock, pop songs of stage and screen came fast and furious and stayed
around for a long, long time. People of Woody's generation, plus the next
one, often remembered and sang an enormous repertory that went back many
years, well before the aficionados' birth. For a connoisseur like Woody,
the backlog is immense.
Q. Are you saying that Woody used this kind of music in his films?
A. And how! The "old" music added immeasurably to his movies, whether as a
key element, nostalgia or commentary. He even had recourse to "old-style"
new songs sometimes. For example, in his early film "Bananas," he used a
splendid Marvin Hamlisch song, sung in Spanish and "genuinely" Latin
American. Other movies used old tunes. At the 1979 Cannes Festival, the
closing, out-of-competition film was "Manhattan." It opened with
sensational, romantic views of New York City, to the music of Gershwin's
"Rhapsody in Blue." On a huge screen and with state-of-the art sound this
was so beautiful that the audience of professionals broke into applause.
Q. I see ... and I remember now how well he used pop music in "Broadway
Danny Rose," as impresario Rose tries to promote a has-been singer. Also
the old tunes in "Hannah and Her Sisters" ....
A. ...and all of "Radio Days" including the sweet-singing Diane Keaton;
and, and...  ending with the funny-phony chorus in "Mighty Aphrodite."
A. In a way, a non-plot movie. It is about a big family of wealthy
(presumably WASP) Manhattanites, the kind that give little soirees where
Itzhak and Navah Perlman play (wait 'til you hear what they are playing!).
Steffi (Goldie Hawn, very charming) had long ago divorced writer Joe
(Allen), married Bob (the ever pleasant Alan Alda). This produced parents,
step-parents and miscellaneous categories of siblings.
Bob and Steffi are liberal Democrats. Steffi is into causes, such as the
one that takes her --chauffeur driven-- to prisons where she suggests that
the inmates be given a chance to participate in the redecoration of their
cells. Bob is being driven crazy because his young son Scott is on an
arch-conservative political kick. (There's a funny solution to this). The
family includes a dotty grandpa, almost out of the old Dad in TV's "Keeping
Up Appearances." There's also an authoritarian German cook.
Steffi's and Joe's daughter, DJ, in her late teens, narrates the movie. Her
sister Skylar (a name out of Sonny and Cher?), played by Drew Barrymore, is
engaged to Holden, played by Edward Norton, currently famous for "Primal
Fear" and "The People vs.Larry Flynt."  The couple open the film as they
sing the title oldie in Central Park and in the streets -- the main
excursion of the film into the working classes. Holden ( a reference to
Caulfield?) is the scion of wealthy David Ogden Stiers (born in Peoria,
none too recognizable, but then where there's an Alda there's a Stiers).
Q. Is this an all-singing movie like "The Umbrellas of Cherbourg"?
A. No. It 's cross between the late Dennis Potter's BBC series "The Singing
Detective" and "Pennies from Heaven " (plus the "Pennies" film with Steve
Martin) and the 1930s flicks that used any excuse to break into song and
dance. There are differences though. The old songs in the Potter series
used dubbed original recordings and commented on many topics.  The 1930s
movies used professional singers. Here the tunes are mostly about love and
sung by the actual cast of non-singers. Allen had everyone warble in
his/her real voice (except for Drew B. who can't sing at all).
Q. Doesn't this produce horrible sounds?
A. You'd be surprised how well just about everyone comes through, perhaps
not with flying colors but  pleasantly. However, contrary to what you may
have heard, there are also professionals who sing and dance in imaginative,
funny, hilarious, most skillful sequences. Like the personnel at Harry
Winston's jewelry store; like assorted hospital patients to the tune of
"Making Whoopee" ; like ghosts in a funeral home. For Halloween we get
tricked and treated to a great, juvenile version of "Chiquita Banana."
There's a killer sequence in Paris, a Groucho Ball where all the men and
women are made up as Grouchos (Woody is perfect) and where a large group
does a number, "Hooray for Captain Spaulding" from a  Marx Brothers film.
The performers sing it in French. It's a howl.
A. My guess is that Woody is pay homage to the millions of French
cinephiles and Groucho-ites. In France, during the several student unrests
of the past, many wall graffiti stated: "I am a Marxist, of the Groucho
persuasion."
 Q. How does Joe-Woody come into the story?
A. Early on, he visits the splendid apartment of his best friends (Hawn and
Alda).He now lives in Paris, where his latest amour has dumped him. He is
the same old Woody, yearning for romantic love with younger women, full of
tales of woe and  his usual  neuroses. But instead of feeling all this as
"deja vu," I found it comforting, the way I used to do for the Monty Python
people, not in spite, but because of the basic sameness of program after
program. I don't mention this haphazardly, since Woody and the Pythons
were, for me, the main comic geniuses of the post-war period.
A. He now wants to return to Paris and kill himself there. He even thinks
of taking the Concorde to get there earlier and do it. Instead he ends up
by the romantic canals of Venice with daughter DJ who has engineered in
most complex and funny ways  (these include a peephole in a New York wall,
near-fatal jogging, posing as a Tintorettto scholar) for Joe to meet and
seduce fellow neurotic  Julia Roberts, a married art historian. More
follows, with the finale, back in Paris finding Joe and Steffi dancing by
the Seine -- an enchantingly lyrical sequence where amazing special effects
make Steffi glide on land and rise in the air.
Q. Are there good gags and good one-liners?
A. All you ever wanted but were afraid you wouldn't get. Woody may still
play his dysfunctional persona, but as a film maker he is totally
functional, hits on all cylinders, crafts beautifully his amusing details.
Like the experienced gag-writer he used to be, he misses nothing, has full
control over gags, topping them and topping the topper.
A. In showbiz parlance, the  building up gags on top of previous ones.
Like a two- or three-stage rocket.  For instance, Holden plans to surprise
Skylar with a ring placed inside a dessert. She swallows it. They rush to a
doctor who, pointing to the ring in the X-rays, asks Holden how much it
cost. "Eight thousand dollars."  "You could have gotten it for six thousand
from my brother-in-law."  Or take a Sikh cabby who joins the singing ... in
his own language. Or Tim Roth, as creepy an ex-con as any, who is paroled
thanks to Steffi and repays her by taking-- temporarily-- Skylar away from
her fiance Holden. And more...
A. Clear how? What do you mean exactly?
Q. I have in mind all those movies that increasingly play guessing games
with the public, often confuse it, make us spend too much time figuring out
who's who, what's what and all that -- not to mention impossibilities.
Among thrillers, for instance, you never find that "clear and clean"
development that Alfred Hitchcock did so well.
A. I understand. Yes, on the face of it, once you figured out which child
is from which marriage, there are no outlandish question marks. If later
you think back, you might become aware that there's some sketchiness in
certain characters, but no more than in a "Broadway Melody" movie. It
doesn't hurt, but somewhere I read that a great deal more footage had been
shot, with more characters that were cut out of the final version. Even so,
what comes through with utter clarity is Allen's trademark, sentimental
adoration of New York, his selective view of the good that precludes the
bad and the ugly. This time, Woody expands his urbanolatry with additional
valentines to Paris and Venice.
Q. You rate this film three-and-a-half stars, high praise. Do you think the
public and the critics will agree?
A. Devotees of  Woody and of vintage music, yes. This is one of those rare
fun-fun-fun, pack up your troubles in the old kit bag and smile, smile,
smile movies that I'd like to see again, and soon. Allen has chosen his
songs very cleverly among good ones by first-rate tunesmiths-- but then he
selected mostly items that are less familiar than the golden chestnuts. If
you know them, there's the pleasant shock of recognition. If you don't,
there's the pleasure of discovery. But for people who, for reasons of
culture or age are indifferent to such super-oldies, it could be a
different story.
Q. How do you think the film will be received abroad?
A. I really can't guess. In Europe Woody Allen is an icon, a film deity.
I'm glad he is yet I have always been puzzled, since he uses the American
vernacular in ways not always translatable. Not to mention his New York
brand of Jewish humor and other ethnic humors -- of which, by the way,
there's little in "Everyone..." Now when all is said and done, it's the
movie's music that is its backbone -- and while there are many connoisseurs
of jazz abroad, I can't tell how many Tin Pan Alley or Broadway specialists
exist there.
Q. So the film might not get fully appreciated?
A. Again, I can't tell. But look at what happened a few years ago at Cannes
to the wonderful Terence Davies picture  "The Long Day Closes," about the
gray life of postwar British working classes whose escapism was in  (mostly
American) movies and popular songs. Many Europeans just didn't get it. The
songs meant nothing to them.
Still, even those viewers of "Everyone" who are outside this nostalgia loop
ought to appreciate the superior production values (sets, photography,
orchestrations, etc.) to which Woody's usual, superb collaborators have
imparted smooth, Allenian sights and sounds.

Title
Review for Primary Colors (1998)
PRIMARY COLORS *** 1/2  Produced and directed by Mike Nichols.Written by Elaine
May, based on the novel by Anonymous. Photography, Michael Ballhaus.
Editing,   Arthur Schmidt.Production design, Bo Welch. Music, Ry Cooder.
Cast: John Travolta (Gov.Jack Stanton), Emma Thompson (Susan Stanton),
Adrian Lester (Henry Burton), Billy Bob Thornton (Richard Jemmons), Kathy
Bates (Libby Holden), Maura Tierney  (Daisy Green),  Larry Hagman (Freddy
Picker),Paul Guilfoyle (Howard Ferguson),Caroline Aaron (Lucille Kaufman),
Rebecca Walker (March Cunningham), Mykelti Williamson (the illiterate man),
et al. A Universal Pictures release. 142 minutes. Rated R (language, sex)
Some day in  Afghanistan,  when they start showing films again and import
"Primary Colors," most viewers will make neither heads or tails of it.
Perhaps a mere handful of Afghans will see it as a movie on the Clintons.
More, but still few viewers --never mind the sty in their eye --will think
it is about the corrupt American electoral system and its strategies.
It would be good if the American public could appreciate the movie both as
Clintonesque and as a kind of docu-drama of our politics, instead of the
just the former, which is the majority perception.
The fact is that "Primary Colors" is the filmization of the eponymous novel
by former Newsweek writer Joe Klein, published with "Anonymous" as the
author. Klein, immediately suspected, at first denied, eventually 'fessed
up.
The book was a "roman a clef," (which means "a novel with a key" in
French), the kind that shows historical facts and real people but disguised
as fiction. The fiction is generally tricky so that the readers have to
solve puzzles of identification.  The faithful (with some excisions) movie
version is a "film a clef," but both incarnations are so transparent that
they're not really very clef.
John Travolta plays the Democratic Governor of an unnamed Southern State.
His nom-de-film is Jack Stanton, Jack as in Kennedy, Stanton as in Clinton.
He is running in the Presidential primaries. His wife Susan (Emma Thompson)
is at his side, and she's a damn good campaigner and adviser. To Stanton's
staff --initially one of dedicated amateurs --is added the young idealist
Henry Burton who wants to be part of history, and about whose late
grandfather (someone like Martin Luther King) everyone gushes.  Stantonites
include spin-doctor southerner Richard Jemmons, cute Daisy Green,
troubleshooter-fixer Libby Holden, and others.
Jack and Susan are "constructed" to look and sound as humanly as possible
like Bill and Hillary Clinton.  Henry Burton, an African American, is
derived from George Stephanopoulos (and played by a Brit) --a clever move
because Stephanopoulos is  Greek-American, hence, in terms of politics, a
member of a minority,  and Henry is also a member of a minority. Even more
than Stephanopoulos, he reinforces the aura of an all-inclusive, non-racist
entourage. (It also helps to get more black votes, of course). As Jemmons,
Billy Bob Thornton is a projection of James Carville. And so on, down the
line.
The film's opening is an inspired, funny visual and aural essay on the
variety of hand-shakes the Governor uses. It would stand by itself as a
prize-winning short. Then the portrait of Jack is expanded, amplified and
constantly added to. The man is a consummate politico who can pretend,
manipulate, cajole, inspire, move, cheat, you name it, he can do it.
In his first dramatic appearance, in a New York school where he encourages
minority adults to get an education, Stanton follows the sad tale of a
black man whom illiteracy has seriously damaged, raptly and with swelling
tear ducts.  He segues with the heartbreaking story of his own uncle, a
Congressional Medal of Honor winner who refused all school scholarships or
civilian offers, because--that was his shameful secret-- he too was
illiterate. Jack concludes with a moving and realistic paean of education.
Now here's a candidate who knows how to listen, who has sensible ideas, who
understands the hurt of others. But hold on! The uncle yarn will turn  out
to be pure invention. Hold on again ! If quick-change artist Stanton  can
lie like, well, a politician, he can also feel for other people. That's
what makes Jack such a complex, multi-layered fellow, and that's what the
movie captures with amazing accuracy. This goes well beyond the simple
Jekyll-Hyde transformation and into a far more devious and complicated
character.
Jack has the searching eye of a ladies' man eye and a high level of
testosterone. In his case as in others, those traits can be inseparable
from other talents. It's one big ball of wax. I wager that the name "Jack"
was chosen to evoke JFK, not only for  fast-thinking one one's feet but for
sexual shenanigans too.
Just being next to Stanton flusters so much the New York teacher who hosted
the meeting that she keeps stumbling on stairs. She later comes out of
Jack's bedroom, while the Governor does not even blink as his helpers,
assembled in the hotel suite, watch her exit. Nerves of steel? Nerve? Both.
The complexity, which extends to most other aspects of the movie, makes
"Titanic" look like child's play, save for the specials effects. The "PC"
director and writer are the once famous cabaret-type duo of Nichols and May
who, separated for years, were reunited on the stage, then for the film
"The Birdcage." Both are devilishly talented.
I bet they hurried to finish "PC" while the Presidential hubbub was at its
then-apex. I also bet that they wished the film could have come out in the
Fall of 1998, since that's when the likeliest Oscar candidates will be
released. While at today's date (late March 1998), "PC" leads the pack by
light-years, the memory of voting Academy members almost always disfavors
pre-summer releases.
Back to Henry, who is inducted in Jack's ranks in a whirlwind recruitment.
In "PC" we follow everyone, but it is Henry whom we watch as the nearly
always present thread, and as though he were the chorus of an ancient Greek
play. It is his actions, observations, reactions and reactions to reactions
that make us, the audience, identify with this decent, able and likable
young man. Henry takes us everywhere, to the mechanisms, agonies and
ecstasies of campaigning, including the New Hampshire primary that ends
with Jack in second place (to general jubilation) well after the story's
mid-point.
Much, if not most of the plot deals with the staff having to counter
rumors, accusations or sometimes deliberate lies, and what seems to be a
severe case of satyriasis (that's the Don Juan syndrome, the male
equivalent of nymphomania).  Among them is a phone call that incriminates
Jack as he talks sex with a hairdresser deliciously named Cashmere McLeod.
To the rescue comes gun-toting old pal Libby (Kathy Bates) who seems to
know everything and everyone and is wise to the Age of Electronics. More, I
cannot divulge.
The movie is fast, elliptical, humorous, amusing. It is also raunchy in
speech, acts and behavior. As a farce, it is amoral, immoral, cynical and
very funny. As an expose of political animals it has wild moments and
touching moments. It peeks with savvy into the exhausting process of
running for office, the higher the office, the more killing the effort.
It pulls no punches, but understands Jack Stanton, warts and all. There's a
magnificent night scene, the culmination of the collaboration between
director, writer, set designer and the master cinematographer Michael
Ballhaus. The camera pulls in doughnut-fancier Jack sitting across the
street in a glassed in a doughnut shop, chatting with true sympathy and
empathy with the lone, gimpy  employee. It's a rare, quiet interlude, an
Edward Hopper moment of isolation,  except that Jack's presence promises
some hope for the proletarian employee. It is also a moving moment of
epiphany for Stanton. And it justifies another scene: as Billy Bob is
quitting his job (he'll come back), he takes his leave of Henry, asks him
to stick with Jack. "This one's worth it."
A speech to laid-off workers, from the heart and with no b.s. is as good as
anything Frank Capra ever did, and far more believable. Events that involve
talk-show hosts Larry King, Charlie Rose, Geraldo Rivera, Bill Maher (as
themselves), or  Rob Reiner (as Izzy Rosenblatt), keep hitting the mark.
The Reiner episode catalyzes changes that will affect Jack's rival
candidate. This sets in motion a crazy yet believable chain that ends up
involving ex-Florida Governor Picker (Larry Hagman), who is the soul of
decency --but has a secret.
Hagman underacts with admirable control, at the opposite pole of his famous
"Dallas" performances on TV. Which brings me to the performers. They are a
superb (and superbly cast) cast. As Susan Stanton, Emma Thompson has a
number of choice scenes with terse and fast dialogue as well as reactions.
She is attractive, at times seductive, even sexy. Henry is endearing. Libby
is a great, bossy, volcanic strategist with pit bull determination, yet I
have a feeling that her part is a bit overdone, not in acting but in her
skills. Nor am I too convinced by the final episode that concerns Libby.
(No, I won't give it away. This is, after all, also a political thriller).
Then there's Travolta, that Lazarus of actors who came back from the dead
with "Pulp Fiction." He does very well, yet if you expect a total
impersonation of Bill Clinton you simply won't get it. You might have, in a
stage-play. But in a film, with its merciless close-ups, Travolta can only
be a semi-Clinton.
There's common agreement that the real President is as smart as they come,
a well-educated thinker-doer. I'm not swayed by his Rhodes scholarship
since many scholars, even famous ones, are really duds. Still, the real
Clinton leaves no doubts about his native intelligence.
Travolta can be a very fine actor. He gives a striking, cunning
performance, but he cannot change his spots. If you don't allow Jack his
very own personality; if you concentrate on the Clinton/Stanton parallels
to the detriment of the bigger picture; if you search for convincing
Clintonisms, no matter what Travolta does, he does not exactly radiate with
brains. In any case, directors and witers have to be intelligent, but
thespians don't, so long as they have talent. There's no denying that a
person with Jack's characteristics could be a Governor or President. Or
become a Hollywood star.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Phenomenon (1996)
PHENOMENON * 1/2 . Directed by John Turteltaub. Writen by Gerald 
DiPego. Phtography, Phedon Papamichael. Editing, Bruce Green. 
Production design, Garreth Stover. Music, Thomas Newman. Cast: John 
Travolta (George) Kyra Sedgwick (Lace) Forest Whitaker(Nate), Robert 
Duvall (Doc), et al. Released by Buena Vista. 124 min. Rated PG. 
In a cute, cute, grungily picturesque small town in the North of 
(you've guessed it, it's California again), people live in friendship 
and celebrate the 37th birthday of George Malley (Travolta, who is 
42). Here you ask: Did you say George Bailey, Jimmy Stewart's name in 
Frank Capra's "It's a Wonderful Life"? Not quite but close.
George is a good man and a fine auto mechanic whose best pal is Nate 
(Whitaker). He is secretly in love with divorcee Lace (Sedgwick) who 
has two cute kids and (once bitten) does not wish to complicate her 
life.
On the night of his birthday, a mysterious light in the sky hits 
George. It must be the Bolt of Knowledge. Before you can spell 
"miracle" George, the common man. is transformed into a genius such as 
the world has never seen. He reads books by the ton, understands just 
about everything, learns foreign languages in minutes, has the gift of 
telekinesis, can beat anyone at chess, senses coming earthquakes, 
fixes organic and super-efficient fertilizer from common products, and 
more.  
In short he is a polymath of extraordinary, superhuman proportions. 
But while otherwise George remains his old, warm and friendly self, 
his new power begins to disturb others. Except  his pal Nate, the 
kindly doctor (Duvall) - the most educated and sophisticated person in 
town, Lace's children (kids are wiser than adults) and eventually, 
after a slow, sweet courtship, Lace herself. 
There is a disturbing subtext of anti-intellectualism here. Or perhaps 
there is not. Hard to tell as the movie's myth seems uncertain as to 
where it wants to go, though surely it alludes biblically to the 
dangers of knowledge, clearly so when George and the kids take turns 
biting into an apple.  
As George is about to go to the University at Berkeley and speak to 
all sorts of savants, and awkward plot device has the FBI close in on 
him as someone who knows classified information. More troubles follow 
at the same as happiness of an ordinary kind comes, thanks to loving 
Lace. (She gives him what is supposed to be the most erotic, shampoo 
and haircut in movies, but is, in reality, a tedious timewaster for 
us). 
As troubles proceed, so does the sentimentality that steadily rises to 
95 percent humidity tearjerker levels. The film, slow and a bit dull 
at first, remains slow and becomes very dull. This mega-intelligence 
of George's could have led the movie into any number of serious, funny 
or brainy directions. Instead, it opts for a peculiar solution that 
leaves everyone dissatisfied. I will not reveal it, in case you do see 
the film because of 
Travolta who is very good, a warm, unpretentious, lovable being. 
Duvall is,as usual, perfect. Whitaker is merely a necessary presence, 
as is Sedgwick. The photography, heavy on the lyrical, is good. The 
score is terrible, generic stuff of the connect-the-dots school.

Title
Review for For Love of the Game (1999)
FOR LOVE OF THE GAME (1999) ***  Directed by Sam Raimi. Written by 
Dana Stevens from
the novel by Michael Shaara.  Produced by Armyan Bernstein, Amy 
Robinson.  Photography, John Bailey. Editing, Eric L. Beason, Arthur 
Coburn. Production design,  Neil Spisak. Music, Basil Poledouris. 
Cast: Kevin Costner (Billy Chapel), Kelly Preston (Jane Aubrey), John 
C. Reilly (Gus Sinski), Jena Malone (Heather), Brian Cox (Gary 
Wheeler), J.K. Simmons (Frank Perry), Vin Scully & Steve Lyons (as 
themselves), Carmine D. Giovinazzo (Ken Strout), Bill Rogers (Davis 
Birch), Hugh Ross (Mike Udall). A Universal release. 137 minutes. 
PG-13
Does America love baseball? Has Kevin Costner had box-office hits 
with the baseball films Bull Durham and Field of Dreams? Has been 
unlucky with  some recent movies --except for Tin Cup where he plays 
a golfer? Is The Pope Catholic?
So it made good sense to do a third baseball picture. He is Billy 
Chapel, the Detroit Tigers ace pitcher and prime Hall of Fame 
candidate. Now he's in New York for a game at Yankee Stadium. His 
shoulder hurts. His soul hurts as he is told that his team is being 
sold. He's 40, getting older by sports standards. He has 19 years of 
pro playing behind him. And his heart is breaking because his girl, 
magazine writer Jane (Kelly Preston)  announces that it's all over 
between them; that he really needs no one; that his real love is 
baseball; that  in a few hours she's off to England where a dream-job 
is expecting her.
That's the set-up. From here on out it's flashbacks and flashforwards 
that would be artsy and tiresome (but can be a tad tiring)  except 
that Sam Raimi --who directed The Evil Dead but caught us by surprise 
in 1998 with the so-different A Simple Plan-- manages his script and 
his team (of actors) with a sure-hand and an obvious passion for The 
Game.
Five years ago Billy and Jane first met. They met cute, but it's 
funny and fresh. Their relationship is charted back and forth, 
surprises abound, there's even a surprise young girl, Heather (Jena 
Malone) who livens, warms up and helps crystallize the lovers' 
on-off relationship. More, I cannot say, since this is sports movie 
but also a character-driven picture. It has its own levels of 
suspense, in personal and in sports matters.
There are some clever inventions (events, scenes, sequences), whether 
in rainy New York, sunny Florida or the snowy West. The plot is 
highly manipulative of course, as it plays with the characters' 
actions and reactions, and with the audience's response to what is 
on the screen. The tricks of the trade, both filmic and baseballic, 
are out in force. But they are well handled, keep your attention and 
do not ever get boring. Even the music score by Greek-American 
Poledouris, though generic/romantic, skirts the bombastic repetitions 
by Greek-Greek composer Vangelis in that popular sports-movie 
Chariots of Fire.
All this would still be high-class routine stuff, were it not for the 
superb scenes in the ballpark, their mise-en-scene, their 
photography, the realistically filmed crowds : excellent, imaginative 
photography, sound-mixes, editing that coordinates people and actions 
in the diamond and off it. We get the players, the raucous fans, and 
we get the iffy  but touching thoughts of Billy during his mind games 
with the opponents. He's fighting (under physical and psychological 
handicaps) for his team, his good name, and his exit from the Tigers 
(he'll be traded, no matter what happens).
The movie treats its players with a glove (not kid, but still), as we 
only see and hear rather comradely things with no trace of 
locker-roomitis. The closest to a nasty presence is a young Yankees 
batter who looks satanic. Billy foils him again and again. But the 
game is a gem of excitement and suspense.
The players (in both senses) are very good, although there is no true 
depth in the affair, the setbacks and the Fun With Bill and Jane. 
Costner has the right physique for the role, but it  does get a bit 
redundant as we watch him suffer. Kelly Preston is convincing as a 
real person, as opposed to one playing a part. She does not want to 
be a groupie, but the presumed intensity of the affair is made 
somewhat ho-hum by three things: the lightning fast, out-of-character 
(hers) speed of her initial sex with Billy; our knowledge that so 
many male sports figures are incorrigible woman-collectors; and the 
studio-imposed carnal cuts in order to get a PG-13 rating. Young Jena 
Malone is beautifully cast as she matches perfectly Preston's looks.
The winningest side of the film is the great edge-of-the-seat footage 
which works both on baseball lovers and on non-aficionados.

Title
Review for Jesus' Son (1999)
JESUS' SON (1999) ** 1/2 Directed by Alison Maclean. Written by 
Elizabeth Cuthtrell, David Urrutia, Oren Moverman, from the eponymous 
book of short stories by Denis Johnson. Cinematography, Adam Kimmel. 
Editing, Stuart Levy and Geraldine Peroni. Music, Joe Henry. 
Produced by Margot Bridger, Elizabeth Cuthrell, Lydia Dean-Pilcher. 
Cast: Billy Crudup (FH), Samantha Morton (Michelle), Denis Leary 
(Wayne), Jack Black (Georgie), Will Patton (John Smith), Greg Germann 
(Dr.Shanis), Holly Hunter (Mira), Dennis Hopper (Bill), et al. A 
Lion's Gate release. 107 minutes. Rated R.
In her second feature (after the interesting, made-in-New Zealand 
"Crush" of 1992), Director Maclean has good company, especially the 
steadily up-and-coming Billy Crudup and Samantha Morton. But is Denis 
Johnson's  source book an ally? It's a collection of short stories 
with fairly personal,  strong and poignant passages about druggies in 
the 1970s. This sort of thing does not translate easily --if at all 
--into a  movie stream, a plot, a continuity. The film does try 
however.
The title came from a Lou Reed song called "Heroin" in which the 
lyrics go "When I'm rushing on my run, and I feel just like Jesus' 
Son..."
Billy Crudup plays FH, which stands for F---Head, which comes from 
anything that can go wrong around the man, doing so. Starting with 
Iowa City in the 70s, FH narrates several episodes in the fragmented, 
zig-zag way that so many sober people use when telling a story. Here 
it is reinforced by the influence of drugs on users.
The characters around FH are, like him, marginal to 
"average-standard" society, their doings and non-deeds are unreal or 
surreal, hallucinatory, with visions and all sorts of oddities. As FH 
(and others) move around the film is more bizarresque than 
picaresque, and a blackly humorous, tenuous but perceptibly present 
link to the old (yet very alive in independent films) Theater of the 
Absurd and to the humor of Jean-Luc Godard.
The main event in FH's micro-odyssey is his meeting and falling in 
love with Michelle, who shoots heroin. Before those two got together, 
FH was clean of hard drugs and something close to a slacker. But when 
the new twosome is formed, Michelle brings the young man to the Big 
H. Their relationship is on and off, often tumultuous, often 
escalating to major fights. From vignettes to larger episodes, the 
milieu of the couple (or of FH when he finds himself alone) is drawn 
in episodic ways, sometimes convoluted (but not so that you cannot 
follow), slightly to heavily comic or ironical equivalents of acts, 
scenes, and bits within scenes. What's incoherent is not the story 
but the lifestyle of its people --including the mysterious sources of 
money for Michelle's and FH's drug purchases, hotel rooms and 
groceries. (It's all the weirder since there are no hints of their 
dealing drugs).
Michelle and the other types are not especially likable or moving, 
but there's something simpatico about FH that calls for our hopes 
that he can find a better life. He seems to get close to this when he 
moves to an Arizona hospital for a strange mix of inmates: old, 
terminally ill, gravely handicapped, near-healthy (cf. Dennis 
Hopper's small part), or imaginary invalids (cf. Holly Hunter who 
throws away her crutch after sex with FH). FH himsef is murkily 
drawn, part in rehab, part as a touchy-feely nurse to the denizens. 
Some added surrealism uses mysteriously an Amish couple, including a 
quick bit where FH touches the Amish wife magically, through a pane 
of glass.
The film goes from attaching moments and involving bits to 
indifferent or alienating ones, then bounces back into acceptability. 
How often and how much I will decide only after a second look in the 
non-near future. Absence may make the heart grow fonder, and surely 
makes the brain work better.

Title
Review for Double Jeopardy (1999)
DOUBLE JEOPARDY *** Directed by Bruce Beresford. Written by 
DaviWeisberg and Douglas S. Cook. Photography, Peter James. Editing, 
Mark Warner. Production design, Howard Cummings. Music, Normand 
Corbeil. Producer, Leonard Goldberg. Cast: Tommy Lee Jones (Travis 
Lehman), Ashley Judd (Libby Parsons), Bruce Greenwood (Nick 
Parsons), Annabeth Gish (Angie), Roma Maffia (Margaret Skolowski), 
Davenia McFadden  (Evelyn Lake). A Paramount release.106 minutes. 
Rated R (sex, language, violence).
No-nonsense nonsense, this thriller is firmly tongue-in-cheek but 
smart enough not to push this aspect onto the audience.  It requires 
every bit of suspended disbelief you can muster -- and what's nice 
is that you can do it effortlessly.
Australian-born Bruce Beresford directs with pep, zip, velocity and 
a knack for shrugging off the outrageous. Beresford is, unjustly, 
seldom mentioned as one of the best film-makers, yet he has done 
superior works.  Among them, in Australia,  Don's Party (1976), The 
Getting of Wisdom, Breaker Morant, The Fringe Dwellers. In America: 
Tender Mercies, Her Alibi, Driving Miss Daisy; Black Robe 
(Canadian), Mister Johnson (shot in Africa) and others.  There have 
been some misses, of course, but those matter little in a career 
distinguished by variety, intelligence, sensitivity and humor.
Double Jeopardy is a legalistic term : no one can be tried again for 
the same crime.  Suppose a wife is found guilty of killing her 
husband; and that the husband is alive and well and living it up. If 
the wife decides to shoot him dead,  she'll get away with it.
That's roughly what occurs here. The film opens by the coast of 
Washington State where live, in luxury, shaker-mover Nick, his wife 
Libby, their 4-year old son Matty. At a fund-raising party "chez" 
Parsons, a man innocent of art culture tells his companion that 
they're looking at works by Picasso. Nick sets them straight. "It's 
Kandinsky" he explains, and goes on to a micro-lecture.
In US movies, someone who can perorate on Kandinsky's and Picasso's 
dates, periods and styles, may well become, ipso facto, suspect. 
Which is correct in Nick's case.
In ways too deliciously bloody to reveal, Nick fakes his death and 
disappearance, causing Libby to be found guilty of murder. In prison 
she is gutsy but misses her son terribly. In ways too clever to 
disclose, she discovers  that Nick and her best friend Angie (to 
whom Libby had confided young Matty) had hatched a plot.
So she humbles herself before the parole board and gets paroled -- 
after serving just six years -- talk of improbabilities! But then, 
verisimilitude is falling off all the windows in this film. Then 
again, things are so catchy and kinetic that we don't really care.
For the next two years, Libby will be under heavy restrictions, 
supervised by parole officer Travis (Tommy Lee Jones), who looks 
rough, acts tough, but has, as you guess right away, a great heart 
and a secret sorrow.
Libby does not seek revenge. She only wants her son back. Her own 
investigation becomes a maze of complications, escapes, near-arrests 
and full-arrests by cops and by Travis. They defy description, 
credibility and logic. Mind you, Libby has not aged even one day in 
prison. The only sign of fatigue from adventures and prowesses is 
occasional, discreet puffiness under her eyes.
Yet the perils of Libby are vastly eye-catching, entertaining in the 
action-movie sense. The more outrageous they become the funnier they 
get, even though the story is built as a  thriller more than a ha-ha 
movie. Ingeniously, it forces you to capitulate and drop any shreds 
of disbelief left in your brain.
The search for Angie concludes first, made partly possible by 
Libby's great physical shape (it legitimizes her remarkable training 
for fitness in prison). and by her newly, instantly learned skills 
in computers, faking personalities, magically getting cash, and so 
on.
The search for Nick take her, then Travis, to New Orleans, where she 
gets a free Armani evening dress (don't ask); where a barman 
spontaneously warns her against the police; where Nick is now a 
celebrity with a French name and a Southern drawl; where 
remembrances of Hitchcock movies (especially Cary Grant bidding 
"funny" at an auction in North by Northwest) and of Gothic terror, 
plus an avalanche of twists, keep us pleasantly busy until the 
telegraphed yet enjoyable happy ending.
Pleasing too is the first-rate photography by a habitual, Australian 
collaborator of Beresford's, and the beautiful visuals filmed in 
British Columbia (standing-in for Washington State) and lavish 
sights of New Orleans.
Ashley Judd is something of a revelation. Tommy Lee Jones, well 
rehearsed from The Fugitive, can play his part with the proverbial 
hands tied behind his back. Supporting roles are tops.
Don't jeopardize your fun. Avoid previews or reviews that disclose 
too much. In spite of its collection of predictabilities and 
impossibilities, or rather because of them, the film is great 
entertainment.

Title
Review for Fly Away Home (1996)
FLY AWAY HOME ***  Directed by Carroll Ballard. Written 
by Robert Rodat and Vince McKewin, based on the 
autobiography of Bill Lishman.  Photography, Caleb 
Deschanel. Editing, Nicholas C. Smith. Productiondesign, 
Seamus Flannery. Producers, John Veitch and Carol Baum. 
Music, Mark Isham. Cast: Jeff  Daniels (Thomas Alden), Anna 
Paquin (Amy Alden), Dana Delaney (Susan Barnes), Terry 
Kinney (David Alden) et al.  A Columbia release. 110 
minutes. Rated PG. 
Technically and pictorially, "Fly Away Home" (by Carroll 
Ballard of "The Black Stallion" fame), is a small gem. In 
other aspects, some questions come up. 1) Will a bushy 
beard make likable lightweight Jeff Daniels more of a 
pronounced character? 2)Will Anna Paquin make the 
transition from Oscar-winner ("The Piano") child 
performer to teen-age star? 3) Does the movie move 
you? 4) Is it entirely believable? 5) Is this overall a good 
film? 
The answers: 1) just a little; 2) perhaps; 3) now yes, now 
no; 4) not really; 5) yes.  
When her mother dies in a car crash in New Zealand, 
13-year old Amy is taken back to her native Canada by 
her long estranged (and idiosyncratic) father. She has 
trouble adjusting until she finds a raison d'etre by 
becoming Mother Goose to several orphan goslings. Dad, a 
hand-glider devotee among other things, helped by 
friends succeeds in building two motorized ultra-light 
craft. Rescuing the now grown-up geese from the Law, 
father and daughter fly south to winter quarters in North 
Carolina, each one his/her machine, followed by the now 
migrating birds.  
This is no tall tale. In 1988, Mr.William Lishman 
successfully led a flock of geese in like fashion. In 1993, 
with a team, he guided 18 geese some 400 miles from 
Ontario to Virginia, and in 1994, 38 birds over 800 miles, 
from Ontario to South Carolina. These and other 
experiments have been of major importance to 
threatened or endangered migrating species.
The film takes on even greater Mother Goose-ey fairy 
tale dimensions as it invents the character of Amy, with, 
however, elements from real life. Anna Paquin was born in 
Canada, her father was Canadian, her mother a New 
Zealander, and they were divorcing during the making of 
the film.
What personal traits William Lishman and Thomas Alden 
(Daniels) share, I cannot tell. Thomas is sketched out  as 
an eccentric, a sculptor, conservationist, flyer, inventor 
and a nut of sorts who lives in an "artistic" mess. Yet we 
still have no clear image of or feeling for him. 
Little Orphan Amy is a rather sullen, a resentful daughter 
who doesn't warm up to a father she hasn't seen since she 
was three. To a characterless score by Mark Isham, Amy 
goes to boring school. Life is dull until the birds and their 
causes predictably bond father and daughter. Predictably 
too, Dad has a sweet, understanding girlfriend who is 
anxious to make friends with reluctant Amy. 
A parallel sub-plot ties ecology and animal welfare. 
Technology and land development ("civilization") 
encroach as bulldozers tear up  Ontario's bucolic 
landscape. This factor figures later in the migration 
sequences.  
For its first thirty minutes the movie is one of mood, 
eccentricities and lovely nature, but lacks focus and is not 
particularly involving.  The turning point for me was 
esthetic, when at minute 32 Amy is briefly shown lying in 
a field in what looks like a beautiful imitation of the 
painting "Christina's world" by Andrew Wyeth. 
The tempo picks up with the nurturing of the eggs, the 
hatching, the goslings who (as is common) identify the 
first being they see (Amy) as their mother.  She walks, 
runs, twirls as she calls to them. They follow her faithfully. 
Amy and her birds become an irresistibly enchanting 
sight, many degrees above plain "cute," especially as few 
things in life are as soul-satifying as humans and animals 
connecting with one another.  
When an official quotes ordnance 9314, which requires the 
clipping of wings of such geese, father and daughter 
explode and unite in protest and opposition.  Esthetic and 
emotional levels rise considerably.
The project to lead the birds to migration takes over the 
story, with good rhythm, interesting experiments made 
with flying machines (you wonder where the money comes 
from), the training of people and birds, the actual trek by 
air. For many of us the sense of worry and danger will be 
heightened by the memory of Jessica Dubroff, the 7-year 
old pilot who, with her father, crashed to her death 
several months ago. No doubt this gave nightmares to the 
filmmakers.
But talk of uplift! When we enter prime National 
Geographic territory, the flight of the humans and the 
birds is a gorgeous, fascinating succession of patterns, 
colors, landscapes and skyscapes. The incidents are quite 
attaching, even when they lean more to movie-movie 
events than fact. Some outlandish, even absurd scenes -- 
like flying through the canyons of Baltimore -- can only 
have been computer-generated, but still, they are not 
blatantly heroic.  As the film escalates from feel-good to 
feel-great, it becomes a joy for old and young.
Performances are good, partly because the characters 
play in quiet fashion, miles away from bombastic. It is 
more like the mood produced by massed strings than by a 
marching band. I do deplore the diamond that is put in 
Amy's nose, a trendy desecration of Indian culture -- but 
then the birds and the bird people make up for this 
generously.

Title
Review for Yi ge dou bu neng shao (1999)
NOT ONE LESS ( Yi ge dou bu neng shao) ( China, 1999) *** Directed by 
Zhang Yimou. Written  by Shi Xiangsheng, from his novel. Photography, 
Hou Yong. Editing, Zhai Ru. Art director, Cao Jiuping. Music, San 
Bao. Cast: Wei Minzhi (Herself), Zhang Huike (Himself), Tian Zhenda 
(Mayor Tian), Gao Enman (Teacher Gao), Sun Zhimei (Sun Zhimei), Feng 
Yuying (Television Station Receptionist), Li Fanfan (Television 
Host). Produced by Zhao Yu. A Sony Pictures Classics release. In 
Mandarin (with English subtitles).  106 minutes.
The American director Joseph Von Sternberg (1894-1969) comes to mind 
as I think of the Chinese director Zhang Yimou (b.1951). Sternberg 
"created" Marlene Dietrich in the "Blue Angel" and six additional 
films (1930-35), the high point of his career. Their relationship 
went beyond cinema. Zhang Yimou's feature debut "Red Sorghum" was 
also that of the beautiful actress Gong Li. The two were "an item" 
for about 8 years as he directed her in the highly successful, "Ju 
Dou," " Raise the Red Lantern," "The Story of Qiu Ju," and "To Live" 
for a total of 7, including the unfamiliar (to me) "Codename Cougar." 
Their last collaboration, "Shanghai Triad" (Yao a yao yao dao wai pei 
qiao) had mixed reviews. Zhang-ites hope that now Pygmalion minus 
Galatea will not, as in Sternberg's case, result in declining 
popularity.
"Not One Less" may put those fears to rest, although Zhang changed 
style and content so radically that comparisons are not valid. His 
early career was as a cinematographer. All his films until now have 
powerful, creative visuals. But  here, the customary, delicate 
bravura (not an oxymoron) of often saturated colors, their 
orchestrated, eye-arresting scenes, give way to utter simplicity. 
Made almost like a documentary, the pictures is  a cousin of 
cinema-verite and Italian neorealism.
The village of Shuiquan seems to be in the middle of nowhere, but as 
it turns out, is 3-4 hours by bus from Beijing. What makes one think 
"boondocks," is generalized poverty and the fact that we see very 
little of the place. The images are predominantly of a run-down, 
one-classroom, one-teacher schoolhouse and of dusty dirt roads around 
it.
Teacher Gao is leaving for a month to attend his ailing mother. Wei, 
age 13, an elementary school graduate, has been hired as substitute 
teacher. She's not much older than her pupils. And she does not know 
much more than they do. The idea is to band-aid the emergency.. Wei 
will receive 50 yuan at some point (which keeps eluding her) for a 
month's work. It's essentially a kind of baby-sitting, just keep the 
kids in class.
According to today's exchange rates, one yuan equals 12 US cents. At 
the village, once can of Coca-Cola is either one or two yuans. Wei's 
50 yuans come to $6.
Given the dire shape of the place, students who need to work for 
their families or elsewhere drop school alarmingly fast --from 40 to 
28 since the school year began. This menaces the subsidies to the 
school (such as they are!). Teacher Gao warns Wei to hold the line. 
He sweetens this by promising a bonus (10 yuan) if all 28 kids 
remain. "Not One Less!"
The conditions at the school, and, surely, in the village, are 
dismal. Wei and some kids (who is not clear) sleep in a horrid room. 
Where their food comes from is also unclear. Chalk is rationed: one 
per day. When some chalk trampled on , it is a catastrophe. There are 
no books. Wei copies the lessons on the blackboard. She admonishes a 
child  not to write too large or press too much since it uses up too 
much chalk.
In Part Two of the film, a 10-year old boy, Zhang Huike, smart, 
lively and prone to trouble-making (pitifully mild by American 
standards) stops coming to school. His widowed mother is in debt. 
Zhang went to the big, unnamed city to find work. Through 
brick-moving the class collects a minuscule sum for Wei to go to the 
city and search for the boy. It is unclear whether she does it to 
keep the students at the 28 level, or to get her bonus --For a Few 
Yuan More.
Her small adventures follow, there is a rather unlikely happy ending. 
As Wei reaches the end of her rope, she is told to take her case to 
almighty TV. The stumbling block is an autocratic, 
bureaucratic-to-the-letter receptionist. But a manager ex machina 
saves the day. Wei goes on a telecast, with a typically chatty, 
elegant anchorwoman. The newness of it all literally dumbfounds Wei. 
She freezes, says nothing.
The boy is found, he returns to the village with Wei and a camera 
crew. But TV micro-celebrity and a gift of tons of chalks solve 
nothing. End-titles tell us that a million children a year drop 
school for work. It's a false figure. Reality is ten times higher. 
But since this is a criticism of China's system, and since director 
Zhang Yimou has often had troubles with the government and censors, 
he lowered the figure to what authorities would deem acceptable.
In Italian neorealism the movies did not hesitate to show or denounce 
evils by individuals as well as the state. Matters are much more 
careful and balanced here, a bit as in old Soviet movies. The TV 
station bureaucrat receptionist is scolded, and it another bureaucrat 
who is helpful. The kindness of strangers gets some credit as a 
restaurant helps hungry Zhan, although this is done primarily to 
avoid his bothering the customers. You may glimpse a chic woman or 
two but contrasts are kept down. No discotheques, no pricey stores. 
You sense the movie's political prudence.
What's new and interesting is that almost all the characters are 
non-actors who use their real names and who do in real life what they 
do on the screen --starting with Wei who was chosen from an enormous 
field of candidates. What is most successful is how well, starting 
again with Wei, all those non-professionals fit their roles and 
situations. Were that the movie could give a big boost to the casting 
of amateurs. If this escalates the multi-million-dollar salaries of 
stars could go the way of the walls of Jericho. Fat chance.

Title
Review for Voleurs, Les (1996)
THIEVES (LES VOLEURS) (France,1996) *** 1/4  Directed by Andre Techine.
Written by Michel Alexandre, Pascal Bonitzer, Gilles Taurand,Andre Techine.
Photography, Jeanne Lapoirie. Editing, Martine Giordano. Set design, Ze
Branco.
Music, Philippe Sarde.Cast:  Catherine Deneuve (Marie Leblanc), Daniel
Auteuil (Alex), Laurence Cote (Juliette Fontana), Fabienne Babe
(Mireille), Didier Bezace(Ivan), Julien Riviere (Justin),Grandfather (Ivan
Desny),Pierre Perez (Fred),Regis Betoule (Regis), Naguime Bendidi
(Nabil),Didier Raymond(Lucien),Benoit Magimel (Jimmy Fontana), Chiara
Mastroianni (Graduate Student) . A Sony Classics release. In French with
subtitles, 117 min.Rated R (strong sexuality, violence,language)
Andre Techine ("Te" as in "terrible" "chi" as in "Chicago", accent on "ne"
as in "negative") used to be a critic for the "Cahiers du Cinema" in that
magazine's most esoteric period, before he began making films in 1974. His
background may explain some of his characteristics as
director-screenwriter. He is now in his early fifties.
Through 1996, 14 of his films have been released. Since 1993's "My Favorite
Season" (starring Catherine Deneuve and Daniel Auteuil), Techine has been
on a roll, in the USA too, with that movie, "Wild Reeds," and now "Thieves"
(also with Deneuve and Auteuil).
Daniel Auteuil  keeps reminding me of the great Michel Simon (1895-1975) in
one way. Simon was, from his earliest films on, the ugliest star in France.
Among the big, talented names today, Auteuil is up there too, at least in
the category of far-from-pretty. His re-teaming with beautiful Deneuve adds
another Beauty and the Beast to this category,  but not in simple, obvious
ways -- especially since the man's acting easily makes you forget his odd
looks.
In "Les Voleurs" Auteuil shares the limelight with many other characters,
but the main spotlight is on him. I say "main" because spotlights are also
on several others and in an almost bewildering array of combinations and
permutations. These, plus the film's use of many flashbacks and
flashforwards, force the viewer to concentrate without pause on the people,
facts and events on the screen. I would have preferred fewer flashbacks and
a more linear construction.
To tell the plot would take up more space than a reviewer is given.  It
would also disclose what should not be revealed. Not so much in the
whodunit way, though this movie is among a host of other things,also a
thriller, but in all the other components.
"Thieves" takes place in our time, in and around Lyon, France's third
largest city.Alex (Auteuil) is a police detective who never smiles. He
divorced his wife (a cop too) because he did not want to hve children ("who
wants to bring them up in this world?"). He is all-cop, always in contact
with seamy life. His main beat is the "Cites," low-rent public housing
complexes for low-income people (including immigrants) where it is risky
for him to walk the streets at night.
Alex is semi-alienated from his family and has not seen some of them for
four years, others for ten. He lives alone on a small salary. His father, a
mysterious man, is wealthy. Alex has an older brother, Ivan,  a shady type
who runs an industrial-strength operation of expensive stolen cars, and has
just opened  Mic Mac, a nightclub. Ivan has a wife, a 10-year old boy (a
loner), many mistresses. He boasts to Alex about his wealth, disdains
Alex's modest existence.
When Alex does meet member sof the family, it is for unavoidable or
semi-professional reasons. The encounters, even when friendly on the
surface, reveal a great deal of disapproval , antagonism and hostility on
all sides.  .
In  Ivan's entourage are a young man, Jimmy  and his sister Juliette. They
both have criminal records. Jimmy is now the junior partner at the Mic Mac.
There is an odd, kinky relationship between Alex and Juliette, after she is
brought to him for shoplifting. There is also Marie (Deneuve), who teaches
philosophy at the uiversity, is divorced and a grandmother (scrumptious)
who has entered into a passionnate relationship with her student... who
happens to be Juliette. Because of Juliette, the professor and the cop meet
and develop a weird sort of rapport.
Much happens in the movie, with the stress on character exploration and
relationships. Some relationships may strain belief, but do not break it.
The Alex-Ivan setup goes further and deeper than the sometimes
Hollywood-familiar "brothers on opposite sides of the law."  Juliette, a
dysfunctional cipher in many ways, keeps reminding me of Juliette Lewis.
She has had several quirky relationships and there is even a vague hint of
incest. And so it goes.
This is not "entertainment" in the ordinary sense, but while not cheerlful,
the complex, unusual persons and happenings,the tough, psychological,
erotic and "intellectual" aspects are fascinating to follow in this
zig-zagging story. Twice I have seen "Thieves" eight months apart. The
second viewing was even more satisfactory than the first.

Title
Review for Cronos (1993)
     This is all about the CD.  Not the Compact Disc or a Certificate
of Deposit but the Cronos Device that is supposed to ensure
immortality.  It was invented by an alchemist who, fleeing the
Inquisition, came to Mexico in 1574 and became an official watchmaker.
The device looks like an outsized golden scarab,o, in the director's
own words, a Faberge egg
     Apparently there's a glitch in this gizmo: although it kept its
inventor alive for centuries, he did die in a 1930s earthquake.  You
can't trust anything.
     Cut to 1997.  Meet elderly antiques dealer Jesus Gris, his much
younger wife Mercedes and his granddaughter Aurora.  Mercedes is a
tango teacher who may or may not be unfaithful.  Aurora's provenance is
unexplained, as is her near-mutism.  A lot is unexplained in this
movie.
     The CD turns up inside the base of a wooden angel that Senor Gris
sells to Angel, the gangsterish American nephew-henchman of terminally
ill industrialist Dieter De la Guardia.  But Gris keeps the
contraption, which Angel and Dieter are after.  It is only later that,
in its muddled, non sequitur way, the film reveals that Dieter owned
the alchemist's diary and knew about the CD.
     The CD comes without instructions.  When Gris winds it up, it puts
out needle-pointed claws that pierce, let out blood, cause pain, but
also somewhat rejuvenate the man.
     There's more muddled stuff as Gris vampiristically needs the blood
of others (he licks a nosebleed off a bathroom floor); as the bad
Angel beats up and kills Jesus Gris; as Gris's corpse is, in repellent,
graphic images, patched up ... and later comes to life; as, with the
help of Aurora, Gris fights separately Angel and Dieter.
     The movie is a ghoulish goulash of nonsense, plot holes, loose
ends, discontinuities and illogicalities, even by horror flick
standards.  At every step we are left wondering about things natural,
unnatural and supernatural.  What is the nature of the May-December
Gris couple? What do the De la Guardia Enterprises manufacture? How can
the resuscitated Gris use a pay phone without change? Why does grungy
surgeon-embalmer-mortician Tito cremate an empty coffin?
     The film may be a narrative mess but it is a minor triumph of
techniques and visuals.  Whether the sights are silly, repulsive or
both, the images are striking.  The real raison d'etre of the movie
is its art work, photography, colors, lighting, special effects, moody,
stylized or surreal decors.
     By Mexican standards, the CRONOS budget (about two million
dollars) is huge, second only to that of LIKE WATER FOR CHOCOLATE.
The movie would have cost ten times more if made in North America.
     The 29-year old Guillermo del Toro, self-avowedly
"genre-impaired," is exclusively fascinated by "grotesque tales and
horror with Gothic sensibility." Obviously a student of horror and
science-fiction, he has thrown into his film everything save the
prosaic kitchen sink.
     Among the elements: Vampires and the Undead, the Search for the
Fountain of Youth (in the tradition of the Spanish Conquistador Ponce
de Leon), the  Golden Bug, Egyptian-like scarabs (a staple of The
Mummy's Curse school of movies), the Cronos of Greek mythology (a
Titan who devoured his own children) and The Time Machine (Chronos
with an "h" means "time" in Greek).
     There are also whiffs of Catholicism (prayer, redemption, etc.)
and of the Frankenstein moral: don't fool around with what God has
created.
     Add to this much would-be humorous symbolism of names: Angel (of
darkness), Aurora (Dawn in Latin), Tito (as in Yugoslavia=B9s), De La
Guardia (the late Mayor of New York and a reference to guarding or
protecting?) and more.  And, of course, Jesus Gris (cf. Jesus Cristo).
Jesus is a common Hispanic name, but here there are pointed references
to would-be immortality.
     CRONOS swept the Mexican Oscars with nine "Ariels,"including Best
Picture, Screenplay and Director.  It won the top prize at the Critics'
Week of the 1993 Cannes Festival.  In the U.S., its critical reception
has been quite mixed, although in some quarters it is becoming a cult
movie of sorts.

Title
Review for Azúcar amarga (1996)
BITTER SUGAR (AZUCAR AMARGA) *** 1/2 .  Directed by Leon Ichaso. Written
by Ichaso & Orestes Matacena. Story , Ichaso & Pelayo Garcia. Photography,
Claudio Chea. Editing, Yvette Pineyro. Production design, Liliana Soto.
Additional editing, David Tedeschi. First Assistant Director, Tito Rosario.
Music, Manuel Tejada. Additional Music, Jose Ferro, Jr. Songs,  Vergilio
Marti & Victor Victor.  Cast: Rene Lavan (Gustavo), Mayte Vilan (Yolanda),
Larry Villanueva (Bobby),  Miguel Gutierrez (Dr. Tomas Valdez), Mr. Garcia
(Luis Celeiro), Belkis (Teresa Maria Rojas), Claudio (Orestes Matacena),
Soraya (Caridad Ravelo), Yiyo (Jorge Pupo), Security Guard (Hotel) (Augusto
Feria), Security Guard (Beach) (Flex German). A First Look Pictures
release. In Spanish with subtitles. In black & white.  102 min. Not rated.
"Bitter Sugar" was made by Havana-born Leon Ichaso  ("El Super" and others)
who left Cuba and came to the US at age 14. It is such a bitterly
anti-Castro movie that it is bound to be execrated by Fidelistas, loved by
anti-Castrists, and disliked by sympathizers of the Cuban Revolution. But
the latter should note that the Revolution is not in question.What its
idealism eventually became is.  True, the film never mentions the
continuing Cuban policy of the US Government, but then, this is a movie
limited to internal affairs.
Those points  are moot however, since the film seems to have had a low
distribution profile. This is sad as "qua" film, "Bitter Sugar" is
excellently made and, for me, fascinating.
The setting is Havana, in fairly recent times not specified except for the
fact that the Soviet Union had not yet dissolved. Economically, Cuba's
living standards are awful. Gustavo, a good-looking, bright University
student is the son of psychiatrist Dr.Valdez and the brother of hirsute
rock musician Bobby. The boys' beautiful mother had died in accident some
years back.
Gustavo, an idealistic product of Castroism, is the "Hombre Nuevo" (the New
Man) of the Revolution, though, with his sense of humor he is no rabid
fanatic. He wins a scholarship to study aeronautics in Prague -- which, as
someone later tells him mockingly, is a useless skill in Cuba.
Gustavo meets Yolanda, a pretty dancer with a great figure. They fall in
love. But their affair is enormously complicated and affected by most
apects of life in Cuba: the lack of many basic necessities, censorship,
taboos, repression. The government is desperately trying to bring in
tourists whose dollars-only beaches and hotels are closed to Cubans other
than personnel. It is also on a frantic search for foreign investors,
while, ironically, Castro harangues the crowds about the Revolution
sweeping out capitalism. There are additional, personal complications, like
the "rockero" brother getting into trouble with the authorities, or
Yolanda's mother disapproving of "Communist" Gustavo.
The young people's relationship is touching though never saccharine. Both
are charming and intelligent. Rene Lavan and Mayte Vilan portray them to
perfection, subtly convey sensitivity with none of the expected (especially
from Latins) soap opera theatrics. Affectionate and friendly too is the
rapport between Gustavo and his humorously cynical, politically
disillusioned father.
I noticed that Cubans address their parents as "viejo" or "vieja" (old man,
old woman) which makes the father and son banter all the nicer. At a party
to celebrate the scholarship, Dr. Valdez unveils a cake, a rarity in this
land of tremendous shortages. He describes humorously how the "Socialist"
ingredients were obtained. Miguel Gutierrez, who plays him, is marvelous, a
major screen and stage actor in Cuba which he left in 1991. He could teach
others more than a thing or two in nuances, conveying a lot with a little,
and more...
I will not detail the plot which is quite complex yet never confusing.  The
film achieves a difficult multiple blend of excellent character portrayals,
a moving love story and the discussing, unveiling and criticizing Cuba,
especially how its politics stifle aspirations and limit  the lives of
younger people.
The story involves several people : the defiant musician Bobby (in a
devastating development which comes from a real event); Dr. Valdez who has
no clients, even though
"in Cuba everybody is crazy," and who starts a new career; Yolanda's
family; the scholarship kept dangling before Gustavo with advice "to play
the game"; an Italian investor woven in both as an individual and as
emblematic of the "new colonialists" of Cuba. Even minor characters have
impact.
You could swear that the whole thing was filmed in Havana. Yet, except for
some establishing and other shots, the filming took place in Santo Domingo.
I've seldom seen a more convincing job of substitution -- I can't even
bring myself to call it faking. On top of some undoubtedly genuine street
scenes of Havana, the recreation is exemplary. Black and white also adds
authenticity to the documentary feeling, and melds seamlessly with what
must be older black-and-white footage of the city's life. Within the film
there is also footage of older home movies and of current videotapes made
by the characters.
(The black-and-white print reminds me that some years ago, a university
student taking an Introduction to Film course, loudly protested that he
hated, and would refuse to watch, any black-and-white movies. I hope no one
will miss this film for this reason!)
The editing is masterful in its blend and variety. Lavishy and
intelligently incorporated music is well played,  from  good rock to nice
old tunes. The subtitles are of high quality and the recording catches
clearly the characteristic Cuban accents that tend to eat consonants.
A final thought on film and politics. Many classics, such as Eisenstein's,
were partisan and could even lie blatantly -- which "Bitter Sugar" does not
-- yet these are still great films.
Note :This review and others can be found at :
http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for People Will Talk (1951)
PEOPLE WILL TALK (1951)  Written and directed by Joseph L. 
Mankiewicz, from the play "Dr. Praetorius" by Curt Goetz. 
Produced by Darryl F. Zanuck. Photography, Milton Krasner. 
Editing, Barbara McLean. Art direction, Lyle Wheeler, George 
W. Davis. Set design, Thomas Little, Walter M. Scott. Music, 
Wagner and Brahms. Music direction, Alfred Newman. Cast: Cary 
Grant (Dr. Noah Praetorius), Jeanne Crain (Annabel Higgins), 
Finlay Currie (Shunderson) Hume Cronyn (Prof. Elwell), Walter 
Slezak (Prof. Barker), Sidney Blackmer (Arthur Higgins), Basil 
Ruysdael (Dean Lyman Brockwell), Katherine Locke (Miss James), 
Will Wright (John Higgins), Margaret Hamilton (Miss Pickett), 
et al. 110 minutes.
M.D. Cary Grant teaches at a University, also runs a clinic. 
He meets Jeanne Crain who is so desperate (because she is 
pregnant and unmarried) that she attempts suicide. Grant 
tricks her into thinking she is not pregnant--attributing this 
to a lab mix-up of tests--and marries her. 
Parallel to this subject (rather than used as a subplot) is an 
investigation launched by mean-spirited, jealous colleague 
Hume Cronyn into the mysterious past of Grant and his strange 
companion Finlay Currie. 
The film's pregnancy theme may be very dated these days, but 
it was quite progressive in its time. The  University's 
investigation is a reflection of McCarthy-type witch-hunts. 
The title refers to gossip, intolerance and slander, but in 
addition  everyone talks and talks and talks. Some of this 
talk is literate, some is Hollywood- heatrical. 
The movie has a great deal of charm and color, makes good use 
of music, is pleasant to watch. It is also full of 
improbabilities and loose ends,  along with a strong dose of 
corn. Implausibilities include Crain's instant love of Grant; 
Crain's suicide attempt, as neither her having a gun nor using 
it right outside Grant's office make sense; the odd story of 
Grant's past...
The entire tete-a-tete part where Grant proposes to Crain is 
ho-hum, if not ho-ho-ho-hum-hum-hum; the sequence of playing 
with toy trains is exaggerated in its effort  to be humorous. 
In general, whimsy in this movie is on the heavy side. There 
are other flaws.
The characters don't really satisfy, even though most are 
played by consumate character actors. Many of the thespians 
are overdrawn and overdone. Attractive Jeanne Crain is, as 
usual (with exceptions, notably in "Pinky") too cold an 
actress; Sidney Blackmer, as Crain's father, is too smug in 
his admission he has been a failure in life; Cronyn is much 
too evil. Even Grant is too idealized, too smart, self 
-possessed, angelic and multi-talented.
On the other hand, bass-playing physicist Walter Slezak is 
charming and convincing as Grant's  friend, and Finlay Currie 
is memorable. Currie, an accomplished Scots musician who only 
entered movies in his early 40s, had made a strong impression 
as the convict in the 1946 "Great Expectations." His role here 
is unusual by any standards. Shunderson is an older, big, 
silent man, possessed of what looks like Scottish dourness 
(but isn't), and with unclear functions. Clearly, though, he's 
a man with a secret. He gives the impression of having some 
sort of mental weakness. Attached to Grant with total 
devotion, he is like a loving dog. The Shunderson-Praetorius 
rapport is interesting and touching enough to justify the 
whole film.
I must admit that the movie's weaknesses may become apparent 
only after repeated viewings. Seen once (perhaps even a second 
time), PEOPLE papers over the holes, thanks to brio, warmth 
and originality. And, even for those whose logic does not 
allow them to  suspend disbelief, this movie still ranks as 
good, enjoyable and recommended.  After all, it is a 
J.L.Mankiewicz product. (Edwin Jahiel)  

Title
Review for Last Summer in the Hamptons (1995)
LAST SUMMER IN THE HAMPTONS *** 1/4  Directed by Henry Jaglom. 
Written by Jaglom & Victoria Foyt. Produced by Judith 
Wolinsky. Photography, Hanania Baer. Cast: Viveca Lindfors 
(Helena Mora), Kristoffer Tabori (Nick Mora), Victoria Foyt 
(Oona Hart), Jon Robin Baitz (Jake Axelrod), Savannah Boucher 
(Suzanne), Roscoe Lee Browne (Freddy), Andre Gregory (Ivan 
Axelrod), Nick Gregory (George), Melissa Leo (Trish Axelrod), 
Roddy McDowall (Thomas), Martha Plimpton (Chloe Garfield), Ron 
Rifkin (Eli Garfield), Diane Salinger (Marian Mora Garfield), 
Brooke Smith (Lois Garfield), Holland Taylor (Davis Mora 
Axelrod) and Henry Jaglom (Max Berger).  A Rainbow Film Co. 
release. 106 mins. Rated R (occasional adult expressions and 
references to incest)
Irritating for some, intriguing for others, clever and 
fascinating for many, Henry Jaglom's latest picture is, 
whatever the reactions, one of the sharpest depictions of  the 
hearts, minds and above all, fixations on careers of theater 
people: actors, playwrights, directors, teachers, satellites. 
The one major exception is Oona Hart (Victoria Foyt, the 
current Mrs. Jaglom) who visits from Hollywood.
Oona goes to a large country house in the ritzy Hamptons. For 
financial reasons, the owner, aged stage actress (and ex-movie 
star) Helena Mora(Viveca Lindfors), has put it up for sale. 
As is customary,  matriarch Helena's large, extended and 
talented family, all in theater, gather there in the summer. 
This is their last weekend. Traditionally too, the clan has 
mounted a play for a single performance, a yearly, 
artistic-cum-social event attended strictly with limited 
invitations.  
Oona enters the new milieu with trepidation and a load of 
complexes. She earns far more from movies than anyone around 
from stagecraft, but she is insecure, in awe of real pros and 
(I guess) because while bankable she has not attained true 
stardom. Without becoming a catalyst she is the main thread of 
the film as it presents us with a multitude of situations 
among the regulars. 
What sets everyone apart from common mortals is ego and 
egocentrism, terms that are not synonymous. The second, in 
addition to self-importance, includes colossal 
self-absorption. Oona's ego may not be larger than the 
others', but in an ocean of "I, I, I," her share is gigantic.  
She is also a specialist in "You, you, you." In that other 
thespian movie, "All About Eve," cynic George Sanders advises 
Marilyn Monroe to go and do herself some good. That's just 
what Oona is about.
Flitting from person to person, she networks, schmoozes, 
dispenses gobs of hyperbolic compliments, transparent 
flattery, heavy adulation and outpourings of fraudulent 
sincerity. Buttering up director Ivan Axelrod (stage director 
Andre Gregory of "My Dinner with Andre") she gushes about his 
work, then admits she has never seen any of it: "But I've 
heard about it ... You're like a legend."
What, in showbiz lingo, tops the gag, is that Ivan accepts 
this hook, line and sinker. He doesn't even smile ironically. 
Later, in fact, he cuddles Oona. At another point he has 
something like near sex with her as she does her panther 
exercise, jumping, clawing and roaring. (When she does her 
baby seal exercise she's just as hilarious). 
The performers, all excellent, have zip, zing and verve. I 
only regret that the great, distinctive Roscoe Lee Browne who 
can radiate intelligence and irony like nobody's business, has 
such a tiny role. 
The structure of the film is like a string of improvisations, 
but in reality it is a careful charting of encounters. Large 
family reunions around Helena's table are done in most 
un-gourmet fashion as food is barely the background and talk 
is all. Smaller groups are formed. Dominant are the repeated 
tete-a-tete two-shots, with the same couple or with a 
different partner.
Seldom has a movie deserved more the description of "bits and 
pieces." So many of them that they may try your powers of 
concentration as you attempt to figure out who's who or what 
to whom.  
Unlike the conventions of the "well-made play," where the 
exposition starts as the curtain goes up on Act I, Scene 1 and 
soon we are given basic information about many characters, 
"Last Summer" is hyper-realistic. It's like getting plopped 
into a big party and having to fend for yourself in figuring 
out the identities of others guests.
When Jean Renoir's classic "The Rules of the Game" (an obvious 
inspiration for "Last Summer") gathered a motley weekend crowd 
in a chateau, the diverse characters stood out with clarity, 
as they do in Jaglom's other models: Chekhov's "The Cherry 
Orchard," the older novel, play and film "Grand Hotel," Ingmar 
Bergman's "Smiles of a Summer Night," its clever Woody Allen 
version "A Midsummer Night's Sex Comedy," etc. 
Jaglom takes his non-method a bit far. I thought of viewers 
who complain that too many subtitles in inordinately talky 
foreign films block the looking at screen images. Mr. Jaglom 
might have used occasional identifications, like those on TV 
news or documentaries: "Henry Purcell, Rio Tonto Police 
Chief." Not too many of course, since part of the game is 
figuring out the characters.  
English-born (1939)Henry Jaglom, first an actor on American 
TV, entered movies as an editorial consultant (whatever that 
means) for "Easy Rider" (1969) before turning writer-director 
with "A Safe Place" in 1971. "Last Summer" is, as per Jaglom, 
his eleventh film, but in reality his twelfth if you count his 
co-direction of the theatrically unreleased "National Lampoon 
Goes to the Movies" (1981). 
Jaglom is an independent and a maverick who makes decidedly 
non-Hollywoodian movies, super talky affairs of staged 
"cinema-verite" (documentary),with players who range from many 
unknown or little known to second-stringers. In his filmic 
cocktails, he mixes and stirs them with "real" people, often 
filmmakers like Orson Welles, Bob Rafelson, Monte Hellman, 
Milos Forman, John Landis. 
The average cast is large. Names and no-names generally share 
the pie democratically.With "Always," Jaglom started 
increasing the number of parts. With "Someone to Love," 
"Eating," "Venice-Venice" (60 parts, albeit many microscopic) 
and "Babyfever" Jaglom became the Cecil B. DeMille of 
Kammerspiel.
In "Last Summer" what we don't learn about theater people is 
hardly worth mentioning. Among the revelations (to those 
unfamiliar with the profession) is that everything, including 
personal life, is ever sacrificed to getting a part. 
Oona, cynically encouraged by her visiting lover (Jaglom) has 
a fling with a talented grandson of Helena's. He, poor soul, 
deludes himself that Oona might follow him to the wilds of the 
Midwest. She: "I don't even know where Missouri is!" 
We learn that ambition goes so far that a "gorgeous 
apprentice" (Nick Gregory) fakes being gay and comes on to 
young playwright Jake (real playwright Jon Robin Baitz) to 
advance his (the phony's) career. We learn that a director 
father is jealous of his successful son and that the first 
sexual experience of a young woman was with her gay brother. 
We learn about family relations, problems, alienations, about 
truths, lies, deceptions, self-deceptions and the terrible 
toll of aging.  
Helena explains that she left Hollywood and returned to the 
stage because there she could learn much more about her craft. 
True enough, but wasn't it also because getting old demotes 
one to lesser parts?   
In the most moving scenes, twice Helena watches herself on TV. 
She sees Viveca Lindfors in her two initial movies, after 
Hollywood imported her from Sweden. Her first US film ("Night 
Unto Night") was in 1947, opposite Ronald Reagan. It was 
shelved until 1949 so that her public screen debut was with 
Errol Flynn, in 1948  ("The Adventures of Don Juan"). One 
picture may have been a dud, the other a potboiling 
swashbuckler, but even if we know those facts, there is pathos 
in stars looking at their glory days. Think of  "Sunset 
Boulevard." 
Miss Lindfors died while on tour in Sweden in 1995. Unlike 
Helena, she never left the cinema although she did also return 
to the stage. Her penultimate movie was the 1994 "Stargate." 
She worked in almost 60 films, few of them worthy of her 
talents--unlike "Last Summer," where her last appearance is a 
fitting, touching grand exit. 

Title
Review for Goya (1999)
GOYA IN BORDEAUX (Goya en Burdeos) (Spain, 1999) *** 1/4. Written & 
directed by Carlos Saura. Photography, Vittorio Storaro. Art 
director, Pierre-Louis Thevent. Editing, Julia Juaniz. Music, Roque 
Banos. Cast: Francesco Rabal (old Goya),  Jose Coronado (younger 
Goya),  Dafne Fernandez (Rosario), Maribel Verdu (Duchess of Alba), 
Eulalia Ramon (Leocadia), Joe Mai Pou (Godoy), et al. Sony Pic. 
Classic release. Spanish with subtitles. Ca. 100 minutes. R (violent 
scenes) A the Art.
Since the film has been around for several weeks it has been widely 
reviewed.  Some opinions are tepid, some  positive, others ecstatic. 
Much depends on what a viewer knows about the great Spanish painter 
(1746-1828), art, aSpanish history, Napoleonic Wars, etc.  Much also 
depends on what the spectator expects from a film about a major 
artist to be.
It is decidedly not a documentary, an "educational" movie, a 
traditional biography, or anything familiar in movies. The closest to 
a categorization is : a fractured Goyaesque view of periods, 
elements, the personality and the talent of Goya, qua artist and qua 
human being.
It is civilized cinema. Its most obvious main attribute is the superb 
cinematography by Vittorio Storaro, the Italian master who has won a 
record four Oscars : The Last Emperor, One From the Heart, Reds, 
Apocalypse Now,
Goya is introduced as an exile in Bordeaux (France) at age 82. (This 
un-didactic and un-academic film may give  the impression that he had 
been sent into exile, but this was a voluntarily exile of many 
Spanish Liberals who detested the royal regime). In France, the 
widowed Goya lives with his latest mistress Leocadia who is his 
junior by 40 years, and his youngest daughter Rosario who is a 
lovely, loving child, smart and wise beyond her years.
Old Goya is played by Francisco Rabal who was then about 74.  Rabal 
has been in about 185 movies,  Spanish, international ( French, 
Mexican, Italian, American, etc.) Many were directed by such masters 
as Torre-Nilsson, Bunuel, Saura,  Bardem,Visconti, Antonioni, Tanner 
and others.  For those who remember the younger Rabal, he is 
unrecognizable here.  The old man Old Goya is a human wreck, a 
debilitated monster, cranky, crotchety, tormented by the past and 
present, and a lip reader since losing his hearing at age 45. His 
"story" is told without crystal-clear chronology, mostly to his 
daughter or as visions, with  zig-zags of time. The flashbacks and 
flashforwards lead to a multiplicity of periods, as well as the 
joining of past and present in several scenes. (One must suspend 
disbelief in the many sections where Goya read lips so well that 
reality becomes mythical.)
The "young" Goya is well performed by 42-year old Jose Coronado who 
notwithstandings some 20 films is unknown outside Spain. A small 
puzzle: while Coronado plays his Goya at different ages, he looks 
essentially the same. But then, the movie is such a work a fantasy 
that literal realism is no big problem.
There is no way to tell the "story" without using up column inches or 
confusing the reader. The movie is self-explanatory, the art of the 
superb director Carlos Saura is apparent, his collaboration with 
Storaro seamless.
The film is a cauldron with a paella of thoughts, talk and visuals 
about art, with interspersed sketches, drawings, engravings, still 
paintings, paintings that move and take on life, homages to Velasquez 
(both by the film and by Goya),    "tableaux vivants," politics, and 
the long affair between Goya and the love of his life. She is always 
in his  heart and mind.  The Duchess of Alba was a great beauty, a 
great wit, a powerful political figure, the richest woman in Spain 
and at some point the hated enemy of the King and Queen. The latter 
and her lover Godoy poisoned her, says Goya.  The Duchess was the 
model for  Goya's paintings "The Naked Maja" and "The Clothed Maja" 
which stand in amazing contrast to the revolutionary series "The 
Disasters of War."
Carlos Saura grew up as a passionate lover of films, music (his 
mother was a concert pianist), painting (his brother was a famous 
artist), dance, theater  and everything concerning art, politics, 
psychology or behavior. His record is sublime, from realistic to 
symbolic or allegorical political films (during the years of  that 
other Francisco, dictator Franco), to poetic works on love, dance and 
music (within dramas) which blend traditions and experimentation, and 
more. He made Goya at age 67. His passion for the subject and the 
film are obvious and striking. I can't help feeling that  they are 
colored by the Master's intimation of mortality.

Title
Review for Get Bruce (1999)
GET BRUCE! (1999)*** Produced and directed by Andrew J. Kuehn. 
Photography, Jose Luis Mignone. Editing, Maureen Nolan. Music, 
Michael Feinstein. Appearing : Bruce Vilanch, Bette Midler, Billy 
Crystal , Robin Williams, Whoopi Goldberg, Lily Tomlin,  Nathan Lane, 
Roseanne, Carol Burnett, Florence Henderson, Rosie O'Donnell, 
Shirley MacLaine, Paul Reiser,  George Schlatter, Raquel Welch, 
Sigourney Weaver, and others. A Miramax release. 93 min. R (raunchy 
talk and jokes)
Of the films starting with the word "get" the three most interesting 
have been the British "Get Carter" (1971), a tough action item with 
Michael Caine;  "Get Out Your Handkerchiefs" (1978) the irreverent 
French movie with Gerard  Depardieu; and "Get Shorty" (1995), the 
humorous, hoodlum story from Elmore Leonard, with John Travolta.
The ""get" in Get Bruce, unlike the other titles, refers to the 
hirings of real-life Bruce Vilanch by practitioners of film, TV and 
other events, that is, "celebrities" --which is one of the most 
irritating and overworked words in American pop culture.
A small,  improvised poll turns out this fact: almost no one among 
ordinary folks has any idea who Bruce Vilanch is. But (a very big 
but) everyone in showbiz knows that this Bruce is a joke and gag 
writer who is in huge demand among actors, stand-up comics, sit-down 
comics, leaders or organizers of such public events as roasts, 
homages, the Academy Awards ceremonies and so on ad infinitum.
Which explains why this light-hearted documentary is studded with 
laugh-getting stars, clients, collaborators, admirers and --in the 
best showbiz tradition --"best friends" of Bruce's. Look at the 
credits above and you get merely a whiff of Vilanchites.
The voluminous, hirsute Bruce, ever-looking unkempt, ever wearing one 
of his funny t-shirts from his colossal collection, is a very funny 
fellow. In interviews which, like good jokes, never overstay their 
welcome, in amusing conversations, discussions, appearances and the 
like, in cinema-verite scenes, one learns a great deal not only about 
Vilanch but also about several of his performer-friends. There are 
tidbits that inform you about those persons, as well as Bruce, and 
that make them all  more understandable. They also reveal the 
mechanisms behind the funny stuff.
In a few cases this gets a bit tiresome, notably when Robin Williams 
keeps appearing and being funny, or so he thinks. But by and large -- 
as in the case of the parceled out interview of Bruce's vivacious, 
scene-stealing adoptive Jewish mother --there is lively light shed on 
the speaker as well as on Vilanch. Or take the sessions in which 
frequent Oscar-host Billy Crystal sits down with Bruce and both get 
into the technicalities of what was done, changed or eliminated in 
the Motion Picture Academy's annual event -- which is discussed as 
the "nec plus ultra", as something like the Olympic Games of live 
appearances.
Vilanch does not merely provide jokes. He tailor-makes, very 
cleverly, to the style and the personality of personalities, so that 
we, the public, easily believe that the one-liners and others 
originate with the performers. In addition, Vilanch also coaches the 
performers with precision, skill and a vast knowledge of what works 
and what does not, from gestures to looks, from hair to toes, from 
dressing to walking, and much more.
In addition to the above addition, Bruce himself is a first-rate 
performer. We see him doing his shticks more than once in this 
not-flagging, fast-paced, even frantic assemblage of scenes and 
sequences. The man is a joke factory, which, if listed on the stock 
market, would keep paying high dividends to shareholders.
Vilanch, a gay man, has done a great deal of good work for the cause 
of Gay Liberation and AIDS.
Just about the only non-comic moment in this documentary is when he 
becomes lachrymose during an AIDS benefit.
Among the miscellaneous revelations in the documentary is that Bruce 
originated the famous appearance of then Whoopi's paramour Ted 
Danson, in an affair where Danson was in blackface. This created a 
controversy. My position is that the event was in bad taste, but what 
really shocked me was to hear Whoopi say that something  or other was 
"about Ted and I." So much for the literacy and grammar of 
"celebrities."
"Get Bruce" is a most entertaining ninety minutes . You laugh a lot 
and learn a lot. But do bear in mind that this work is neither about 
humor (both in its narrow and wide definitions) nor about wit. Oscar 
Wilde or even Noel Coward are light-years away. Gags, jokes  and 
ephemeral one-liners are its mainstay and reign supreme.

Title
Review for Pollock (2000)
POLLOCK (2000) ***  Directed by Ed Harris. Written by Barbara Turner 
and Susan J. Emschwiller, based on the book "Jackson Pollock: An 
American Saga" by Steven Naifeh & Gregory White Smith. Photography, 
Lisa Rinzler.  Editing, Kathryn Himoff. Production design, Mark 
Friedberg. Music, Jeff Beal, Dondi Bastone. Produced by Fred Berner, 
Ed Harris, Jon Kilik, James Francis Trezza.  Cast: Ed Harris (Jackson 
Pollock), Marcia Gay Harden (Lee Krasner), Jennifer Connelly (Ruth 
Kligman), Tom Bower (Dan Miller), Bud Cort (Howard Putzel), John 
Heard (Tony Smith), Val Kilmer (Willem de Kooning), Robert Knott 
(Sande Pollock), Amy Madigan (Peggy Guggenheim), Matthew Sussman 
(Reuben Kadish), Stephanie Seymour (Helen Frankenthaler) Jeffrey 
Tambor (Clement Greenberg), Sada Thompson (Stella Pollock), Norbert 
Weisser (Hans Namuth). A  Sony  Classics release. 117 minutes. Not 
rated.
I bet that if one were to ask the person-in-the street in any country 
to name some famous American painters, the answer would be "Andy 
Warhol" (1938-1987) and "Jackson Pollock," (1912-1956), most likely 
in that order. That's assuming that there would be an answer.
Those two artists were mega-stars in their day, but memory shrinks 
faster and faster; the past fades, and, most ironically, 
information,  while increasingly available in this Information Age, 
is seldom correctly digested.  (This state of things has its own 
logic, but that's another story).
Pollock went through several artistic phases. He was initially a 
figurative artist  (after studying with Thomas Hart Benton); then a 
semi-abstractionist; a surrealist; an major abstract expressionist; 
and more. (I am simplifying his complex and complicated career). The 
thread that runs through most of his stages is that the unconscious 
is the source of inspiration.
Starting in 1947 he innovated totally with "drip" painting which made 
him famous in many circles. In 1949 he was consecrated by a Life 
Magazine issue headlined by "Is he the greatest living painter in the 
United States?" Stardom and world-wide celebrity followed, as well as 
derision in certain quarters, including some artistic ones. He had 
exactly seven years left in his life.
Pollock was also an alcoholic and a manic-depressive who went through 
hospitalization and several psychoanalytic therapy sessions.
The admirable, versatile Ed Harris directs here his very first movie. 
When he read the 1991 Pulitzer Prize winner biography of Pollock by 
Steven Naifeh and Gregory White Smith, he became obsessed with 
turning it into a film. After more than a decade of planning, raising 
funds, going through the usual Odyssey that is the fate of many a 
non-moronic project. He was so influenced by Pollock's work that he 
started to paint.  Harris came up with a winner. Not the kind that 
pack in audiences and get showered by enough dollars to make  Brinks 
truck sag. --unless one believes in miracles--gets a large audiences 
and dollars that might make a Brinks truck sag. Not the  conveniently 
arranged,  fanciful biography genre that Hollywood calls "a biopic." 
Not a systematic, documentary or educational analysis. But a 
selective recreation of the life and times and above all the art of 
Jackson Pollock.
A flashforward of the now successful Pollock in 1950 leads back to 
the early 1940s. In convincingly recreated Greenwich Village, he 
lives and works in a modest apartment. There, Lee Krasner  who also 
lives and works in the area, suddenly appears to look at his 
work--and have a look at the painter too. Lee, also an artist, falls 
in love with the paintings, and with the man.
She becomes his advisor, companion and unofficial agent. I am 
reminded of Roman mythology's nymph Egeria who counseled King Numa 
Pompilius.  Pollock however is no king, and needs help from the 
artistic Establishment. Lee knows the ropes. She arranges a visit by 
Howard Putzel. He is fat, pleasant man, played by a totally 
unrecognizable Bud Cort.
Cort who will forever be in movie mythology as the suicidal young man 
who loves ever-young (at 79) Ruth Gordon in the now classic "Harold 
and Maude" (1972). And in 1970 he was in two Robert Altman cult 
movies, "MASH" and  "Brewster McCloud" in which he is Brewster who 
wants to fly inside the Houston Astrodome.
I wonder if the very good choice of Cort is not also a devious homage 
to Robert Altman who made "Vincent & Theo" (1990) one of the very 
best movies about a painter (Van Gogh), along with Maurice Pialat's 
"Van Gogh"(France, 1991).
Putzel is the talent spotter for millionaire art patron, collector 
and gallery-owner Peggy Guggenheim (the niece of Solomon G, She is 
played by Amy Madigan who is Harris' wife)  Peggy G. is a ball of 
fire. She may kvetch, she may think highly of herself ( in capital 
letters, as it were), but she unlocks the door to glory after seeing 
what Pollock can do. The film intimates that without the two women, 
Lee and Peggy, Pollock may not have made it. A cruciall and enjoyable 
sequence has Howard Putzel taking Ms. Guggenheim to see Pollock's 
works in the man's digs. After climbing several floors they find no 
one there. Jackson and Lee duo arrive late, when the visitors have 
returned to street level. Tenacious Lee has to push (metaphorically) 
peeved Peggy back upstairs.
The visit is the colorful start of success for Jackson. I'll skip 
details, except that later, at a reception in Peggy's luxurious 
dwelling, the inebriated fellow urinates on the burning logs in the 
fireplace, then has sex with Peggy. The act is not shown.(One wonders 
what the laws are about defamation of character -- even when the 
facts are true).
Lee proposes. She and Jackson marry. Later they move to a farmhouse 
in East Hampton, Long Island --where the movie's exteriors were shot. 
The in-film  chronology can be muddy at times. My clue to the effect 
that the move away from New York came after the war was provided by 
newly settled Pollock's first visit to a rural grocery. There, the 
owner mentions the splitting of the atom as well as the A-bomb. It's 
the script's gauche.way of orienting the audience.
Life for Lee Krasner is no bed of roses. Not because of material 
problems that are there but do not come up in the dialogue, but 
because Pollock is a psychological mess,  drinks and cannot hold his 
liquor,  chain-smokes (but not a single cough is ever heard),  blows 
hot or cold according to the turns his mental illness takes. By and 
large,  except for a couple of scenes with his artist buddies, he is 
taciturn, moody, inarticulate. He may suddenly insult his guests or 
behave terribly with Lee, do both at the same time.
Lee 's suffering wife is a particularly sad case. A very good painter 
in her own right, she apparently has given up her own work, or at 
least effaced it before Jackson's.  Her main raison d'etre is an 
almost fanatical belief in the man's talent.
When he first saw her work he told her "You're a damn good woman 
painter" which today is like saying "Some of my best friends are 
Negroes." Setting aside considerations of evolving semantics, the 
fact is that Pollock meant it. Yet he scarcely shows any interest in, 
or make mentions of,  her career, talent or possibilities. His mental 
problems are no alibi for this.  But then it is blindingly clear that 
the man is totally art-focused and unaware of his own self. After 
all, his is not a unique case -- or even a very unusual one. Many 
people obsessed with their mission or with art or science or, or, or 
(a long list) have a kind of tunnel vision (and tunnel feelings?) of 
the world around them. There is logic in the mostly comic movie 
characters such as the absent-minded professors, the inventors with 
their heads in the clouds, the musicians who. away from their 
instrument reside in another planet.
I last saw Ed Harris giving a wondrously multi-layered performance in 
Agnieszka Holland's fascinating "The Third Miracle" (1999), a  film 
which, deplorably, I have heard no one mention to this day. . In 
"Pollock," Harris is very good again, he IS Pollock--and does all the 
paintings himself, down to the much-awaited, inevitable Big Scene, 
that of "discovering" dribble or spatter or drip painting.
Harris paintings remind me of Van Meegeren's Fake Vermeers that 
fooled many an expert..  There's not an original Pollock in  sight. 
It's impressive.
But while demanding, the Harris role is not an involving one.. The 
key to this was given way back by Gertrude Stein speaking about 
fictional characters.  I quote from memory:  :"I always prefer the 
normal to the abnormal. The normal is so much more complex and 
interesting"
Both Harris and Marcia Gay Harden were Oscar nominations, as they 
should have been. Their performances are of the cumulativr kind : you 
don't so much recall vividly this or that scene as you get an overall 
feeling.
The movie is beautifully but not "artsily" photographed. Blessedly, 
it eschews protracted scenes or sequences. It is also somewhat 
disjointed. It does give us an idea about the couple, far more about 
Pollock's painting process than about his "inner" self. But we cannot 
ask it to succeed where psychoanalysis obviously failed. The bottom 
line is that we, the audience, are, or shoud be, far more attentive 
to the paintings and their processes than to Jackson's mercurial 
behavior, his fits, his weirdnesses, or his calm moments.
The unloquacious Jackson's mind and soul are all in his work, period. 
A mini-series would  have fleshed out the period but could probably 
not take Jackson any farther. ( And it would certainly be a 
commercial fiasco.)
Relatives and friends do come and go as if they were on short subway 
rides and not for the whole trip. The first place goes to the 
influential art critic Clement Greenberg who championed and helped 
Pollock, yet was later critical of his work. He is played by Jeffrey 
Tambor, unusually changed and aged since his terrific Hank in "The 
Larry Sanders Show."
Most other characters make short, lightweight appearances, including 
Val Kilmer who shows twice in the walk-on (better, the sit-on) part 
of Willem de Kooning, Pollock's friend as well as his main rival.
A note for cinephiles.  Co-scriptwriter Susan J. Emschwiller is the 
daughter of Ed Emschwiller who made his mark as an important 
avant-gardist during the glory days of Underground cinema.
Movie reviews by Edwin Jahiel are at : http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel 

Title
Review for Love Affair (1939)
     One of Hollywood's best romances.  It created a memorable couple
(Charles Boyer, Irene Dunne) who perform superbly.  Character actress
Maria Ouspenskaya too has one of the top old lady roles ever filmed.
     A shipboard romance later turns into near catastrophe through
misunderstandings and an accident.  Humor and pathos mix, separate,
re-mix, in this smooth but un-slick, carefully crafted but not
artificial, moving but un-hokey gem, enhanced by the beautiful old
French song "Plaisir d'Amour."
     The same director remade his own film in 1957 as "An Affair to
Remember," with Cary Grant and Deborah Kerr and a nice, sentimental
song. This version became recently popular again after it was "quoted"
in "Sleepless in Seattle."  It is fine but the earlier movie is
unbeatable. Then came the third edition, the 1994 "Love Affair" with
Warren Beatty and Annette Bening - a fiasco, which, if anything, makes
the original look even better, not that it needs any help.

Title
Review for Flirting with Disaster (1996)
FLIRTING WITH DISASTER ** 1/2 Written and directed by David O. 
Russell. Photography, Eric Edwards. Editing Christopher 
Tellefsen. Production design, Kevin Thompson. Music, Stephen 
Endelman. Cast: Ben Stiller (Mel Coplin), Patricia Arquette 
(Nancy Coplin), Tea Leoni (Tina Kalb), Mary Tyler Moore (Mrs. 
Coplin), George Segal (Coplin), Alan Alda (Richard 
Schlicting), Lily Tomlin (Mary Schlicting), Josh Brolin 
(Tony), Richard Jenkins (Paul), CeliaWeston (Valerie) , et al. 
A Miramax release. 91 minutes. Rated R (language, sexual 
situations, substance use) 
The first feature by David O. Russell, the low budget 
"Spanking the Monkey," was daringly original. It made the 
writer-director more than just promising, which is something 
that new filmmakers have to live up to, especially as there is 
generally a kind of curse attached to second features. 
In Russell's case, the funny "Flirting With Disaster" is no 
comedown,even though the film is neither daring nor a minor 
landmark.It is clever without brilliance or depth, it is 
inventive without originality.  
"FLT" is a road movie of sorts. Not quite an odyssey as it has 
only three way-stations. Following a zippy montage, we meet 
Mel Coplin (Stiller), about 30, in an adoption agency. 
Entomologist Mel, the beloved and loving adopted son of a New 
York Jewish couple (Moore and Segal), is married to sweet 
Nancy (Arquette). They have a first baby who remains unnamed 
for an outlandish time, partly because Mel is in the throes of 
a pre-midlife crisis. 
Has this been brewing for some time or is it sudden? The film, 
not exactly a profound study of characters, tells us nothing. 
We are simply shown a confused Mel who feels that his identity 
will never be complete so long as he does not learn who and 
what his natural parents are.  
Working in an adoption agency, Tina Kalb (Leoni), a beautiful 
long-legged ex-dancer now on the brink of divorce and, 
perhaps, a Ph.D. in psychology, delivers the goods. "Your 
mother lives in San Diego. Let's go." Tina wants to include 
herself and her camcorder as part of her academic research.  
The quartet drives west, is reunited with a caricatural, 
multi-wedded Southern belle. She looks nothing like Mel, is a 
devout Reaganite ("he was a great friend") and the mother of 
gorgeously vacuous beach bimbo twins. Through a mixup in 
Tina's files, the lady turns out to be the wrong person. I 
give away nothing as the audience had guessed this all along. 
The episode is amusing, has good farce, almost hilarious 
dialogue and changes of behavior. Contrite Tina, whom Mel is 
attracted to, is now sure she has located the right parents. 
>From the San Diegan sun, the foursome treks to snow and slush, 
Gerald Ford-loving Michigan. The new candidate is an 
improbable father, a low-life type. Diagnosing Mel's "Jew 
nose," he forwards him to New Mexico, but not before a fracas 
that involves a couple (in both senses) of Alcohol, Tobacco & 
Firearms officers. 
Paul is gay with some neuroses. Tony is bisexual. As movie 
luck would have it he had gone to school with Nancy, now 
desires her and also feels the need to have a baby. The 
quartet grows to a sextet as the two men, none too credibly, 
go with the Coplins -- as vacationers, not professional 
sleuths.
Episode Three leads to Antelope Springs, N.M. and the real 
McCoys, the Schlictings (Tomlin and Alda) and their sullen, 
weirdo son. This, the journey's decisive leg, turns out to be 
an acid trip for some. 
The Schlictings are unreconstructed old acidheads, 
anachronistic hippies who in the Sixties were jailed for 
making LSD. They are are now "artists" who live from their 
awful work, "with supplements from other things." In a film 
that keeps announcing its moves, you can guess that what they 
fabricate in their basement is not Christmas seals. (Major 
laughter is produced when Tina lights up and Alan Alda stops 
her with "This is a non-smoking house.")
There is some lust in the film (Mel and Tina, Tony and Nancy) 
but this pales before the catalogue of references to body 
parts. It begins as Patricia Arquette primps most intimately 
for her husband; then Mary Tyler Moore briefly shows her 
bra-clad breasts (actually nothing risque); it continues with 
legs, calves, noses, male organs, more breasts...
It's rather systematic, as is the movie's development. The 
plumbing of characters is sacrificed to broad gags. You laugh 
allright but the movie's creatures are not really attaching, 
likable or interesting. Eventually they get a bit  tiresome, 
along with the plot's cliched mixups of humans, cars, keys and 
other objects.
Writer-director Russsell is no Preston Sturges or Woody Allen, 
although,  vaguely like Woody, he tries to exploit Jewishness 
vs. Goyishness.  The Coplins (especially Mary Tyler Moore), 
Tina, the two lawmen are more neurotic than dysfunctional, 
while the Schlictings (except the son) are in harmony with 
their kookiness. All actors deliver OK performances in their 
limited-scale roles. 
Do not look for ambitious thoughts, not even the old notion 
that the blue bird of happiness is found at home or next door. 
This is first and last a machinery for screwball farce. It's a 
pleasant enough work, with the added bonus of deserving 
inclusion in the BBNMM Society's roster (that's Bring Back the 
Ninety Minute Movie).  

Title
Review for Out to Sea (1997)
OUT TO SEA ** 1/2. Directed by Martha Coolidge. Written by Robert Nelson
Jacobs. Photography, Lajos Koltai. Editing,  Anne V. Coates,  production
design, James Spencer; art direction, William F. Matthews. Choreography,
Kim Blank. Music, David Newman . Cast:  Jack Lemmon, Walter Matthau ,Dyan
Cannon, Gloria DeHaven, Brent Spiner, Elaine Stritch, Hal Linden, Donald
O'Connor, Edward Mulhare, Rue McClanahan. A 20th Century Fox release. 109
min. PG-13.
The epithet "extraordinary" can  mean " extremely good" or "most unusual."
Jack Lemmon and Walter Matthau can be both. Whether working solo or as a
team, they have brought idiosyncratic talents to a variety of roles, from
farcical to dead serious. Both  actors have also been able to rescue minor
flicks, or to interest us in characters that essentially reprise the
performers' familiar shticks. It happens again in Out to Sea, the eighth
screen pairing of Lemmon and Matthau.
Lemmon, a former long-time salesman at Gimbel's department store and for
many decades happily married to (his words) a perfect wife, Matthau's
sister. Her death devastated Lemmon. Years later he is still obsessed with
the dear departed. His good buddy Matthau keeps telling him to buck up,
while regularly borrowing money from him .Lemmon disapproves of his
brother-in-law, yet the two are friends. This is nothing like the formula
of antagonism in  Grumpy Old Men.
Matthau, unemployed,  probably never did an honest day's work. He lives off
schemes seldom specified but -- here at least --  dependent on dangerous
loan sharks. To call him a scam artist might be going too far. Still, he
somehow maneuvers reluctant Lemmon into joining him in a 10-day cruise on
the beautiful cruise ship Westerdam.
After the ignominy of flying to port in cattle class (economy) comes
ignominy Number Two when Matthau reveals to his pal that he had signed up
both of them as dance hosts  (male). Ignominy Three is that their cabin is
the equivalent of modern steerage.
Matthau's general plan is to live it up with rich dames and do some
fortune-hunting. I have been on great Transatlantic liners but never on a
cruise, so that I really cannot pass on the authenticity of the ship's
travelers and such. F or that matter, since I have never watched TV's  The
Love Boat, I can make no comparisons.  But the cruise ship is very well
photographed and feels convincingly realistic in a gaudy, Vegas-y way.
Customers are of many ages but the focus is on older women. It does this
with kindness, without caricatures, and with some mild irony that does not
go overboard.  Mature ladies are, of course, the logical partners for our
heroes, except that Matthau, who cannot dance, resorts to broad subterfuges
to avoid it.
This is not easy, as both men have been singled out by the martinet cruise
director Brent Spiner (he plays Data in Star Trek: The Next Generation), a
kind of sergeant in impeccable dinner jacket (he also sings nicely). Spiner
is good and amusing as  the semi-villain. He checks his dance hosts for
particles of dust,  crooked ties and the like. Above all, with the menace
od dire reprisals, he forbids fraternization with any woman after a dance
is finished.
His severity is motivated by his ambition to rise, at long last, in the
ranks of the shipping company. He warns our friends: " I'm your worst
nightmare, a song-and-dance man raised on a military base." Later Matthau
says of him :" I think his father was cruise director on the Bismarck."
Funny -- for those who know WW2 history.
Predictably, Matthau sets his sights on youthful Texas millionaire widow
Dyan Cannon, at a poker table. With unexpected talent for long-range
planning, he dreams up ploys to charm her and to discredit another suitor,
wealthy Edward Mulhare. Cannon is with her mother Elaine Stritch who plays
beautifully her limited role of  boozing, tart-tongued grande dame --Texas
style.
Lemmon does some nifty steps with eagerly funny women -- although the ace
terpsichorean  is Donald O'Connor, in a small, welcome return that one
might call dancing relief. Lemmon soon finds mutual attraction with 71-year
old widow and former book-editor Gloria DeHaven. She's no cruise fodder
but, at their insistance, she travels with her newly-married daughter and
son-in-law.
How, through  quid pro quos, disguises, slapstick and all, Matthau and
Lemmon will fare with their ladies while evading Spiner's strictures, is
the body of the movie. Lemmon , still haunted by thoughts of his wife, is
once again good in touching moments.
The plot is slight, the mechanisms, repartees and comments often deja vu,
yet the story is serviceable. In the audience I saw it with there was much
white hair, some audible familiarity with cruises, but also a good
sprinkling of youngish and young people. All laughed a great deal and were
oblivious to some tedious stretches.
I would not  disparage the film by calling it geriatric. In a nice twist,
the scenario plus Martha Coolidge's direction seem to have come up with a
work in praise of older women. Films have accustomed us to elderly leading
men . At this writing  (July 1997) Lemmon is almost 72 1/2,  Matthau close
to 77. What is really unusual is that Dyan Cannon is almost exactly 60 1/2
years old, Elaine Stritch 70 1/2,  and Gloria DeHaven very close to 73.
How old Rue McClanahan is (she plays Spiner's superior and evaluator) I
could not find. She too is one charming lady.
Actors such as Stritch are ageless because, not being glamor-pusses they
rely on acerbic spoken lines. Cannon is incredible, seems to be having a
ball, has a constantly amused expression in her twinkling eyes. More, she
is a sexy chick  whose figure, generously  displayed, could turn any male's
head and make 20- or 30-something women emerald-green with envy. Even with
plastic surgery, personal  trainers and dietitians, the Cannon Case is
astounding.
Gloria DeHaven, once popular in breezy films (mostly in second female
leads), had  disappeared from the screen since the mid-Fifties. She
resurfaced briefly in mid-Seventies in a few films (mostly bad and made for
TV) some of which went unreleased for years. Here she does beautifully as a
lovely older woman who, like her co-performers, ought to shame the studios
for not daring to put Golden Agers in solid, even main roles. If the movies
are good, the public of most grownups will surely accept senior citizens on
the screen, whether audiences see suh films in addition to ort as
replacement of many pictures with action, special effects, teens, bimbos
and macho hulks. As Matthau tells reluctant-to-commit Lemmon "You're crazy.
Years of insanity have made you crazy. There's no such thing as too late.
That's why they invented death."
"Out to Sea" is no great comedy or farce, not even a really good one, but
not a bad one either. It has some good twists, is  unpretentious,
light-hearted,  innocuously charming, and with enough laughs to make it a
pleasant diversion.

Title
Review for Mitt liv som hund (1985)
(MITT LIV SOM HUND)
(Sweden, 1985)
*** 3/4
Directed by Lasse Hallstrom.
Written by Hallstrom, Brasse Brannstrom, Pelle Berglund, Reidar Jonsson.
Based on Jonsson's novel.
Photography, Jorgen Persson, Rolf Lindstrom.
Production design, Lasse Westfelt.
Editing, Suzanne Linnman, Christer Furubrand.
Music, Bjorn Isfalt.
Cast: Anton Glanzelius, Anki Kiden, Tomas von Bromssen, Manfred Serner,
      Melinda Kinnaman, Ing-Marie Carlsson, Kicki Rundren, Lennart Hjulstrom,
      Leif Ericson, Christina Carlwind, et al.
A Svensk Filmindustri Film, distributed by Skouras Films.
In Swedish with subtitles.
100 minutes. 
Rated PG.
     Movies about children can be made in four basic ways.  The first
is one of unabashed fantasy, without any pretensions to realism.  It
can yield very pleasing results, as in the Shirley Temple movies.
     The second way is that of the adults who exploit the kids' image,
and with premeditation try to con the public into believing that this
is how it really is.  Such films are false, but their lowest common
denominator formulas often work well with the mass public, including
the youthful public.  There are many such movies.
     The third approach is better intentioned, as the filmmakers kid
themselves that their depiction is genuine.  The fourth way is to make
the film as close and as faithful as possible to the kids' point of
view.  Theoretically, there could be a fifth method: films made
strictly, entirely, by kids and from their own viewpoint.  This is an
impossibility, a cinematic oxymoron.  One would have to implant
recording devices into a child's eye and brain, as in some
science-fiction pictures.
     So, the very best we can hope for is approach number Four.  This
is the attitude that gave us classics like Jean Vigo's ZERO FOR CONDUCT
or Francois Truffaut's 400 BLOWS and a few more films.  You now can add
to this tiny group the Swedish MY LIFE AS A DOG.
     Director Lasse  Hallstrom made his first movie at age ten, (with
his father's Super 8), the 3-minute "The Ghost Thief."  He went on
filming in high school, sold "Mascots" (about a music group) to TV
before graduating, became a freelance TV maker of short, funny
sketches.
     In the1970s, under contract to television, he made four rather
autobiographical series, including "Shall We Go Home to my Place or
your Place or Each One of Us to Our Own Place?"  The head of production
at the Swedish Film Institute found it funny, suggested that Hallstrom
make a film feature on the theme of "boy meets girl."
     That was A LOVER AND HIS LASS, followed by other features, all
described by a Swedish critic as "tranquil comedies."  In 1985, with
his fifth feature, the different MY LIFE AS A DOG, which is tranquil
and not so tranquil, a comedy as well as a drama with elements of
tragedy, Hallstrom stepped onto a broader scene.  The movie was voted
Film of the Year in Sweden, and its young star, Best Actor.  It has
since become a major international success, receiving prizes in
several festivals and getting excellent attendance.  Recent statistics
in the U.S.A. have it high on the box-office list, ahead of any other
current foreign film.
     MY LIFE AS A DOG, loosely adapted from a 1983 novel, treats in a
series of well-connected, smoothly flowing episodes, a period of about
a year in the life of a twelve-year old boy.  It is 1959, the year when
Swedish boxer Ingemar Johansson defeated world champion Floyd
Patterson.  The boy is also called Ingemar Johansson, and he too will
have to fight his way into growth.  His absentee father is out at sea,
somewhere in the Equator.  We never see him.  Ingemar is a private
boy, secret though not secretive.  He does not pass judgment on his
father or discuss him--or anyone or anything else for that matter--in
the orderly, narrative, cause-to-effect fashion of adults.  When asked,
he replies that father is loading bananas, and if he left, who would
load them?
     Ingemar lives with his older brother and his mother, a book-lover
terminally ill with tuberculosis.  The relationship among the three is
warm, understanding and attractive, in spite of some downs.  The boys
do their childish best to help with the chores, often with comically
catastrophic results.  Sibling rivalry, Ingemar's sub-teen high spirits
and awkwardness result in mischief and accidents that frequently
involve the elements, from water (Ingemar wets his bed) to fire (he
starts one by the beach).  There is an echo here of Truffaut movies
(THE 400 BLOWS, SMALL CHANGE) both in the details and in the way
the mishaps are treated matter-of-factly, humorously, elliptically,
without elaboration.
     The sick mother now and then goes into understandable fits of
rage.  When her condition worsens, the brothers are sent away to
different places for the summer.  Ingemar, separated from his dog, goes
to his uncle's house, in a small, provincial, unpaved nowheretown where
time seems to have stood still for decades.  The uncle, a married,
peasantish, kindly bon vivant, treats the boy like a pal, becomes a
bit--but not entirely--a surrogate father to him.
     Uncle works in a glassworks where old-fashioned methods are still
used.  Through him Ingemar meets a collection of oddballs and
eccentrics that could easily have become too picturesque or corny, were
it not for the film's ability to stop in time and to avoid
heavy-handedness.  He meets Saga, the best player in the soccer team
and the best boxer around.  Saga turns out to be a pretty tomboy who
despairs at her burgeoning breasts that will interfere with
athletics.  At the same time, attraction for Ingemar burgeons too.
     There is old, bedridden Mr.Sandberg, whose end is near but who
hides the equivalent of a Sears catalogue and almost swoons when he has
Ingemar read him the text that describes women's underwear.  There is
glassblower Berit, a sweet woman who looks like a younger Ellen Burstyn
and whose voluptuous figure is desired by all.  She brings out more
troubled, nascent sexuality in Ingemar when she has him accompany her
to a sculptor's where Ingemar must wait and not peek while she poses in
the nude.  On the whole, it is a good summer for Ingemar.
     After the boy's return home, his mother dies.  He is sent back to
the small town for good.  Following a short, painful period of
adjustment, he takes the step into adulthood, just as his namesake
triumphs in the boxing ring.
     We forget how marvelous it can be for a youngster to discover
that the most ordinary days can be filled with revelations and
discoveries.  In every episode, Ingemar lives the growing pains,
confusions and joys of coming of age.  He is a sober kid of few words.
He makes up for this with introspection.  His stream of
consciousness punctuates the film.  Whenever Ingemar is particularly
confused or sorrowful, the movie cuts to a star-studded sky and we hear
the boy's thoughts.
     Ingemar is a collector of odd facts, mostly about accidents
through which he ponders the mysteries of life and fate.  He thinks of
a train and bus collision that left five dead and fourteen wounded; of
an Evel Knievel-type daredevil motorcyclist who perished as he was
trying to jump over 31 barrels (" if there had been only 30, he would
have cleared them"); of an athlete in a stadium who was transfixed by
another's javelin throw.
     Ingemar talks to himself the way characters in the films of Godard
tell each other trivia and anecdotes, seemingly irrelevant but in
reality meaningful.  The meaning for Ingemar is that, after all, his
tribulations are minor: in relative terms he's not so badly off.
     Throughout, his constant, his leitmotif, is the story of Laika,
the dog that the Soviets sent into space and left to die among the
stars.  The boy identifies with Laika as well as with his own, absent
dog.  When particularly perplexed or annoyed, he gets down on all fours
and barks.
     Among the charms of MY LIFE AS A DOG is that it is sensitive
without being distancing, outlandish and cute (His Life) ; or familiar
to most viewers and maudlin (Our Life); or full of manufactured
surprises (This is Your Life).
     The cast is perfect.  Anton Glanzelius (Ingemar), is a homely
child with the kind of face that at first glance seems more appropriate
for The Dead End Kids or Our Gang.  Yet he gets to you within minutes
as his deep-set eyes prove what Ingmar Bergman said, that the eyes are
the mirror of the soul.  Glanzelius can convey an amazing range of
feelings through tiny changes of expression and body language.  His is
an Oscar-worthy performance.
     Script and direction introduce superb little details, visual and
behavioral (Ingemar takes out his alienation by chasing a potato around
his plate) or aural (the transition of sound from a vacuum cleaner to a
car engine).  Director Hallstrom's techniques--indirect, lovingly
ironical, elliptically humorous, based on razor-sharp observation--are
good enough to make you wish to see his other films.  Hallstrom's
approach is the closest thing to the methods of master filmmakers like
the Czech (now American) Milos Forman ("The Firemen's Ball"), that
other Czech Jiri Menzel ("My Sweet Little Village") or those of the
better, bittersweet Yugoslav movies.
Written febr 8 1988 Polished up late Nov. 1995 

Title
Review for Henry V (1989)
HENRY V (UK, 1989) **** Directed by Kenneth Branagh . Shakespeare's play
adapted by Branagh. Cinematography, Kenneth MacMillan. Editing, Michael
Bradsell. Production Design, Tim Harvey. Costumes, Phyllis Dalton. Music,
Patrick Doyle.
Cast:  Derek Jacobi (Chorus); Kenneth Branagh (Henry V), Simon Sheperd
(Gloucester), James Larkin (Bedford), Brian Blessed (Exeter), James Simmons
(York), Charles Kay (Canterbury), Alec McCowen (Ely),  Fabian Cartwright
(Cambridge), Stephen Simms (Scroop), Jay Villiers (Grey), Edward Jewesbury
( Erpingham), Ian Holm  (Fluellen)  Daniel Webb (Gower), Jimmy Yuill
(Jamy), John Sessions (Macmorris). Shaun Prendergast (Bates), Patrick Doyle
(Court), Michael Williams (Williams), Richard Briers ( Bardolph),  Geoffrey
Hutchings ( Nym), Robert Stephens (Pistol), Robbie Coltrane (Falstaff),
Christian Bale (Boy), Judi Dench (Mistress Quickly), Paul Scofield
(French King), Michael Maloney ( Dauphin), Harold Innocent (Burgundy),
Richard Clifford (Orleans), Colin Hurley (Grandpre), Richard Easton
(Constable), Christopher  Ravenscroft (Mountjoy), Emma Thompson
(Katherine), Geraldine McEwan (Alice). David Lloyd Meredith (Governor of
Harfleur), David Parfitt  (Messenger), Nicholas Ferguson (Warwick), Tom
Whitehouse (Talbot), Nigel Greaves (Berri), Julian Gartside (Bretagne), et
al.
Produced by Stephen Evans  (executive), David Parfitt  (associate),  Bruce
Sharman. A Samuel Goldwyn release. 138 minutes. PG-13.
The first film directed by Laurence Olivier, at age 36,  was HENRY V
(1944). It was and still is a triumph, a yardstick of cinematic excellence.
The first film directed by Kenneth Branagh, at age 28, has five hard
Shakesperean acts to follow.
In both movies the directors  played the title role. Both films are of the
same length. Comparisons are unfair because Branagh did not set out to
remake Olivier but to present us with something entirely different.
Comparisons, nonetheless, are inevitable.
Olivier's HENRY, made (incredibly) in wartime, was a paean to English
fortitude, a  proud, rousing booster of the spirits of the embattled
British. It was also a poetic, stylized work with  many sunny images right
out of The Book of Hours of the Duke of Berry.
Branagh's version has a somewhat revisionist and naturalistic approach , a
much darker view --psychologically and visually. It is the product of a
modern anti-war sensibility, though not entirely so, since the negative
view of fighting is at the same time a celebration.
Olivier looked and sounded  patrician, and moved with supple grace. Branagh
has a proletarian's stockiness and a glamorless potato face. There are
moments when you may think you are watching a British pop musician who is
also a great actor.
Branagh and most of his companions  --a Who's Who of British
talent--deliver splendidly intense performances. So intense that
Shakespeare's scene-closing couplets become here thunderous conclusions, as
opposed to Olivier's gentler introductions.
The difficulty for Branagh must have been that he wanted both to impose his
vision and avoid any duplication of Olivier, even if he found in Olivier
elements that coincided with his own.
Both men made cuts in the text. Chorus, in Olivier's prologue, stuck to
Shakespeare, with imaginative staging. Branagh's trick is to set his Chorus
(Derek Jacobi) in an empty sound-stage. He fiddles with the lines and
Jacobi's commentator throughout the play has tones of Brechtian
distanciation. But then, to give cinematic specificity to his work, Branagh
goes all out for close-ups of faces, unrelenting, pervasive, sometimes
suffocating shots where the large screen is filled with visages, often from
hairline to chin cleft.  The huge heads interfere with the language and
oddly reduce the distanciation effect.
Branagh's intention was to show a young monarch burdened with the guilt of
his crown-seizing father, establishing closer relations with his people and
maturing to grand leadership. This aim is reached and Henry's progress is
clear.
But audiences unfamiliar with Shakespeare will not quite grasp the
significance of Henry's lineage or  Prince Hal's abandonment of Falstaff,
shown  in a flashback from HENRY IV. Paradoxically though, this is the
point where the film hits its first private, emotional peak.
Olivier, in the trying times of World War II England, eliminated most
references to the islanders as vengeful patriots. Branagh retains many, and
, in the modern, respect-your-enemy way, transforms Olivier's foppy French
into worthy adversaries, especially the Dauphin who underestimates England
("She is so idly kinged" ) and  Paul Scofield's mesmerizing, thoughtful,
sad King Charles. Scofield transforms prose into poetry, as does the
Hostess (Judi Dench) in her gut-wrenching account of Falstaff's death, as
does much of the cast.
The major  exception is in the "funny" or romantic scenes of French
princess Katharine learning  English and, at play's end, being courted by a
"Kiss Me Kate " Henry. Emma Thompson (Branagh's wife at the time) speaks
atrocious French .
Henry's nocturnal peregrinations in his camp, and the famous speeches like
the St. Crispin exhortation are state- of- the- art. But the battle of
Agincourt  is muddled, small-scale (for budgetary reasons), does not
explain the role of the English spikes and long bows with which  the
immensely outnumbered English  defeated the French horsemen who wore
cumbersome suits of armor.
The battle though a fairly somber sight, does not go far enough in its
blood and guts. This and the slow-motion photography cry out for a Sam
Peckinpah.
Even so, the Bard's sublime language is beautifully served throughout, the
players are humanized as much as possible, the first-time direction is
impressive.Notwithstanding some objections, this HENRY V is a top-notch
film.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
AS GOOD AS IT GETS ***1/4 . Directed by James L. Brooks. Written by Brooks
and Mark Andrus from a story by Andrus.   Photography, John Bailey.
Editing, Richard Marks. Production design, Bill Brzeski. Produced by James
L. Brooks, Kristi Zea and Bridget Johnson. Cast: Jack Nicholson, Helen
Hunt, Greg Kinnear, Cuba Gooding, Jr., Skeet Ulrich, Shirley Knight, et al.
.A TriStar release. 132 minutes . PG-13.
BREAKING NEWS: This movie has swept the Golden Globes Awards in the musical
or comedy category: Best picture. Best actor (Jack Nicholson). Best actress
(Helen Hunt)
Now playing, the shaggy dog film "Wag the Dog" is dogless. Also playing is
"As Good as It Gets" in which a real shaggy dog -- a rare Brussels
Griffon--steals scenes and becomes the agent of major changes. Its name is
Verdell, which I first took for "Fidel," which  made me expect a partly
political film, which it isn't. Fitting no pigeonhole category, it comes
closest to a socio-psychological comedy-drama.
"As Good" also stars Jack Nicholson, in top para-Satanic and aggressive
form, circumflex eyebrows, hooded eyes ranking with the best (Victor
Mature's, Bob Mitchum's), incongruous tan for a New Yorker (but no one yet
has ever been able to challenge the deep bronzing of Douglas Fairbanks, Sr)
and his bag of eccentricities at an apex.
The movie has both originality and well-crafted, deja-filmed mainstream
appeal. Peripherally, it is  a distant variant on Beauty and the Beast, the
Taming of the Shrew (with sexes reversed). Centrally, it is  a showcase for
the talents of Nicholson and Helen Hunt.
Melvin Udall (Nicholson) is a misanthropic, bilious, hypochondriac,
reclusive mega-nut. His manias include always washing with a fresh cake of
soap; walking to the same restaurant daily at 11 am for a giga-cholesterol
breakfast at "his" table served by "his" waitress; bringing his own plastic
knives and forks; wearing disposable surgical gloves; avoiding brushing
against people or stepping on sidewalk cracks. All of this, plus more
quirks, is apparently explained by his suffering from obsessive-compulsive
disorder.
That's bad enough, but Melvin is a pain in every other way too. He's a
champion people-insulter and, among other lovely traits, homophobic,
African-American-fearing, and a Jew-and-everybody-else Equal Opportunity
hater. This includes animals. The action begins with Mel (who probably
hates his parents for his name) throwing his neighbor's beloved pooch
Verdell down the laundry chute.
The neighbor, Simon (Kinnear) is a successful painter, whose art dealer
friend is a classy African-American named with originality Frank Sachs
(Gooding). Both are gay, but not that you could tell. The other major
"dramatis persona" is Carol (Hunt),  Mel's habitual, suffering, and
onlywaitress acceptable to Mel at the restaurant. She is a single mother
with a dangerously asthmatic boy, lives with him her mother (Knight) in
far-off Brooklyn, trudging to and fro exhausted by her waitressing and her
motherly duties.
When Simon is brutally beaten up by invading, thieving street hoods, and
taken to the hospital, Frank sticks Mel with the dog in a way that Mel
cannot refuse. Predictably, grudgingly (and unconvincingly), the writer and
the canine fall for each other. Did I say "writer"? Yes, that's what Mel
does for a living, composing romances for female readership and making lots
of money from his 62 or so purple-prose novels. The contrast between his
profession and his character is absurd, rates an F for credibility. Mel
explains his knowing portrayals of women by :"I think of a man, then I take
away reason and accountability." This adds gynecophobia to the list, makes
us think of Mel as a virgin (??!!) and simply won't wash.
Upon his return from the hospital, Simon finds himself broke: he has no
health insurance (a real tragedy for so many self-employed), his medical
bill is over $60,000, his art has been vandalized, his will to paint has
vanished, he is losing his apartment. But look what  animal companionship
can do for people! Increasingly human and humane Mel comes to the rescue.
And by some intricate plot devices, he also delivers Carol and her son from
the evil of uncaring doctors and medical bills. It's artificial plotting
but while you are watching it, it is also warm, lovely and well-acted. All
the while, of course, Mel is falling for Carol. But the New Mel dies hard.
When he introduces his friends to one another he says:" Carol the waitress.
Simon the fag." I'll stop here.
NIcholson, in spite of his improbable role, is Nicholson, meaning as good
as ever, even better perhaps. No surprise here. The real  revelation is
Helen Hunt. I have never cared much for her flimsy, parts in TV's "Mad
About You," and while she has many more credits, too many of them were in
unmemorable productions. She was finally top-listed in her previous film
"Twister" (1996), but her role was pallid.
Now finally Helen Hunt has come into her own.  Without bravura or pointedly
dramatic or humorous scenes and repartees, without prettifying makeup or
sexy clothes, without scene-stealing episodes, Hunt does steal the whole
movie. In one of the most amazing transformations in recent cinema, she
makes palpable her struggle with life and conditions, her exhaustion as
waitress, caring mom, commuter and debtor in splendidly veristic ways.
We learn nothing about the father of her child, or for that matter about
the earlier Carol, yet she is three-dimensional both in her sadness,
depression, lack of men in her life as well as in her moments of humor and
happiness. Cannily, the script adds rounding off Carol through a
funny-turning-unfunny interlude with a lover who vanishes.
Aged beyond her 34 years , not especially pretty by ordinary standards, she
is enormously likable, appealing, real and, yes, even sexy. She also
strikes very believably at HMOs and the medical profession, though the
"deus ex machina" introduction of a wise, wonderful doctor restores some
balance. Yet, what with Simon's lack of insurance, a strong case is made
against our health system.
Multiple Oscar-winning writer-director-producer Brooks had previously
directed "Terms of Endearment," "Broadcast News" and the notorious "I'll Do
Anything," which, filmed as a musical, failed in previews and had to come
out as a non-musical. Even so, the latter is my favorite Brooks movie,
partly because of its superb direction of actors. Now Brooks repeats his
tour-de-force with Helen Hunt. No matter how iffy the tale, the
performances make it a winner.

Title
Review for Bride of Chucky (1998)
BRIDE OF CHUCKY (1998) *  Directed by Ronnie Yu. Written by Don Mancini,
based on his original characters. Photography, Peter Pau. Editing, David
Wu, Randolph K. Bricker. Production design, Alicia Keywan. Art direction,
James McAteer. Puppet effects, Kevin Yagher. Music, Graeme Revell. Cast:
Jennifer Tilly (Tiffany - also the doll Tiffany's voice), Alexis Arquette
(Damien),  Katherine Heigl (Jade), Nick Stabile (Jesse), John Ritter (Chief
Warren Kincaid),  Brad Dourif (Voice of Chucky), et al.  A Universal
release. 89 minutes. R (violence, language, doll copulation)
"Child's Play," the original Chucky film, came out in 1988, was inventive
and scared large sections of its audiences. The sequels of 1990 and 1991
were near worthless. The fourth reincarnation of Chucky the killer doll
changes the title but not the junk.
Chucky was the transubstantiation of now defunct serial murderer Charles
Lee Ray who, as he lay dying, passed on his spirit (?) to an ordinary doll.
He also left behind his girlfriend Tiffany.
Tiffany, who gives a new meaning to "trailer trash," is a crude,
micro-skirted, chain-smoking dame painted like a wall of graffiti, and with
an enormous cleavage that threatens to explode. For years she's been
wanting her lover back. Now, as Chucky's bits and pieces are kept in a
police repository, the woman bribes a cop who steals the remnants-- and is
quickly terminated by Tiffany. She sets about to rebuild the whole Chucky.
Drawing the old, reliable mystical pentagram on the impossibly large floor
of her trailer, and going through mystical mumbo-jumbo and candle-lit
ceremonies, she reconstructs the doll.
She uses an instructions book, "Voodoo for Dummies." This sends an
immediate warning: version 4 will mix atrocities with jokes, gags, and
"funny" stuff.
The one-piece Chucky dispatches the creep Damien (get the name?), one of
Tiffany's lovers, as the latter is waiting in bed for sex with the lady. No
problem, because Tiffany, a Martha Stewart devotee, wants to marry, settle
down in a dream house, have kids... But Chucky spurns her.
One thing leading (don't ask) to another, Tiffany puts Chucky in a cage,
brings him a girl-doll, is electrocuted by Chucky but her spirit is
transferred to the other doll. The toy-couple bickers, exchanges barbs,
doesn't get along, but, take my word, will follow the cliche of "normal"
people: antagonism leading to love -- or at least, sex.
In another couple, the under-18 Jade is an orphan who lives with her uncle
Warren, the local Police Chief. Warren (who perhaps unconsciously lusts for
the girl), aided by his henchcops, puts all possible impediments between
her and her true love Jesse.
The dolls need to go to New Jersey, where there is, in a grave, an amulet
that can restore them to their human shape.Tiffany-the-person has already
availed herself of the services of her trailer-park neighbor Jesse. Now, as
Tiffany-the-doll (she has retained the T-woman's voice) she hires Jesse by
phone. For $1,000, he must deliver two dolls to Jersey. Jesse seizes the
opportunity to convince Jade to elope and start a new life with him. (A
little money goes a long way in the mind of the naive boy!)
The foursome's trip becomes a killing spree for the dolls, complete with
explosions, crashes, wrecks, you name it...
What really deserves a rapid death is the film itself. Some funny moments
do exist, but all in the context of mayhem, gore, destruction, ugliness
--it all feels like the product of a sick imagination that knows no bounds
in concocting disgusting scenes. I wondered what kind of public the movie
was directed at, and what the viewers' reactions were.
So I did a quick, small investigation. The personnel working at the theater
showing it was unanimously positive. "It's not great, but it's funny."
"It's for all audiences." "We kids, like that sort of thing." "It's for
teenagers." "It's for 20-24 year old people." "I'm 26 and I liked it."
"It's great fun." And more along those lines.
Now, I must say that I like good horror pictures, including the old German
silent classics, the Draculas and the Frankensteins, the Val Lewton
productions (The Cat People, I Walked with a Zombie, The Body Snatcher,
etc.), Rosemary's Baby... the list is large, and includes parodies such as
Love at First Bite. But I loathe bad horror, unintelligent horror for
dummies, horror that is essentially visual pornography.
The popularity of this last genre is disturbing. Not for moral reasons. I
do not believe that, for example, bad slasher flicks result in copycat
imitations in real life-- but I do not doubt that they condition
undiscriminating viewers into more and more bad taste. As Stendhal said :"
Bad taste leads to crime." And the cultural crimes of the media, are at the
very least, a colossal factor of the dumbing of the public from Aden to
Zitomir.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Topsy-Turvy (1999)
TOPSY-TURVY (U.K., 1999) ****  Written and directed by Mike Leigh.
Photography, Dick Pope. Editing,  Robin Sales. Music,Carl Davis (from 
Arthur Sullivan's). Production design , Eve Stewart. Produced by 
Simon Channing-Williams.  Cast: Dorothy Atkinson (Jessie Bond),  Jim 
Broadbent (W. S. Gilbert), Ron Cook (Richard D'Oyly Carte), Allan 
Corduner (Arthur Sullivan), Eleanor David (Fanny Ronalds), Shirley 
Henderson (Leonora Braham), Lesley Manville (Lucy Gilbert), Kevin 
McKidd (Durward Lely), Wendy Nottingham (Helen Lenoir), Martin Savage 
(George Grossmith), Timothy Spall (Richard Temple), Alison Steadman 
(Madame Leon) and many others. A USA Films release. 160 minutes. PG
Delicious is the word for this labor of love and love for the 
theater. Delicious like a long,  leisurely gourmet meal of "haute 
cuisine" which lasts for hours, has an unhurried pace, makes time 
pass most pleasurably, brings in course after course, and progresses 
with interesting conversations.
Writer-director Mike Leigh has carved a special film-niche for 
himself with very British movies that reveal extraordinary things 
about ordinary working-class people: High Hopes, Life Is Sweet, 
Naked, Secrets and Lies, et al. He (and his actors) have been awarded 
a host of major prizes. And that's not counting Leigh's activities in 
the theater, and with TV films which also get theatrical releases.
In Topsy-Turvy Leigh deals with the team of  librettist W.S. Gilbert 
(1836-1911) and composer Arthur Sullivan (1842-1900) or Sir Arthur 
after he was knighted in 1883. There's also a third man, 
impresario-manager D'Oyly Carte (1844-1901).
Even though one my cats is called Yum-Yum, I  am no G & S aficionado. 
Yet I appreciate how distinctive and novel their works were and how 
they brought out another side of staid Victorianism.
Compared to the familiar hoi polloi characters in the other Leigh 
movies, the "showbiz" people of Topsy-Turvy are downright patrician. 
They appear not in the old genre of artists' biopic but within a 
limited time-frame which allows depth and details.
It begins in 1884, when the latest G & S production, Princess Ida, 
was not well received. By G & S standards, it's a flop. The team's 
first collaboration, Trial by Jury, had been followed by several 
hits: The Sorcerer, H.M.S. Pinafore,  The Pirates of Penzance, 
Patience , and  Iolanthe. Princess Ida may have not deserved its 
unsuccess, but certainly Ida is no Aida. Not that one can compare 
hefty Grand Operas and their Bel Canto to the comic operettas that G 
& S invented.
Sir Arthur, bedridden with painful kidney trouble, still finds the 
strength to get to the Savoy Theater and conduct the orchestra. (His 
expressive face as he mouths the score is a marvel). But he also 
suffers from the musical ambition to compose, as he had in his early 
career, serious music. Princess Ida is the last straw. " I can't 
waste any more time on these trivial soufflés" he tells Carte.
Sir Arthur takes a break by going to the Continent. He is a bon 
vivant whose appreciation of French food and, in a Paris bordello, of 
a topless singing duo of ladies, bring out his "joie de vivre" and 
wit. It's charming.. But by the time Gilbert reads him his latest 
libretto, Sullivan has had it with topsy-turvy, formulaic plots.
The film's 160 minutes never drag or fatigue. And I say this as the 
founder of the BBNMM movement -- Bring Back the Ninety Minute Movie. 
We are treated  (and it is a treat) to wonderfully calibrated 
Victoriana:  interiors, artifacts, people; character and 
personality-revealing talk;  thoughts on creativity and art; the 
business side of productions; insights into private lives. Every 
minute brings something of interest, and many skillfully brief 
moments stand for full situations.
Topsy-Turvy revels in contrasts especially between lively 
man-about-town Sullivan and. serious, often dour Gilbert. The choice 
of words and images has the effortless feeling that comes from 
intelligent preparations. "Echt" British humor and educated wit are 
both a contrast to and a supplement of the funny singing patter of 
the G & S productions.
The partners are on the verge of breaking up permanently when smart 
Mrs. Gilbert (who like all the supporting  characters is painted with 
forceful economy) drags her husband to a novelty, an Exposition of 
Japanese culture. Kabuki, dances, music and other Japanese exotica 
suddenly set Gilbert on his operetta road to Damascus. Thus is The 
Mikado born in 1885.
All this is dealt with a succession of cleverly edited scenes. 
Gilbert, who has bought a Japanese sword, plays with it.  Cut to G & 
S together again,  reading a new script. Cut to February 12, 1885, 
when dire, Empire-shaking news reaches England: General "Chinese" 
Gordon and his men in besieged Khartoum were massacred on January 26 
by the Mahdi's rebel Sudanese. Cut to performers-to-be in The Mikado 
gorging themselves with oysters --and soon becoming sick. Life does 
go on.
The acting, from tiny to main roles, is flawless. Smart, telling, 
enjoyable moments, scenes or sequences abound. The funniest have 
Gilbert rehearsing his cast and thus becoming like a modern stage 
director. He has Japanese ladies show his performers how to stand, 
walk, and deploy fans. He instructs others on delivering lines. (Was 
Leigh  partly inspired by Truffaut's film-within-film mishaps in Day 
for Night?). It is high comedy, doubly impressive when one thinks of 
the movie's cast rehearsing how to handle The Mikado's rehearsals. 
Especially since Mike Leigh and his people,  in plays and movies, do 
not work in kosher ways. There are no standard scripts; everything 
derives  from interaction, invention and improvisation. Assuming that 
process was also used in Topsy-Turvy, the approach results in 
wonderful smoothness and dovetailing.
There is even suspense .Gilbert cuts out the song of a performer (who 
recalls Robert Morley). Will he reinstate it?  Will the  key actor 
who shoots  drugs, the actress wih a bad leg, or the actress who 
drinks, affect the performance?
One gets here many films for the price of one. G & S's life and 
works; how "An Operetta Is Born"; authentic shoptalk; backstage life 
of total verisimilitude --the best I know of-- and more. Technical 
aspects are brilliant. But the press seems to neglect the 
contribution of a major collaborator. Composer Carl Davis, born in 
Brooklyn but a longtime resident in England, though well-known in 
inner circles is not a name familiar to the public. Yet his output is 
huge and magnificent. Davis's scores include theatrical films (he won 
the British music award for The French Lieutenant's Woman);  many TV 
films (Channel 4, BBC, etc.) that have often been released as 
"regular" movies or appeared on PBS; TV series from the UK; 
documentary series such as The World at War, The Unknown Chaplin, 
Cinema Europe: The Other Hollywood. His new scores for silent 
classics (Intolerance, Ben-Hur, The Eagle, Greed, etc.) are the best 
ever. Prodigious Davis is the top film composer of our day, yet no 
one of my acquaintance knows him, except for maestro-pianist Ian 
Hobson who has recorded with him in England and admires him.
A final thought. Other operettas, e.g. by Vienna's Johann Strauss, by 
the Hungarian-born Franz Lehar, or by France's Offenbach, have 
traveled very well. But the untranslatable texts of W.S. Gilbert have 
limited the G & S repertory to English-speaking countries. 
Topsy-Turvy, in spite of getting two New York Film Critics Award 
(Best Film, Best Director) may also meet with this fate.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Trigger Effect, The (1996)
THE TRIGGER EFFECT ** 1/2 . Directed and written by David Koepp. 
Photography, Newton Thomas Sigel. Editing, Jill Savitt. 
Production design, Howard Cummings. Music, James Newton Howard. 
Producer, Michael Grillo. Cast: Kyle MacLachlan (Matt), Elisabeth 
Shue (Annie), Dermot Mulroney (Joe), Richard T. Jones (Raymond), 
Michael Rooker (Gary), Bill Smitrovich (Steph), et al. A Grammercy 
release. 93 min. Rated R (language, violence) 
"The Trigger Effect," screenwriter David Koepp's first feature as a 
director, hooks you strongly at the start. Later, when slowness, 
loose ends and diffusion lessen the power of the hook, there is still 
evidence of tight collaboration between the writer-director, his 
cinematographer (crisp work), editor, production designer and 
others.
Koepp has said that his inspiration was the late 1970s BBC 
documentary series "Connections," written, directed and 
"performed" by that fascinating man, James L. Burke. It is 
abundantly clear that the connection to "Connections" is used with 
dexterity in "The Trigger Effect."  
The opening shot is of coyotes devouring their prey at night. You 
may think this is in the wilderness, but then, in quick succession 
the next shots are of a large power plant, of a busy mall on a Friday 
night, of its multiplex and of the inside of a theater. Connections 
are imaginatively made between animals, technology and humans.
Knowing nothing of the movie, as soon as the second shot appeared 
I thought that the old Latin saying "Homo homini lupus" (Man is a 
wolf to man) was the direction the film would take. It did, with a 
vengeance. The mall sequence is a tour-de-force, a single, 
continuous four-minute Steadicam shot in which strangers bounce 
off each other  in such uncivil ways that within humans not only 
are connections shown but the disconnections too. 
Inside the theater we witness unpleasantness between some black 
and some white customers, as Annie gets insulted while her 
husband Matt remains timorously silent. There's also something 
disconnected between those two, and quietly reinforced by the cold 
look of the parking structure they go to after the show.
We follow them to their upscale home in some suburb of (unnamed) 
Los Angeles. The house, bristling with burglar alarms, is in a state 
of disconnection with itself, because of messy renovations in 
progress. There is tension between husband and wife, the kind of 
gradual alienation that can set in a marriage. It is manifested by 
several subtle yet telling details.
They find their baby girl feverish and in pain with a recurring ear 
infection, for which there is no more medicine left.  A sudden 
blackout affects the whole city, at the very least.. Every activity 
and machine connected to electricity comes to a halt, including 
broadcasts. Matt drives to a store where the lifeless tills make 
only cash acceptable. He has no prescription for the child's drug, 
there's no way to call the doctor. Matt, after an altercation with 
the unpleasant pharmacist, returns home empty-handed. Later 
though, in a decision which cannily combines paternal anxiety and a 
show of newfound machismo, Matt goes back to the store and steals 
the drug in a good, suspenseful sequence.
There's commotion in the chic development, with neighbors 
grumbling, advising, consulting and showing more un-neighborly 
selfishness than mutual help.
Subcontractor Joe, Matt's oldest friend, visits and stays. He adds to 
the tension as, in more subtle ways yet, we see that best buddy or 
not, manual worker Joe is disconnected from the high-earning  
(profession unknown) yuppie Matt. Also because Joe is single, of 
the "marriage is living death" school, with a succession of 
girlfriends and with an eye on Annie.
What is not subtle is the blatant way the film keeps underlining 
Annie's sexuality at every turn. When the threesome sit by the fire,  
the wife, after a drink or two, loses her inhibitions and engages in 
not so oblique sexual talk.
Matt and Joe go out and buy a shotgun which, expectedly, has 
tripled in price. By the next morning, an intruder has been shot dead 
(How the cops were contacted remains a mystery). Annie gets 
closer to Joe. All talk of leaving town. (A sure way to guarantee 
looting). It is at this juncture that the movie begins to lose points 
by becoming too much ado about not enough danger.
It might have been a study in new stresses added those of "normal" 
life. The pharmacy bit , for example, could have been extended to a 
blackout's other problems. But writer-director Koepp cannot shake 
off a penchant for the sensational. Never explaining the source, 
extent or estimated length of the blackout, he treats it like a 
mythical plague that brings out the wolf in humans.
David Koepp has co-authored the quirky "Apartment Zero,"  "Death 
Becomes Her," "Jurassic Park," "Mission: Impossible," "The Paper," 
"Toy Soldiers." His solo scripts are "Bad Influence," '"Carlito's Way,"  
"The Shadow," and " The Trigger Effect." He can be good, but does he 
like "strong" and hyperbolic situations!
Here he continues going over the top on Sunday, the third day of the 
crisis, when thousands of cars take to the road in an eastward 
exodus. The trip, the encounters (some wildly coincidental), the 
fear of the unknown and of strangers, lead to misunderstandings 
and irrational violence, as well as to a too neat, Hollywoodish, 
goodie-goodie rapprochement between individuals and races, while 
heroicizing Matt. All this is too much deja vu and in far too slow a 
tempo.  
Metaphors and symbols, past a certain number, encumber the 
picture.  Like most movie people, Koepp sees life through 
Californian glasses. Those of us who have been through much longer 
blackouts --though, granted, not in a megalopolis -- can testify 
that the resulting inconveniences can also make people helpful and 
kind in this "we're in it together" situation. But then, ugly sells 
more tickets than nice, and, 'tis true, Los Angeles is not angelic. 
What is universally valid for developed countries is our modern 
dependence on technology. But let's not go overboard and whole-hog, 
and read the movie as a denunciation of dehumanization by 
technology. Machines, gadgets and alternating current may spoil us  
or become counter-productive fixations. They can render us 
helpless when they abandon us. But they have also improved 
immeasurably the quality of life, work, health, leisure and have 
added (including Cyberspace) incalculable benefits to our existence. 
It's too late to become Luddites.

Title
Review for My Best Friend's Wedding (1997)
MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING  ** maximum.  Directed by P.J. Hogan. Written by
Ronald Bass. Produced by Jerry Zucker and Bass. Photography, Laszlo
Kovacs.Editing, Garth Craven & Lisa Fruchtman. Production design, Richard
Sylbert. Music,James Newton Howard.  Cast: Julia Roberts (Julianne Potter),
Dermot Mulroney (Michael O'Neal), Cameron Diaz (Kimmy Wallace), Rupert
Everett (George Downes), Philip Bosco (Walter Wallace), M.Emmet Walsh (Joe
O'Neal), Rachel Griffiths (Samantha Newhouse), Carrie Preston (Amanda
Newhouse), Chris Masterson (Scott O'Neal), et al. A  Sony Tri-Star release.
112 minutes. PG-13.
My Best Friend's Wedding is another marriage picture by Australian P.J.
Hogan whose warm, funny, original Muriel's Wedding was a hit, starting at
the 1994 Cannes Festival. This time Hogan is not so lucky.
I saw this film on Friday. As the end credits rolled by, I thought :"TGIF"
-- Thank God It's Finished. MBFW seems to be an attempt at a 90s screwball
romantic comedy, vaguely along the lines of much earlier ones.  But instead
of a crazy, outlandish structure, minutely plotted, diversified and with
strong  ensemble playing (think of Cary  Grant  gems such as His Girl
Friday and My Favorite Wife, both of 1940), this picture is made to
showcase Julia Roberts  at the expense of everything and everyone else.
Almost, that is.
The film's fourth banana, English actor Rupert Everett, salvages the show,
steals every scene he's in, even those in which he speaks to Roberts on
long-distance calls. Roberts plays Julianne, a New York food critic who
refers to "creme brulee" as "kraym broolay." Everett is George, her editor
and confidant. He is handsome, sexy, smart. He is also gay,which you
certainly wouldn't know if you hadn't been told from the start.
Nine years ago Julianne had a torrid but short affair with college-mate
Michael.  Julianne is no long-distance runner when it comes to
relationships, but the reasons why the twosome stopped are still not clear.
They switched to being best friends and such perfect soulmates that they
made a pact: if by the time they reached age 28 they had found no true
love, they would marry each other.
The time has come. Michael, now a sportswriter in Chicago, calls Julianne,
but instead of popping the question he announces feverishly that in four
days he will marry young college girl Kimmy, the daughter of Chicago
tycoon. He has such prenuptual jitters that Julianne simply must come and
lend support.
For Julianne this comes as an IRA bomb throw. It triggers in her the
absolute notion that Michael is the man of her life. She flies in,
ostensibly to help him, but in reality to get him away from Kimmy.
The film, always focused on Roberts, is the string of Julianne's
machiavellian machinations. She charms the eager fiancee ("You're my new
best friend" says naive Kimmy), worms her way into and works on everybody,
systematically diminishes Kimmy in Michael's eyes. A few of her strategies
are amusing, most are too cruel to be entertaining, as when she manoeuvers
tin-eared Kimmy into singing karaoke in a truly atrocious voice.The story
becomes increasingly phony, nonsensical and often verges on hysteria.
So-feminine Julianne is called Jules by her friends. It is a significant
detail. I am sure that the scriptwriter had His Girl Friday (1940) in mind.
That movie was a remake of The Front Page (1931), where two battling
Chicago newsmen were named respectively Walter Burns and Hildy Johnson. In
His Girl Friday Cary Grant plays editor Walter Burns and reporter Hildy
Johnson now becomes a woman (Rosalind Russell) and Walter's ex-wife. She's
currently engaged to Ralph Bellamy, whom Grant undermines and ridicules so
as to get Russell back, both as a star reporter and as his wife. There are
other parallels between MBFD and His Girl.
Julia Roberts is considered blessed by the tooth-fairy by many, and no
doubt beloved by dentists. She throws herself into her role body and soul,
but the script is incomplete about her character, and makes  her barefaced
tactics for the reconquest of Michael unappealing --even nasty.
Michael is namby-pamby, Kimmy is painfully immature, both lack personality,
both are credulous dim-bulbs and lambs too easily led to slaughter. Script
and performers seem to grope as to what might come next. There are hardly
any sparkling lines of dialogue, except for Rupert Everett's. Even then,
when he shows up in Chicago and tells a group that Jules went with so many
men "that she couldn't sit down for seven years," this indelicacy is out of
character for George. Still, far and away, the best part is when he poses
dashingly, convincingly and funnily as the fiance of Jules, and enchants
one and all.
The film becomes exponentially cynical, confused and incredible, including
many psychological as well as time-and-space impossibilities in the last
reel. The finale is a non-closure cop-out. The only touching scene is in a
corridor of the Drake Hotel, a quiet hiatus in which a passing bellman
called Richard gently tries to boost the morale of a despondent Julianne. I
think that the actor is Paul Giamatti.
That old movie subject --love-stricken people using strategies that will
lead to marriage-- is not very applicable today. In 1997 such romanticism
does not jibe with the rate of 54.8%  marriages ending in divorce. You
don't need statistics either to know how increasingly short-lived so many
marriages are. Julia Roberts and Lyle  Lovett were not an isolated case.
Sad but true,"'til death do us part" in movies has become a hard sell.

Title
Review for Rosa Luxemburg (1986)
ROSA LUXEMBURG *** 1/2 (Germany,1986) Written and directed by 
Margarethe von Trotta. Cinematography,Franz Rath. 
Editing,Dagmar Hirtz.Sound, Christian Moldt.Art direction, 
Bernd Lepel,Karel Vacek.Costumes,Monika Hasse.Music,Nicolas 
Economou. Producer,Eberhard Junkersdorf. Cast: Barbara 
Sukowa,Daniel Olbrychski, Otto Sander,et al. A Bioskop 
Film-Munic production.In German (and some Polish)with 
subtitles.122 minutes. No rating.
High-quality German cinema and transfixing history combine 
beautifully in ROSA LUXEMBURG, a film I recommend highly. It 
covers mainly the crucial years 1898-1919 of "Red Rosa"'s 
life, when the Polish-born political activist, heroine and 
martyr of the Social Democrats, lived mostly in Germany. 
On January 15, 1919, Rosa and her comrade Karl Liebknecht were 
murdered  by Freikorps troops of--ironically--the new Social 
Democrat German Republic.  Arguably, they were the first 
victims of the Nazi system to come. 
Rosa was an idealist and a purist, intransigent in politics 
and love. She was a spellbinding orator, an indefatigable 
worker, speechmaker and writer, a firebrand who tolerated no 
timorousness, personal or ideological compromises or political 
cliches. Prison was a way of life for her--she was jailed nine 
times. 
Margarethe von Trotta's film should fascinate all those who 
are interested in cinema that deals with big issues 
which--like this work--even transcend their main subject. And  
Rosa Luxemburg is a very tricky subject to handle. Today's 
standards are infinitely more exacting than the old ones of 
barefaced propaganda (e.g. films made under the Third Reich) 
or the old Hollywood biographies with their sentimentalities, 
heroics,simplifications and feeble-minded manicheism. 
Now films like ROSA must re-invent the genre, case by case. 
Director Von Trotta does this excellently, balancing 
dangerously between documentarism and fiction, between 
personality and the wider historical context. 
Rosa was  so  active and  complex  that any single film on her 
must be selective.  On my second viewing of ROSA in 20 months, 
I found the film's presentation of its intense heroine and its 
political background even more entrancing than the first time. 
There is enough here to feed a miniseries. 
Before the movie came out, Von Trotta said :" I have collected 
so much material that I could make two more films....Some 
historians will find my film very incomplete. It wasn't my aim 
to create a work of history but a portrait of Rosa. But I feel 
that for all the people who don't know her, the film will help 
them discover her. Rosa is used in the East as in the West. In 
West Germany, the stamp showing her portrait was unacceptable 
to the public. In the East they use her for political ends and 
play down her opposition to Lenin."
Curiously, historians did not object to the film. Only  a few 
"instant-expert" reviewers criticized some of the movie's 
liberties--specifically the death of Kostia Zetkin, Rosa's 
lover and the son of her friend Clara Zetkin--when in 
actuality it was Hans Diefenbach, Kostia's successor,  who was 
killed in World War II.  
The big--and perhaps only--love of Rosa's life was Leo 
Jogiches (played with sober presence by Daniel Olbrychski), 
who, even after he was rejected by Rosa because he had cheated 
on her, remained her collaborator.
Neither Jogiches nor anyone else from the movie's Who's Who 
among the Social Democrats has a foreground role in ROSA. 
Wisely, Ms. von Trotta has concentrated on her central figure 
without diluting her two hours of Rosa with efforts to fill in 
details of Karl Liebknecht, Karl and Luise Kautsky, Clara 
Zetkin, August Bebel, Jean Jaures, and the other, by now 
legendary, political figures of the period. 
Nonetheless, they are all there. By making every moment of 
their screen presence count in a forceful way, those activists 
are woven into history without being merely supporting cast. 
But it is, of course, Rosa who dominates the film, both by the 
way the script is written and through Barbara Sukowa's superb 
performance. She won the Best Actress Award at the 1986 Cannes 
Festival.  
Luxemburg-Sukowa is a true believer in the people, above 
parties and systems; she is a figure of utter resilience, 
passionate yet lucid; she is a woman deeply conscious of art, 
literature, and of nature (in contemporary German terms she 
would be both a Red and a Green). Rosa is also a woman of 
abnegation who suffers for others but not  for herself. 
Of her  approximately 2,500 letters that von Trotta studied, 
one, addressed to Sophie Liebknecht, describes  in Rosa's 
wonderfully touching prose the mistreating of a wagon-pulling 
ox by a soldier in Rosa's prison yard. 
Von Trotta has condensed it with skill, retaining its essence 
as well as its ending :"Oh my poor buffalo, my poor beloved 
brother, here we are, the two of us, powerless and helpless, 
united in our pain and nostalgia."
The writer-director originally tried to find a bilingual 
(German-Polish) as well as Jewish actress for the part . She 
was unable to do so. It was a stroke of luck, as she turned to 
Barbara Sukowa, who, although she looks nothing like the real 
Rosa, has absorbed her personality magnificently. She even 
learned Polish and uses a slight Polish accent in her German.
Rosa's Jewishness is not stressed in the movie. This is not an 
avoidance reaction on the part of Ms. von Trotta, but because 
at the time the intellectual Jews were totally assimilated 
into the German mainstream. Furthermore, Rosa herself had a 
world view of her mission, which precluded any feelings of 
nationalism or ethnicity. On the other hand, the predominance 
of Jews in the SPD (German Socialist Party) is obvious in the 
film.
The movie is one of much talk and dialectics, of considerable 
excitement if you are in the least curious about history. 
There are uncanny relevancies to our own day--not only to the 
situation in the Germany of the 1980s but also in Rosa's 
resounding, pacifist speeches. 
Perhaps the most poignant moment of this hearfelt film is the 
1914 defection of socialists, all over Europe. Initially they 
resisted the coming war. Alas, pressures, conformism and 
chauvinism led to a mass betrayal of principles, of  logic and 
of sanity. It happened in Germany, it also happened in other 
countries. The door to the madness and tragedy of the guns of 
August was open.
Remarkable too is ROSA's powerful feminism--but not in the 
usual sense. Rosa herself was impatient with it and delegated 
this particular struggle to others. The feminism lies in the 
way that the movie's Rosa, though given a great deal of 
femininity, is not for a moment thought or spoken of as a 
woman, a female or an exception, whether within or without the 
socialist circles. 
The question of sexism never comes up. The way von Trotta puts 
us before a moral-social given of equality and 
non-discrimination, the way it flows so naturally, ennobles, 
in this respect, the socialists of all hues, even those who 
were Rosa's ideological adversaries. We have not progressed 
much in one full century. 
[Note: Review written Nov.20,87. A third, recent screening of 
the film changes nothing of its quality and validity]. 

Title
Review for Danzón (1991)
DANZON (Mexico, 1991) ***. Directed by Maria Novaro. Written by Maria and
Beatriz Novaro. Photography, Rodrigo Garcia. Editing, Nelson Rodriguez,
Maria Novaro. Art direction, Marisa Pecanis and Roberto Sanchez. Music,
Danzonera Dimas de los Hermanos Perez, Pepe Luis y su Orchestra
Universitaria, Danzonera Alma de Solavento, Manzanita y el Son 4, Marimba
La Voz de Chiapas. Cast: Maria Rojo, Carmen Salinas, Margarita Isabel, Tito
Vasconcelos, Blanca Guerra, Cheli Goodinez . A Sony Pictures Classics
Release. In Spanish with subtitles. 103 min. Rated PG 13.
Mexican director Maria Novaro is building up a repertory of films about
women who go through some form of adversity end up by finding themselves.
"Lola," her first feature, dealt with a woman with a 5-year old daughter,
abandoned by her man. The much more upbeat "Danzon" centers on thirtyish-
fortyish Julia (Teresa Rojo),  the single mother of a 15-year old girl, who
searches for a man who is not really her  man.
Both films have won the Best Picture award at the Latino Film Festival in
New York, respectively in 1990 and 1991, and diverse other prizes. "Danzon"
was best Mexican film in Mexico, with Maria Rojo  copping the Best Actress
award at the Chicago and the Valladolid (Spain) Festivals.
Julia, a telephone company operatrix in Mexico City, is a cheerful soul
whose one passion is "danzon," a ballroom dance originating in Haiti and
originally patterned after French cotillion dances. Via Cuba it became
popular and quickly spread to the Mexican port of Veracruz one century ago.
For 6 years, Julia has been getting top prizes in danzon contests, always
with the same partner, Carmelo. Carmelo is fiftyish, always immaculately
dressed in a chic white suit and hat. Oddly (or not so oddly if you think
that  the realistic "Danzon" has discreet elements of fantasy and
symbolism), Julia knows next to nothing about Carmelo, whom she meets only
at the dance hall. "He's married, all men are married" says a friend, but
Julia discounts this.
One day, Carmelo disappears. Julia is not only left without a dancing
companion but somehow realizes that the man meant a lot to her. On the
slightest of clues, she goes to Veracruz, presumably Carmelo's home town,
to look for him. There she stays in a shabby hotel frequented by "ladies of
the night," makes friends with various women, principally with the
originally gruff owner, with a prostitute with a cute baby,  and with a
gentle transvestite nightclub "artist" whom Julia always refers to as
"she." They all try to help her locate Carmelo.
Near the end of her mini-Odyssey Julia has a fling with a much younger man,
then calmly and happily returns to Mexico City where, in the ballroom, a
wonderful  surprise awaits her.
"Danzon" is linear and episodic and linear, and, like the dance itself,
slow. It is constructed-- on purpose-- along the lines of older popular
Mexican movies, with a kind of pervasive naivete.
What it tries to accomplish is threefold. The film is an affectionate paean
to danzon and  local music for the masses, and simultaneously it is a
political statement by Ms. Novaro (who majored in sociology) since it
celebrates autochthonous tradition as opposed to imported modernism.
"Danzon" is also about the "growing up" of an already grown woman. And it
focuses too on the strength of sisterhood, of women sticking together.
In a way, "Danzon" shares with several films of recent years a trend
towards populism. While the former Soviet bloc nations are anxious to do
away with screen proletarians, other countries seem to be adding them to
their productions.
"Danzon"s personal points are made quietly, and Julia is played with the
right mix of high spirits, resolution and worry. The musical points are
made quite raucously. The sounds vary from the playing of accomplished
bands or well sung, very Mexican sentimental vocals (from records) to
strident or cacophonous blarings.
Worked in quite naturally and nicely photographed is the town of Veracruz,
a port city that must be the dullest and least picturesque in Mexico,
though compared to Mexico City's horrendous pollution and congestion, the
movie shows crisply and palpably Veracruz's clean, fresh sea air and its
airy, uncrowded places.
I looked, however, in vain for the famous Cafe de la Parroquia where the
best coffee in Mexico is served and sold. Perhaps it was there, but not
pointedly enough shown to be identified.
This, in a sense is typical of "Danzon." The movie feels as though it were
trying to avoid specificities of time and place. It could be set in the
1980s or decades earlier. The Mexico City practitioners of the dance wear
Sunday-best 1950s clothes, the Veracruzans' summery outfits are undatable.
The cars and the radios are older. The shabby freighters have no age.
There's an advantage to this generalizing, but at the same time this spills
into a kind of mildness and vagueness that might border on dullness for
those viewers accustomed to more dramatic action. Visually, a symptom of
this is the systematic use of long shots when closeups are expected.
Plot-wise, the lack of spelling out things makes you wonder how Julia, who
declares herself broke soon after arriving in Veracruz, finances her stay
and the gifts she brings back to Mexico City.
Unexpectedly for a Mexican work "Danzon" pursues understatement rather than
broad filmic discourse.  On one occasion, this becomes unwittingly funny,
as when Julia joins her new, temporary young lover in his boat. Their
lovemaking is unseen and only alluded to by the up and down movements of
the ship's hull.  On the other hand, when, the next day, the young man
reappears with his hair cut short, Julia's dismay at seeing him look even
younger is touchingly effective.
For some viewers "Danzon" will be too leisurely and lacking in strong
rhythms (except for the music) or incidents. But it certainly has a special
kind of sly charm and it is an interesting addition of movies by women and
about women.

Title
Review for Tao of Steve, The (2000)
THE TAO OF STEVE (2000) ** Directed by Jenniphr Goodman. Written by 
Duncan North, Greer Goodman and Jenniphr Goodman. Photography, 
Teodoro Maniaci. Editing, Sarah Gartner. Production design,  Rosario 
Provenza. Music, Joe Delia. Produced by Anthony Bregman. Cast:  Donal 
Logue (Dex), Greer Goodman (Syd), Kimo Wills (Dave), Ayelet Kaznelson 
(Beth), David Aaron Baker (Rick), Nina Jaroslaw (Maggie), et al. A 
Sony Pictures Classics release. 87 minutes.  R. (language, pot, 
content), At the New Art Theatre.
Last night I saw on cable the 1949 "The Lady Takes a Sailor" directed 
by the often great Michael Curtiz  ("Captain Blood, "The Sea Wolf," 
"Santa Fe Trail,"'Yankee Doodle Dandy," "This is the Army," 
""Casablanca," "Mildred Pierce." etc.)  "Lady Takes a Sailor" is a 
pretty bad screwball comedy with Jane Wyman and Dennis Morgan, yet I 
enjoyed its unpretentious nonsense. I enjoyed less  "The Tao of 
Steve." which ambitions to be both funny and "profound." But don't 
take my word for this, as the movie does have a following, beginning 
with its premiere at Sundance.
Its first-time director's first name is Jenniphr (sic). (It's a small 
shock, but less so that a lady I saw whose name, I swear, was 
Latrina).  After her 1994 graduation from the NYU film school, Ms. 
Goodman (born in Santa Fe) moved back to New Mexico with her spouse. 
For two years they shared a house with old friend Duncan North, a 
kindergarten teacher who was overweight and an amazing lady-killer. 
North, becoming the center of a projected film, worked with Ms. 
Goodman and her New York-based actress sister Greer Goodman for two 
years on a script based on Mr. North life,  activities and sexual 
strategies.
The result is (in it makers' words) "a romantic comedy" in which 
Duncan North becomes kindergarten teacher Dex (no last name) played 
by Donal Logue  with the help of additional body contours. Dex is a 
slacker with time on his hands. The Tao of the title is the 
"philosophy" and the modus operandi of this most  improbable 
Casanova. Set in (or near?) Santa Fe, the story is essentially about 
sex rather than love. There is no Steve in it. The name refers to 
improbable role models, all actors named Steve:: Steve Austin (of 
TV's "Six Million Dollar Man," Steve McGarrett (of TV's "Hawaii 
Five-O," and way above all, Steve McQueen. What Dex admires is their 
COOL.
Having just seen again McQueen in the original, 1968 "The Thomas 
Crown Affair," having found it (again) a silly, nonsensical, empty 
stylistic exercise, I'm having second thoughts about cool, what it 
is,  where and what it gets you. Here is gets you a stream of 
semi-Zen, of references to Marx (Groucho), to the philosopher 
Heidegger (and/or Kierkegaard?), to Mozart, etc.
I forgot to mention that the film opens with a ten-year class reunion 
of  college classmates, with Dex sorting out the girls the way one 
examines a restaurant's menu. Dex used to be the hot-shot thinker of 
his class. His  utterances vary in style, but they are sort of 
academic -- not the way college professors talk among themselves (in 
mostly sensible, normal English), but in the heavy academic, 
jargonish way they often argue or lecture.
Almost all who speak here seem to do so with their mouths open. I 
wonder why. On the other hand, given the sexual nature of the movie, 
we get neither gratuitous nudity nor the usual four-letter words. ( 
These are present of course, but in spirit or via euphemisms.)
  I won't go or get into the "plot," except that it eventually gets 
Dex  together with Syd. She is a stage designer. Ten years ago she 
was also the object of a one-night stand with Dex.  And since Dex 
apparently dropped her pronto, and seems to have forgotten that 
micro-liaison, she's mad. And the flitting, non-committing man falls 
in love with her this time. The balance of the movie is about the 
possible transformation of the two into a twosome.
Some passages are pretty good, I agree. But the attraction of 
opposites which, in film after film, begins with antagonism and leads 
to "amore" is one of filmdom's most durable and fallacious illusions.
There are two lessons we can extract from the picture. One, that a 
little learning can be a bore to others. The other that a would-be 
seducer or lover who is fat should not worry about it.
In the filmmakers' suggestion box I will place a message: " If you 
want to show the complexities of male-female relationships, see the 
films of Eric Rohmer, study them, then do your own, different thing."

Title
Review for Cry, the Beloved Country (1995)
Cry, the Beloved Country *** 1/2  Directed by Darrell James 
Roodt.  Written by Ronald Harwood, adapted from the novel by 
Alan Paton. Photography, Paul Gilpin. Editing, David Heitner. 
Production design, David Barkham.  Music, John Barry.  
Produced by Anant Singh.  Cast: Richard Harris (James Jarvis), 
James Earl Jones (the Rev. Stephen Kumalo), Vusi Kunene 
(Theophilus Msimangu), Dambisa Kente (Gertrude Kumalo), 
Charles S.Dutton (John Kumalo), Eric Miyeni (Absalom Kumalo). 
A Miramax release. 108 minutes. Rated PG-13.  
"There is fear in the land. And fear in the         hearts of all who 
live there. And fear puts an end to understanding and the need 
to understand. So how shall we fashion such a land when there 
is fear in the heart? The white man will put more locks on his 
door and get a fine fierce dog, but the beauty of the trees 
and of the stars, these things we shall forego.
"Cry, the beloved country, for the unborn child that is the 
inheritor of our fear. Let him not love the earth too deeply. 
Let him not be too moved when the birds of his land are 
singing, nor give too much of his heart to a mountain or a 
valley. For fear will rob him of all if his gives too much. 
Yes cry, cry, the
beloved country."
Even for people familiar with world literature, their first 
acquaintance with a South African novel was "Cry, the Beloved 
Country," by  Alan Paton (1903-1988), a white who had been 
principal of the Diepkloof Reformatory since 1935.  
The film (released in 1995) has adapted the beautiful, sad, 
poetic book with  maximum fidelity, including descriptions, 
dialogue and voice-over narration. It relates events in 1946. 
Stephen Kumalo, a Zulu pastor (James Earl Jones), leaves his 
rural area for his first trip to Johannesburg. With the sum 
total od his money, a paltry 14 pounds 6, and with dogged 
determination, he is looking for his sister and for his son.  
"My son, Absalom" echoes both the Bible and William Faulkner.
He finds the woman. She had become a prostitute of the saddest 
sort -- not from greed but by necessity.  He rescues her and 
her child. Then he eventually locates Absalom -- in prison.  
The young man had fallen in bad company and had a penal 
record. During an attempted burglary, with two companions, 
Absalom, panicking when the white occupant returned, shot him 
fatally. 
By coincidence, the victim, Arthur, was the only child of a 
landowner from Kumalo's area, James Jarvis (Richard Harris).  
There is no doubt that Absalom, as he stated to his father and 
the Court, fired unthinkingly because he was frightened. While 
no excuse in the eyes of the law, this is  a terrible 
indictment of a society of separate and unequal races, where, 
in the dominated group, "Fear Eats the Soul," to quote the 
title of a Fassbinder film.
Ironically, Arthur was a liberal and the creator of a black 
center (the Claremont Boys Club). Says a club official to 
James: "He gave us all of this,"  and adds: " He is the only 
man, black or white, to see me as I am."
Among Arthur's writings, James  reads: "It is not native crime 
which is the problem, but white crime..." James, not shown as 
a bigot, is, like so many others, guilty by ommission and 
ignorance. He learns from tragedy. During a sleepless night, 
he tells his wife: " There was something Arthur wrote, that 
day that he... He said we taught him nothing. He means that we 
taught him nothing about the country in which he lived. He 
said that we called ourselves Christians, but we were 
indifferent to the suffering of Christians. He said that  when 
we say we are Christians, what we mean is that we are 
white.... Oh, why... Why, why, why, why do we bring children 
into this world?" 
In ways too delicate and complex to detail or reveal here, the 
two distraught fathers meet. Jarvis, unaware of who the 
anonymous visitor is ( Kumalo almost collapses from emotion), 
treats him kindly. Then the preacher, with immense pain 
declares: "It was my son that killed your son." Jarvis, still 
gentle: "I understand what I did not understand.  There is no 
anger in me." They part with "Go well, umfundisi" (a 
respectful expression for "pastor")  and "Stay well umnumzana" 
("sir"). The sequence is heartbreaking, the actors superb, 
both tens on a scale of 1 to 10. 
James Earl Jones has an enormous presence, all the stronger 
for his contained agony. Richard Harris, in  his most 
underplayed, quiet role ever, is also a paragon of moving, 
unrhetorical, unshowy reactions.  The strange but believable 
bond between the two men is reinforced in the scenes that 
follow.  
I confess that I was a bit worried at the start of the movie, 
first because the music by James Barry sounded like a clone of 
his score for "Out of Africa," secondly because the trek of 
the Rev. Kumalo to Johannesburg, where he gets scammed and 
robbed on arrival, might overdevelop the aspect of a rube in a 
big city. But neither musical nor plot cliches appear. 
Instead, we get a series of events that go from touching to 
moving to devastating, both for the characters and the 
audience. The poignancy is cumulative, impossible to resist. 
It lasts to the very end when the preacher goes up to the 
mountain, with more Biblical echoes, not to mention Martin 
Luther King.
There is true emotion, dignity and nobility in this film, yet 
none that you might suspect of pulling out all the stops in 
order to influence the audience.  There is also, in the eyes 
of many critics, a great deal of true Christianity, but in my 
opinion the story transcends Christianity, Judaism, ancestor 
worship or totemism, reaching instead deep levels of humanity 
that cut across religions or non-faiths. 
Not everything is obvious. Neither the police nor the 
prosecutor or the judge are made into racist villains. During 
Absalom's trial, whenever Arthur Jarvis  is mentioned, it is 
not by name, but as "the white man." This speaks volumes. So 
does the richness of the film in major elements ( like the 
kindness and help shown Kumalo by a white Bishop and a black, 
complex clergyman), small touches (impasses for blacks, the 
hostility of the bordello's madam), integrated incidentals (a 
bus boycott that forces the two preachers to walk 11 miles), 
and much else. 
By Hollywood standards, this is an Un-American movie, I mean 
one that takes its time with feelings, reflections and 
reactions. Yet slow it isn't.  The running time is listed 
variously as 108 and as 120 minutes. It is quite possible that 
after its initial screening the film was cut, but even in that 
case, no harm was done. It still plays like a Greek tragedy 
for our time. Not to be missed. 

Title
Review for Ninth Gate, The (1999)
THE NINTH GATE (France, Spain, 1999) *** Produced and directed by 
Roman Polanski. Written by Enrique Urbizu, John Brownjohn, Polanski, 
from the novel "El Club Dumas" by Arturo Perez-Reverte. Photography, 
Darius Khondji. Editing, Herve de Luze. Production design, Dean 
Tavoularis. Music, Wojciech Kilar. Cast: Johnny Depp ( Dean Corso), 
Frank Langella (Boris Balkan), Lena Olin (Liana Telfer), Emmanuelle 
Seigner (The Girl),  Barbara Jefford (  Baroness Kessler),  Jack 
Taylor (Victor Fargas), Jose Lopez Rodero (Pablo and Pedro Ceniza), 
James Russo (Bernie), et al. Released (USA) by Artisan 
Entertainment.133  minutes.  R (sex and violence)
Black humor seems to be, among other characteristics, in the genes of 
director (and writer and actor) Roman Polanski -- but that's a 
speculation. What is certain is that his childhood and youth were 
marked by dark events. He was born in Paris (1933) in a Jewish-Polish 
family which, in 1936, made the wrong choice of returning to Poland. 
That's where the German attack of September 1, 1939 started World War 
II. In 1941 Roman's parents were sent to a concentration camp where 
his mother died. The boy escaped the Cracow ghetto, meandered in the 
country taking refuge in Catholic families. His  survival would make 
a fascinating film, but as a filmmaker Polanski has referred directly 
to the savagery of war in just one short movie.
How he became a major cineaste is also a fascinating tale. I'll skip 
it, except to say that three aspects of his "oeuvre," anguish, 
alienation and absurdism, were often accompanied by a sense of the 
comedic (cf. the parody "The Fearless Vampire Killers or: Pardon Me 
But Your Teeth Are in My Neck")
In America Polanski's fame came with  the Hollywood movie "Rosemary's 
Baby" (1968).  The following year, his pregnant wife  Sharon Tate and 
others were murdered by the Manson "family" In 1974 came the triumph 
of "Chinatown" and in 1977 the scandal (the statutory rape of a 
13-year old model) which had Polanski flee to Europe. His subsequent 
films there were the hit "Tess"; " Pirates" which justly bombed; the 
underrated, Hitchcockian "Frantic"; the quirky "Bitter Moon"; the 
powerful "Death and the Maiden."
"The Ninth Gate" may not be epoch-making, but it is better than it 
may seem at first sight, especially if one does not view it simply as 
"horror" (the wrong pigeonhole), but as a black humor fantasy. Bear 
in mind that the film is a simplification of a novel otherwise 
impossible to adapt.
New York City's Dean Corso (Johnny Depp) is a kind of book detective, 
an agent with impressive knowledge who searches for valuable rare old 
books. He's also a con-meister who tries to buy cheap and resell very 
high.
The opening sequence (after a marvelous list of credits) is of A+ 
caliber. Corso visits a wealthy but naive couple to appraise the 
collection of their old father, now a wheelchair-bound vegetable. In 
the process, Corso purchases for himself a rare "Don Quijote" for a 
ridiculously low sum. Note how the old man's face -- he is aware of 
the book's value but is unable to communicate-- expresses his 
feelings. This is one of the several good moments of the film, 
details that keep it going through thick and thin.
New York is shown in "film noir" terms, disturbing, ominous. It was 
terrifically recreated in European studios. Corso is summoned by a 
client, zillionaire Boris Balkan (Frank Langella) who has a haughtily 
sinister side and whose name recalls Transylvanian vampirism. Balkan 
is a high-power  demonology lover whose collection (protected by high 
tech) of books on Satan is world class. He has recently bought "The 
Nine Gates of the Kingdom of the Shadows" from another collector, the 
aged Telfer who then hanged himself. That's a priceless book, with 
nine etchings, published in Venice in the mid 1600s. The story goes 
that its author Aristide Torchia (who signs his engravings AT) was 
assisted by Satan and paid for this on the stake.
Balkan has tried some magic via the book (some sort of Renaissance 
voodoo? ) but it didn't work. Knowing that the volume is one of three 
extant, he commissions Corso to examine the other two books,  in 
Portugal and in Paris, for a huge fee --undisclosed and regularly 
increased. He  trusts him with his copy which, wrapped in chamois and 
placed in a leather bag will accompany Corso's every step. (The bag 
may someday go for thousands at a movie memorabilia auction)
For safety, Corso deposits the volume at his collaborator Bernie's 
rare-book shop. The defly deftly sketched relationship of the two men 
is one of the several reasons to see the movie.
The investigation begins. It is high powered. It is also high camp. 
If you take the film and its mumbo-jumbo seriously, you're on the 
wrong track. Polanski's tongue-in-cheek treatment spills out all over 
the place.
Does the plot make sense? No. Is it amusing? Yes-- in spite of Bernie 
getting mysteriously killed and hung just as in one of the volume's 
etchings. Enter the young and sexy widow Liana Telfer  (Lena Olin) 
who is after the book her late husband had sold Balkan.
As in private eye thrillers she tries seducing Corso. No need to 
alert you to   her raised skirt, but do notice the thigh's cabalistic 
tattoo of a snake biting his own tail. Vigorous sex terminates when 
Corso gets bumped on the cranium. It's Hollywood film noir again. 
Except for a clever shot of the man coming back to life with his eyes 
double printed on the film. Another striking, fugitive moment.
The search for the two other copies escalates. It leads to Spain, 
Portugal and France. Corso is indefatigable, shows extraordinary 
stamina and remains unruffled. Johnny Depp is remarkable in the cool 
way he plays his part, even more impertubably than the three major 
Philip Marlowes: Bogart, Mitchum and Dick Powell. And like the 
private investigators of old he punctuates his sleuthing with smoking 
Lucky Strikes and drinking scotch. The permanent joke however is that 
Depp, hairdo, mustache, goatee and glasses is a dead ringer for a 
more manicured Leon Trotsky!
Involved in his search is a pretty, nameless and most mysterious 
young woman (The Girl) played by Polanski's wife Emmanuelle Seigner. 
She pops up all over the map, does strange things, keeps super-cool, 
rescues Corso more than once and joins forces with him. I cannot 
reveal more.
More pleasantries include twin brothers  Ceniza (the name 
symbolically means ashes) Spanish book specialists played by one 
actor (great special effects); a Dennis Rodman-like goon; a one-armed 
old Baroness in a wheelchair. A passionate bibliophile, she competes 
with hated Balkan, owns another copy of the book, has a forbidding 
secretary (the latter is used as a nice red herring ). Corso, in a 
devilish hurry, opens the outer door to the Baroness's place --but he 
does not shut  it. A mistake, as film fans will attest.
The good moments are many, especially when they deal with books, 
their inspection and their collectors' passion. Corso's discoveries 
of etchings initialed LCF (Lucifer) are sort of silly fun. But the 
film does suffer  from unclarities and disorientations. When the 
investigator takes a cab to Victor Fargas -- an impoverished 
Portuguese aristocrat who owns one of the "Nine Gates," the road 
looks like a typical tree-lined French one. Fargas's English accent 
is an un- Portuguese hybrid. Later,to follow another car, Corso 
instantly and incredibly hijacks a half-million dollar sports 
convertible that a super-wealthy Arab and his Parisian chick have 
left for hotel personnel to park. The chase is fun and funny, but 
leads to an improbable chateau which is hosting a huge coven of high 
society witches, all unlikely devil-worshippers about to have an 
orgy. Balkan puts an end to this.
Starting with the fast car, the film goes downhill even faster. It 
reaches a nadir with ridiculous episodes in another, far more ancient 
castle, and with  an idiotic finale of sex. Even the original score 
by  Wojciech Kilar.and the intelligent photography by Darius Khondji 
(*see note below) looks like a silly add-on. The third half-hour of 
the movie is a mess, but two out of three ain't bad.
* Darius Khonji.  Born in Tehran, Iran, to an Iranian father and 
French mother. Studied film at New York University. Among his 
credits: Delicatessen ,  The City of Lost Children , Stealing Beauty, 
Evita, Alien: Resurrection, In Dreams, The Beach.
In The Ninth Gate his imaginative camera-work avoids the horror 
genre's oft-used mists, soft-focus tricks or SFX gimmickry. Instead, 
it keeps a sharp, often deep focus and making his shots realistic and 
his lighting match the sets.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for State and Main (2000)
STATE AND MAIN *** 1/2 . Written and directed by David Mamet. 
Photography, Oliver Stapleton. Editing, Barbar Tulliver. Production 
design, Gemma Jackson. Producer Sarah Green. Music, Theodore Shapiro. 
Cast: Alec Baldwin, Charles Durning , Clark Gregg, Philip Seymour 
Hoffman, Patti LuPone, William H. Macy, Sarah Jessica Parker, David 
Paymer, Rebecca Pidgeon, Julia Stiles. A Fine Line release. 102 
minutes. R (language, allusions to sex)
The so-talented Rebecca Pidgeon is in real life Mrs. David Mamet. I 
saw her last in her husband's excellent remale of "The Winslow Boy." 
Here she plays Ann, a smalltown bookseller, the leader of the 
dramatic society, and the fiancee of obnoxious lawyer and local 
politico Doug MacKenzie (Clark Gregg). There's no true love between 
the two, but then really small towns have really small opportunities. 
Soon that man will be evinced by a quiet, lovely affair between Ann 
and visiting scriptwriter Joseph Turner White (Philip Seymour 
Hoffman.) The new relationship--like most of the other aspects of the 
movie--is a gem of originality, as is Ann's charming wisdom. Quietly, 
without pretentiousness or sententiousness, she speaks pearls. One of 
them goes: "You make your own fun. Otherwise, it's entertainment."
Triple threat playwright, screenwriter and director David Mamet must 
be having the time of his life by making his own fun here by 
satirizing out and out the making and makers of movies. Director Walt 
Price (William Macy) has been looking for locations to shoot the 
late-19th century opus "The Old Mill." He had found the ideal place 
and mill in New Hampshire, but circumstances obliged the movie crew 
to run away. The replacement is Waterford, Vermont, a spot as 
colorful in sights and denizens as any invented by Hollywood. (Even 
the rain looks like movie-rain.)
Walt is everything you didn't want to know about a name director and 
about films -- if you want to keep your illusions about the 
practitioners of the Seventh Art.  Both in turns and simultaneously 
he is imperious, rude, demanding, cajoling, foul-mouthed, clever, 
imaginative, impossible, inventive, Napoleonic and Machiavellian. His 
declining star Bob Barrenger (Alec Baldwin) has a pronounced taste 
for young, school-age girls --which inevitably leads to troubles. 
First-time screenwriter Joe White is sweet, insecure and lost without 
his manual typewriter which disappeared between New Hampshire and 
Vermont. He finds in smart, tolerant Ann a rod, a staff, a muse and 
an object of his affections.
Claire, the projected film's female lead, has mega-problems, to which 
she adds a refusal to bare her breasts on-camera. This has something 
to do with her "purity," though an additional $800.000 would change 
her mind. The casting of Sarah Jessica Parker is inspired given her 
roles in TV's "Sex in the City."
Marty Rossen, the shyster lawyer who is the film's producer, is never 
short of arguments and ploys. He's the kind of beast who would do 
anything to get what he wants -- in fact he is like the classic 
definition of "chutzpah" where a man who killed his father and mother 
throws himself at the mercy of the Court "because I'm an orphan."
Add  mid-teenager Carla (Julia Stiles, who must have been 18 when the 
movie was shot).  She helps her dad with food services at the hotel 
where everybody is staying. In a clever twist, she seduces seducer 
Bob --and everything concerning the making of "The Old Mill"'s comes 
to a halt, while other developments stress venality, including lawyer 
MacKenzie's. By sheer coincidence some echoes of the year 2000's 
stolen Presidential election add some serious weight to the politics 
of the situation.
(By the way, the Old Mill of Waterford turns out to having been 
torched in 1960 by, probably, a destructive schoolboy.)
The film may be a series of catastrophes but they are all presented 
so juicily, amusingly, hilariously, winningly and wittily that they 
five the movie its several "raisons d'etre."  Details are splendidly 
sketched out. Characters and  situations are all different from one 
another while movie cliches are given freshness and originality.  .
The cast and team of both "State and Main" and "The Old Mill" are 
rather small but do wonders thanks to Mamet's quick, sharp (or 
obtuse-on-purpose) dialogue. He handles language like a 
prestidigitator, directs with ease. Many of the stars have been in 
Mamet films:  Macy, Paymer, Pidgeon, LuPone.
Non sequiturs or absurd logic enrich the text. Inventiveness reigns: 
at the hotel, the traffic in people, rooms, doors opening or closing 
is coordinated like a Georges Feydeau farce. In the hotel's cafe, two 
regular, chorus-like old-timers read Variety and talk technically of 
inflated movie profits. The whole production feels like a renaissance 
of older, classic screwball comedies --but not of slapstick pics.
Macy and Paymer repeat the old joke about naming people Associate 
Producer instead of paying them, yet the gag is always fresh. Paymer 
wants to ammortize expenses by bringing in product placement in the 
film, computer advertising ... in 1895, that is. Sure enough, by the 
end, some of the "inner" movie's shots shows an ad for a livery 
stable, and beneath it, one for Bazoomer computers.
Of course, we never find out what "The Old Mill" is about.
Do not stand up and leave the theater while end-credits are rolling. 
The humor continues until the lights go up.

Title
Review for Mad City (1997)
MAD CITY *** 1/4.  Directed by Constantin Costa-Gavras. Written by Tom
Matthews, based on a story by Matthews and Eric Williams.Photography,
Patrick Blossier.Editing, Francoise Bonnot. Production design, Catherine
Hardwicke. Music,Thomas Newman. Produced by Arnold Kopelson and Anne
Kopelson.  Cast: Dustin Hoffman (Max Brackett), John Travolta (Sam Baily),
Alan Alda (Hollander), Mia Kirshner (Laurie), William Atherton (Dohlen),
Blythe Danner (Mrs. Banks) Bill Nunn (museum guard) et al.  A Warners
release. 114 min PG-13
Director Costa-Gavras was born in Greece. His correct name is Konstatinos
(Constantine), or Kostas for short, Gavras ("gah-VRASS). It was hyphenated
by the French.
Few people today are aware that the Cold War began right at the end of
World War II, in Greece, as a civil war between Communist partisans and the
Royalist regime.
Gavras's father was a modest government employee. He was suspected of
leftist affiliations and suffered for it. The discrimination extended to
the young Costas. Denied rights like a driving permit or entrance to Athens
University, he went to Paris at age 16 or 17, studied literature at the
Sorbonne, later film-making, then became assistant director to several
major directors. His first film, a crime thriller, was a hit. In 1968,
Gavras became a French citizen, made his third film, the multi-prized "Z"
that was hailed as the first big, French political picture. There followed
more, impressive political thrillers.
Gavras was on to a fresh film formula. He was the first to combine the
vigorous, American style with European political sensibility. The movies
were major successes, won great awards. All were taken from real events,
each antagonized a different political regimes. "Z," on the assassination
of a leftist Greek leader by the forces of the right, riled the military
junta that was to rule Greece for seven years - even though the murder had
preceded the colonels' putsch."The Confession" dealt with political
kangaroo trials within Communist Czechoslovakia. It infuriated much of the
Left. "State of Siege" set in Uruguay (but filmed in democratic Chile just
before Allende's fall) took on the CIA and political torture. It displeased
many in the USA. "Special Section"'s denouncing of French tribunals under
the German Occupation, and French judges as toadying collaborators, made
many French legal professionals see red.
Then began Gavras's US-period. "Missing"  (Cannes festival top prize) dealt
with mass slaughter, the killing of a young American in Pinochet's Chile,
and the inanity of State Department representatives. "Hanna  K" attempted a
"rapprochement" between Arabs and Jews, was accused of being
pro-Palestinian. It had a  short life in American theaters. The flawed but
gripping "Betrayed" denounced white supremacists was followed by "Music
Box," on wartime criminals harbored in the USA.
The better Gavras films are fascinating. The man has no fixed or partisan
ideology, yet the same strain runs through his movies: attacking the abuse
of power of any sort. In "Mad City," that principle still applies, since
the media, led by television, wield amazing influence and often abuse it
for sensationalism, ratings and ego-boosting.
The story is one of headlines. Max Brackett (Hoffman) a star investigative
TV reporter for the CTN network, had rubbed the wrong way the powerful,
self-serving and jealous CTN star anchor Hollander (Alda), and had been
exiled to an affiliate in a small California city. Max, chafing at the bit
because his station's manager will not allow him to do big exposes without
proofs, is sent to report on a local museum, now in financial straits. This
turns into manna from Heaven for sensation-seeking Max. Now is his chance
for a scoop that will put him back on top.
As he interviews museum director Mrs. Banks (Danner), the haughty scion of
the founders, there bursts in Sam Baily (Travolta). He is a poor
blue-collar slob who was dismissed as a guard. He is armed with a rifle and
dynamite, not intending to use them, but for getting Mrs. Banks' attention
and plead  for reinstatement. The man is clearly slow-witted and, at least
temporarily, highly deranged.
Accidentally, Sam discharges his gun and hits the remaining guard,
Williams, who is black and was Sam's buddy. Totally confused and remorseful
by events that got out of hand,  Sam keeps hostage a bunch of visiting
school kids, their teacher and Mrs. Banks. He treats them with
friendliness. The crisis grows instantly into a media-circus with crowds,
reporters, cops (and a headline-seeking police chief), firemen, flashing
lights, street vendors...
Connoisseurs realize that "Mad City"'s writers knew Billy Wilder's "The Big
Carnival," (1951), originally titled "Ace in the Hole." Kirk Douglas played
an opportunistic big-city reporter who sees his chance at winning fame (the
Ace) by exploiting cynically a man in New Mexico buried by a cave-in (in a
Hole). The event becomes a media circus (the Carnival).  Is it an accident
that Dustin Hoffman is named Max Brackett? Wilder's longtime writer was
Charles Brackett.
Other inspirations include "The Front Page" (remade as "His Girl Friday);
"Dog Day Afternoon" where a robbery by Dustin Hoffman blows out of
proportions; and various exposes of the TV business (e.g."Network").
The madness continues in broad yet believable lines. Press people, a la
paparazzi, pursue Williams to his hospital bed or film him with from a
scaffolding outside his window. A black reporter insinuates to Mrs.Williams
that racism was involved. A bystander harangues the crowd on Waco, Ruby
Ridge, and people (read "whites") losing jobs through racial quotas.
We've come a long way since "Z," where the press actually helped the Good
Guys. Yet traces of decency remain. Max's initial reaction is only to
exploit the incident, but soon he becomes the advisor-mentor of helpless
Sam. He coaches, then interviews him on camera, trying to show the good,
human side of the man. He also becomes his intermediary and, yes, his
friend, as he walks a tightrope between getting the story and doing the
best he can for Sam.
Played superbly and coolly by Hoffman, he is a canny, intelligent pro,
knows the trade by heart, even anticipates the media's and the FBI's moves.
Caught between several fires, he maneuvers very well --until, that is,
slimy anchor Hollander shows up to steal the show. The two men's
relationship and power struggles are convincingly depicted.
Inevitably, Gavras makes the movie "a l'americaine," with strokes
bolder--and slicker perhaps--than in an European psychological thriller.
This does not hurt, although Travolta is so well in control of his crazed
sad sack characterization that it gets theatrical at times. The technical
credits are very good.  Photography is by Frenchman Patrick Blossier
("Vagabond," "Betrayed," "Music Box"). Editing is by Frenchwoman Francoise
Bonnot who has often worked brilliantly with Gavras, starting with "Z" for
which she received an Oscar. She also won the UK's BAFTA Award.
Then there's the character of Laurie (Kirshner), a pretty, young TV intern,
who was delighted to be assigned to Max for the museum reportage. She
looked at him so adoringly that to avoid entanglements he quipped "I'm
gay." But soon starry-eyed Laurie symbolizes the future of TV. When
Hollander appears, the sweet young thing ceases to be Max's Girl Friday and
switches camps. By implication she would do anything to climb the ladder.
There are no fealties in the business.

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
GOOD WILL HUNTING (1997) *** 1/2  Directed by Gus Van Sant. Written by Ben
Affleck & Matt Damon from a story by Damon. Editing, Pietro Scalia.
Production design, Melissa Stewart. Costume design, Beatrix Aruna Pasztor.
Music, Danny Elfman. Cast: Matt Damon (Will Hunting), Robin Williams (Sean
McGuire), Ben Affleck (Chuckie),Minnie Driver (Skylar), Stellan Skarsgard
(Lambeau), Casey Affleck (Morgan), Cole Hauser (Billy) et al . A Miramax
release. 126 minutes. R (language)
What makes a genius be a genius?  One clue in this film is that its hero
Will Hunting has a photographic memory to end all memories. But then, the
great philosopher Henri Bergson, whose works include the seminal "Matter
and Memory" (1896), used to say that "Memory is the intelligence of
imbeciles." So a one-in-a-gazillion case like Will's must ally memory and
stupendous intelligence. But what is intelligence of this caliber? Never
mind.
Will Hunting is a young, tough Southie (from working-class South Boston)
whose miserable childhood (genes are not mentioned) has led to verbal,
mental and physical aggressiveness outside his small circle of buddies.
Self-taught through gobbling up books in public libraries, Will is a genius
in mathematics, perhaps in other areas too.
One of his idiosyncrasies is refusing to join Establishments of any kind,
from universities to government.  (In a bar, there's a great, on-the-nose
scene that satirizes Academe and academics). Having opted for menial jobs,
he is currently a janitor at the prestigious M.I.T.  As he sweeps a hallway
he spots a problem posted by a famous mathematician, Professor Lambeau, a
major award-winner. The puzzle that defies the best graduate students and
their teachers too is solved by Wil in a jiffy.
Prof. Lambeau tracks down the mysterious and uncooperative savant.  As Will
is psychologically troubled, a street fracas leads him to court. His long
rap-sheet results in a $50,000 bond. The judge is talked into placing Will
in Lambeau's custody, for teaching and therapy. In a series of funny
vignettes, sundry psychologists give up on the young man. As a last resort
Lambeau enlists reluctant Sean McGuire (Robin Williams). The two men used
to be university classmates but fell out. Lambeau went on to glory, McGuire
to counseling and to teaching in a community college. The odd relations
between the two are among the film's strong points.
Defensive, aggressive and cynical at first, second, and third, Will slowly
relents, especially as he becomes aware that Sean is another wounded soul
-- in great part because the death of his wife devastated him. Patient and
analyst become good for each other and bond. Will's "cure" is also aided by
an affair with Brit (and Harvard medical student) Skylar (Minnie Driver).
The movie originated as a short story by Matt Damon, an assignment in
creative writing when he was at Harvard. Damon and childhood friend Ben
Affleck then joined forces to transform the story into a movie script.
Conceived as a thriller, the scenario evolved into a character-driven tale.
Its production took the writers through the usual odyssey of film projects.
Maverick Gus Van Sant, has now directed a movie with mainstream appeal and
predictable developments. But is the subject also of a mainstream nature?
Not really. It may create that impression but deep down its is original,
offbeat.
American films are like the USA itself. They are built on a grand scale far
more often than in other national cinemas. They deal with superlatives.
"Good Will Hunting" does not have the gigantism of  views, crowds, actions
or disasters, yet it fits the superlative label with Will's mind being
extra-extraordinary. Will is a Superman of the mind and the intellect,
which by itself makes the film a rarity, especially in the way it also
weaves in the intimate Will.
In acting, working parts and details the movie rises above deja vu yarns.
The rich dialogue runs from pungent to "intellectual" to touching as Will
gets "tamed" and Sean comes to terms with his own wounds. The process can
be slow in terms of screen time, but that's a necessity when you don't have
the characters magically undergo transformations with Hollywoodian
celerity.  It's all interesting and un-cliched, except in an
audience-courting bit in which Will abandons his last-ditch defensiveness
when he finds out that Sean too is a dedicated baseball fan. Yet even this
cliche is handled with originality. In plot development and spoken lines,
there's a great deal of first-rate writing here, by first-time writers too!
Robin Williams delivers a class A performance, with distant affinities to
that of "Dead Poets Society." Serious, touching yet humorous, he is lively
but not maniacal, frenzied or agitated, does not make with the jokes as
usual.  His portrayal is affecting, even memorable in many a scene. The one
of  his long speech  by the river is heart-rending.   Ranking four stars
for its moving eloquence about love, it is also a superb Valentine to his
dead wife.
Whether or not Damon has the great looks and sex-appeal often mentioned in
the press is not for me to judge, but as a performer he too is striking ,
complex and complicated. as in his relationships with Skylar and all
others. His longest speech is a socially-conscious mini-gem that gives his
reasons for not going to NASA.
Minnie Driver was last seen on the big screen as disc the delightful, kooky
disc-jockey Debi in "Grosse Pointe Blank." On the small screen she recently
appeared on the Jay Leno show -- wrongly and bustily dressed. She's back to
charming us in "GWH."
Swedish actor Skarsgard hits the bull's-eye as big-time mathematician
Lambeau, who is astounded, admirative, discreetly jealous and upset before
the genius of the street-kid prole.
The movie misses out on just one thing, its title. Not catchy, too cute,
making little sense, it sounds like a hunt for bargains at GoodWill
Industries.

Title
Review for Oscar and Lucinda (1997)
OSCAR AND LUCINDA (Australia,1997)  ** 3/4. Directed by Gillian Armstrong.
Written by Laura Jones from the novel by Peter Carey. Photography, Geoffrey
Simpson. Production design, Luciana Arrighi. Editing, Nicholas Beauman.
Music, Thomas Newman. Cast: Ralph Fiennes (Oscar Hopkins), Cate Blanchett
(Lucinda Leplastrier), Ciaran Hinds (Reverend Dennis Hasset), Tom Wilkinson
(Hugh Stratton), Richard Roxburgh (Mr.Jeffris), Clive Russell (Theophilus),
Bille Brown (Percy Smith), Josephine Burns (Miriam Chadwick), Barnaby Kay
(Wardely0Fish), Barry Otto (Jimmy D'Abbs), Linda Bassett (Betty Stratton).
A Fox Searchlight release. 131 minutes. Rated R (sex, violence)
Religion and gambling make strange bedfellows. A rare subject for
literature,too, as in the book that, in 1988, won England's paramount
prize, the Booker, and became the source novel for the film "Oscar and
Lucinda." Yet, the most famous gamble in history is Blaise Pascal's wager.
The 17th century French writer,philosopher, mathematician, physicist bet on
the existence of God, in what is probably the biggest win-win gamble ever.
If God exists, you win. If He does not, you've lost nothing.
This bet is essentially reiterated in "Oscar and Lucinda," though Pascal is
not mentioned or credited. The bettor is Oscar, an Anglican minister whose
story is told in flasback by his great-grandson.
Oscar, born in Victorian England,was a country boy from Devon, who lost his
mother early. His father was a fundamentalist Christian, the leader of the
local Plymouth Brethren. He saw other sects --including the Anglicans --as
heretics, and even punished his son for tasting Christmas pudding, that
work of the Devil.
His fanaticism drove Oscar into the household of an Anglican preacher, then
to Oxford where he studied for the Ministry. An impecunious loner, Oscar
became friends with a schoolmate who introduced him to betting on horses.
The bug bit him with the strength of an Ebola virus. Rather than become
that standard type of fiction, the addicted gambler who loses all, Oscar
became a steady winner.He paid his debts, saved a pittance for his modest
needs and placed his winnings in poor-boxes.
After ordination,to avoid the temptation of gambling while serving God, he
decided to become a missionary in backwoods Australia. He made the long
sea-voyage even though he had aquaphobia, an intense fear of water. I was
amused by someone calling it "hydrophobia," which evokes rabid dogs, bared
fangs and awful drool, whereas poor Oscar is the soul of gentleness!
Lucinda was Australian, a girl with a will. She grew up in the country, had
a fascination for glass, was totally orphaned and inherited a nice fortune.
In Sydney she bought a glassworks and became that extreme rarity for her
day, a female entrepreneur. In her private life, Lucinda was also an
intense gambler who favored cards, played in the homes of known gamblers or
in Chinese dens, wore (how shocking!) bloomers. She shared her love of
glass with the Reverend Hasset. They became friends.All this made Lucinda
more than suspect in the eyes of the public and the clergy.
When Lucinda had gone to England for modern equipment, and was returning to
Australia, she and Oscar met on the ship, recognized their passion for
gambling and became friends.
Their relationship was not carnal, not even overtly amorous, although one
suspects that it was an "amitie amoureuse," -- stronger in Oscar's case.
But he won't say a word since he believes that love exists between Lucinda
and Hasset.
Now, Hasset, whose friendship with Lucinda has raised eyebrows among the
clergy, has been exiled, appointed to a nothing place far within the
outback. Oscar, in a strange move that allies glass and faith, has
Lucinda's works construct a glass church which will be taken to the faraway
boondocks to the Reverend Hasset.
"O & E" is an original tale, to say the least. The paperback edition of the
book is 448 pages. The film is 131 minutes. There is no way that the novel
could be transposed without huge cuts. As a result the movie is fascinating
yet puzzling; fresh yet frustrating; complex but meandering.
At its most basic, a motion picture is an assembly of scenes that contain
images that (generally) have movement in them. There are cuts and there are
cuts. Editing (or cutting) can be slow or fast. Many cuts don't belabor
matters yet convey the essentials. This is good. But when cuts make whole
sections disappear, they may leave gaps and the audience wonders about what
went on.
In "O & L" the absence of certain explanations diminishes
characterizations, motivations and plain facts. Why is Oscar scared of
water? (It is hinted at in the movie but not sufficiently explained). How
did young Oscar fare after breaking with his father? Does Oscar think that
there are no gambling opportunities in Australia? Why does he wear
Salvation Army-type clothes when he later could afford better ones? And how
is it that he can be a regular winner in the tricky area of gambling? What
is his "system"? What was the source of Lucinda's passion for glass and
where does her mother's wealth come from? What, for the public, are exactly
the Prince Rupert's glass drops? Why, in the expedition to haul  the glass
church, does the hitherto rather pleasant leader, Mr. Jeffris turn into a
killer?
(Yes, there's a critique of racism toward the aborigines but it feels
thrown in). Etc.
The film is disjointed and cloudy, although its beautiful photography, sets
and often lush settings can captivate and temporarily refrain you from
asking too many questions. The cast does very well with what it has, but it
is all too sketchy. A pity, as the better Australian movies are strong on
people, motivations and character developments, and that's also director
Gillian Armstrong's forte: "My Brilliant Career," "Mrs. Soffel," "Little
Women" and others.
"O & L" can be stunning with pictorials more than with its human psyches.
The most quoted line comes from the narrator. "In order that I exist, two
gamblers, one obsessive, one compulsive, must meet." Yet the difference
between obsession and compulsion is   murky at the very least.
Many touches of humor do make up partly for the film's frailties. The loss
of Oscar's virginity is both comical and crucial to the plot. The jewel of
the crown, however, is the transporting of the church, a sort of
Fitzcarraldo Lite. It too could have used lengthening within a movie that
needs an extra hour for catching up with the book.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Beautiful Thing (1996)
BEAUTIFUL THING (U.K. 1995) ** Directed by Hettie Macdonald. Written by
Jonathan Harvey from his play. Photography, Chris Seager. Production
design, Mark Stevenson. Editing, Don Fairservice. Cast: GLen Berry (Jamie),
Linda Henry (Sandra,Jamie's mother),Scott Neal (Ste), Tameka Emson (Leah),
Ben Daniels (Tony), et al.  A Channel Four production released by Sony
Pictures Classics. 90 min. Rated R (sex, language, pot-smoking)
The kitchen-sink mentality that started in 1950s British plays and then
films is still with us, with variants and adaptations. A large proportion
of more contemporary movies from the United Kingdom continue to deal with
the "working classes," an euphemism that is seldom used in the US.
There is much in common between the older pictures and the newer, but also
differences, including the fact that working classes are often subjects of
comedies. Even when they are not, even if the films float on a sea of
troubles, the tone can be upbeat, as if the inheritors of Angry Young Men
(and women) who used to made the works of the 50s and 60s are now still
young and critical but no longer angry.
Such un-angries are Jonathan Harvey, who was 24 when his play "Beautiful
Thing" opened to much praise in London, in 1994. Or the play's director,
Hattie Macdonald, who worked closely with Harvey on adapting the play for
the screen. For both it was their first film work.
The movie's opening is slightly surrealistic, as an Indian teacher clad in
a sari gives orders to a melange of schoolboys on their athletic field. We
then move to the main venue, where the film was made during a heat wave in
"the blistering" and "sweltering" summer of 1995. These may be British
criteria, as the absence of sweat and the clothing of the characters do not
suggest furnace conditions to me! The place is the Thameshead Estate in
Southeast London. "Estate" may, among Yanks, conjure up visions of
gentility, but is another British euphemism for low-rent public housing.
The dwellers are the usual Brits -- whose accents badly need subtitles for
all but UK audiences. The focus is on three teenagers (Jamie, Ste and Leah,
who live in contiguous apartments), Jamie's mom Sandra, and her current,
younger lover Tony. They are all nice people, as it turns out.
Jamie is self-conscious, indifferent to the all-important sports and
sometimes bullied by his schoolmates. He often argues with his mother. Sten
excels at sports yet gets  regularly beaten up by his alcoholic father and
his drug-dealing older brother. Next door, Leah, who lives with her mother,
is black, a school drop-out and a devotee of the music of Mama Cass (and
the Mamas and the Papas). She plays it very loudly at all times and dreams
of singing like Mama Cass, but cannot, as she has champagne taste and beer
talent.
Sandra, a chain-smoker and no mean drinker, is 35 --although she looked
older to me-- works as a barmaid and is, within her limitations, a good
mother. Tony, 27, is a post-hippie who becomes increasingly likable.
Within the focus, it is the Jamie-Ste relationship that gives the film its
main theme. The boys get closer to one another as a refuge from various
problems. Their   friendship turns to love, a "beautiful thing to cling on
to" says Jonathan Harvey. The first realization of this panics Jamie ("I'm
a queer!"). He adjusts, however, and, curious, swipes a copy of "Gay Times"
magazine and pours over it.  A split, then a reunion with Ste follow, then
visits to a gay/lesbian/transvestite pub. Finally both Tony ("That's
cool!") and  Mom. turn out to be supportive.
That's the gist of it. The movie picks up speed in its second half, has a
pleasant closure, although Sandra's last-minute decision to drop Tony
--presumably to devote more time to her son -- does not ring true.
The main interest for me was less the gay motif than the depiction of the
working-class milieu. While the Estate is no hovel and has some nice green
areas, its very segregation by class and its tightly joined quarters do
breed the kind of communal life and social promiscuity (not in the sexual
sense) that would limit horizons and condemn the denizens to be stuck in
the lower rungs of society. I find this sad.
I do not think however that this is what the filmmakers are saying.
Playwright Harvey writes that he explained to the boys that his (Harvey's)
parents has reacted perfectly when they discovered he was gay. " I had to
explain to the actors that certainly with me and my friends there wasn't
much of a crisis about being gay. It was just natural to us. It's a happy
love story; you can be gay and happy, you can be working-class and accept
homosexuality."
This upbeat attitude may seem fresh in some quarters, but I believe that by
now,  close to the dawn of the year 2,000, acceptance of gayness should be
treated as a given and not as a great discovery.
As for the depiction of the working classes, no matter how precise, at the
risk of being called a snob I must confess that still more of this
naturalism is getting to be a bit monotonous, in spite of some revealing
dialogues.
"Beautiful Thing" is rife with the basic f-word. This reminded me of a
British  film I had just watched again,  the excellent  "Ladybird,
Ladybird," by a master of working-class movies, Ken Loach. It also came to
mind because of what is, in "Beautiful Thing", a major and perhaps
unintended bonus: the way this and many other U.K. movies seem totally
integrated in matters of race. They show no discrimination, no
self-consciousness or consciousness of differences, no trace of complexes.

Title
Review for Titus (1999)
TITUS  (US-Italy 1999) *** Written and directed by Julie Taymor. 
Freely adapted from Shakespeare's "Titus Andronicus." Photography, 
Luciano Tovoli. Editing, Francoise Bonnot. Production design, Dante 
Ferretti. Costumes, Milena Canonero. Music, Elliot Goldenthal. 
Produced by Jody Patton, Conchita Airoldi and JulieTaymor. Cast: 
Anthony Hopkins (Titus), Jessica Lange (Tamora), Alan Cumming 
(Saturnius), Harry Lennix (Aaron), Jonathan Rhys Meyers (Chiron), 
Matthew Rhys (Demetrius), Angus Macfadyen (Lucius), Colm Feore 
(Marcus), et al. A Fox Searchlight release.162 minutes. R (gory 
violence).
"Do I see it or do I skip it?" I suspect that many readers of reviews 
check this out by cutting to the chase and just checking the critics' 
ratings by stars or letters.  Sometimes this tactic is valid, but it 
does not work for unusual items like "Titus." What's  needed in such 
cases is the equivalent of computer-dating -- matching the movie and 
the personality of the movie-goer.
"Titus" is not the kind of Shakespeare that one would rush to see on 
the stage. Its screen progenitor Julie Taymor has done the next best 
thing: making it a wild sight-and-sound spectacle. Her challenging, 
hugely idiosyncratic production is unlike anything else. It stands on 
its own feet, Roman sandals or Gucci shoes. At three hours minus 
eighteen minutes it is not recommended to the mainstream  public or 
the faint of heart,  but for cognoscenti there is a definite 
enrichment.
Ms. Taymor, admired for her fanciful theater-staging of Disney's "The 
Lion King,". also did a quirky "Titus" off-Broadway around 1994. 
"Titus-the-movie" is a specialty picture. It is for those who follow 
no-holds-barred experimental avant-garde. For Post-modernists who 
specialize in Shakespeare and are curious to see what Ms. Taymor did 
with, and to, the Bard. For some of the many students who never read 
"Titus Andronicus," a work which always been at the bottom of the 
pile of assigned Shakespeare -- assuming it was placed on the list at 
all.
The story revolves around Roman General Titus who returns after a 
great victory over the Goths. He brings prisoners, QueenTamora among 
them. (Her name looks like a version of "Taymor"). Hewing to a jolly 
tradition, he executes her oldest son.
Titus declines to be crowned Emperor. Instead, he nominates foppish 
Saturninus. But the  General modesty and generosity are repaid with a 
maze of political plots, counter-plots, machinations, assassinations, 
rivers of blood and cut-off body parts.
The play, a very early one by William S., is his most gory and 
violent. The film's extra-vivid visuals make it even bloodier. To 
mention merely three gruesome occurences,  Titus's daughter who gets 
raped by two young men before they cut off her hands. Titus's 
self-mutilates.. He cooks up the now-butchered rapists as meat pies 
served to unsuspecting Bad People.
The over-the-top play becomes a topping-the-topper movie. Not a sight 
for sore eyes but a sight to make the eyes sore. Ms.Taymor takes 
Shakespeare's feverish imagination and keeps adding to it. The "less 
is more" principle of the Weimar Republic's Bauhaus ushered in 
modern, simple, functional design. The slogan for this movie should 
be "more is more."
"Titus" was shot in Italy, with some parts in Croatia.. Its 
production credits are a Who's Who of abundantly imaginative, 
audacious collaborators. They are  mostly Italian. The main exception 
is a French woman: veteran, international and eclectic editor 
Francoise Bonnot. She has been cutting films since 1962, including 
six by Costa-Gavras (down to his latest, "Mad City"). Among the 
non-Gavras pictures are  "Black and White in Color," "Un Amour de 
Swann," Polanski's "The Tenant," "The Year of the Dragon." "Titus" is 
a big stretch for Ms. Bonnot, with its surrealism at opposite poles 
to the realism of her past labors.
Julie Taymor's tactics are something like "Anachronism as Art." In 
the demented sights of her film we get automobiles brushing against 
Roman legionnaires, toga-clad people smoking cigarettes, modern 
priests among breastplated warriors, a T-shirted boy,  tuxedo-wearing 
adults among ancient garb, a huge modern bank safe, helmets with 
delirious ornaments, modern jazz, boogie woogie, sundry methods of 
torture, assault rifles, revolvers and poniards....
That's just a sampling. There's also the make-up such as that for 
centurions with  ash-covered faces who march like computer-made 
creatures. Additionally, shots or scenes may remind you of Federico 
Fellini's outlandish faces and bodies; or of his streetwalkers in 
"Nights of Cabiria."
What obviously Ms. Taymor had in mind was to modernize Shakespeare 
while showing his undiminished relevance. She establishes many 
parallels to contemporary (and eternal) politics, maneuvers, tricks 
but no treats. Her references run from the non-glory that was Rome to 
Italian Fascism, dirty deeds, inhumanity, and other such niceties of 
our times
Fantasy has no limits.. And there's the rub. The uncompromising 
excesses are --for what they are -- spectacular, perhaps admirable, 
certainly novel. But they also distract. You don't concentrate as 
much as you wonder whilst the layers of visuals often cover up the 
language.
Above all, Shakespeare is words. His text for "Titus Andronicus" is 
not while not as stupendous as that of  his mature plays, yet is 
still replete with great lines and verse. But I could not always 
catch them. For several reasons.T he one mentioned above. The 
unfamiliarity with the play, even if one has read it before. The 
torrent of words delivered with    rat-tat-tat speed. The accents of 
players who are British, Americans trying to sound British, or Brits 
trying perhaps to sound un-British.
I miss my beloved Oxbridge or BBC accents, especially the amazing 
clarity of Laurence Olivier's euphonious, sonorous, mesmerizing voice 
in his Shakespearian plays and films, in fact in everything else the 
man performed. Also in his narrations, as for "The World at War." For 
that matter, I miss too the voice and delivery of Orson Welles.
In counter-argument to myself I'll admit that while "Titus" needs 
state-of-the art sound equipment, acoustics and audio balance, these 
were not available at the auditorium where I saw this work.
In the audiovisual orgy that is "Titus,":the players range from good 
to excellent in their peculiarly styled roles. Cast leaders Anthony 
Hopkins and Jessica Lange do not sound traditionally 
"Shakesperean,"only semi so. This fits the staging. For Lange  (who 
becomes the new Emperor's consort) and for many of the actors, the 
defining word is "malevolence." Tamora paves the way for Lady 
Macbeth, who by comparison is almost  a sweetie.
The grandest schemer-plotter of them all is Aaron the Moor, played by 
black actor Harry Lennix. He is also Tamora's lover and, in a modern 
way, the main hater of the Establishment and its prejudices. I 
suppose that Shakespeare had a change of heart later when, way ahead 
of his time, he championed minorities such a Jews and blacks. In 
"Othello," the great soul is the Moor of Venice, while the villainous 
Iago is a nasty white man who in some ways inherits Aaron's 
trickeries and treacheries..
Influences or inspirations last to the very end..The last shot is a 
freeze- frame, the kind that Francois Trufaut's "The 400 Blows" made 
so very popular that it became a cliche. Here however, this deja vu 
is mitigated by a clever aural trick. "Vivere," one of the many songs 
by the famous Cesare Andrea Bixio is heard over the end- 
credits..There is no Italian alive who does not know  all Bixio's 
compositions, no Italian tenor who has not sung or recorded them, 
from Tito Schipa and Feruccio Tagliavini to Luciano Pavarotti..The 
singer here is Carlo Buti, in an older, original recording.. All this 
may sound like a detail, but for Italian audiences, "Vivere" which 
means "To Live," makes a melodiously ironical "finis."
NOTE  for lovers of popular Italian music.  Bixio (1896-1975) was 
prolific, had major hits throughout his whole life. Starting with the 
first Italian sound movie "La Canzone dell'Amore" (1930) most, 
perhaps all of his songs were introduced in films. His best period 
was 1930 -1940, with tremendously popular pieces at home and in most 
of Europe:  "Parlami d'amore, Mariu," "Violino Tzigano," "Torna 
piccina mia," "La mia canzone al vento,"  "Mamma,"  "Vivere" and 
others.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Kikujiro no natsu (1999)
KIKUJIRO (Kikujro no natsu) (Japan, 1999) ***. Directed, written, 
edited by Takeshi Kitano. Photography, Katsumi Yanagishima. Art 
editor, Norihiro Isoda. Music, Joe Hisaishi. Cast: Beat Takeshi 
(Kikujiro), Yusuke Sekiguchi (Masao), et al.  In Japanese, with 
subtitles. A Sony release. 116 minutes. PG-13.
Takeshi Kitano (b. 1947) is now probably the best-known media person 
in Japan. He started out in a comedy-club stand-up duo "The Two 
Beats" which went on to television. "Beat Takeshi," became one of the 
names Kitano uses as an actor. He then became a TV superstar ( to 
this day he appears in 8 programs a week),  a movie actor and a 
director-writer-editor as well as a literary person and a cartoonist 
and painter,  Some of his art work can be seen in "Kikujiro."  The 
Kitano cult in Japan  roughly approximates the American enthusiasm 
for Quentin Tarantino, with whom Kitano superficially shares violence 
and cool. But Kitano consciously changes styles.  He prefaces the 
notes on "Kikujiro" with this statement::
"After 'Hana-Bi' ['Fireworks'] I couldn't help feeling that my films 
were being stereotyped: 'gangster, violence, life and death.' It 
becomes difficult for me to identify with them.  So I decided to try 
and make a film no one would expect from me. To tell the truth, the 
story of this film belongs to a genre which is outside my specialty. 
But I decided to make this film because it would be a challenge for 
me to cope with this ordinary story and try to make it my very own 
through my direction, and I tried lots of experiments with imagery. I 
think it ended up being a very strange film with my trademark all 
over it. I hope to continue upsetting people's expectations in a 
positive way."
The genre Kitano refers to is the old one about a kid bonding with an 
adult. The many reviewers of "Kikujiro" have mentioned a plethora of 
titles. although no one seems to remember one of the best, the French 
"The Two of Us." The reviews have been overall middling to negative, 
which is unfair.
Summer holidays finds Tokyo schoolboy Masao at loose ends, bereft of 
pals and things to do. He is also bereft of a mother. She's stepped 
out of his life long ago, left him with his grandma, a working woman, 
yet regularly sends money for the kid. Masao is nine, a bit fat by 
Japanese standards, a bit short by American standards, a bit moody 
and pretty quiet by any standards. He decides to go and visit his 
mother.
 From this point on the spectator must forget about realism, 
verissimilitude and logic. Grandma has a friend whose middle-aged 
husband Kikujiro is a fellow who strikes rough poses, is gruff, 
insulting and aggressive, but probably has a heart of deeply hidden 
gold. The wife orders him to accompany the kid's peregrinations, so 
that we get a sort of road movie with semi-picaresque sides.
The film is, depending on your reactions, slow, leisurely, with an 
oriental tempo (whatever that is), sweet, full of chutzpah (amply 
provided by Kikujiro), improbable, absurd but nice, absurd and 
irritating, charming but predictable, charming and full of surprises, 
unreal, surreal, silly, dull, quietly exciting and inventive, and so 
on...
I will not get into details, descriptions or even an outline. My own 
reaction to the movie is most positive. I like its quiet surprises, a 
great deal of subtly humorous inventions, a few cliches and many 
anti-cliches, the rough but not objectionable edges, sparse dialogue, 
and its originality disguised as deja vu. The main annoyance is not 
the story but a simple, very nice jazz-like music score (piano and 
strings) by the director's pal and collaborator. This gets repeated 
so incredibly often that with all due respect to the most talented 
Kitano, you wonder about his musical ear. Otherwise, this movie is 
one that I enjoyed at the 1999 Cannes Festival and which I just saw 
again with undiminished pleasure.

Title
Review for Kissing a Fool (1998)
KISSING A FOOL * 1/2   Directed by Doug Ellin. Written by James Frey and
Ellin from a story by Frey. Photography, Thomas Del Ruth. Productiondesign,
Charles Breen. Editing, Favid Finfer. Music, Joseph Vitarelli. Cast: David
Schimmer (Max Abbitt), Jason Lee (Jay Murphy), Mili Avital (Samantha
Andrews), Bonnie Hunt (Linda), Vanesa Angel (Natasha), et al. A Universal
release. 93 minutes. Rated R (strong sexual content, coarse language)
It opens with some beautiful aerial shots of Chicago to the sounds a song
(written and sung by Harry Connick) that 's like a "romantic" insipidity, a
throwback to several generations ago.
A wedding is taking place on a splendid suburban estate. Right away, the
film starts playing transparent, cutesy-coy little "guess who? guess what?"
games with the audience. The groom is not identified. A rather tipsy
vulgarian, Linda (Hunt) seems to be a lesser (or  uninvited) guest who
needs to talk -- to anybody -- but  soon reveals that she is the hostess,
the owner of the place.
She plays her game with an unprepossessing, dumb-looking fellow and his
fiancee, taunting them with the story of Max and Jay. It comes out in
episodes.
Jay and Max have been best friends since childhood. You realize instantly
the artificiality of this. Jay, a sensitive young man now working on his
first novel, cannot get over his having been dumped by his girl Natasha,
who became a model, went to Paris, was and still is a tramp. An unlikely
couple and another artificial situation. Jay's novel is based on his
experiences. Some book!
Max is a popular sportscaster and a stud. When it comes to women, he leaves
no stone unturned. He is a foul-mouthed egotist. He has no AIDS, but give
him time. He may know about passes, in football games or in bars, but he is
abysmally uneducated.
Linda (see above) is a wealthy publisher. She will bring out Jay's book,
and assigns to him Samantha ( Israeli actress Mili Avital) as editor, .
Jay, for some reason, persists in setting up a date between Sam and Max.
Max loudly, coarsely and volubly refuses, but Jay wins.
Cut to a haggard Max knocking on Jay's door with his tale of woe about that
date. Cut to Sam doing ditto with a diametrically opposed story. Hey, this
might turn out to be a fin-de-siecle "Rashomon" !  It's not. It's just a
practical joke.
Max and Sam have fallen in love instantly and plan to marry. Never mind
that they are opposites, that Max says "I hate books, she hates sports."
Never mind that Max is really an untraveled yokel and Sam a worldly
sophisticate. So what's the answer? There isn't one, not any more than
there's a key to the impossible friendship between the artistic Jay and the
crass Max. I've always thought that the "opposites attract" theory is mucho
hooey.
Max moves in with Sam. Three weeks later, he gets cold feet as he ponders
about his future as a husband and probably a father. Two big worries.
Number One is expressed: will Sam be faithful to him? Number Two is, I
guess, subconscious and unexpressed: will, I, Max, have to give up all
those chicks?
So Max will test Sam. So Max will ask pal Jay to hit on Sam, then we'll
see. By now the film is 35 minutes old.
Jay, that decent, self-pitying soul, won't hear of it. But somehow, as he
works closely with Sam on his book, he falls for her, and she for him. They
have much in common. Just happens they've both been to that same restaurant
in a small Italian town -- and they ooh and aah about it. And other such
things. Conveniently too, Max has gone to Detroit on an assignment. With a
girl.
Jay and Sam go to a strip-bar where they encounter, of all people, the
notorious Natasha back from France. She is now Natassia. Sam, getting
closer and closer to Jay, plays the game, introduces herself as Claudette.
Jason: : "She is my fiancee." That's wishful thinking.
Let's cut to the chase. There are 3-way confrontations; faithful friend Jay
moves to New York; Max moves out of Sam's apartment. Months pass. Jay's
book is a big hit, Max gets Jay back to Chicago and reunites him with Sam.
We return to the framing story of the wedding of Sam and Jay. Max, dancing
with publisher Linda, tells her: "So, you have money. I do too. That's
good." THE END
A crass tale? Yes. A perverted variant and great-grandchild of the really
romantic Cyrano story? Perhaps.
Max comes to terms with the situation during Jay's stay in the Big Apple,
after he (the I-hate-books fellow) has read a book, probably the only one
in his life, a  gift from Jay. Another colossal improbability. The
leather-bound volume is not "The Further Adventures of Superman" or " Sex
for TV Personalities" but "Maxims," by the great French moralist La
Rochefoucauld (1613-1680). Give us a break! Who's trying to impress whom
with "Cultcha." The scriptwriters showing off theirs?
And who could possibly  ever but ever believe that the cute, intelligent,
educated Sam would fall for the creep Max? And who could possibly ever but
ever doubt, that sooner or later Jay and Sam would become an item?
Or, for that matter, that Jay's book is a huge best-seller? (I admit that
this is less of a stretch than the rest , since so many bad novels do sell
well).
Now, the curious thing is that this dumb movie had some passing attractions
and did often keep my attention. Unhealthy curiosity? The sights and sounds
of Chicago? Good photography? Frankly I can't tell without seeing it again,
in the comfort of my TV screen that is.
One item that did strike me is the magic of the movies. Not special effects
but the fact that Mili Avital looked pretty in all the scenes, beautiful in
others, very beautiful in others yet. Amazing what lighting, makeup, camera
angles, clothing and such can do.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for This Is My Father (1998/I)
THIS IS MY FATHER(US/Ireland) **1/4   Written & directed by Paul 
Quinn. Photography, Declan Quinn. Editing, Glen Berman. Production 
design, Frank Conway. Music, Donal Lunny. Cast: James Caan (Kieran 
Johnson), Aidan Quinn, (Kieran O'Day), Moya Farrelly (Fiona Flynn), 
Colm Meany (Seamus Kearney), Moira Deady (Seamus's mother), Gina 
Moxley (Fiona's mother), Stephen Rea (Father Mooney), John Cusack 
(the flying reporter), Brendan Gleeson (Officer Jim), et al. A Sony 
Classics release. 120 min. R (for a li'l bit of sex)
A family picture, though not in the usual sense, since it is about 
the darker side of families. It is the fruit of three cooperating 
brothers from Chicago: first-time writer-director Paul; actor Aidan ; 
cinematographer Declan. They were also the executive co-producers. 
And if you look at the credits with a lynx-eye you may note that 
their sister Marian has a tiny role. No sibling rivalry here.
I read that Paul "briefly attended the University of  Illinois , 
where he studied film and writing," but soon quit to travel around 
Europe. He lived in Ireland for six months. Back in Chicago, he 
formed (with Jeremy Piven and John Cusack) a theater company.
Declan went to Chicago's Columbia College, lived and worked for years 
in Ireland. Returning to the USA he photographed several films: the 
much neglected The Ballad of Little Jo, Leaving Las Vegas, Kama 
Sutra, Louis Malle's last movie, Vanya on 42nd Street, and others.
This Is My Father is a curious mix of professional production, a 
heartfelt subject with good intentions, gauche development and 
continuity, and rather muddled relationships. It does have a cast of 
performers who are on my list of very good as well as most likable 
thespians.
James Caan, whose career has been sadly spotty since about the 1980s, 
opens the movie as Kieran Johnson --a present-day high school History 
teacher in Aurora, Illinois-- in a classroom  sequence which is 
economical and right on target. He is a disabused professional among 
too many who-gives-a-damn students whose future, he tells them 
without mincing words, is unpromising.
His home life is not uplifting either.  His very old, widowed mother, 
Fiona, is totally incapacitated by a stroke. Living with them is 
Betty, his divorced sister Betty, and her  rebellious teenage boy 
Jack who's been expelled from school. Kieran himself, the stepson of 
Fiona's late husband, was told that his birth father was a French 
sailor.
The discovery of a fading photo of Fiona and a stranger, whose 
love-message as well as a book of poems were signed "Kieran," incite 
the schoolteacher to find out about his origins.  Since it is 
summer-vacation time, he takes off for Ireland, with his nephew Jack.
The search leads to a small Irish village. Kieran learns nothing from 
the close-mouthed locals.  But then, at their bed-and-breakfast, run 
by Seamus and his aged mother (tinkers who have settled down), the 
old lady, first by having her "palm crossed with gold," then gratis, 
tells the Irish-American the story of star-crossed lovers Fiona and 
farmer  Kieran O'Day (Aidan Quinn).
That sad, beautiful tale takes place in 1939. Fiona is 17, lovely, 
independent, spirited. Kieran is several years older. The girl has 
been sent home by the nuns of her school. Home means  Mother, whom 
all call "the widow Flynn" and who is the richest person in the 
village, owns it sole automobile, has a terrible character, is 
authoritarian, and a lush to boot.
Kieran lives with, and works for his foster parents ,tenant farmers 
for the widow. His lowly origins make him what we'd called today 
"disrespected" by the narrow-minded majority of villagers.
The Fiona-Kieran relationship is revealed to us and to the Chicago 
Kieran in successive episodes, with the time frames alternating 
between 1939 and the present. I will not reveal the plot's evolution 
here. No doubt it holds one's attention. Yet that attention is 
needlessly distracted by the film's structure, certain details and 
the lack of others, so that the story proper becomes slow.
For one thing, relationships can be muddled. Certain characters' 
nature or backgrounds (e.g. the widow Flynn's) have to be inferred. 
What makes her so nasty? There are gratuitous sections or portrayals. 
There's an unexplained store-keeper who covets the widow. Landlord 
Colm Meany starts out with small but  unmistakable gay mannerisms, 
but soon these get dropped.  In a silly episode, Yank photo-reporter 
John Cusack who's just learned how to fly, drops in out of the sky, 
close to the couple that's stranded at , the beach by a malfunction 
of the widow's car. A hyperkinetic fellow, the journalist  wants to 
play American football right away, and does.  He also fixes the car. 
Later he and his tiny plane are gone. If this was meant to be 
semi-comic relief, or to underline American vigor, or else a kind of 
childishness, it was a misguided, jarring interlude.
The village priest, a major figure, is played by Stephen Rae as 
meddling, autocratic, fanatically prejudiced, fire and 
brimstone-preaching, and clearly lecherous. Is this going to extremes 
necessary? The same question applies to the presence of young Jack 
who is quite nice and makes friends with two giggly schoolgirls. But 
the  youth scenes, though pleasant are extraneous to the plot.
Harder to swallow --and found in many a movie--is unfounded 
omniscience. The old woman who relates the past (1939)  knows too 
many details and specifics which she could not possibly have 
witnessed. She's like the eye of God --which counters the good 
photography that has nary a close-up (at most medium close-ups) and 
uses medium and long shots which cleverly distance us.
All the performers are fine, in spite of the sketchiness of most 
roles. Good as well as strong is the depiction of the village as a 
suffocating place. As someone says "in small villages a small 
difference makes a big suspicion."
There have been thousands of Irish or Irish-American roles in cinema. 
There have been   quite a few Irish-themed movies, whether made in 
Hollywood, the U.K., and now in Ireland too. But how many of them do 
American audiences know or remember?
Several of those films were political dramas, such as the grim 
classics The Informer (1935) and Odd Man Out (1947). Most of the 
modern ones deal with Northern Ireland: Cal (84), Hidden Agenda (90), 
In the Name of the Father (93). There have been socially conscious 
items, some sad, others upbeat, others mixed: Ryan's Daughter (70), 
The Field (90),  The Commitments (91), The Playboys (92) (with Aidan 
Quinn), Raining Stones (93), The General (98, starring Brendan 
Gleeson as the real-life gangster) ). There have been few outright 
romances, like Circle of Friends (95); or  comedies, like the warm, 
realistically colorful The Snapper (93, starring Colm Meany); and 
probably just one major poetic legend, The Secret of  Roan Inish 
(95). Yet the one title that would be most familiar to most viewers 
would be John Ford's picturesque The Quiet Man (52, starring John 
Wayne).
This is My Father joins the group of grim Irish-centered movies, and, 
whatever its weaknesses, deserves praise for its honest 
,non-commercial avoidance of picturesque or cliched or true or false 
Irishisms. It may not be a film after the Irish Travel Bureau's 
heart, but then this is its principal orginality.
The Irish Republic and Ulster cannot compete with the multitude of 
genre movies, such as Westerns, yet the  overwhelming majority of the 
above titles are gems.  In any case, comparisons would be pointless. 
It's like the elephant mocking the mouse "Look at the size of me, and 
look at the size of you.""Yeah" retorts the mouse "...but I've been 
sick!"
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Bribe, The (1949)
THE BRIBE (1949)  *  Directed by Robert Z. Leonard. Produced by 
Pandro S. Berman.Written by Marguerite Roberts from a story by 
Frederick Nebel. Cinematography, Joseph Ruttenberg. Editing, Gene 
Ruggiero. Music, Nacio Herb Brown (song),William Katz, Miklós Rózsa. 
Cast: Robert Taylor  (Rigby), Ava Gardner, Charles Laughton, John 
Hodiak, Vincent Price, Samuel S. Hinds, John Hoyt, Tito Renaldo, 
Martin Garralaga, et al. An MGM film
For many years, Robert Taylor  (1911-1969) was one of the top stars 
at MGM. He was internationally thought to be the handsomest actor in 
Hollywood. He did deserve to be called "the man with the perfect 
profile," and while not a performer of AAA caliber, he was very good.
Beginning in 1934 (at age 23) he was in a quick succession of movies. 
As the lead in the musical "Broadway Melody of 1936" (1935).he was 
popular, but it is with "Magnificent Obsession" (1935) that he became 
a star. Other films confirmed his status: "The Gorgeous Hussy" (1936) 
and above the super-romantic "Camille" (1937) where as Armand Duval 
he was cast opposite Greta Garbo. Other successes followed, 
culminating again with the World War I sad romance "Waterloo Bridge" 
(1940), with Viven Leigh. In subsequent movies -- in many genres -- 
his  stature remained high, even though few of the pictures were 
truly superior. Some were indifferent. Some were stinkers.
"The Bribe" is in that last category. Still young at 39, Taylor looks 
good -- and that's all one can say about the film, which opens with 
one of the most-used clichés of film noir: the first-person narration 
that leads to a long flashback.
Taylor, named just Rigby, is a Federal agent. His superior calls him 
in. Taylor arrives wearing impeccable, expensive clothes of the kind 
that one mostly sees today (A.D. 2000) on TV network news hosts. 
Egged on by the movie's title, one might suspect that he has been 
taking bribes, but then his boss too is snappily dressed. Perhaps 
some research into Government employees in 1949 is in order.
Rigby is assigned an undercover job in Carlotta, a tropical island in 
Central America. Some clever racketeers purchase in the USA war 
surplus equipment as junk, but secretly too ship to Carlotta valuable 
airplane engines. The operations nets them millions, on which they 
pay no taxes to the US. Government.  Since Carlotta is not a tourist 
place except for deep-sea fishing, Rigby will pose as a dedicated 
amateur fisherman.
The island is transparently one of those formulaic, generic and 
unconvincing studio sets. As usual, the central meeting place for 
locals and foreigners is an hotel with a restaurant, bar and music.
Too many of the clients are wearing (or holding) jackets in 
Carlotta's sweltering weather. It adds another phony note yet. And, 
of course, there is the "de rigueur" beautiful American torch singer 
who is stranded there. In this case she is Ava Gardner, who has an 
American husband, former wartime, then civilian airplane pilot John 
Hodiak. A basket case of disillusionment, he works as barman and is 
habitually in his cups. (Why do they keep him?) The cast is rounded 
out by a peculiar Charles Laughton with hurting feet, and the 
predictably villainous Vincent Price.
Adding to lack of genuineness is the hotel's band of  Central 
American musicians who accompany Ava's singing. But you can sense 
immediately that the music is mostly provided by a large-ish, unseen 
studio orchestra.
Predictably Taylor and Gardner will fall for each other. What follows 
will not be told here except that it lacks shape, suspense, true 
romance, and any sort of interest. Neither Taylor nor Ava are 
convincing in their roles.  What could be noted is that from the 
start of the film there is an enormous amount of smoking by all, even 
by the 1940s standards. If Taylor did this in real life it  is no 
wonder he died of lung cancer.
Ava Gardner's performance is a mediocre as everyone else's. Her 
singing is indifferent. The song she does is by composer Nacio
(for " Ignacio") Herb Brown who contributed splendidly to many a 
film, and whose last picture was no other than "Singin' in the Rain." 
You wouldn't suspect this from the dullness of his song here. Nor 
does the score by another great talent, Miklos Rozsa, make a dent.
How the mighty can fall, at times!   (Edwin Jahiel)
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Man on the Moon (1999)
MAN ON THE MOON (1999) *** 1/2 Directed by Milos Forman. Written by 
Scott Alexander and Larry Karaszewski. Cinematography, Anastas 
Michos. Editing, Christopher Tellefsen and Lynzee Klingman. 
Production design, Patrizia Von Brandenstein.  Cast: Jim Carrey (Andy 
Kaufman), Danny DeVito (George Shapiro), Courtney Love (Lynne 
Margulies), Paul Giamatti (Bob Zmuda), Vincent Schiavelli (Maynard 
Smith), Peter Bonerz (Ed Weinberger), Leslie Lyles (Janice Kaufman), 
Jerry Lawler (himself), et al. A Universal Pictures release. 118 
minutes. R (language, sex)
Man on the Moon is like one of those beautiful, old European squares 
--which are generally round and called "Place," "Platz" "Piazza," 
etc. Many are even more appealing because they come as the meeting 
point of colorful streets or avenues. In this film about the comedian 
Andy Kaufman (1949-1984) what you have is the coming together of 
talents: the main star, the director, the writers, the production 
designers, and more.
Jim Carrey is amazing, lives his part as Andy, becomes Andy, is Andy. 
Stories have circulated about Carrey being like a reincarnation of 
Andy during as well as off shooting. Sounds like publicity, but it's 
a fact.
Director Milos Forman's films are all splendid, from the features 
made in his native Czechoslovakia  in the 60s ("Black Peter," "Loves 
of a Blonde," " The Firemen's Ball") to his American debut in 1971 
with the neglected "Taking Off," then "Hair," " One Flew Over the 
Cuckoo's Nest," "Ragtime," "Amadeus," " Valmont," " The People vs. 
Larry Flynt." They are quirky, eccentric, humorous, well-observed, 
and have warmth without gloppiness. Forman loves the unusual, even 
the demented, which are musts if you make a film about Andy Kaufman. 
"Man on the Moon" takes its title from the eponymous REM song tribute 
to the late Andy.
The screenwriters has previously penned "Ed Wood" and Larry Flynt." 
They too also love and thrive in, the weird. Production designer Von 
Brandenstein, was Oscared for "Amadeus" and nominated for "Ragtime." 
Many other co-workers are veterans of Forman films. The ensemble 
works like clockwork, but you cannot hear them ticking. The tic-tocs 
are all concentrated on the persona of Andy.
"MOM" is a biopic, not factual in all details but faithful to the 
Kaufman spirit. In only two hours one gets not only a first-rate feel 
for the peculiar Andy, but coverage of a large number of his life's 
steps: Saturday Night Live is there; so is the character of Latka 
Gravas of the TV's series "Taxi." Also club appearances; his reading 
all of "The Great Gatsby" to students of Arizona State; the 
mysterious lounge performer Tony Clifton; the Mickey Mouse song; the 
Old Macdonald song; the infamous wrestling matches with women, then 
with the real champion Jerry Lawler; etc. etc. etc. as Yul Brynner 
would say.
Andy was the truest original in the trade and arguably the first 
performance artist. He had no comic shticks. His appearances were 
oddball happenings which puzzled all. The pranks he played on 
audiences, the practical jokes at their expense, his overt 
antagonizing of the public, his sado-masochistic attitudes, his 
private, convoluted jokes and hoaxes were surrealist, dadaist, 
Theater of the Absurd. The aim, we guess, was not to amuse but to 
confuse, to infuriate, to cajole and to insult, to be a provocateur 
whether in childish ways or in highly (but hidden) sophisticated ways.
There was no telling who or what was Andy-the-person and who Andy-the 
performer. One flew into the other. The audiences as well as people 
who knew him personally could not tell whether Kaufman was putting 
them on or being himself. But then "himself" remains elusive to this 
day. It would seem that everything he did -- even in private 
life--was an act .Everything was rigged. Even chance was 
orchestrated, but not so that anyone could tell. Indeed, when it was 
announced that Andy was dying of cancer, all, even his family, first 
thought that it was a stunt.
  In the movie, he tells his last girlfriend, Lynne Margulies "You 
don't knoe the real me." "There's not a real you" she retorts. That's 
the best possible summation of Andy.
"MOM" is no comedy, no entertainment, not anything we've seen before. 
Yet it is fascinating, all the more so because it does not follow the 
canons of entertainment or biopics. Biographical movies are 
notoriously inexact, homogenized (or at least pasteurized), bent on 
tying up loose ends and explaining their heroes or antiheroes. "MOM" 
does nothing of the sort. It is, for this reason, and because Andy 
himself was a huge loose end as well as a loose canon that it all 
rings true. Kaufman, that child of TV who grew up to push the 
envelope farther than anyone in showbiz, remains a mystery.
Carrey's superlative embodiment of Andy should not eclipse other 
roles. Though Courtney Love (as Lynne) has an unimpressive, shortish 
part (the real Lynne, shown on a TV special, is most atractive and 
lively), Danny DeVito brings a palpable warmth as Andy's manager and 
true friend. His pal-client may have been a looney--then again he may 
have been just acutely different-- but he stuck to him. And there's 
Andy's alter ego, the mysterious, obnoxious Tony Clifton, who eludes 
identification. Is he Andy in disguise? Yet well after Kaufman's 
death he reappears to pay homage.
Don't miss the start of the movie. The precredit introduction is 
highly original.

Title
Review for Family Thing, A (1996)
A FAMILY THING  *** 1/2. Directed by Richard Pearce. Written
by Billy Bob Thornton and Tom Epperson. Photography, Fred
Murphy. Editing, Mark Warner. Production design Linda
DeScenna. Music, Charles Gross. Produced by Robert Duvall,
Todd Black, Randa Haines. Cast: Robert Duvall (Earl), James
Earl Jones (Ray), Michael Beach (Virgil), Irma P. Hall (Aunt
T.), David Keith (Sonny), Grace Zabriskie (Ruby), Regina
Taylor (Ann), Mary Jackson (Carrie), Paula Marshall (Karen),
James Harrell (Earl, Sr.),Patrice Pitman Quinn (Willa Mae), et
al. A United Artists release. 109 minutes. Rated PG-13.
Do you remember "Pinky" (1949) or the 1934 and 1959 "Imitation
of Life," both filmizations of a Fannie Hurst novel? Do you
remember what dramas or tragedies resulted in those movies
where a black girl passed for white?
We've come a long way since, but not all the way, as "A Family
Thing" shows. The film' s acting is unarguably superb. The
story is gripping. The direction is warm without corniness,
serious without preachiness, theatricality or sensationalism.
Earl Pilcher, Jr. (Robert Duvall) has a small business in his
rural Arkansas town. From our brief initial look, the place,
though not romanticized, feels like one that must be good to
live in, at least if you're white.
Earl's old mother dies, in an unusually realistic scene. A
couple of days later Earl is handed a posthumous letter, in
which Mrs. Pilcher reveals a big secret. Back in the early
Thirties, she was the friend--but only inside the house--of
her black domestic help. Young Willa Mae, who already had a
son, one day turned out to be pregnant by Mr. Pilcher. She
died giving birth to a very Caucasian-looking boy whom the
Pilchers passed as their biological child Earl,Jr.
Now over 60, with a wife, two grownup children, a father whom
he employs and treats lovingly, and an essentially
uncomplicated life, Earl is stunned. How will this man's heart
and mind deal with the revelation?
In her letter, the defunct lady urges him to get to know the
black half-brother he never knew he had. The reeling Earl 
confronts now penitent Earl,Sr. in a scene made all the more
effective by its avoidance of high-voltage dramatics. Later,
in a fine-tuned cut, sleepless Earl goes from his bed to his
shop's trash can to retrieve the crumpled letter.
With few clues, he abruptly takes off for Chicago in his
pickup truck to track down his brother Ray (James Earl Jones),
a cop, and succeeds. Following an awkward and far from
kiss-kiss reunion (Earl was no surprise to Ray), Earl starts
back for Arkansas. But after a bloody mugging and the theft of
his truck, he lands in a Chicago emergency ward. 
In a plausible development the hospital people contact Ray, 
deliver the wounded man to the policeman who most reluctantly
accepts to look after him for one day. He takes him to his
home ("we have a niggertown in the North too"), in which are
crowded widower Ray's son Virgil (Michael Beach) a city bus 
driver, and Willa Mae's sister, the now blind Aunt T.(Irma P.
Hall).
Ray and Virgil don't exactly warm up to Earl, but Aunt T.
does. She is an authentic character, as sharp as a samurai's
blade. She cannot see skin color and diferences, dispenses
matriarchal authority and wise comments that are deciding
factors for future relations.
Expectedly yet fascinatingly, events change the brothers'
initial antagonism gradually change to rapprochement and to
Earl's tentative understanding of "the others." It's done
without the expected cliche's, sentimental drivel or
cookie-cutter progressions. Instead we get an intelligent,
sensitive, believable approach. 
Less believable is how the senior Pilcher couple managed to
present baby Earl as their own to their small community. But
then, I was so engrossed by the film that I may have missed
something. I still wonder, though.
There's also the matter of  Earl's "whiteness," especially
when you think of Duvall in palefaced roles like Tom, the
Irish-American  Consigliere to the "Godfather"'s Corleone
clan. Then again, a geneticist would say that the unusual is
not the impossible.
The acting by the Duvall-Jones-Hall trio is right on the
button and most moving. Little-familiar Hall is a revelation.
The amazing variety of convincing roles Duvall and Jones have
held is too rich to list. Let cinephiles check their files.
Here, while ever consistent with their personalities, the
three lead portrayals are never obvious, yet they cover a
large spectrum of emotions and reactions. A homily delivered
by Earl to chip-on-his-shoulder Virgil might have been
sententious. It is affecting instead. Secondary characters are
drawn with deft economy.
The credit to the performers ought not to obscure the
contribution of the scriptwriter team (their 1962 "One False
Move" was excellent) or of director Richard Pearce
Pearce, a cinematographer in major movies ("Woodstock," "
Hearts and Minds," etc.), debuted in direction with the
marvelous "Heartland." He went on to make, among others, such
unusually good films as "Threshold," "Country," (with Jessica
Lange), or the little-seen "The Long Walk Home," (Whoopi
Goldberg and Sissy Spacek).
He brings to his work his camera experience, an eye for sets
and textures and a first-rate selection of scenarios. Above
all, this educated Californian (English at Yale, Political
Econmics at the New School for Social Research), has genuine
perceptions, sympathy and empathy for his subjects.
"A Family Thing" is beautifully detailed, pulls no punches,
doesn't impose political correctness. Chicago blacks are
Earl's hijackers and muggers. Later, others try the same stunt
on Ray, in a delicious scene reminiscent of "Lethal Weapon."
(The movie is not without humor that comes naturally).
In the black area, Earl witnesses affluence and misery as he
attempts drunkenly to begin coming to terms with his
negritude. Ray's apartment is so tight that surly Virgil,
resenting Earl being given "my couch," has to sleep inside the
bathtub. Yet Ray drives a shiny late-model car, which makes
the home situation less a comment on income than on housing
and ghettoizing.
Virgil has two cute daughters whom he loves, but these live
with their mother. In a structure of discreet yet telling
parallels, a train passes by Earl's Arkansas house and an El
by Ray's. Not too incidentally either, we get a depressing
view of big city hospital overcrowding.
There's no true closure to this film. It is after the brothers
visit their mother's grave and the movie ends that the really
hard part for Earl will come. In Chicago, he was in a foreign
culture. Adapting was relatively easy. In Arkansas he'll have
to deal with family and friends within their (and his) own
rural culture. Who knows what will develop. Perhaps a sequel?
The movie is easily as touching as "Mr. Holland's Opus."
Neither feelgood nor uplifting, it is stirring and
thought-provoking. All this without your ever looking at your
watch while the film is running.

Title
Review for ĄÁtame! (1990)
TIE ME UP! TIE ME DOWN! (Atame!)(Spain,1990) Written &
directed by Pedro Almodovar. Produced by Agustin Almodovar.
Photography, Jose Luis Alcaine. Editing, Jose Salcedo.
Production design, Esther Garcia. Music, Ennio Morricone.
Cast:Victoria Abril(Marina), Antonio Banderas(Ricky),
Francisco Rabal(Maximo Espejo), Loles Leon(Lola), Julieta
Serrano(Alma), Maria Barranco, Rossy De Palma. A Miramax
release. 105 min. Not rated.(If so, doubtlessly NC-17)
Camp-followers must be pleased these days, what with the work
of David Lynch, the Coen Brothers or Pedro Almodovar.
In TIE ME, Almodovar, Spanish cinema 's  brat who thumbs his
nose at filmic conventions by exaggerating them, takes a minor
but serious movie genre, pushes it to extremes and turns it
into a comedy. This genre is the captor-captive movie. 
Liliana Cavani's scandalous THE NIGHT PORTER had a former Nazi
concentration camp commandant and his former victim enter into
sadomasochistic games. In William Wyler's obsessive THE
COLLECTOR, a young man adds to his butterfly collection a
woman he is infatuated with. In the romantic THE WIND AND THE
LION, a Moroccan desert prince captures an American widow, and
her admiration. And so on.
What Almodovar does in TIE ME is to take themes along such
lines but de-dramatize them with that special Spanish variant
of kitsch known as "hortera."
Ricky (Banderas), released from a mental hospital, has a
fixation on former hooker Marina (Abril) with whom he once had
a one-night stand. She is now a porn-horror star and something
of a junkie--which in Spanish is pronounced "yunkee,"
perilously close to "Yankee."
Ricky forces himself into her apartment but not on her. He
declares: "I am 23, I have 50 thousand pesetas and am alone in
the world. I would like to make a good husband for you and a
good father for our children." Then this peculiar lover, more
swain than swine, proceeds to tie down Marina, oh so gently.
Yet as he had battered her a bit, and she also has other
pains, he proceeds to take care of her needs.These include
analgesics as well as heroin.
Ropes and devotion create bonds. Bondage leads to bonding.
When Ricky comes "home" all bloodied up by street druggies,
Marina's maternal-sexual feelings are aroused. True love
explodes.
One should not dismiss this situation as a misogynist fantasy
by a homosexual director (which Almodovar openly is). On the
contrary, Almodovar's screen world is sympathetically and
empathetically populated by female protagonists. More than
anything else, the point here is to make a parody of pulp
literature, film romances, B-movies, and the post-Franco Spain
which has been catching up with modern times with unfettered,
bewildering speed.
By itself, the main sex-love theme cannot convince us or
sustain the movie, but Almodovar throws in non-stop
peripherals, some pathetic, some not, all of them funny.
Marina, who looks like Rosanna Arquette's Iberian cousin, is
introduced as the movie she stars in is winding down.
It is directed by Maximo Espejo(Rabal) whose name--what a
stroke of genius!--means "maximum mirror." A veteran
filmmaker, now wheelchair bound, he is hornier than ever and,
quote:"making a comeback with a second-rate horror film."
Using the film-within-a film  device, Almodovar satirizes
deliciously yet affectionately the movie-making process and
the mentality behind such flicks.
Marina has a comic, outlandish sexual experience in her
bathtub, with a wind-up toy. Later, handcuffed to Ricky, she
goes out to her friendly, single-mother dentist who generously
offers her pills as well as a joint. In search of other pills
the two women disturb a fornicating lady-pharmacist who
appears girded with a holster and gun.
The television set shows a wild commercial on retirement, with
Germans, as young Nazis, efficiently planning ahead, while the
hedonistic Spaniards dance. 
Bound and gagged, Marina uses the remote control to watch THE
NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD on TV. Ricki's search for dope takes
him to the streets, where dealers are seriously talking
politics and a junkie offers herself to Ricky for 5,000
pesetas. "Make it 4,000" she then says "since I have herpes."
The movie abounds in paradoxes. The main one is that
theoretically, in spite of raunchy language and, at
face-value, sordid scenes, TIE ME is neither dark nor squalid.
Rather it is on the luminous side, and its vulgarity is
systematically de-fanged by Almodovar's eccentric humor. Of
course, it is emphatically not to everyone's taste, but if one
suspends disbelief and sets aside preconceptions, TIE ME is a
wildly entertaining and kinky piece of cinema. It might even
tie you in knots.

Title
Review for Fille sur le pont, La (1999)
THE GIRL ON THE BRIDGE (France, 1999) (La Fille sur le Pont).***1/2 
Directed by Patrice Leconte. Written by Serge Frydman. Photography, 
Jean-Marie Dreujou. Editing, Joelle Hache. Production design, Ivan 
Maussion. Produced by Christian Fechner. Cast:  Avec Vanessa Paradis 
(Adčle), Daniel Auteuil (Gabor), Demetre Georgalas (Takis), Isabelle 
Petit-Jacques (Takis's bride), Frédéric Pflüger (the 
contorsionnist), Giorgios Gatzos (Barker), et al. A Paramount 
Classic release. In French with subtitles. 92 minutes. R 
(sexuality). At the Art. 
Soon after attending a Freaky Film Festival, by a freaky coincidence 
I saw "The Girl on the Bridge." In many ways, this superb, 
fascinating, strange, original  feature was a kind of apotheosis of 
freakishness.
Its director is the so-imaginative Patrice Leconte whose best movies 
include "Monsieur Hire," a wonderful remake of the classic "Panique" 
(1946); the very offbeat love story "The Hairdresser's Husband"; and 
the splendidly sharp and witty "Ridicule," set among aristocrats of 
the court of  Louis XVI and Marie-Antoinette.
Leconte's films are original, clever in scenarios, dialogues and 
performances, with superior cinematography and often colorful 
settings. "The Girl" is all that but now the glorious colors have 
been replaced by glorious black-and-white which aids our 
concentration and gives the film a "classic movie" feel.
It entertains in quirky, funny and sexy ways --all beyond easy 
description. It stars the great Daniel Auteuil and very popular 
singer-actress Vanessa Paradis, 
The picture is constructed like a succession of small puzzles which, 
however, impede neither comprehension nor appreciatioon. Opening on 
a soundtrack of Algerian music is the sequence of Adele, all in 
closeups. She is pretty, about 23, gap-toothed (a Gallic Lauren 
Hutton?) She talks and talks about her sad lot, her string of sexual 
and sentimental failures in male retlationships. It is an odd kind 
of self-analysis, self-criticism and confession. Whom is she 
addressing? A jury? A group of shrinks? She is very much a woman, 
but also strangely childish.
Cinephiles may be reminded of the sequence in  Truffaut's "The 400 
Blows" where the boy Antoine Doinel replies to questions by a 
reformatory's psychologist. Her declarations, paradoxical and often 
quietly funny also bring to mind Jean-Luc Godard's style.
We next meet her in night and fog, on a bridge of the river Seine in 
Paris. She intends to jump to her death. But Gabor appears, talks, 
mocks, argues, and finally fishes her out of the murky waters. He 
rescues her because he needs a new partner, meaning a target for his 
skills as a knife thrower. 
The two become a couple of performers, but not an item. Gabor takes 
her to a posh circus in Monaco where they do their number, The Wheel 
of Death.  She is tied to a rotating wheel. He throws his blades at 
her, It is terrifying yet also, after a fashion, humorous. We are 
asked (but not pressured) to believe that between Adele and  Gabor 
and the knives, there's a kind of mental tele-guidance. He does nick 
her more than once however, and his box of band-aids becomes a funny 
prop. And there's additional mind-power as Gabor -- who will not 
gamble-- has Adele do it and win stacks of money.
The film develops as a strange kind of road-movie which takes the 
duo to Italy, to a cruise ship going to Greece and Turkey, to a 
fanciful, amusing separation of the two. This grows into longing. 
Mind you, there is neither sex nor verbal love-making between the 
man and the girl. Adele is sex-obsessed -- a kind of  nymphomaniac. 
She attaches herself sexually, instantly and serially to man after 
man, consummates sex in comical or farcical scenes (including one 
with a contortionist) but does not  fall in love. Gabor reprimands 
her (when he doesn't shrug his shoulders,) yet keeps his cool --as 
she does hers.
Of course, the movie would be inhumane if Gabor were not gradually 
falling in love. But the film is humane, like those it may remind 
you of partly-- such as Fellini's "La Strada," but without its 
pessimism and grunge. Not to mention Felliniesque music. (The movie 
has an outstanding, rich musical commentary   from much Italian to 
Benny Goodman,  Mariane Faitfull, Hispanic, Turkish, and other 
sounds.)
On board the cruise ship, Adele's latest instant fling is with 
Takis, a chic Greek newlywed whose rationale to Gabor about his 
"blitz" affair with Adele is: "My wife is Italian. We don't 
understand each other.."
Such delectable absurdisms populate the movie. There is even a 
section where Takis and Adele leave the ship and their partners in 
mid-Mediterranean, by escaping in a lifeboat. The sequence seems to 
upend  James Bond who, at the conclusion of many 007 flicks finds 
himself  on a small boat--with a gorgeous female.
Non sequiturs,  frequent metaphors for sex, bits of fetishism, 
surreal sights and sites, symbolism, run rife. Yet they always fit 
the characters, the action, the sets while they are not pretentious, 
sophomoric, pleasd with themselves or irritating.  
This is a devilishly smart and smartly played movie. But I doubt 
that its direction, performances and paraphernalia could exist 
without the splendid script by Serge Frydman who had earlier twice 
collaborated with Leconte.

Title
Review for Blue in the Face (1995)
** 1/2
Directed by Wayne Wang & Paul Auster, with "situations created"
         by Wang & Auster in collaboration with the actors.
Photography, Adam Holender.
Editing, Christopher Tellefsen.
Production design, Kalina Ivanov.
Costumes, Claudia Brown.
Video segments director, Harvey Wang.
Cast: Lou Reed, Michael J. Fox, Roseanne, Mel Gorham, Jim Jarmusch,
      Lily Tomlin, Jared Harris, Giancarlo Esposito, Malik Yoba,
      Joe Zuniga, Victor Argo, Stephen Gevedon,
      the John Lurie National Orchestra, Sharif Rashed, Mira Sorvino,
      Keith David, Peggy Gormley, Harvey Keitel, and others.
A Miramax film.
89 min.
Rated R (language). 
     What do you call a sequel that's not a sequel?  As director Wang
and writer Auster were making the wonderful SMOKE, they realized that
the members of their cast were "assuming a life independent of their
script."  So they had the notion of making a sort of (very much sort of)
follow-up that could be shot fast (it took six days), use available
actors from SMOKE (these are few), add many new, mostly volunteer
performers, do the whole thing as a series of improvisations as opposed
to the carefully scripted SMOKE.
     This time both Wang and Auster are listed as directors.  They also
"created situations" with the help of the cast.  The film was shot in
six days with part of the SMOKE crew and several replacements.  The
funding, provided by Miramax, must have been under a shoestring,
perhaps a few inches only.
     BLUE IN THE FACE takes it title from the actors being urged to
talk until they are just that.  It has little in common with "Smoke"
save that its epicenter is "The Brooklyn Cigar Company," the corner
store managed by Auggie (Harvey Keitel).  The film might better be
called "All You Wanted To Know About Brooklyn and Never Thought of
Asking."
     Sometimes it feels like  "More About Brooklyn Than You Wanted to
Know." At other times it does not.
     BLUE IN THE FACE is a celebration of Brooklyn, its many racial
groups that presumably live in harmony (in the movie they go further,
into friendship), the nostalgia for the Dodgers whose departure hurt so
much, the ghost of Jackie Robinson, the need for retaining TBCC which
is more than just about tobacco, etc.  The statistics include the
number of potholes in Brooklyn.  We also get some new and old
documentary footage.
     BLUE IN THE FACE opens splendidly.  Outside TBCC, Auggie's
girlfriend (Mel Gorham) is talking a blue streak.  A twelve-year old
boy snatches the purse of a woman, is chased and caught by Auggie.  The
bleeding-heart snatchee (Mira Sorvino pre-"Mighty Aphrodite"), though
urged on by experienced, world-wise Auggie, will not press charges.
Disgusted, Auggie gives the purse back to the thief saying "Take it!"
The boy runs off.  Mira is livid with rage.
     Little of the hour-and-a-half is up to those standards.  People
come and go, mostly desultory talk takes place, characters reappear or
don't.  There is a strong climate of good fellowship.  A few sketches
work well, the others do not.
     This is the kind of movie that expands the medium, that you want
to like.  In one sense, it is a very, very distant cousin of talkfest
pictures like the chic METROPOLITAN or the studentish SLACKER.  Even
more distantly, it is a street version of the sophisticated MY DINNER
WITH ANDRE or the films of Eric Rohmer.  In another sense it is close
to e-mail chat, but with a much higher ratio of interesting to dull.
Still, there are arid stretches.
     Nice things do occur however.  Lou Reed, behind the counter at the
start and intermittently, addresses us on a whole mess of ideas,
beginning with the fact he's been leaving Brooklyn for 36 years.
     The end credits are followed by more film then by credits and then
by a heartfelt tribute to the late Jerry Garcia.  So don't walk out of
the theater until the lights come on.  In-between the best improviser
is Jim Jarmusch who goes to the TBCC to smoke his last cigarette and
talk with Auggie.
     What a difference a smart director-writer can make! Here, Jarmusch
could be a character in one of his own movies.  In his several
appearances he discourses humorouly on smoking, tells of his first
cigarette, the result of a robbery by his young friends in Akron, Ohio,
when he was twelve.  He tells of a friend who had his alarm clock wake
him up every four hours, so that he might have a smoke and go back to
sleep.
     Ever the film buff, Jarmusch describes actor Richard Conte in a
war movie where he plays an obsessive smoker.  We see a scene of that
old film.  Jarmusch also tells of the schoolboy interpretation of Lucky
Strike's LSMFT: "Loose Stomach Means Full Toilet," then laughs at the
absurd slogan "It's Toasted."
     He then wonders why, when a movie character's gun is emptied, he
throws the revolver away!  All the while--as well as in in some
sketches with other people--Keitel listens, adds some words, always
makes you feel that he is real and cares about those around him.
     Jarmusch is immediately identifiable.  Others, like Lily Tomlin
as a man, are not.  I had a problem recognizing Roseanne whom I first
took for a sleazy hooker.  Her acting is atrocious.  When she turns out
to be the wife of the store's owner (Victor Argo) she does a dumb
shtick from her TV programs about wanting to go to Las Vegas.
     Madonna, too, as a singing telegram messenger in a sluttish outfit
may cause a double-take as she looks way older than her then 35 years.
She is not amusing.
     Mel Gorham, as a Latino pepperpot, has one of the funniest lines.
She tells Auggie " I um goinggg  to make looove to you, I am goinggg to
ride you like a Beeeg Boool."
     I forget who the dummy is that out of the blue provides us with
this aberrant wisdom: "First you like somebody, then you kiss them,
then you do the dirty, and if you fall in love with them, you marry
someone else."
     Other "situations" can be be dull, but the better ones
compensate.  The novelty and brio of the film are not without charm.
     Sometimes, leftovers can make dishes even better than the
original.  Sometimes they cannot, but they are still worth eating.
"Blue in the Face" is like that.
     NOTE: The last segment is obviously a (welcome) afterthought.  Was
it added after the film was originally shown, as a piece In Memoriam
Jerry Garcia (August 1, 1942 - August 9, 1995)? I am told that it was
screened as "Coffee and Cigarettes" at the Telluride Festival, and that
it was the last video Garcia made.
     Oddly, Jim Jarmusch made "Coffee and Cigarettes" (short,1986),
then "Coffee and Cigarettes Part Two" (short, 1988), then "Coffee and
Cigarettes (Somewhere In California)" (1993).  I have seen at least two
of them, but I don't remember any of those being anything like the item
in "Blue."

Title
Review for Mr. Wrong (1996)
MR. WRONG  * 1/2 . Directed by Nick Castle. Produced by Marty 
Katz. Written by Chris Matheson, Kerry Ehrin, Craig Munson. 
Photography, John Schwartzman. Production design, Doug Kraner. 
Editing, Patrick Kennedy, Music, Craig Safan. Cast: Ellen 
DeGeneres (Martha Alston), Bill Pullman (Whitman Crawford),  
Joan Cusack (Inge), Dean Stockwell (Jack Tramonte), Joan 
Plowright (Mrs. Crawford), John Livingston (Walter), Robert 
Goulet (Dick Braxton), Ellen Cleghorne (Jane), Hope Davis 
(Annie), Brad Henke (Bob), Christine Cattell (Nancy 
Culpepper), Peter White (Mr. Alston), Polly Holliday (Mrs. 
Alston),  Maddie Corman (Missy), et al.  A Touchstone Picture. 
92 mins. PG-13. 
Today you're the toast of the town, tomorrow you're just 
toast. That's what happens to popular TV and stand-up comedian 
Ellen DeGeneres in her first feature role.
Actually, past a dumb giveaway opening scene that leads to a 
long flashback, the start of "Mr. Wrong" is at least as funny 
as the thought of certain people as US President.  Martha 
(DeGeneres), 31, a talent coordinator for a local TV talk 
show, is at her younger sister's wedding. Even when unspoken, 
the pressure by family and friends to have Martha find her own 
Mr. Right permeates the air. Martha however, professionally 
content and personally well-balanced, is acceptably happy as a 
single. She bides her time. There are good nuances in her 
portrait. 
Cut to some amusing office scenes, notably of Martha's much 
younger assistant  Walter who keeps courting her. Cut to 
lonely Martha's date with a yoyo who brags:"I can  sell ovens 
to Eskimos." Nonplussed Martha: "I think the usual expression 
is freezers." He, puzzled: "What would they need them for?" 
And on her doorstep he asks: "Give me a French kiss." Ugh.
The future suddenly materializes in the person of  Whitman 
Crawford (Pullman), met cute (but not too) around a jukebox 
playing the Hank Williams oldie "I'm So Lonesome I Could Cry" 
(performed by Chris Isaak). Before you can say Valentine's 
Day, they're having a hot affair. The morning after, at the 
office, her best friend breathlessly inquires "Did you? Did 
he? Did he?"--1990s coded language for safe sex.  
Martha is in seventh heaven with Whitman's  devotion, 
classiness and gentleness. He writes poetry (he recites some 
gibberish to her in a funny scene) and, as we learn later, 
gets from a trust $50,000 a month. 
When he takes her to see his mother (Joan Plowright)  
weirdness begins to set in. When Martha innocently tells him 
"I want you to be yourself," this turns out to be as drastic 
as pressing the red missile-launching button. Whitman drops 
what we realize was a fake persona and does become himself. 
No, he's no serial killer but a total loony who does odd and 
tasteless things, and desperately wants to marry Martha. In 
turn, she now desperately wants out.
So far, so good. But the movie takes a sudden dive past the 
first 35-40 minutes and keeps shedding ratings stars. The 
balance is devoted to Whitman's relentless pursuit and 
stalking of Martha. 
Unreasonably jealous, Whitman's previous girlfriend Inge 
(Cusack) aided by a fat, hopeless suitor, menaces Martha whom 
Whitman keeps showering with gifts and unwelcome attentions. 
"Mr. Wrong" becomes tedious though not awful (yet), given its 
small ambitions. But after a second plunge it smashes itself 
flat on the pavement.  Meandering, incoherence, confusion and 
stupidity turn fun into fiasco.
Much is wrong with "Mr. Wrong." The direction, hesitant and 
uneven from the start, worsens exponentially. The 
concocted-by-committee scenario gets even more painful. One of 
the scripters had done the "Bill & Ted" flicks. The other two 
are first-timers. Past the initial impetus, the trio grope in 
the dark, have no idea where to go next, fail to find a single 
acceptable development, gag or line.
The plot includes some name performers given either 
microscopic walk-on parts (Goulet) or a small, wasted ones 
(Plowright, Stockwell, TV "Alice"'s Holliday).  
Criminally idiotic is the role of the usually incomparable 
Joan Cusack, slated in my book for the Thelma Ritter Award.  
Criminally cruel is the way DeGeneres is photographed. The 
very fact that she is no movie beauty should have been worked 
on to show us a real person, a change from bimboids. It is 
pure technical sloppiness. Look at Robert Redford in 
newscasts, then at his younger, well made-up and shot, 
transformed face in the previews of his new film.
Coming close to being right in "Mr. Wrong" are a) the natural 
rapport between DeGeneres and Best Friend  Ellen Cleghorne, a 
black actress, and b) the perfect normalcy of older women 
having affairs with younger men. Alas, both notions are way 
underdeveloped, and the second is botched up by the asinine 
ending. 
Perhaps theaters ought to screen only the first section, for 
two thirds off tickets. 

Title
Review for Love in the Afternoon (1957)
LOVE IN THE AFTERNOON (USA, 1957) ***1/2. Directed, produced,written (with
I.A.L.Diamond) by Billy Wilder. Based on the novel Ariane by Claude Anet.
Photography, William Mellor. Editing, Leonide Azar. Production design,
Alexander Trauner. Music, Franz Waxman. Costumes, Hubert de Givenchy. Cast:
Gary Cooper (Frank Flannagan),  Audrey Hepburn (Ariane Chavasse), Maurice
Chevalier (Claude Chavasse, Van Doude (Michel), John McGiver (Mr. X), Lise
Bourdin (Mrs. X) Bonifas (Commissioner of Police), Audrey Wilder ( a
brunette), Gyula Kokas, Michel Kokas, George Cocos. Victor Gazzoli (the 4
Gypsies, musicians), Olga Valery (Lady with Dog),  Leila Croft and Valerie
Croft (Swedish Twins), et al.
Comedy-romance stars Gary Cooper (1901-1961), Audrey Hepburn (1929-1993),
Maurice Chevalier (1888-1972),  with John McGiver in a funny supporting
role, and the Diga Valery Gypsy musicians reinforcing the comedy.  This gem
by Billy Wilder is on my short list of the most underrated movies, and is
one of the least mentioned Wilder films. Of course, it is not without
fervent admirers.
American playboy millionaire Cooper, in Paris, has an affair (one of
dozens) with the wife of bumbling Britisher McGiver. The latter employs
private eye Chevalier, a specialist in getting evidence on unfaithful
spouses. Chevalier's daughter, music  conservatory student Hepburn, learns
of this, goes to the famous Hotel Ritz to warn Cooper that McGiver
(awkardly gun-toting)  is about to catch the couple in flagrante delicto.
A May-December romance develops. Even though Cooper looks his age and may
well have been already ill at the time, and even though Hepburn, then
28-ish, looks radiantly like 19 or 20, the rapport between the two works
extremely well. The loving father-daughter Chevalier-Hepburn relationship
is utterly charming too.
The script is by Wilder and his then-new collaborator I.A. L. Diamond. This
team went on to more superb work together, including the 1959 "Some Like It
Hot." "Love in the Afternoon " is an original movie, in ways sometimes
apparent -- even obvious -- but  also sometimes too delicate and
anti-cliche for unsophisticated viewers -- and the cinema public has been
sadly and gradually losing its sophistication since that movie was made.
Cooper's unusual, un-rakish ladykiller, for example, is deemed improbable
by some people, yet it adds something new to the traditional depiction of
Don Juans. "Love in the Afternoon" has wit, humor, slapstick, sentiment
that never cloys, gags and naughtiness a la Ernst Lubitsch with whom Wilder
had worked and whose major inheritor he became, though with original
creations rather than imitations.
The movie was beautifully and realistically filmed in France: Paris, the
Ritz Hotel,  the Studios de Boulogne, the Opera, the Chateau de Vitry, etc.
The score includes  (repeatedly!)the famous slow waltz "Fascination" by
Filippo D. Marchetti  (copyright 1901) used in a most amusing and
imaginative way.
Though an American production, LITA employed many fine French artists,
technicians and performers. Vienna-born Wilder who had his first career in
German-language films, emigrated to Hollywood (as many Jewish artists did)
when Hitler came to absolute power. Before coming to the USA however, he
spent a couple of years in Paris--where he directed his first film --and
understood very well the French and their wit, both very close to Wilder's
own.
The score (other than Fascination) was by one of the great Hollywood
composers, German-born Franz Waxman, who fled anti-semitism and reached
Hollywood about the same time as Wilder, ca. 1934.
What used to be called "art direction"  and now has become "production
design" is by Alexander Trauner, the best stage designer in France and one
of best in the world.  He makes a small, sub-cameo appearance in the movie.
Hubert de Givenchy (or at least his "Maison," i.e. his firm) provided the
dresses. Givenchy was one of the reigning fashion designers in the world,
known for his chic, discreet elegance (and later, his perfumes). It's worth
looking at the dresses closely and noticing that even in the case of
"schoolgirl" Hepburn, a middle-class, middle-income young lady, what she
wears, while looking appropriate, is subtly the product of Haute Couture.
APPENDIX:  A table in which the age of Audrey Hepburn is compared with that
of her leading men.
 (months of birth not considered --only years)
[Audrey Hepburn, born  1929 . Films where she was much younger than her
leading men.]
ROMAN HOLIDAY 1953, Peck born 1916 ,then 40 / AH then 24 --age diff 16 yrs
SABRINA  1954,  Bogart b. 1899, then 55 /  AH  then 25 -- age diff 30  yrs
WAR AND PEACE 1956, Henry Fonda, b. 1905, then 51 / AH then 27-- age diff
34 yrs
FUNNY FACE 1957,  Fred Astaire, b. 1899,  then 58 / AH by then 28 ---age
diff 30  yrs
LOVE IN THE AFTERNOON 1957,Gary Cooper, b. 1901, then 56 / AH by then 28
--age diff 28 yrs
THE UNFORGIVEN 1960, Burt Lancaster b.1913, then 47 / AH then 31 ---age
diff 16 yrs
CHARADE 1963, Cary Grant,b. 1904, then 59 / AH then 34 /  --age diff 25 years
MY FAIR LADY 1964, Rex Harrison, b. 1908, then  56 / AH then 35 --age diff
21 yrs
PARIS-WHEN IT SIZZLES 1964,  Wm Holden b. 1918, then 46 / AH then 35 -- age
diff 11 yrs
WAIT UNTIL DARK 1967, Efrem Zimbalist Jr.  born 1923, then 44 / AH then
38--age diff 6 yrs
[Audrey Hepburn, born 1929.Films where she was just about 1 year younger
than her leading men.]
BREAKFAST AT TIFFANY'S, 1961, George Peppard  b. 1928, then 33 / AH then
32,   1 yr younger
THE CHILDREN'S HOUR, 1962, James Garner b. 1928, then 34 /AH then 31,  1 yr
younger
BREAKFAST AT TIFFANY'S, 1961, George Peppard  b. 1928, then 33 / AH then
32,   1 yr younger
THE CHILDREN'S HOUR, 1962, James Garner b. 1928, then 34 /AH then 31,  1 yr
younger
BREAKFAST AT TIFFANY'S, 1961, George Peppard  b. 1928, then 33 / AH then
32, 1 yr younger
THE CHILDREN'S HOUR, 1962, James Garner b. 1928, then 34 /AH then 31,  1 yr
younger
[Audrey Hepburn, born 1929. Films where she was OLDER than her leading men.]
ROBIN AND MARIAN, 1976, Sean Connery b. 1930 then 46 /A Hepburn by then 47,
1 year older
GREEN MANSIONS, 1959, Tony Perkins b. 1932, then 27/ AH then 30,    3 yrs older
HOW TO STEAL A MILLION, 1966, Peter O'Toole b. 1932, then 34/ AH then 37,
3 yrs older
TWO FOR THE ROAD, 1967, Albert Finney b. 1936, then 31/ AH then 38, 7 yrs
older ********
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Lone Star (1996)
LONE STAR *** Written, directed and edited by John Sayles. 
Photography, Stuart Dryburgh. Production design, Dan Bishop. 
Music,  Mason Daring. Cast: Chris Cooper (Sam Deeds), 
Elizabeth Pena (Pilar), Miriam Colon (Mercedes Cruz), 
Matthew McConaughey (Buddy Deeds), Kris Kristofferson 
(Charley Wade), Clifton James
(Mayor Hollis Pogue), Frances McDormand (Bunny), Ron Canada 
(Otis Payne), Joe Morton (Delmore Payne), Eddie Robinson 
(Chet Payne), Gabriel Casseus (young Otis) and Beatrice 
Winde (Minnie Bledsoe). A Castle Rock release. 136 minutes. 
Rated R (violence)
John Sayles, who makes movies that are off the beaten track, 
has come up with a rather original, appropriately lengthy, 
and in some ways fascinating film. Nominally, is it a story 
of detection. Near the imaginary  small town of Frontera, 
Texas, across the Mexican border (the Rio Grande), a skull 
is found by chance. Rio County Sheriff Sam Deeds 
investigates. The clues lead him to the certainty that the 
deceased was Charley Wade, once a sheriff himself.
Wade was vicious and corrupt to the bone, a specialist in 
"la mordida" which is what Mexicans call payola or 
extortion. That's how you can get out of a traffic ticket 
south of the border, but Charley, like a gangster in 
sheriff's clothing, went beyond this to protection money. He 
was also a contemptible racist. 
In 1957, Buddy Deeds, Sam's father, was, along with Hollis 
Pogue, one of Charley's deputies. One day, Buddy decided to 
run the corrupt Wade out of town. Wade was never heard from 
again, while Buddy became Sheriff and a local legend.
Some 40 years later, with the now-deceased Buddy being 
locally worshipped (a plaque is being dedicated to him), 
with  Hollis now the Mayor,and Deeds Jr., a newish, honest 
sherriff who makes grafters uncomfortable, Sam becomes 
almost sure that it was his father who had killed Wade. In 
part this is wishful thinking: Sam, an estranged son, would 
like to place the guilt on his own father. 
This is merely the start and premise of the movie. Its 
official synopsis  runs to four pages, my own notes to 
seven. All this because "Lone Star" packs a huge number of 
local persons, acting, interacting, with connected pasts and 
present. Among them is widow Pilar, once Sam's high school 
sweetheart;  Pilar's mother, Mrs. Cruz, a successful 
restaurant owner, also widowed; roadhouse-owner Otis Payne, 
known as The Mayor of Blacktown; the son he had abandoned 
and who now returns as Colonel Payne, there to close an Army 
base; Payne's boy, rather alienated; Bunny, Sam's nutty 
ex-wife; and many others.
One can double the number of those characters as Sayles's 
main tactic is the flashback that shows them in times past. 
The flashbacks occur without warning, so that you must be 
get ready for them. And, whether the time is "now" or 
"then," Sayles adds to his system a large number of cryptic 
scenes that are connected to many a dark secret.  
The movie is ambitious, not limited to a whodunit but 
reaching into ethno-political territory. In a town where the 
gringos still rule yet 19 out of 20 people are of Mexican 
origin, problems of identity are enormous, including active 
or dimly felt racism, the teaching of history to students, 
etc. Some cases are especially interesting, like Mrs. Cruz 
who often says "Speak English! We're in the United States!" 
and denounces "wets" (wetbacks) to the Border Patrol. But 
it's not that simple. There are changes in attitude and the 
flashbacks are full of surprises.
We also get some good insights into non-white and 
non-Mexican matters. When  the spit and polish Colonel 
reprimands a black private, he asks her why , in her 
opinion, there are so many African-Americans in the Army. He 
expects a patriotic reply but what he gets is "This is not 
our country, but the Army is a good deal."  
There's not a dull minute in the film, yet it is not a 
touching work. It is somewhat cerebral, needs much 
concentration. You are kept very busy following and 
deciphering matters as it shifts back and forth to past and 
present. Some scenes are disjointed. Some characters  come 
to a dead end after having served the purpose of making a 
point.  Like Pilar's boy when he is arrested without reason. 
Like two Sergeants, one black one white, openly in  love ... 
to show that times have changed. Like an outdoors seller who 
warns Sam :" Be careful when you go poking, you'll never 
know what you'll find." This last item is a cliche, of which 
this maverick movie is not entirely free. 
This mystery wrapped in an enigma is also poorly miked (at 
least in my preview video), something that is a problem with 
many movies now that performers have stopped enunciating. 
The various accents (genuine or imitated) and Texas drawls 
can make some lines impenetrable. 
Sayles is not prodigal with humor, a point in his favor 
given the seriousness of the setup. The two exceptions I can 
think of is that Chris Cooper, in homage to Gary Cooper who 
played Longfellow Deeds in Frank Capra's "Mr. Deeds Goes to 
Town," has Deeds as his nom-de-film. The other is this 
exchange. Sam: "I'm going to the other side." Colleague: 
"Republicans?" Sam: "No, Mexico." 
"Lone Star", with its large cast of characters, is built 
like a thick novel or like a TV series whose material has 
been compacted. But contrary to television practices, Sayles 
is economical and un-repetitious.
At the Cannes Festival, where I missed it, the film was 
expected with some trepidation, yet after its showing I 
heard no comments whatsoever. I can see why. It must have 
puzzled audiences with its Tex-Mex nature, its convolutions, 
its dialogue that loses flavor in subtitles.
All that said, "Lone Star" is eminently worth seeing. It is 
beautifully produced, shot and performed. Kris Kristofferson 
is far better as a villain than as a hero. The  soundtrack 
of Mexican and American songs is first-rate and, for a 
change, provides the right commentary. Finally this is one 
of the rare films that deal (intelligently too) with 
ethnicities in the USA.

Title
Review for Air Force One (1997)
AIR FORCE ONE  ***  Directed by Wolfgang Petersen. Written by Andrew W.
Marlowe.Cinematography, Michael Ballhaus. Production design, William
Sandell. Editing, Richard Francis-Bruce. Music, Jerry Goldsmith, Joel
McNeely (additional). Cast: Harrison Ford ( President James Marshall), Gary
Oldman (Ivan Korshunov), Glenn Close (Vice President Kathryn Bennett),
Wendy Crewson (Grace Marshall),  Liesel Matthews (Alice Marshall), Paul
Guilfoyle (Chief of Staff), Xander Berkeley (Agent Gibbs), William H. Macy
(Major Caldwell),  Dean Stockwell  (Defense Secretary) ,Tom Everett (NSA
Advisor), Jürgen Prochnow (General Alexander Radek),  et al. A Beacon &
Sony/Columbia release.125 min. Rated R. (Violence, language).
When the Soviet Union dissolved, Hollywood political action-thrillers lost
their favorite enemy. But it was only a matter of time until a substitute
could be found, "AFO" opens with a daring raid by US and Russian commandos
on the Presidential Palace of Khazakstan , a breakaway, independent
republic since 1991. Many guards are killed. General Radek (Jurgen
Prochnow)  the vicious, tyrannical, terrorist-sponsoring President, and a
menace to Russia, is abducted and taken to a Muscovite prison.
At a Moscow conference US  President Marshall (Harrison Ford) makes a
watershed declaration: America will no longer intervene abroad only if US
interests are involved, but also when Evil menaces Good anywhere. It's a
stirring speech that in real life would raise many a political eyebrow. It
gets thunderous applause.
The President, his wife, their 12-year old daughter, a large entourage plus
members of the press board the USA-bound Air Force One plane. The sequence
is impressively staged and photographed. But you guess right away that some
"reporters" are really terrorists and that one American Secret Service man
is a traitor.
Exhausted President Marshall is a regular guy, a happy family man who just
wants a beer while watching a football game on tape. The First Lady looks
nice but is not glamorized. She has some patriotic, duty-first dialogues
with her man, somewhat in Jimmy Stewart style. Daughter Alice (from "The
Little Princess") is  charming.
The terrorists take over the plane, using its huge resident arsenal. The
action is extremely violent. Dead Americans litter the aircraft.  Gary
Oldman (as Ivan Korshunov) is the forceful, devilishly clever, intuitive,
well-prepared leader of the phony newsmen. Excellently cast Oldman speaks
perfect English with a Russian accent. I would trust him to sell me vodka,
but otherwise Korshunov is a frightening monster, a paranoid, True Believer
in Communism. He demands the immediate release of Kazakh President Radek,
otherwise every half-hour he will execute a hostage. He does just that.
At the White House,  the Government's  civilian and military bigwigs
gather, presided over by Vice President Glenn Close. (Bully for this; high
time we had a woman in this post or as First Citizen). Close's performance
is emotional yet efficient. As  a bonus, it also involves her in a
tug-of-war with ambitious Defense Secretary Dean Stockwell. From Europe,
fighter planes get in the act.
This is as far as I will go into the plot without spoiling the suspense of
this recommended movie. And there is plenty of suspense fast, gripping,
suspending your disbelief or numbing your senses to the point that you
ignore much of the action's ludicrousness. Of course you know all along
that after costly battles, the end will find the First Family alive and
well. The suspense, while not nail-chewing about the final outcome ( the Z
on an A to Z scale), works well during the tense events that run from B to
Y. You might get a bit impatient, but not bored.
Harrison Ford's role makes no major demands on his acting,  Gary Oldman's
performance is far more notable. But the choice of Ford as the lead in a
"guy movie" was cleverly calculated to attract many female fans of the now
55-year-old actor.
That Harrison could lose, especially playing a President, is
unconstitutional. That this is a Ford actioneer means he is at heroic
center-stage in "AFO."  That he was a Vietnam hero and Medal of Honor air
ace, skilled and self-sacrificing, are attributes essential to the plot.
There's no scarcity of other clichés. When push comes to shove, President
Marshall transforms himself from world statesman into Indiana Jones,  a
paragon of pugilism, daring, inventiveness and skills. We get mano a
mano-type duels down to the final triumphant face-off.  Or tricks of the
suspense trade that involve a cellular phone, a fax, a gun that the
President gives the traitor in the only ironical scene that made the
audience titter.
The real and new star of the movie is the AFO plane. For the hordes who fly
in steerage AFO is a wonder. The picture does a great job of special
effects and recreating the plane without any plans or much information.
President Clinton has seen the movie twice, both times during flights in
Air Force One.  About the plane's authenticity he declared that "As far as
I know there is no escape pod and I don't think we have quite the arsenal
on there, and there is no back door." He might have added the real plane's
conference room is much smaller. Mr. Clinton "liked a lot" this "very good
movie."
The photography, production values,  and almost all special effects, are
tops. German-born director Wolfgang Petersen skillfully combines in one
work his interest in people in confined spaces (the submarine film "Das
Boot"), a tricky genre, and in Presidential assassinations ("In the Line of
Fire").
I cannot think of the film as literally "entertaining." There is something
disturbing about so many killings and about the psychological trauma of a
12-year old who has witnessed so executions. The story has major gaps. What
was the mechanism of the terrorists' (and the traitor's) preparation?; how
exactly could they fool elaborate security? why did the Secret Service man
(whose has small, vague part) betray? what are the specifics of General
Radek's crimes?
One may wonder what Khazakstan will think of this movie. And whether a
terrorist takeover of AFO  could occur in reality. The chances may be
minute yet for most of us far more credible in "AFO"  than UFO.

Title
Review for Big Store, The (1941)
BIG STORE, THE (1941)  Directed by Charles Reisner. Written by Nat 
Perrin (story), Sid Kuller, Hal Fimberg, Ray Golden. Photography, 
Charles Lawton. Art Director , Cedric Gibbons with Stan Rogers.  Se 
decoration, Edwin B. Willis,  Cast: Groucho Marx (Wolf J. Flywheel), 
Chico Marx (Ravelli), Harpo Marx (Wacky), Tony Martin (Tommy Rogers), 
Virginia Grey (Joan Suttton), Margaret Dumont (Martha Phelps), 
Douglass Dumbrille (Mr. Grover), William Tannen (Fred Sutton), Marion 
Martin (Peggy Arden), Virginia O'Brien (Kitty), Henry Armetta 
(Giuseppi), et al. An MGM film. 89 minutes
The Marxes --with Groucho pretending to be great private eye -- save 
a big department store from crooks.
Practically everybody who has written about this film badmouths it as 
one of the weakest Marx works, if not the weakest. Here is my 
minority opinion.
The movie is certainly not a Marx classic, but it is still a delight 
with many qualities. The brothers do have their share of mad moments 
or even scenes. The Groucho-Margaret Dumont duo (she is, as usual, 
his "souffre-douleur") does nicely. Character actor Henry Armetta has 
funny turns as a customer who comes to the store with his wife and 12 
kids. Six of the latter disappear temporarily within beds which, like 
some other items, each with its own electric wall-button, makes them 
appear or disappear. (A nice parody of the famous hide-a-bed that can 
be stored inside a wall.).
Groucho leads an amusing crows of dancer-singers, all store 
employees, to the pretty good tune of "Sing While you Sell," which 
comes with a medley of boogie woogie and then-familiar songs: "Yes My 
Darling Daughter,""Mama Yo Quiero" and others.
Virginia O'Brien sings a lullaby. She was a specialty comic singer 
for MGM in the 40s, appearing in a dozen and half movies.  Well-known 
for her dead-pan delivery,
she would face the camera in totally impassive closeups, stone-faced. 
No matter what the song she would never shift to any other 
expressions. This is still quite funny.
Singer Tony Martin, very popular, rather handsome and endowed with a 
good voice, does here "If It's You," a pleasant romantic song, and in 
the finale "The Tenement Symphony," with a large orchestra and young 
people's choruses. This number is now ridiculed by many, yet I 
believe that it does not deserve this reaction. Yes, it is  corny, 
but has some good passages that don't call for all that scorn.  The 
music is not bad but it is too grandly sentimental and overall dated. 
Still, the public of the 40s and 50s found it impressive.
Then there's the music provided by Chico and Harpo. They do a piano 
piece for four hands that's clever and amusing. Later, Harpo at the 
harp delivers a pleasant medley within a setting of mirrors in which 
Harpo is shown playing other instruments too. The special effects 
people did a pretty clever job. I suspect that it was inspired both 
by mirror tricks in previous Marx movies. The famous 1948 Hall of 
Mirrors sequence at the end of Orson Welles' Lady from Shanghai may 
or may not have been influenced by this number.
All things considered The Big Store is eminently watchable (and 
listenable) to this day, and a plus in the Marx filmography.

Title
Review for Bacheha-Ye aseman (1997)
CHILDREN OF HEAVEN ( BACHEHA-YE ASEMAN) (Iran, 1997; US release 1999) ***
Written and directed by Majid Majidi. Photography, Parviz Malek-zadeh.
Editing, Hassan Hassan-doost. Set design, Ashgar Nezadh Imani. Production
mgr., Seyed Saeed Seyedzade. Music, Keivan Jahanshahi. Produced by Donah
Film Co. & Institute for the Intellectual Development of Children & Young
Adults. Cast: Amir Naji (Ali's Father), Mir Farrokh Hashemian (Ali),
Bahareh Seddiqi (Zahra), Nafiseh Jafar Mohammadi (Roya), Fereshteh
Sarabandi (Ali's Mother), Kamal Mir-karimi (the Principal) and Behzad
Rafi'i (the Coach). A Miramax release. 88 minutes. In Farsi, with English
subtitles. Rated G.
At the Art Theater.
Iranian cinema became known around the mid-1960s. In 1979,  the fall of the
Shah and the takeover by the Ayatollah Khomeini's regime made the country
into a theocracy with many restrictions and severe censorship.During the
Khomeini decade, cinema declined in numbers, quality and scope.
With the death of Khomeini and a (very relative) "liberalization," good
filmmaking picked up. Several  directors --these days the big name is Abbas
Kiarostami --became world figures, not in the entertainment-oriented,
subtitles-loathing USA, but in Europe and its festivals. Censorship
however, though somewhat relaxed, is still going strong in Iran.
Iranian movies have a special niche from the Shah's days on: films for
and/or about children. An Iranian researcher preparing a video documentary
interviewed several filmmakers on such movies. Other than the expected
reasons ("kids are our future" etc.) a major  stated or subsumed factor was
those films are "safer" and face reduced censorship. As I construe this,
many kidpics can also be an alibi for hinting at negative social and other
conditions.
Before  several autocratic regimes dissolved, the device of circumventing
the censors via indirection was thriving in many countries. In Franco's
Spain or Communist Poland and Czechoslovakia, seemingly non-political
subjects and characters used, in fact "invisible" allusions through
symbols, metaphors, humor or irony, to make their critical points. The work
of many filmmakers was enriched and refined by necessary subtleties. Many
movies of this kind were among the best of national productions.
Children of Heaven is about two kids, Ali, 9, and his younger sister Zahra,
and about a pair of sneakers, Zahra's only shoes. Their working-class
family is dirt poor --but honest, of course. It lacks most  basic
necessities and is hounded by their landlord for overdue rent. In their
home and on the streets, we get telling views of how the other half lives,
more probably the other nine-tenths.
Even the gift of a ballpoint pen takes on large dimensions. I couldn't help
wondering what one of the household's Persian rugs might fetch in the West,
and perhaps keep the group in comfort for  a long time
During one of his many errands, Ali has Zahra's pitiful sneakers repaired
by a cobbler.  Within minutes these get mistakenly picked up by a blind
trashman. Returning home, the terribly upset Ali  is greeted by Zahra's
enchanting smile--before, that is, he tells her the awful truth. Zahra will
smile just twice again in the course of the hour-and-a-half movie.
The siblings say nothing of the loss to their parents since the family is
too poor to afford new shoes. I also suppose that Iranian youngsters,
unlike those of most western countries, have a traditional respect of their
seniors--and respect often goes hand in hand with fear of being the bearer
of bad news.
In their predicament, the siblings decide to share Ali's own (and only)
pair of sneakers when the children go to their respective schools. Zahra's
school is in the morning, Ali's in the afternoon, so there's a kind of
relay race as she passes on the sneakers to her impatiently waiting
brother. Times don't dovetail precisely, so the boy gets to school just
minutes late, is caught three times by the strict but kind (as we later
see) principal. Why Ali doesn't give the man his perfectly good excuse
baffles me. Is Iran so tight-lipped before authority?
The schoolchildren are so nicely disciplined and well-mannered in their
shabby classrooms that it makes American schools look like high-tech
infernos. Yet my Western eyes were depressed by the identically garbed
female pupils in dark pants and blouses and huge white head scarves.
Complications and supense follow. Zahra sees her old shoes being worn by a
classmate. Father gets on his rickety old bicycle with Ali, to seek
gardening jobs for the rich. They cross a Tehran that's beyond their
depressed areas. It's a revelation, another world, a modern city with wide
road, tree-lined avenues, tall buildings, consumer advertising.
Reaching a beautiful residential neighborhood, they are in a fairyland of
clean, quiet, empty   streets totally walled palatial villas with gardens,
intercoms from the gate door to the house, and at times guard dogs .(Read:
splendid but dehumanized)
The points made by the contrasts are obvious. Disembodied refusals are
heard on the intercoms. The father, a terrible, tongue-tied salesman, is
rescued by Ali's making the proposals. Papa gets new respect for his son as
he is hired by a nice old grandfather who pays him handsomely. (Read:
wealthy people do have a heart). Ali plays with the grandson.(Read: kids
are kids, with no social distinctions. Read also: poor little rich boys are
bored and isolated, as in a number of Hollywood pictures).
Once the job is done, the pair leave in high spirits. You sense that
something bad is going to happen. It does, when the bike's brakes don't
work. It is not a serious accident but financially the poor people are back
to square one.
At the boys school, the gym teacher had announced an inter-school
competition of long distance running, four kilometers. The first prize is
two weeks in a holiday camp, a dream for have-not students. Ali,
preoccupied with his troubles and bad shoes did not sign up, but
discovering that third prize is a pair of sneakers, he begs tearfully to
enter the race. The teacher relents.
In an American film, the boy would have won not just third place but first.
I won't say any more. The hard race is well and suspensefully  filmed, the
movie's conclusion is very good, without a neat wrap-up --a big plus.
Acting is good, kids and adults are "real." Among the grownups are several
instances of kindness. The style of COH mixes the documentary and the
dramatic, is clearly (and by the director's admission) derived from Italian
neorealist films, notably De Sica's classic The Bicycle Thief (1948) and
certain other European movies on poverty.
In fact, a new Majidi movie ( all I know is that it is a
"comedy-documentary") made in Iran, produced by Kevin Costner and Jim
Wilson, was announced for February 1999. Its title : The Bicycle Thief. I
have no news of it. Perhaps its U.S. release was postponed because a
re-release of De Sica's The Bicycle Thief has been playing recently in a
few U.S. locations.
COH was a major hit in Iran and a 1999 Oscar nominee for Best Foreign Film.
It is  a good picture, although a number of tricks, plot devices, obvious
constructions, coincidences (note the blind man and the girl with Zahra's
shoes) and manipulations, all for a good cause no doubt, will be sensed by
the viewers. Try as he may, writer-director  Majidi cannot even approximate
the starkness of De Sica's tone. The Italian film was in black and white
and in wet wintry weather, while the colors and sunshine of COH act as a
small palliative to the characters' travails.
The category "Children's Films" may give the false impression that this is
a Disneyfied movie. No, it is for adults, and for young ones who are able
to read the subtitles on the screen.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for 2 Days in the Valley (1996)
2 DAYS IN THE VALLEY (1996) ***  Written and directed by John Herzfeld.
Photography, Oliver Wood. Editing, Jim Miller, Wayne Wahrman. Production
design, Catherine Hardwicke. Music, Anthony Marinelli. Producers, Jeff
Wald, Herb Nanas. Cast: Danny Aiello (Dosmo Pizzo), Greg Cruttwell (Allan
Hopper), James Spader (Lee Woods), Teri Hatcher (Becky Foxx), Charlize
Theron (Helga), Jeff Daniels (Alvin), Eric Stoltz (Wes), Glenne Headly
(Susan), Paul Mazursky (Teddy Peppers), Louise Fletcher (Evelyn), Marsha
Mason (Audrey), Keith Carradine (Detective Creighton), Austin Pendleton
(Ralph), Peter Horton (Roy Foxx), Kathleen Luong (Midori) et al. A Rysher
Entertainment/MGM Credit Lyonnais release. 105 minutes.Rated R (violence,
sex, language)
About one dozen characters meet naturally or fortuitously (read: pretty
artificially) in California's San Fernando Valley where dark deeds are done
in a violent yet comic film that parodies noir films.  Not in the
extra-broad, burlesque style of Mel Brooks ("Blazing Saddles," "Young
Frankenstein," " High Anxiety"), or the "Airplane!" and "Naked Gun" movies
and such, but in "serious" yet tongue-in-cheek fashion.
The characters have a strong family resemblance to the creatures of Quentin
Tarantino, with a nod to David Lynch, but they are relatives, not clones.
They criss-cross paths in a choreography that recalls (from a lot to
somewhat) those of Robert Altman, Robert Rodriguez ("El Mariachi,""
Desperado") Richard Linklater ("Slacker"), Wayne Wang ("Smoke") and other,
mostly newish filmmakers.
The cast has James Spader as a diabolically sadistic killer, so chilling
that he makes many other cold assassins look like ice-cream;  Dany Aiello
as a very Italian-American hitman on the skids who is employed and
exploited by Spader; Becky Foxx as a divorcee would-be victim; the Brit
Gregg Cruttwell (whose feature debut was in the marvellous "Naked") as an
obnoxiously self-centered art dealer with acute kidney-stone pains; Glenn
Headley as his ill-treated secretary; Paul Mazursky as a has-been, suicidal
Hollywood writer-director; Marsha Mason as the art dealer's sister; Jeff
Daniels and Eric Stoltz as a pair of mismatched vice detectives. Others
flesh out the story.
The film's kernel is a devilishly convoluted, outlandish yet clear plot
that deals with money, a stash of $30,000. This is a sum too small by
today's standards to justify so much mayhem, but then, to it is added an
unknown, presumably larger amount of insurance money.That other money is
dragged into the tale in a most improbable way. I won't let the cat out of
the bag, but when you see the film, think of the status of the beneficiary
and you'll see what I mean.
Then again, logic is not the movie's purpose. Beyond some very unlikely or
far too coincidental meetings there is a whole list of items ranging from
the improbable to the impossible. Among them: a bulletproof vest, a person
who is immune to a humongous car explosion,  kidney stones used as a red
herring, shoot-outs as weird as those in some Westerns, skylophobia (fear
of dogs), unexpected cinephilia (the Mason character), a Norwegian spandex
queen who sounds as Scandinavian as Marilyn Monroe  ... I'll stop here for
fear of giving away the story.
Crazy though it is, the story is suspenseful , entertaining in its bloody
way, and bloody well played. The actors ham it up (or down) skillfully. In
his despair, Paul Mazursky (the director and occasional actor), is actually
touching. His love for his dog adds to the pathos. The underworld figure
Aiello is irresistibly simpatico, funny (especially when he cooks for his
captives), surprisingly kind and decent. Headley's sparse dialogue and
reactions quickly establishes her as a natural sweetheart (no saccharine
here).  The insufferable Cruttwell reminds me of the cynical editor in TV's
"Dream On." Teri Hatcher, always a bridesmaid but never a bride in winter
sports, is miles away from her Lois Lane of TV's "Los and Clark." Jeff
Daniels, bearded twice in succession (after "Fly Away Home") is credibly
cast against type as an overbearing policeman on the psychotic side. Eric
Stoltz has a warm presence. And so on down to incidental characters. Louise
Fletcher, in a mere walk-on role, creates a likable character in a matter
of seconds. With more lines but still in a supporting role, Austin
Pendleton delivers a creepy-funny performance.(He is the jerky, talky
small-time actor who, meeting Mazursky in a park, jokingly and cruelly
twists in him -- figuratively speaking-- the knife of failure). Even
Mazursky's terrier Bogey and Cruttwell's pit-bull Marc deliver. When you
accept the fact that this is more fantasy than realism, every creature in
the cast has its function.
Theirs is not true ensemble acting since characters don't bounce all that
much off each other, yet, within the oddball combinations and permutations,
it is good, skilled professional  playing. There is also a savvy, ironic
feel  for the Valley, one that should affect viewers familiar with the
place though not the many who have merely heard of the Valley's malls and
the Valley girls.
The dialogue is lively, the sets are eye-catching, the cinematography by
Oliver Wood ("Mr. Holland's Opus") is excellent, minimally showy,
ungimmicky, often lyrical in  unexpected ways, as when Mazursky walks his
dog. His sense of camera placement is clever without being showoffish or
gimmicky. The  frequent  close-ups and extreme close-ups reinforce  people
and events. For this type of picture, you could almost call the photography
subtle.
"2 Days" is instant gratification. What it will look like ten years from
now is anybody's guess. I say "instant" because, in a manner that is
typical of most U.S. films --whether Hollywoodian or Independent -- there
are no residues or reverberations that stay on in the viewers' hearts or
minds.
While the characters function very well, there is no  real depth or
dimensionality to them. Typically, character complexity is replaced by
character colorfulness, This can entertain but has limited staying power.
Making his feature-film debut here is writer-director John Herzfeld who has
much TV experience. When he says: "For me the entire movie is about
redemption--how someone can save  another person, and thereby save
themselves" he is merely spouting pretentious hokum by trying to add a
subtext to a film that is all surface.
The movie fits a certain new current which will increasingly beget
imitations. This is dangerous, since, in showbiz parlance, topping a gag or
a situation often works,  but topping the topper, like a trapeze act
without a net  can lead to disasters. Think of wise Johnny Carson who would
make a joke, top it, then sometimes try to go himself one better. Generally
this third stage was greeted with friendly audience boos. A masterfully
sheepish Carson would tell them :" I know, I shouldn't have tried for
three."
That said, whatever the future holds, I must admit that when I left "2
Days" I was thinking in terms of  a  ** 1/2 rating.  Later though, with
harder reflection, it was easy to upgrade it to  ***.

Title
Review for Winslow Boy, The (1999)
THE WINSLOW BOY (UK,1999) *** 1/2 Directed and written by David Mamet,
based on the play by Terence Rattigan. Photography, Benoit Delhomme.
Editing, Barbara Tulliver. Production design, Gemma Jackson. Costume
design, Consolata Boyle. Music, Alaric Jans. Cast: Nigel Hawthorne (Arthur
Winslow), Jeremy Northam (Sir Robert Morton), Rebecca Pidgeon (Catherine
Winslow), Gemma Jones (Grace Winslow), Guy Edwards (Ronnie Winslow),
Matthew Pidgeon (Dickie Winslow), Colin Stinton (Desmond Curry, the family
sollicitor), Aden  Gillett (Captain John Weatherstone, Catherine's fiance),
Sarah Flind (the maid Violet), Neil North (First Lord of the Admiralty),
Sara Stewart (the journalist Miss Barnes), Perry Fenwich (a photographer),
Alan Polanski (Mr. Miahcels, Sir Robert Morton's clerk), Duncan Gould
(Commons reporter), Jim Dunk (colleague), Ian Soundy (local reporter), Eve
Bland (suffragette), Chris Porter (MP). Produced by Sarah Green. A Sony
Pictures Classics release.110 minutes. Rated G.
With The Winslow Boy, his sixth film as writer-director, (and seventh as a
writer) David Mamet pulls a Cocteau.  Jean Cocteau (1889-1963) was a jack
of all artistic trades and master of most. He wrote novels, poetry, plays,
ballets, movie scripts; he drew, painted, sculpted, designed pottery,
stained-glass windows; he was an illustrator, a film director, an
occasional actor --but then  his whole life was a performance. It is all
summed up when, in the years preceding World War I, Sergei Diaghilev (the
famed founder and director of Ballets Russes), before Cocteau's desire to
create ballets, told the young man: "Jean, etonne-moi!" ("Surprise me!")
Mamet is not  a Cocteau-like "touche-a-tout"  but a protean
stage-and-screen creator--and full of surprises. His latest and most
radical twist  is to switch from his tough, rough,   vulgar, profane
American subjects and colloquialisms to a most un-Mametish direction and
writing of a British drama of genteel people, manners and speeches. He
succeeds perfectly.
The Winslow Boy is based on a true event in 1908  Edwardian England. George
Archer-Shee was the youngest child of a retired Liverpool bank manager.
George, then approaching fourteen, and a cadet at the Osbourne Naval
College, was expelled for (allegedly) cashing a five-shilling money order
that was not his. His father, convinced of the child's claims of innocence,
challenged the accusation. Not an easy thing to do since he was up against
the College and its parent, the Admiralty which were immune to lawsuits.
The Archer-Shee case quickly caught the imagination of the British public
and became a "cause celebre" which, in some ways, reminds me of the
notorious Dreyfus Affair (1894-1906) which rent France into two camps. The
British camps were, it would seem, far from the rabid or hot-under-the
collar split across the Channel, so that the Archer-Shee affair did not
become notorious and did not create a world-wide stir the way the Dreyfus
case did. Anti-Semitism, played a huge role across the Channel;
anti-Catholicism may have been a factor in the Archer-Shee turmoil. The
French Captain 's indictement was also the result of intense hatred between
liberals and what we would call the extreme right today. The storm around
the English boy looks like more of a matter of belief or disbelief that a
well brought-up subject of the King could stoop to such an un-Britannic
deed. In any case, in 1910, the boy George was exonerated.
The playwright Terrence Rattigan, already popular in England for his
"well-made" plays since the mid-1930s, had his greatest isuccess in  the
U.K and the U.S.A  right after World War II, when he adapted the
Archer-Shee case as the stage-play "The Winslow Boy" (1946). This then
became a very good  film, as did Rattigan's other best known plays, the
Browning Version  and Separate Tables.
"The Winslow Boy" moved its family from Liverpool to London, and the
time-frame from 1908-1910 to 1912-1914. Mamet's version retains all that,
plus very much of the source play, including a change in George's big
sister Kate, from a conservative woman in real life to a suffragette in the
play.
I will not sort out what is Rattigan's, Mamet's or Caesar's. The Mamet
version, as I remember the earlier ones, is both wonderfully faithful to
the originals and wonderfully original at the same time -- a neat trick and
quite an accomplishment. Nor will I detail the story except for
generalities, the first of which is, of course, that the characters show
almost painful British politeness, and sang-froid which hides deep
emotions.
The second is the matching soberness of the superb performers--I mean all
of them.  Nigel Hawthorne triumphs as Arthur Winslow, the father. He has a
rich background of which only the TV series Yes, Minister and The Madness
of King George are familiar to Americans. He never loses his dignity--nor
do the other Winslows-- but is never stuffy either.  Mr.Winslow (no one
could call him just Arthur), goes through agonies which include the melting
of his fortune, yet keeps an upper lip worthy of a nation of Empire
builders.
Rebecca Pidgeon (she is Mamet's wife and plays Catherine Winslow) is
captivating in her disciplined ways. She is particularly appealing when
Desmond Curry, the family solicitor, older, forever and silently in love
with her, produces a coup: he enlists the help of legal eagle barrister Sir
Robert Morton to represent the Winslow boy. Kate, though not a rabid
suffragette, is politically at the opposite pole of conservative Sir
Robert's. Her logical mistrust of him (unfounded in this case) runs
throughout much of the film, enriching her role and his. The barrister is a
cold character (or so it seems), seems almost brutal as he questions the
boy (but there's a catch to this), is a handsome aristocrat who, when the
air is cleared ought to make a perfect mate for Kate. But the movie does
not succumb to easy asides of romance.
The entire family behaves nobly but un-stiffly throughout the ordeal which
includes the necessity to dismiss servants, to cut down expenses, and to be
public figures. Again, none of this is stressed. Facile cliches (in other
hands) are absent. We do not get the standard view passersby pointing to
any one Winslow and whispering "that's the mother, that's the brother."
A point of historical interest I dug up. The real Sir Robert was Edward
Henry, Baron Carson of Duncairn, a major political figure in Ireland and
England where he was elected to the House of Commons and served as British
solicitor general (1900-1905). In 1895, as Queen's Counsel, he was the
cross-examiner at Oscar Wilde's trial for homosexuality, and was
instrumental in the conviction of the writer. That's a bit ironical, given
that in the Archer-Shee affair, Edward Carson went against the Admiralty,
and that for awhile (1916-17) he was First Lord of the Admiralty.
The movie is promising from its start, with plain, sober credits and
unobtrusive music. Its construction also shines by its apparent, classical
simplicity, something that (cf. Renoir, Ozu, Bresson) is far harder to
accomplish than riotous complexity.
Right away, an elegant, sensitive sense of cinema prevails. Within the
first fifteen minutes or less, the stage is intelligently set. It is an
exposition in the tradition of well-made plays, but then, it is a smooth,
un-abitrary class A exposition which does not hit one with cliched verbal
or visual effects. (A class B stage exposition would be the "tell" rather
than "show" kind. Here, for instance, a couple of servants might be
discussing Arthur Winslow in terms such as "Our master, old-fashioned and
skeptical about certain modern trends, is not without a sense of humor.
Although he is the unquestioned head of the family, a give-and-take mood
prevails; etc. etc.") In other words, the class B exposition is a kissin'
cousin of plot-telling in reviews of films and plays.
For the discriminating audience, and especially for those who are familiar
with the source play and its film adaptation, the pleasures of Mamet's
Winslow are in details of speech and cinematography.
Example: as disgraced young George stands outside the family home, in the
rain, he is spotted by the household help. The maid throws a shawl on her
back as she goes out to get him. Seconds later, Kate too does this. But the
shawls and the gestures are different. Observe with care and you will
appreciate the subtleties in the flow and the discreet parallels.
Another example. George, now in another school, comes home  by railroad.
Boys will be boys. The youngster is all excited by the speed of train and
tells Father of his calculations of train speeds, while the old man listens
pleasantly but obviously with his thoughts on the family troubles. A
family, mind you, which without fanfare or rhetoric is smoothly shown
closing ranks and bonding more than ever. This includes Dickie (Matthew
Pidgeon, Rebecca's real life brother in his film debut) who has sacrificed
studies at Oxford to get employment. He bears more than a passing
resemblance to Tony Blair.
The Pidgeons, both American (Rebecca was trained at the Royal  Academy of
the Dramatic Arts) sound totally British, although my sharp-eared friend
Pearl Goodman, rich with the experience of teaching English as a second
language, opined that Rebecca's pitch was more American than British.
A third example. In the House, as Kate sit in the Ladies' Gallery, she sees
the now increasingly likable Sir Robert holding the floor. It is a mere
glimpse through the small openings in a metal trellis. The camera merely
touches on the people then cuts outside to a bobby lighting up a smoke.
That's lighter than air cinematography and editing.
A final example, among many. One aspect of the movie is a return to the
pre-Surgeon General's warnings about smoking. Older pictures exploited the
ways, styles and methods of smoking in a huge variety of telling ways.
Think of how, in Now Voyager, Paul Henreid lights cigarettes for Bette
Davis and himself. Think of  To Have and Have Not, and Lauren Bacall's
historic entrance Humphrey Bogart's room. Think of thousands of films from
all countries and all periods. The cigarette was, arguably, the most
creative of all props.
In Winslow the tradition of creative, expressive smoking is resumed,
notably by Kate, a modern, liberated woman. At the same time, in an early
sequence, the consideration of not overpuffing indoors logically leads Kate
and her fiance to step outside for a cigarette, and outside is where the
plot needs to place them.
I've seen the film twice, starting at the 1999 Cannes Festival's in its
third or fourth day. (It was an official selection but not in the main
competition).  The previous films had been rather disappointing. Winslow
was the first exceptionally good work. Yet there was scant attention paid
to it . I overheard no discussions yet I suppose that The Winslow Boy must
have been deemed "old-fashioned" or "traditional," when the truth is that
it was as clever, subtle and accomplished as a number of older, admired
classics. It is far from a routine filmed or "aired-out" play. What you get
is the best of both worlds.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Wo de fu qin mu qin (1999)
THE ROAD HOME (Wo de fu qin mu qin) (China, 1999) *** to ***1/2. Directed 
by Zhang Yimou. Written by Bao Shi from his novel "Remembrance." 
Photography, Hou Yong. Editing,  Zhai Ru. Music, San Bao. Art direction, 
Cao Jiuping. Produced by Zhao Yu. Cast : Zhang Ziyi, Sun Honglei, Zheng 
Hao, Zhao Yuelin, Li Bin, et al. A Sony Pictures Classics release. In 
Mandarin, subtitled. 100 minutes. Rated G. At the New Art Theater.
Not too many years ago, the heavily propagandistic Chinese cinema was 
unknown in most countries. But that changed with the "fifth generation" of 
imaginative, creative filmmakers among which Zhang Yimou was and is a star 
director who commands international admiration. He began with "Red Sorghum" 
(1988), went on to such jewels as "Ju Dou," "Raise the Red Lantern," "The 
Story of Qiu Ju," To Live," "Not One Less," and others.
Fabled director Joseph von Sternberg (1894-1969) discovered Marlene 
Dietrich, created her screen persona, also had an affair with the lady. 
Most importantly, the two made a series of great movies. Zhang Yimou did 
the same with actress Gong Li. When their association came to a 
professional and personal end, Zhang-ites were concerned. Not to worry. The 
director changed styles with "Not One Less" and with 'The Road Home," 
opting for marvelous simplicity and human interest. He has said that  his 
motivation was "a reaction against the current tendencies in Chinese 
cinema, against the logic of the market. I wanted [my last two films] to be 
simple, immediate and anchored in reality." The reaction was in opposition 
to the market economy, lack of cultural life and the "vulgar films [that] 
dominate our screens." Sounds like an anti-Hollywood summary.
"The Road Home" is set in our day in a small North China village. On rutted 
snow-covered roads, 30-plus Zhao Di is driven in an SUV from the 
unspecified city where he works (in an unidentified business that seems to 
make good money) to his native village from which he has been long absent. 
His father has died. He was the much-loved local schoolteacher who ages ago 
had come there, built a school and taught generations of children.
The deceased's widow insists on a traditional, old-fashioned burial. This 
means that several men must carry the coffin, on foot, to the resting place 
in/by the village. The problem is that the place is not even a village by 
western standards. (At some point I counted the near-totality of the 
gathered adults: 20 to 30 at most!) And since the late teacher had died in 
a neighboring city (distance unspecified) unavailable money is needed to 
pay the pall-bearers and provide food, drinks and cigarettes for them. It 
is not a practical idea, but the widow is adamant, since that's the way her 
late husband will find "his road home." The son does not hesitate to 
provide the funds.
This introduction is in black-and-white film, black with a blueish cast, as 
though the film stock had been tinted --or else color film was developed as 
black-and-white. Soon however come flashbacks, as the son reminisces about 
his father. These are in gorgeous color. The story  proceeds in flashbacks 
and flashforwards. What is unusual is that it reverses the usual procedure 
of showing the present in color and the past in black and white.
The past goes back to the distant days when, to the locals' delight, 
20-year old teacher Luo Changyu (played by Zheng Hao) came to the village 
from a (we suppose) Teachers College in a city (he was breaking some 
unspecified rules). He was an instant hit--especially with 18-year old Zhao 
Di (Zhang Ziyi) for whom it was love at first sight.
(This was the actress's first feature. Her second, as the miraculously 
energetic young woman in Ang Lee's "Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon" made 
her an international star.)  Miss Zhang has a radiant, delicious beauty 
that is used in irresistible ways. There is no question about the outcome 
of the girl-teacher relationship, but it is lovely to follow in a set of 
steps which I cannot reveal. Both young people are well matched, lovable, 
caring and sincere.
Back to the teacher's first day in school. The village population gathers 
outside to hear him address his pupils: "Learn mathematics, learn the 
present, learn the past, keep a journal." Then "spring, summer, fall, 
winter. In everything there is a purpose," and so on. It's lovely. Our own 
college kids could do worse than follow those urgings, especially as so 
much of today's generation is sadly uninformed about both present and past.
The events or non-events of the past, always in color, are lovingly 
depicted, in all seasons. The latter aresplendid sights splendidly 
photographed in wide-screen. There are good times and less good times, but 
nothing really irreparable happens. Even a broken dish that has sentimental 
value is fixed by an itinerant fellow who makes clear that for what he 
charges they could buy a new plate. What nice symbolism here! Attachment to 
things and to people, respect of the best in traditions or old values. And 
the love story goes on with a freshness and a "familiar unfamiliarity" that 
cannot but touch.
There's humor too. It comes naturally. Early on, when the girl is at the 
well, she sees the teacher holding a bucket. As he  starts for the same 
well he is delayed by an eager fellow. She empties the water in her 
containers so as to still be there when the man arrives. (He does not.)
As for the business of carrying the deceased, there are some very 
interesting developments. "Goodbye Mr. Chips" comes to mind.
The movie is nearly flawless. A number of people mentioned to me that its 
music (most melodious) is like a rip-off of the score in "Titanic." Does 
not bother me. What does is a lack of, shall we say, 
journalistic  information: who, where, when, why, what, how...  This may 
not disturb many a viewer, but for those of us who are interested in 
history, politics and such, there's a bit of frustration in store. After 
all, this is not a fantasy, not a fairy-tale, but a movie that no matter 
how perennial and universal in many ways, still is anchored in its 
cultural/historical background.

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
AMERICAN BEAUTY (1999) ***  Directed by Sam Mendes. Written by Alan 
Ball. Photography, Conrad L. Hall. Editing, Tariq Anwar and Chris 
Greenbury. Production design, Naomi Shohan . Music, Thomas Newman. 
Producers ,Bruce Cohen and Dan Jinks. Cast: Kevin Spacey (Lester 
Burnham), Annette Bening (Carolyn Burnham), Thora Birch (Jane 
Burnham), Wes Bentley (Ricky Fitts), Mena Suvari (Angela Hayes), 
Peter Gallagher (Buddy Kane), Allison Janney (Barbara Fitts), Chris 
Cooper (Colonel Fitts), Scott Bakula (Jim No.1) and Sam Robards (Jim 
No. 2). A Dreamworks release.115 minutes. R (language, sex)
My friend Tomas de Torquemada is a very inquisitive fellow.
TT: Why did you wait this long to review American Beauty?
EJ: My paper has limited space. I gave the priority to other titles.
EJ: Because too many worthy films get here without the ballyhoo, 
publicity, promotions, previews, TV "interviews," or reviewers' 
glowing quotes. Hence, many persons miss them -- especially small 
productions, independent ones and especially foreign films.
TT: Yet doesn't movie quality eventually speak for itself?
TT: But at least some non-hyped, unfamiliar titles do make it on 
clocal screens.
EJ: They do. But the publicity is still zilch, the big chains 
schedule few showings, and/or don't keep them long enough for 
word-of-mouth to bring in
the public.
EJ: These are often too indigent for big ads. Since the distributors 
push the big, commercial titles, whenever a good but unfamiliar movie 
does arrive, its best -- often only -- friends are positive reviews 
in local media.
EJ: Not totally, but ninety percent. With rare exceptions, individual 
critics wield no power. What does is a mass of praise coming from the 
majority of the media. Even then, that works mostly for popular, 
mainstream films.
EJ: No, I said "mostly." There are surprises. The Blair Witch 
Project, an original, independent production made for a shoestring, 
has done extremely well, partly thanks to clever distributors who 
spent a fortune on promotion. But by and large, the masses hardly 
read reviews. Let's not fool ourselves about the influence of movie 
critics.
TT: Let's get back to your priorities. What are some of the recent 
movies you reviewed while postponing  American Beauty?
EJ: It was obvious that this film was being received enthusiastically 
by everybody and his sister. My own two cents would not make any 
difference, either way.
EJ: ... solid but unknown titles, many of them foreign: the hilarious 
French The Dinner Game; the beautiful Chinese The King of Masks; the 
quirky British My Life So Far; the French gem for connoisseurs, 
Autumn Tale. American films like the wrenching Holocaust film The 
Last Days; small, good movies which deal with minorities and had no 
publicity, such as Trick, or the Canadian Better Than Chocolate.
TT: But you did include some mainstream titles.
EJ: Yes. Even duds, as save-your-money warnings. Or else items that 
were getting negative reviews but, in my opinion, were highly 
entertaining. Like Double Jeopardy.
TT: Well now, what about American Beauty?
EJ: It 's good. The acting by Spacey and Bening is superb. Spacey is 
highly versatile and talented, can suggest (here and elsewhere) 
ambiguity like nobody's business. This ability serves fleshes out a 
character who, while not eccentric or original, melds anomie, revolt 
and libido.
In her best roles Bening has been a charmer with character, but no 
passive sweetie-pie. Here charm is replaced by nastiness. in the 
difficult role of a compulsive neatnik of the Martha Stewart 
persuasion, as well as an ambitious and shallow creature. She brings 
a weird kind of complexity to an unbending heart and brain.
Everyone knows by now that the film is about a dysfunctional society 
of which we see only a small section, which is conveniently set in 
suburbia. Conveniently because it keeps characters topologically 
close to one another. But there is no real reason for suburbia to be, 
as intended, a genuine culprit.
The who, what, where, how of the movie could as easily be in a 
megalopolis , in non-suburbia or non-exurbia.
There's almost a genre in which suburbanites are the target of 
ironies. The last one was Ang Lee's exceptionally powerful and 
memorable The Ice Storm. If you go back many years, one of the 
pioneering movies in the genre was the sad and sadly forgotten The 
Swimmer (1968) with Burt Lancaster(from a John Cheever story). In 
1975 we had The Stepford Wives (from an Ira Levin novel) that made is 
caustic points by going to science-fiction and its own brand of 
horror. The list is long.
If there is no horror, literally, in American Beauty, the picture is 
a gallery of creeps or creepiness. No one is immune or has redeeming 
values, from the protagonists to the two girls (and classmates) to 
Budy Kane, the smooth real-estate Czar who is not too far removed 
from business zombieism and with whom Carolyn Burnham has a sadly 
mechanical affair. Wes Bentley as Ricky Fitts, the 18-year old 
schoolmate, compulsive videographer,voyeur, druggie and drug-dealer 
is invidiously romanticized by the movie (a mistake, in my opinion). 
He gave me the creeps. Creepy too is his father, retired Colonel 
Fitts  (effectively played by Chris Cooper), with his Nazi 
paraphernalia, his silent, near-catatonic wife (we guess why she's 
that way at film's end, but I won't reveal it in case you have not 
seen the movie), his relationship with his son. Creepiest of all may 
be the son presenting his urine samples to Dad, so as to show he he 
is drug-free.
Also creepy is the supporting role of Lester's new immediate boss who 
stands for materialistic, arrivistic heartlessness, and stupidity. 
When the rebelling Lester tells him off you fell like applauding. But 
this is a secondary, though well worked-in character. The main ones, 
father, mother, daughter and only child Jane (Thora Birch in a 
Christine --The Ice Storm -- Ricci part), her pal  Angela and Ricky 
make up a sextet which is also a SEX-tet.
Each, in his/her way, is a sicko. Not that this is unjustified. 
Angela, the end-of-millennium Lolita, is an icky creature, almost 
repelling for me, but as the beacon of Lester's mid-life-crisis 
libido and his alienation from Carolyn, she fits in well.
Even so, I keep thinking of Gertrude Stein whose words ought to be on 
the Decalogue of Filmmaking: "I prefer the normal to the abnormal, 
since the normal is so much more complex and interesting."
Summarized in High Concept fashion American Beauty is primarily about 
Lester who takes stock of his life and comes up with a negative 
balance. Unnecessarily, the film opens with Lester addressing us "de 
profundis,"  telling us about his last days on this planet and about 
his impending death. This deja vu gimmick detracts from the story, as 
does much of the over-the-top script. It substitutes  "more is more" 
for the advice "less is more."
The overkill goes as far as packing, claustrophobically and  most 
improbably, almost all the characters as next-door-neigbhors.
Admittedly, the photography, by a master, is superb. There is also 
quite an assortment of humorous bits, not the least of which is 
Lester, semi-drunk, alcohol in hand, starting to make passes at his 
own wife who worries about her high-priced couch being soiled. What's 
extra funny to me is that I don't blame her.

Title
Review for Never Talk to Strangers (1995)
1/2 *
Directed by (Sir) Peter Hall.
Written by Lewis Green & Jordan Rush.
Photography, Elemer Ragalyi.
Editing, Roberto Silvi.
Production design, Linda Del Rosario &  Richard Paris.
Music, Pino Donaggio.
Cast: Rebecca De Mornay (Sarah Taylor), Antonio Banderas (Tony Ramirez),
      Dennis Miller (Cliff Raddison),  Len Cariou (Henry Taylor),
      Beau Starr, Tim Kelleher, Eugene Lipinski, Philip Jarrett, and 
      Harry Dean Stanton as "Max Cheski."
Distributed by Tri-Star.
96 minutes.
Rated R (Violence, language, sex)
     The latest Antonio Banderas Movie Of The Week was helmed by
respected stage director Peter Hall (knighted in 1977).  Between 1967
and 1974, Sir Peter also directed six films, mostly adaptations of
plays and mostly unpraised.
     The writers of NEVER TALK TO STRANGERS are not movie celebrities
either, although Jordan Rush must be a favorite son in Carbondale,
Illinois, since he graduated from Southern Illinois University.  There
is also another, more tenuous Illinois connection.  This movie's
Hungarian cinematographer has shot several American films, including
the 1990 JOURNEY OF HOPE (Oscar for Best Foreign Film), which was
co-produced by University of Illinois alumnus Bill Hartman.  All those
tie-ins however do not make a movie worth watching.
     It starts fairly promisingly as bright criminal psychologist Sarah
(Rebecca De Mornay) has another one of her sessions in jail with
accused serial killer Max (Harry Dean Stanton).  Character actor
Stanton is always good and has, in fact, improved a lot of films with
his presence.  Here he claims that he suffers from Multiple Personality
Disorder, so that other selves are guilty.  Ergo, I, Max, am innocent.
     We also meet Sarah's womanizer pal Dennis Miller, with whom she
once slept (she was drunk then).  He then moved into her building, but
now Sarah gently rejects his advances.
     As a stand-up practitioner, actor and talk show host, Miller is
too coarse, questionable and smug.  He is in character here as he
points out to Sarah that he is not after an involvement but only after
sex. (His succinct, explicit phrasing was unprintable in the main paper
I write for.  But for the censorless Internet it was: "I just want to
fuck.")
     Sarah also has somewhere a boy-friend who once day disappeared.
She and Puerto Rican biker Tony (Banderas) meet cute at a liquor store,
where tattooed Tony discourses like a connoisseur of fine wines.  This
is one of the many mistakes of the film, since he looks as though he
should be drinking out of a paper bag.
     In quick succession, Sarah goes to his pad for wine-tasting, which
means immediate, vigorous sex.  Later the two reluctantly exchange
information about themselves.  Tony works in surveillance, electronic
and otherwise.
     Soon the plot thickens to impenetrability.  Sarah is visited by
her estranged and--it's hinted broadly--once abusive father.  Her
off-on relationship with Tony goes with incrementally kinky sex.  It is
uninteresting, even though the bodies are in fine shape and Miss De
Mornay is not siliconed.
     Sarah receives a gift package of dead flowers, then another with
her dead cat.  Later she reads her own obituary in the paper.  The
audience is theoretically supposed to suspect everyone, including Max
who was released for lack of evidence.  But the audience doesn't give a
hoot.
     Intermittently suspecting Tony, Sarah engages a shabby private
investigator.  Now the surveillance man is under surveillance, on the
"set a thief to catch a thief" principle--while Hitchcock is crying
in Movie Heaven.
     Sarah learns that Tony is lying about his trips.  There's an
attempt on her life via an electric heater that is HANGS LOOSELY RIGHT
OVER HER BATHTUB and is magically supposed to fall and electrocute her
at the right moment!
     That's about the only electricity in the film, since there is none
between De Mornay and Banderas.  Instead, this awfully plotted picture
throws our way a shipload of red herrings as it gets exponentially
incoherent, improbable, impossible, unclear, dull, uninvolving and
stupid.  It uses a plethora of flashbacks and/or visions.  The parts
don't join or hold together.  The proverbial "holes so big that you can
drive a truck through" are here fit for locomotives.
     The production values are good, with slick-and-somber camerawork.
There is an overabundance of shots from various angles that stress
enclosed spaces or suggest partitions such as freight elevator bars,
railings and the like, all heavily symbolic of cages, jails and
separations.
     The film is a waste of everything and everyone, especially Old
Reliable Harry Dean Stanton, whom we see too little of.  It was dumb of
the plot to have had him released from jail.  It was even dumber to
have had this movie released.

Title
Review for Keeping the Faith (2000)
KEEPING THE FAITH (2000) **3/4  Directed by Edward Norton. Written by 
Stuart Blumberg. Photography, Anastas Michos. Editing,  Malcolm 
Campbell. Production design, Wynn P.Thomas. Music, Elmer Bernstein 
Cast: Ben Stiller (Jake), Edward Norton (Brian), Jenna Elfman (Anna), 
Anne Bancroft (Ruth), Eli Wallach (Rabbi Lewis), Ron Rifkin (Larry 
Friedman), Milos Forman (Father Havel), Holland Taylor (Bonnie Rose), 
Ken Leung Don), Brian George (bartender) et al. Produced by Hawk 
Koch, Norton and Blumberg. A Touchstone release.  129 minutes. PG-13 
(delicate sexual setups)
Edward Norton is an excellent, versatile actor who has successfully 
avoided becoming stereotyped. This goes for this film too, where he 
plays a Catholic priest. And where Norton, in his first seating on a 
director's chair, has the tricky task of directing himself.
The results are OK. Not great, but still acceptably comedic-farcical. 
The script is pure feelgood Hollywood. You are always conscious that 
you are watching, and listening to, a movie.
In their teens, New Yorker schoolmates Brian, Jake and Anna were 
inseparable. Then the girl's family moved away. Cut to some 16 years 
later. The two men never ceased being best friends. Brian (Norton) is 
now Father Brian, a Catholic priest. Jake has become a rabbi. Both 
see each other all the time, even cooperate on projects. They are 
modern fellows, hep, hip and big hits with their congregations in New 
York's Upper West Side. (Jake's is noticeably upscale).
Anna, now a corporation executive in California is equally successful 
in her line of work. She goes back East for an indeterminate stay, to 
improve the efficiency of her company's New York office. She and the 
men meet for the first time in ages. The moment they see her at the 
airport they are stunned. The trio resume their old companionship.
Now here's the catch, and the movie's "raison d'etre" : both males 
fall in love with her, which means that they have a Big Problem 
--Brian because he is a priest, Jake because Anna is a "shiksa," a 
non-Jewish female.
While. of course, Brian cannot possibly get married, Jake knows that 
he should if he is to get promoted. In his synagogue, parents, and 
especially mothers, find him a most eligible catch for their 
daughters. Jake dates young women, with humorous results. But his 
attraction to Anna keeps growing. They become secret lovers, while 
Anna's relationship with Brian is such that the priest believes she 
feels unbrotherly love for him. What a mess!
Scenes and sequences more amusing than pathetic ensue, some directly 
involving the three principals, others colorfully peripheral.
I confess that I was constantly distracted by questions of height. 
When the three are seen together at the airport, it is obvious that 
Junoesque Anna is taller than Brian who is taller than Jake. But this 
keeps changing all the time. Take a reception attended by the 
Anna-Jake twosome. Within seconds the man goes from equal height to 
taller to less tall, and so on. There must have been hours spent on 
the sets placing boxes under Jake's feet, changing camera angles and 
perspectives, re-changing them.
Other aspects are less questionable, notably the funny ones. Such as 
a thirteen year old boy whose voice is breaking preparing for his 
Bar-Mitzvah. It's a scream and a screech. Such as the inevitable 
cell-phone gags. Or salesman Don whom the two clergymen visit for a 
Karaoke set. The young man switches from Asian English to New York 
accent in a flash, not to mention his singing performances. Or the 
irruption in the synagogue of a black choir, another device by Jake 
to shake up traditionalism. My favorite, seen early in the movie in a 
pre-flashback situation, is when a drunken Brian confides his 
troubles to a barman. The latter, a Sikh with a multi-national, 
multi-ethnic family background has the best and most humorous 
bar-person role I can remember. And so it goes.
On the negative side, the Anna character was uninteresting and left 
me cold. The film entertains, but while its comedy works the romantic 
part (as in "romantic comedy") is unconvincing. Jake, in a variety of 
ways, plays up too much to his congregation. The happy ending is a 
tacked-on cop-out. And the common wisdom that comedies have to be on 
the sorter side is ignored, to the story's detriment and creation of 
some yawns.
On the whole, however, "Keeping the Faith" is most watchable.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Anatomy of a Murder (1959)
ANATOMY OF A MURDER (1959) Directed by Otto Preminger. Written 
by Wendell Mayes from a novel by Judge John D. Voelker 
(writing under the nom de plume Robert Traver). 
Still one of the best courtroom dramas made. Ben Gazzara 
(perhaps the ideal screen hypocrite) here in his second film, 
is an Army lieutenant accused of killing a barman, the 
presumed rapist (throughout,this, as well as the rape, remain 
presumptions) of provocative wife, (Lee Remick in her third 
movie role). He is defended by small-town lawyer James 
Stewart, prosecuted by nasty, big-city George C. Scott. 
Preminger filmed in a real Michigan locale, with clever long 
takes. Clever too is the casting, as the judge, of Boston 
lawyer Joseph N. Welch, the avuncular hero of the 
McCarthy-Army hearings ("Have you no shame, Senator?") that 
had brought about the downfall of the dangerous and paranoid 
Senator from Wisconsin.
The "Anatomy" in question is less that of the trial--which 
remains ambiguous to the end -- than of the American judicial 
system, so that there are in-references, often humorous. Among 
them, a drunken lawyer (Stewart's assistant) is named Parnell, 
which sounds much like  a reference to J. Parnell Thomas who 
was, in a sense, McCarthy's predecessor as chairman of the 
House Un-American Committee of The Hollywood Ten notoriety -- 
and who later landed in prison for financial malfeasance.
The film was a sensation in its day, for its unprecedented 
discussion of sexual matters, rape and a pair of panties. Its 
performances are excellent as well as precise, down to minor 
figures. Note, for example, that of a hostile barman. 
Preminger treats his movie with almost glacial objectivity. 
The visuals are realistic, the photography by Sam Leavitt is 
in creamy black and white with a full scale of shadings. 
The movie made a star of Lee Remick after Lana Turner had 
declined the role. "Anatomy of A Murder" received eight 
Academy Award nominations: for Picture, Actor (Stewart), 
Supporting Actor (Arthur O'Connell and George C. Scott), 
Writing, Cinematography, Editing (Louis R. Loeffler).   
Though it won no Oscars, it was a major hit and high up on 
many Best Movie of the Year lists. The New York Film Critics 
gave it their Best Screenplay prize; the Venice Film Festival 
named James Stewart Best Actor.  
Aside from it other virtues, including a fine Duke Ellington 
score (Ellington has a walk-on role too),the film is something 
of a landmark in the undoing of Hollywood self-censorship. 
Otto Preminger had already breached its prudishness in 1952 
with the comedy "The Moon Is Blue," in which the female lead 
Maggie McNamara used then-taboo language (as when she asked 
William Holden :" Are you trying to seduce me?") or other 
no-no words like "virgin." It may seem ludicrous, in our 
current over-the-top times, that such matters created a furore 
then, but such are the facts.
Then, in 1955, Preminger's "The Man With the Golden Arm," 
about a drug-addict  (Frank Sinatra), heightened the 
controversy. As this was followed in 1959 by "Anatomy of a 
Murder," one might say that those three Preminger movies, 
albeit entirely different,were a kind of Code-breaking 
trilogy. 
"Anatomy" runs 161 minutes, Seeing it on tape or on a cable 
premium channel without commercials is by far the best way. 

Title
Review for Fort Apache (1948)
FORT APACHE (1948) Directed and co-produced by John Ford, from
a screenplay by Frank Nugent, suggested by the story
"Massacre" by James Warner Bellah. Photography, Archie Stout.
Editing, Jack Murray. Art direction, James Basevi. Music,
Richard Hageman.  Cast: John Wayne, Henry Fonda, Shirley
Temple, John Agar, Pedro Armendariz, Dick Foran, Victor
McLaglen and others from Ford's repertory company. 126 min.
A genuine, entirely American masterpiece. The first of the
Ford U.S. Cavalry trilogy. Longish work centers on a military
garrison out West, mostly manned by veterans of the Civil
War--tactfully called here "the late war"-- most of whom had
held higher battlefield commissions. They live in rowdy
harmony until  the new colonel, Thursday (Fonda), a vain,
arrogant, class-conscious martinet, upsets all, from the
cavalrymen to the sensible, humanitarian Captain (Wayne), and
the Apaches of Cochise, whom he first betrays, then attacks
suicidally.
The film takes its delicious time with vignettes of the men
and their families, comic Irish shenanigans, and sub-plots.
The only weak subplot is the romance between Philadelphia
(Temple),the Colonel's daughter, and O'Rourke (Agar, in his
debut,) the new lieutenant from West Point.
It's an affair that starts before the film can get going.
Temple is all smiles and simpers. Agar, as the son of Sergeant
Major Ward Bond and lovely Irene Rich,  is overshadowed by the
masterful acting of his screen parents. But even this romance,
superfluous in other hands, scores some touching points with
Ford.
Whatever the minor flaws, these are entirely made up by the
excellence of the rest of the cast, from the trio of Agar's
three godfather sergeants (here McLaglen partly reprises his
role in "Gunga Din") to the Fonda-Wayne contrast.
Fonda is obviously patterned after General Custer, down to a
superbly filmed Last Stand. Ford has tremendous control over
his film. Army life may have never been quite the way it is
depicted but that's a moot point, one that you raise for
ordinary or "historical" films but not for Ford's stylized
masterpieces. By the standards of the genre, "Fort Apache" is
rather complex in plot, characters and visuals, but it feels
simple because it so cleanly made that even familiar devices,
treated in a fresh manner, become rituals and look un-cliched. 
The film has grandeur but no grandiloquence. Though everything
is a little or a lot bigger than life, nothing seems
self-conscious or artsy. Ford's eye for authenticity, forswift
and effective details of pathos or satire, is amazing. Compare
the brevity and genuiness of Wayne's encounter with Cochise
(whom he respects) with the same situation in another fine
film, Delmer Daves's "Broken Arrow." Ford's talent comes even
more sharply into focus. Even when horses ford a stream,
there's something more striking in their movements than in
most movies by others.
Morally, Ford is walking a tightrope. He blames military
folly, but at the same time he is so taken with the values of
the Army--a wonderful institution, an expanded family --that
at the end there is an inevitable cop-out when Wayne pays an
unconvincing tribute to Fonda. Yet it may be this very
partisanship that, in part, gives this and other Ford movies
their conviction. The warm poetry and lyrical visuals have not
dated a bit. Freeze the frames on a VCR and you get a
collection of splendid individual shots, compositions that
stand as single images and also flow in beautiful continuity. 
To my taste, Richard Hageman's score dates, now is
inappropriate, now like music for a B-movie. This is a
forgettable imperfection in a work that justifies those who
call Ford "King John." Please turn the control to defeat
colorization, if any.  (Edwin Jahiel) 

Title
Review for Schindler's List (1993)
SCHINDLER'S LIST (1993) **** Directed by Steven Spielberg.  Screenplay by
Steve Zaillian, based on the novel by Thomas Keneally. Photography, Janusz
Kaminski. Editing, Michael Kahn. Production design, Allan Starski.  Music,
John Williams. Costumes, Anna Biedrzycka-Sheppard. Cast: Liam Neeson, Ben
Kingsley, Ralph Fiennes, Caroline Goodall, Honathan Sagalle, Embeth Davidtz
and many others. A Universal release. 185 minutes. Rated R (violence).
In the hopelessly inexact but perhaps necessary system of rating movies via
stars, I have been hoarding for a long time the full and unambiguous
four-star classification. Until "Schindler's List." In military terms it's
like calling the film  General of the Army or  Field Marshall.
Considerations of newness, surprise or shock do not enter that rating. I
have been studying history all my life --  and, happening in the most
enlightened of centuries, the Holocaust is not only the most unspeakable
mass crime, but it is literally impossible to speak of it since no
vocabulary contains terms to characterize it. And although man's inhumanity
to man has existed forever, and this earth is full of killing fields, it is
still beyond grasp that a major, cultivated, artistic, highly "civilized"
nation could do what the Third Reich did.
In a sense, it is because "Schindler's List" shook me up so much in spite
of my familiarity  with the events surrounding the movie, that I am almost
speechless with admiration for the film. Admiration? Another poor, stupidly
inadequate word.
Every year I screen for my film students Alain Resnais' heart-rending
documentary on the death camps, "Night and Fog" (1956). Near the end of it,
the narrator says "But what can one say?" and when the lights go on, the
viewers cannot find anything to say. To say something right there and then,
to analyze and criticize what we saw  -- as we do for other films -- would
feel like an obscenity and a desecration...
"Schindler's List" too simply requires stunned silence.  Words like
"great," "superb," "masterpiece" simply sound jarring in the context of
both films. Those terms can be used when talking of parts of the film,  but
not the whole.
Steven Spielberg's movie relates the events around a real person, Oskar
Schindler who saved more than 1,100 Jews in Nazi-occupied Poland.
Schindler, a German (more precisely a Sudentendeutsch from Czechoslovakia),
a member of the Nazi Party and a shady businessman, rushed to Krakow with
only nominal funds, to become a wealthy war profiteer. Ironically, he
accomplished what a number of immigrants (Eastern European Jews fleeing
pogroms among them) achieved after they arrived penniless in  the West,
including the Americas.
Schindler ( Liam Neeson) was a master hustler, a con-man , a sybarite, a
woman chaser, and a consummate bait and switch artist. His strategies for
luring the German authorities into helping him in exchange of gratitude
(bribes of all sorts) were just as good as the strategies of the Desert Fox
(Field Marshall Erwin Rommel) in North Africa. Oskar, that big bear of a
man,  could also use teddy bear tactics to endear himself to the Nazis in
uniform. He he plied them with wine, women and song, with delicacies
plundered from slave countries, with a cut of his profits. And that rake
was such a wizard that he even managed to charm his own wife right after
she caught him "in flagrante delicto" with another woman.
He rapidly managed to take over a confiscated enamelware plant in Krakow,
plunged into the black market for supplies, and with blitz-speed went from
an elegantly dressed facade with nothing behind it (no rags for Schindler),
to riches. His main ploy was to obtain free, unpaid labor, in the shape of
desperate Jews for whom employment in an industry touted by Schindler as
essential to the war effort, was at least a temporary haven from
annihilation.
Gradually though, self-serving, amoral Schindler came to a kind of
ill-defined consciousness of the Jews' tragedy. It was a slow process -- no
sudden revelation, no road to Damascus.  Endangering his own life, he went
to radical efforts of lying, bluffing and cajoling in order to employ more
Jews, saving  many from a death camp and ultimately even snatching them
from another. The train leaving  Auschwitz with a load of living  inmates
is visually extraordinary and historically unique.
The film is the partial tale of Oskar Schindler along with the partial tale
of the Jews around him :   branded and expropriated, moved into a specially
created ghetto, then wiped out in summary executions in streets, houses and
death camps. The film focuses especially on Itzhak Stern (Ben Kingsley),
Schindler's accountant and right-hand man. It is also the tale of the
Germans, specifically Obersturmbannfuehrer (Lieutenant Colonel) Amon Goeth
(Ralph Fiennes), the local SS Commandant, and a monster.
Contrary to some irresponsible critiques that Spielberg depicts the rest of
the Jews as anonymous masses, a number of reappearing characters do stand
out within the multitude. Spielberg manages the near-impossible coup of
having both anonymity and personalization.
Not every person or happening shown is factual. Stern is a composite
figure, for example. But whether created or recreated, everything is true.
Nothing is exaggerated, embellished or fabricated to dramatic ends. This is
no Hollywoodian flick.It is life and death in the raw, and all done like a
documentary. The film is in black-and-white, framed by color scenes, and
very occasionally adding some color bits that make points in incredibly
powerful yet un-showy fashion.
The historical recreation is just as amazingly strong and true. From the
start, as Schindler sets about casting his nets on German officers in a
nightclub, the atmosphere is genuine, from the chiaroscuro lighting of such
places (it also recalls films noirs and dramas of the 1930s and 1940s) to
the music : "Gloomy Sunday," a popular Hungarian song so downbeat that
(it's a fact) it encouraged many a suicide; other period tunes, jazz, the
tango "Jealousy"; martial music, including the German's favorite march
"Erika."   As the film proceeds, the score includes Hebrew songs and
melodies, background music, classical music (Itzhak Perlman plays), more
German items. For composer and music selector John Williams, it is his
finest hour.
Spielberg's experience pays off  every  minute, with outstanding
efficiency. Yes, Spielberg is the father of fantasies (some terrific, some
good, some irritating, and some lemons), but it is demeaning both to him
and to reviewers to harp on the notion that Peter Pan has finally made a
"real" movie. For the record, Spielberg is also the father of "Duel" (his
1972 debut), of "The Sugarland Express," and of "Empire of the Sun."
Here his camera techniques are astounding: no bravura shots, but unerring
photography that varies from handheld, newsreel or amateur footage,  to
subjective points of view,  to a rock-steady lens watching disaster from
afar, imperturbably, and all the more affectingly.  The editing is full of
masterful ellipses of sights, speeches and sounds, but again, never showy,
never arty.
Intelligent yet unfabricated scenes abound. Two examples among scores. The
evil, bestial Goeth's villa overlooks from high up the camp of Plaszow.
Goeth, stripped to the waist, leaves his mistress in bed and from the
balcony does target practice on the inmates. He then bends down, picks up
with his mouth his burning cigarette from the ledge, while clutching his
telescopic rifle with both hands, and shoots again.
During an infamous triage sequence,  loudspeakers are blaring a syrupy
German song "Gutte Nacht Mutter" (Good Night, Mother)-- a true situation,
grippingly staged.
When all is said and done, Schindler is still a cipher whom, mercifully,
the film does  attempt to explain, either by bargain basement psychology or
through high-flown analysis. The Irishman Neeson plays him with
unforgettable power, nuances, and a characterization that has no equivalent
in other films.
Nor is Goeth (whose name, with deadly irony, is like the humanist Goethe's)
spelled out or clarified. When British actor Ralph Fiennes  first appeared,
I wondered why Spielberg took such a chance on an unknown, instead of
picking a proven powerhouse like Klaus Maria Brandauer ("Mephisto," etc.)
or Jurgen Prochnow ("Das Boot"). Minutes later I knew why. Like those
performers, Fiennes is also a powerhouse who can act like the psychotic
fiend he is but can also, from  head to toe-tips, quietly convey complex
ominousness.
Then there's Ben Kingsley who, is able to portray any nationality, like the
late character actor J. Carrol Naish, (that Irish-American who played all
ethnicities saved the Irish) but as a star and on a much more elevated and
demanding level. Kingsley rounds up the trio of perfect male leads. And in
the rest of the cast, every single part is impeccable, from kids to
oldsters, from civilians to uniformed barbarians.
Violence is omnipresent, but shown in mater-of-fact, unsensational ways.
And it is intellectualized by low-key depictions as well as conversations.
Spielberg's film comes as close to flawlessness as any of the major
classics of cinema. My qualms are minor. One is that the concentration camp
people are not as skeletal as in reality, but there's no way to find
hundreds of emaciated extras.  Another is that the film does not state that
the Holocaust kept building up in direct proportion to Germany losing the
war -- something not known to the masses of viewers who know little or no
history.
At movie's (and war's) end, comes an invention :  Schindler breaks down
from accumulated stress and survivor's guilt, and  takes his leave from the
now free Jews, while doing a mea culpa. Unhistorical, yes, but so
gut-wrenching that I can't really cavil. And the epilogue of the movie is
an extraordinary emotional experience.
Credit Spielberg for creating this film in every detail. (There's an
excellent article on the making of the movie in the January 21 of
Entertainment Weekly ) .  Credit him too for bringing out the best in the
talents he gathered and orchestrating them. Like scriptwriter Zaillian
("Awakenings," "The Falcon and the Snowman," "Jack the Bear"), who recently
also turned director  ("Searching for Bobby Fisher"). Like cinematographer
Kaminski who came from Poland to the United Sates in 1980 to attend
Columbia College in Chicago, went on to American Film Institute and has
photographed mostly unknown movies.
Finally, what gets me in that movie is the reminder, the  knowledge that
there is no knowledge of the Nazi era, that our kids --even many of our
adults-- know all about MTV and Madonna, but no history.  In this age of
information, Hollywood shamefully neglects downbeat subjects of our age
while the several European features can find no public. But then there's
television. The public watches endless detritus on the small screen yet
there is an  abundance ( PBS, TDC, A & E, etc) of documentaries that can
teach us both analytical and in-your-face history.  The resulting ignorance
can be frightening, as in the reports that certain younger audiences
laughed during some of the most heart-breaking moments of "Schindler's
List."
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Conte d'automne (1998)
AUTUMN TALE (CONTE D'AUTOMNE) (France, 1998; US release 1999)  *** 
1/2 Directed and written by Eric Rohmer. Producers, Francoise 
Etchegary, Margaret Menegoz, Eric Rohmer. Photography, Diane 
Baratier. Editing, Mary Stephen. Cast: Marie Riviere (Isabelle), 
Beatrice Romand (Magali). Alain Libolt (Gerard), Didier Sandre 
(Etienne), Alexia Portal (Rosine), Stephane Darmon (Leo), Aurelia 
Alcais (Emilia),Matthieu Davette (Gregoire), Yves Alcais 
(Jean-Jacques). An October Films/USA Films release. In French with 
subtitles. 112 minutes. PG.
In the 100-plus years of cinema, the most important, influential and 
long-lasting "movement" (which, like Expressionism, Poetic Realism, 
Neorealism, etc. was  not a real movement-- but I'll skip the 
lecture) was the French New Wave of the late 1950s and the 1960s. The 
best directors and writer-directors included Jean-Luc Godard, 
Francois Truffaut, Alain Resnais, Claude Chabrol, Jacques Rivette, 
Eric Rohmer. They're all unclassifiable, yet for many viewers some 
key words may come to mind: Godard= avant-garde, Truffaut= romantic, 
Resnais= thinker, Chabrol=satirist, Rivette=lengthy, Rohmer=searching.
Abroad, they are all admired film giants. In the United States, 
Truffaut is/was the best-known and by far the most popular; Godard, 
the most imitated (badly); Resnais, by now, little known; Chabrol 
too, though when known, entertaining for his Hitchcockisms; Rivette, 
hardly seen;  Rohmer, beloved by specialists only.
Rohmer, born in 1920, may be even less classifiable than the others. 
His films are talky, as are almost all French movies, but then 
Rohmerian talk is the mainspring of his works, not just an adjunct or 
a part of them. All develop via dialogue, yet there is nothing 
"theatrical" about them. Oddly enough though, Rohmer, who came to 
cinema through literature, is, in original ways, closer to the great 
18th century playwright Marivaux and to the best 19th century French 
playwright, Alfred de Musset.
Most Rohmer movies deal with people, predominantly young and younger, 
who talk of love and get in and out of relationships. And the older 
Rohmer gets the younger his movies seems to be. His characters argue, 
prod, discuss, flirt, advise, shift, all in what appear to be 
ordinary or at least real settings and situations. The movies are low 
budget, non-studio-ish, beautifully shot in cities, beaches, 
apartments and subtly symbolic nature. The dialogues are carefully 
crafted to be convincingly true, as well as improvised.
Rohmer, among his other works, has concentrated in groupings: Six 
Moral Tales; Six Comedies and Proverbs (a la Musset); Tales of the 
Four Seasons, the last and latest of which is Autumn Tale.
It is the story of two women in their mid-40s, best friends for ages, 
in the Cotes du Rhone wine-growing region. The actresses are veterans 
of Rohmer films. The rest of the perfecr cast are unknowns or 
little-known. Magali, a vineyard owner, is widowed with children 
(grownup). Isabelle, a married bookseller, secretly decides that it 
is time for her friend to have a man in her life. In the matchmaking 
process, there are twists and turns, disguises and tricks, surprises 
and shocks, complications,quid pro quos.confusions, mix-ups, and, 
and... No, I will not drop any hints -- see for yourself. It is all 
wonderful, intelligent, subtly sophisticated, clever but not 
smarty-pantsy, touching but not penny-dreadful-sentimental. It is 
funny, humorous and witty.
What's familiar for Rohmer habitués may be that the (at the time of 
filming) 78-year old maker has an unmatched understanding of people, 
including the youths. Also (look at the credits) the importance of 
women as his collaborators. What is new is that Rohmer has upped the 
age of his protagonists. Which brings me to a "review" I ran into but 
I can't find, alas. So I'll give you what I remember. The writer, a 
male, said in effect that the film was dull especially because he 
sees movies to look at beautiful chicks, and the two women 
protagonists were old and homely.
Anyway, Rohmer movies are made for gourmets, sophisticated 
cognoscenti who know their film cuisine.

Title
Review for Kermesse héroďque, La (1935)
LA KERMESSE HEROIQUE (France,1935) (English title: łCarnival In Flanders˛)
Directed by Jacques Feyder. Adaptation, dialogue and screenplay by Bernard
Zimmer, from a  story by Charles Spaak. Decors, Lazare Meerson. Costumes,
J.K. Benda. Photography, Harry Stradling, Louis Page, Andre Thomas. Music,
Louis Beydts. Cast : Alerme, Francoise Rosay, Jean Murat, Micheline
Cheirel, Bernard Lancret, Delphin, Louis Jouvet, et al.
The prize-winning masterpiece of director Jacques Feyder, stars his wife
Francoise Rosay, Jean Murat, Louis Jouvet and many other excellent actors.
Tongue-in-cheek comedy-farce is set in a Flemish town in the early 1600s.
When Spanish soldiers show up, the men act like cowards, the panicky mayor
pretends to be dead, and his spirited wife organizes the women to give the
conquerors a good time. Lavishly and minutely detailed, the historically
impressive re-creation (by the great Lazare Meerson) of the town, of
paintings by Dutch masters and of the locals posing for them, make this a
unique, inventive, beautiful and joyously immoral treat .
Feyder  himself summarized his film as follows: łEn 1610, un ambassadeur
des Provinces-Unies traverse les Pays-Bas avec sa suite et, comme les
chemins ne sont pas surs, avec son escorte, cšest-a-dire vingt-quatre
piquiers et ving-quatre arquebusiers. Pas un de plus. Le bourgmestre dšune
petite bourgade, se souvenant des exces de la soldatesque, est pris de
panique et decide de faire le mort pour eviter dšheberger le diplomate.
Madame la bourgmestre, revoltee par cette couardise, galvanise les femmes
et organise pour lšambassadeur et sa suite une reception triomphale; elle
arive, par la meme occasion, a marier sa fille selon son propre choix.˛
TranslaTION : " In 1610, an Ambassador of the United Provinces is crossing
the Low Countries with his retinue, and since the roads are not safe, he
has an escort of 24 pike-bearers and 24 firearm bearers. Not one more. The
mayor of a small town remembers the excesses of the military and is panic
stricken. He decides to pretend that he is dead, so as to avoid having to
play host to the diplomat. The Mayor's wife, however is revolted by this
cowardice. She galvanizes the local women and organizes for the ambassador
and his people a triumphant welcome. By the same token, she manages to have
her daughter marry the man the young girl wanted."
This masterpiece of French cinema is a lavish, spectacular and minute
historical reconstruction with superb production values, notably in sets
and artifacts (by the great Lazare Meerson), and costumes. (The town of
Boom still exists in Belgium. And the houses built were on a slightly
smaller scale, to stress the importance of the humans and to permit easier
framing of the scenes.)
Remarkable and inseparable from the look of the film, is its re-creation of
the world of Flemish painters, with Jan Breughel having an important role
in the plot. He was the son of the more famous Pieter Breughel and brother
to the painter Pieter Breughel the Younger. In the film he is much younger
than he would have been in the early 1600s.
The plot is one long series of tongue-in-cheek satire that ranges from
overt to covert, with farcical as well as joyously immoral situations. The
acting is superior. Someone said that Mrs. Burgmeister persuades the local
ladies that" it s better to be laid than dead."  An amusing łjeu de mots˛
but a simplification of the ironical barbs at the male bourgeoisie, the
cleverness of women who are at the same time gutsy, inventive, feminine and
attracted to the manly (and sometimes sophisticated) strangers from the
South. On purpose or not, łLa Kermesse˛ is definitely an early feminist
screen comedy.
łLysistrata˛ and łThe Merry Wives of Windsor˛ come to mind, but łLa
Kermesse˛ is its own, marvelously well conceived entity. It was produced by
a German Company, Tobis, and almost simultaneously a German version was
made by Feyder, with his wife Francoise Rosay again as the only holdover
from the French work. The film was called łDie Klugen Frauen˛ (łThe Clever
Women˛). At its premiere in Berlin, it was enthusiastically received by a
Whošs Who audience which included Dr. Josef Goebbels*, the German Minister
for Propaganda. It is this version (contrary to the misinformation in most
books) that received the Best Director Award at the Venice Festival. The
French film was awarded the Grand Prix du Cinema Francais in 1936, as well
as the Best Foreign Film Award by the New York Film Critics.
The movie caused controversies as well as small riots initially. Some
Flemish people protested the mocking portrait of Flemish notables. Others
saw in it allusions to the Flemish collaborators during the Germansš
occupation of the area during World War I.  The movie was even called
łNazi-inspired.˛
All this died down soon, however. Still, it is easy to see why Josef
Goebbels may have liked the idea of submission to conquerors.
* This brings me to the inaccurate story that after France was occupied in
World War II, Goebbels and his ilk persecuted Feyder and Rosay and forced
them to flee. The couple did prefer, at one point, to simplify their lives
and not have to work for the Nazis, first by going to the South of France,
then to Switzerland where they taught. There, after they had made another
film together, Ms. Rosay left for England while her husband remained in
Geneva until waršs end.  (Edwin Jahiel)
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Alice et Martin (1998)
ALICE AND MARTIN (France, 1998) ** 1/4 Directed by André Téchiné. 
Written by Techine & Gilles Taurand. Collaborator,  Olivier Assayas. 
Photography, Caroline Champetier. Editing, Martine Giordano. 
Production design, Ze Branco. Music, Philippe Sarde. Produced by 
Alain Sarde. Cast: Juliette Binoche (Alice), Alexis Loret (Martin 
Sauvagnac), Mathieu Amalric (Benjamin Sauvagnac), Carmen Maura 
(Jeanine Sauvagnac), Jean-Pierre Lorit (Frédéric Sauvagnac), Marthe 
Villalonga (Lucie Sauvagnac) Jeremy Kreikenmayer  (Martin as a child) 
and Pierre Maguelon(Victor Sauvagnac), et al. Released by USA Films. 
In French, with subtitles. 123 minutes. R (sexuality, violence)
The very Gallic writer-director Andre Techine has a special niche in 
his country's cinema. It is not easily defined or classifiable. He 
tends to make novelistic movies in which aestheticism and lyricism 
mix with the psychology of the characters. Techine is also an actors' 
director. He has baffled certain critics, been praised by others. 
It's a mixed picture.
Techine's best works have a strong record of awards in festivals such 
as Cannes (a host of nominations and one win as Best Director); at 
the Caesars (French Oscars), with four wins (including French film, 
Director, Screenplay, etc. In the USA his "Wild Reeds" was voted best 
foreign-language movie by the New York, the Los Angeles, and the 
National Societies of Critics.
"Alice and Martin" is his 17th feature (out of 18). The three 
features preceding it were "My Favorite Season," "Wild Reeds," and 
"The Thieves" all major hits. "Alice and Martin" however has had 
reviews that range from positive to ho-hum.
In a small town of Southwest France, hairdresser Jeanine lives with 
her 10-year old son Martin, an illegitimate child. Without 
explanation except "it's time you met your father" she packs off 
Martin to elderly industrialist Victor. The latter has an also 
elderly wife--and three boys with her.
Jump 10 years ahead. Martin, now 20, is seen disheveled, wandering 
about the country side, looking  crazy, stealing chickens and eggs. 
He ends up in a police station where we learn that Victor had an 
accident and died. The police does not connect this death with 
Martin's most bizarre behavior, and does not even hold him for 
raiding chicken coops. It is all extremely vague, in fact confusing 
and unconvincing.  This is the start of a film that will continue 
making the audience wonder about who, when, why, how.
Cut to the strange Martin showing up suddenly in Paris.. (Did  he 
have train-ticket money in his shabby clothes?) He looks up his 
half-brother Benjamin who is gay and an aspiring actor but  currently 
works in a large store, hand scanning people at the exit. (I think 
this is also symbolism but of  what, I cannot tell). At a cafe a 
woman accosts Martin, hands him her business card and leaves. She, it 
turns out later, is in the advertising business.
Benjamin shares a minuscule apartment with Alice, about 35 -- a 
violinist whom the director describes as "repressed."
She hardly survives through a variety of musical gigs. (One of her 
best lines::" Other music wants to heal wounds. Tango keeps them 
open.")
Alice sounds like a good, serious musician, but how good we do not 
know. It is interesting to follow her haphazard professional 
activities in classical and in popular music, but if the subtext 
includes a criticism of talents that go begging, Techine does not 
insist on the artist-in-a-garret theme, one that is true, but alas, 
also banal.
Martin now shares Benjamins-Alice cramped lodgings.   Remember the 
woman with the card? Thanks to it Martin   becomes, overnight it 
would seem (by time is unclear in this film) a hit as a model. He 
makes very good money (is this a satire of the advertising business? 
Unclear)  He can pay the rent. (Ask not how three people and a cat 
can fit in the space).
Now too, for reasons equally foggy, he stalks Alice. What is 
understood however is that the young man has psychological problems. 
Alice too but not uncommon ones.  As the two talk, she relates  a 
rather cock-and-bull story about her young sister who had an 
incredible memory that   suddenly drained out when she had a brain 
tumor. The girl died at age 11. And so on. Such confidences 
apparently make A and M draw closer to each other. They become a 
couple, and couples copulate, of course. Yet, while the act is sudden 
and energetic, it is not particularly sexy. And there is no strong 
evidence of " l'amour fou."
Martin has a photo shoot in Spain. Alice comes along. There she has 
symptoms of pregnancy while Martin  keels over from psychic 
disturbances, is hospitalized, loses his job. The twosome stay in a 
middle-of-nowhere seashore area of Spain. Martin is getting 
antagonistic, wants to stop the affair, swims at night in ominous 
waves. They have no money left.
A flashback to Victor leads us to Martin killing his dad. This 
explains his mental state and feelings of guilt. Throughout. we spend 
our time figuring out things. We become like the film characters who 
grope with people and feelings. There's much more of this  in Spain, 
in small-town France, in Paris and in a mental hospital outside 
Paris. And more yet.
But I will not reveal anything else about the story, the odd 
behaviors and the semi-closures. It seems to me that director Techine 
is really artistic, sincere and a believer in his 
creatures/creations. But the story, people, techniques and, what in 
Techine's mind are subtleties, tend to confuse us -- and must have 
adversely affected him, so that he did not look objectively at what 
he was doing.
There are several portrayals that flesh out the events. And they 
score points. But the overall structure is such that it would take a 
second viewing to "get into" the movie and its virtues.
There is also Juliette Binoche, a major star. She has been in films 
by Godard, Techine, Carax, Malle, Rappeneau, Kurys, and other major 
"auteurs." Even more notably she had the lead role in Kieslowski's 
superb "Three Colors: Blue," for which she won Best Actress at the 
Felix, the Caesar and the Venice Awards. Then came her Oscar for Best 
Supporting Actress (in "The English Patient.")
Juliette Binoche is celebrated for her talent in showing feelings, 
reactions, thoughts and the like through eloquent body and especially 
facial expressions. For "A and M," Techine, who compares her to the 
great Lilian Gish of silent movies' fame, wanted to give Ms. Binoche 
a part that would stress her speaking. He did, by in my opinion, not 
far enough.
Her Alice is Alice in Wonderland, but in the sense that the 
spectators wonder about what's going on.
Alex Loret who plays Martin, makes here his feature debut. The others 
are on the unfamiliar side, with the exception of Spanish actress 
Carmen Maura. She has appeared in almost 70 films since 1969, mostly 
Spanish (several by Pedro Almodovar,) some French. But here her 
character is sketchy and without the fire and agitation of her best 
roles.
French movies can be "la creme de la creme" in showing psyches and 
brains, complex relationships and behaviors, family matters and 
conversations, intimate relations, people and situations as they 
really are. But those characteristics can also go sometimes with 
obscurities, opaqueness, over-intellectualism, bizarre constructions, 
unraveled threads and loose ends.
"Alice and Martin" has beautiful photography but is a tortuous and 
tortured work, with people who can neither make contact among 
themselves or with the audience. It  kept me at arm's distance, 
although it could be that a repeat screening might remedy some of 
that.

Title
Review for Moon Over Parador (1988)
MOON OVER PARADOR (1988) *** 1/4.  Produced and directed by Paul
Mazursky.Written by Leon Capetanos and  Mazursky, from a story by Charles
G. Booth. Photography, Donald  McAlpine. Editing, Stuart Pappe. Production
design, Pato Guzman. Music, Maurice Jarre. Cast: Richard Dreyfuss, Raul
Julia, Sonia Braga, Jonathan Winters, Fernando Rey, Sammy Davis, Jr.,
Michael Greene, Polly Holliday, Charo, Marianne Sagebrecht, Carlotta Gerson
(Paul Mazursky), Lorin Dreyfuss.  A Universal release. 105 minutes. PG-13.
Perhaps the first movie I remember in which a double takes the place of a
bad leader and does good things for his people was The Prisoner of Zenda.
Since then there have been many such substitutions on the screen. That's
what Moon Over Parador does too. It's not the most original of ideas, but
then the film makes no bones about the fact that it keeps dippily dipping
into the past, putting old wines into not-so-new bottles. Sometimes it even
shouts this, sometimes it's a passing mention, sometimes it leaves the
recognition entirely up to the public .
MOP is remarkably low-key, even quiet, given its context. Although it's  a
farce, it does not suffer from the frantic tempo or actors' hysterics and
raucousness than can spoil many a comedy, not to mention farces.
The plot is blessedly straightforward and unpretentious. An American movie
crew has just wrapped up shooting in Parador City, the capital of a Latin
American banana dictatorship (Parador means "inn" in Spanish). One of the
cast is Jack Noah (Richard Dreyfuss). His first allegiance is to the New
York stage. He is very much the New York thespian.
Bizarre American retiree Jonathan Winters talks him into staying around
for the Carnival. Jack looks a great deal like Simms, the country's
military dictator. He  also does a good imitation of him. Boozer-wencher
Simms, has a heart attack in his limousine, where he dies in the arms of
Roberto Strausmann (Raul Julia), head of the secret police and the regime's
grey eminence. Strausmann, who is in cahoots with  the " 14  families" that
oppress the people, fears that too sudden an announcement of the Leader's
demise could result in chaos and revolution. He makes Jack one of those
offers one  cannot refuse: to impersonate  Simms.
Jack is nimble, Jack is quick, and before you can say Jack Robinson, the
impostor has made himself up like Simms and is fooling everybody. Well,
almost everyone.The members of Simms' household are not taken in, but they
too have a stake in  keeping up the masquerade.
Not only playing, but being Simms becomes the part of Jack's life. He
thrives in it, even embellishes it. When Sonia Braga, as Madonna (sic), the
late dictator's Numero Uno mistress, transfers her affections to the
impersonator, no work and all play make Jack a bright boy. He stays on and
on, makes gradual changes in the land, replaces the national anthem's
melody (O Tannenbaum) with that of Besa Me Mucho ; leads "his" people in TV
weight-loss exercises; takes other drastic measures to help the poor
before staging cannily his return to New York. (Although the movie is set
in Parador, New York is very much present, as a framing device and with its
theatre as Jack's standard by which everything is evaluated. All this is
cleverly done, with good insights).
To expect substance, deep intentions or  ideas in this movie is to be
looking for something quite different from what Mazursky and Capetanos had
in mind.The filmmakers are interested only in gentle farce, not in
three-dimensionality. Moon is far closer to the Marx Brothers' anarchic
nonsense (and Woody Allen's Bananas) than to Frank Capra 's constructive
comedies. The focal point is not the story, but the one-man show by
Dreyfuss, and its comical trimmings.
Dreyfuss is as amazingly good as he has been in the last many years. On the
face of it, Jack is the picture's most outlandish type, yet in  some ways
he is the most credible, since he doesn't let you forget that first and
last he is an actor submerged in his craft, insecure, avid for pats on the
back and reassuring applause. He joins the roster of other movie
impersonators, especially people like Jack Benny and Mel Brooks who, in the
two versions of To Be Or Not To Be  ham it up because their models are
already hams.  Director Mazursky himself is in the movie, as   Simms'
mother, a la Charley's Aunt.
But there's a difference: as soon as Dreyfuss assumes the role of Simms, he
becomes entirely confident, simultaneously laid-back, self-mocking and
eager. It's much harder to do than it sounds, or for that matter, than it
looks. Ask any non-envious professional.
MOP creates no characters and does not intend to. Most of its people remain
in the background, save for Raul Julia who delivers an amusingly
mock-sinister performance--but even he is there primarily to propel
Dreyfuss along. Sonia Braga is no more than cake-frosting. Jonathan Winters
does some excellent small shticks which deride the U.S. presence in Latin
America, something that is also implied by the Anglo-Saxon name of Dictator
Simms. But, again, forget about the political satire: what we have is
caricature used for the needs of the story, carrying no weight of its own.
It is rich in comic inventions and fresh bits of business. It is also a
compendium of in-jokes and in-references to current events and older
movies. Like the French New Wave filmmakers who influenced him enormously,
Mazursky throws in with abandon a cornucopia of allusions .
The very title of the film parodies the 1941 Betty Grable vehicle Moon Over
Miami, a semi-musical with switched identities. There's ironic-nostalgic
use of the flashback structure of so many 1940s movies, as MOO opens with
Jack back in New York recounting his Parador adventure. The name of
Paraguay's then-dictator General Stroessner becomes Straussmann (Raul
Julia), which additionally stresses the Germans or Nazis in Latin America.
"Round up the usual suspects,"the famous line from Casablanca is used.
There's a starry-eyed comparison of that movie's finale with Moon's. The
sets imitate indirectly the Technicolor exotic-resort movies of Mazursky's
youth. And much more.
This comedy is so determinedly a fantasy that I doubt it could offend
Hispanic sensibilities. Oddly, the peak of its planned illogicality is not
immediately apparent. You may get distracted by the broad shenanigans  and
forget that Dreyfuss-Simms speaks Spanish-accented English  throughout,
when, even by the elastic norms of farce, he should be speaking Spanish.
You can't get more unrealistic than this.
There's a  very funny  morsel where Jack, about to board a helicopter,
gestures to the reporters in the patented smiling, helpless "I can't hear
over this din" way of Ronald Reagan.The public got this one when the movie
came out, but how many new generations will catch on later? It will be as
in many of the other gags, which, back in 1988, were there for older
memories. How many people knew then or know now "Besame Mucho," the songs
from "The Man of La Mancha," the fact that "Tannenbaum" is a Teutonic song
? Paul Mazursky, who was 58 when the film was released, may have
overestimated the  potential complicity of his public.Then again, he might
have relying on the younger audience's satisfaction with the general
outline of the movie, and on the older people's enhanced comprehension.
It's a risky strategy which bespeaks more of Mazursky as a nostalgic
film-buff than as a calculating businessman.
At 105 minutes, MOP could just be a tad too long for those who don't get
immersed in the spirit of its details, which, in their eyes, can make the
film falter and some jokes strain a bit in its latter parts. For myyself
and other spectators the diffusion is an asset. (My own small objection is
the  gratuitous intrusion of Sammy Davis, Jr. whose singing is not exactly
a joy). Yet even unpruned, this is still a splendidly entertaining
movie-movie. It is a bright Moon.
It was shot entirely in Brazil. Production values are high. Maurice Jarre's
score is agreeable, though some moments sounded to me like a paraphrase of
the Delerue music in Jules And Jim. Parador looks lovely. Between its
tourist beauties at poolside and the promiscuous locals it would be a great
place for social diseases.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Est - Ouest (1999)
EAST-WEST (France-Russia, 1999) *** Directed by Regis Wargnier. 
Written by Wargnier, Roustan Ibraguimbek, Sergei Bodrov, Louis 
Gardel. Photography, Laurent Dailland. Editing, Herve Schneid. 
Production design, Vladimir Svetozarov, Alexei Levtchenko. Music, 
Patrick Doyle. Cast: Sandrine Bonnaire (Marie), Oleg Menchikov 
(Alexei Golovin), Catherine Deneuve (Gabrielle), Sergei Bodrov, Jr. 
(Sacha), Ruben Tapiero (Serioja at 7), Erwan Baynaud (Serioja at 14), 
Grigoru Manoukiv, Tatiana Doguileva, Bogdan Stupka, Meglena 
Massalitinova, Valentine Gavev, Nikilai Binev, Rene Feret, et al. A 
Sony Classics release. In French (and some Russian) with subtitles. 
121 minutes. PG-13. At the New Art Theatre.
World War II ended in 1945. A year later, in June 1946, the Soviet 
dictator Josef Stalin started a barrage of propaganda in the West, 
especially western Europe where there were many thousands of Russian 
émigrés. Stalin promised milk and honey, or more specifically, 
amnesty, a Russian passport, a warm welcome to the Soviet Union which 
the returnees would help reconstruct after its destructions during 
the Hitler War, and in fact make it even better a Workers' Paradise 
than it used to be.  Russians seem to be more sentimental and 
nostalgic for their country than other people. So a lot of the 
émigrés took the bait --and lived (sometimes very briefly) to regret 
it.
Among them was Alexei Golovin a young doctor from Paris, his young 
French wife Marie, and their 7-year French-born son Serioja.
No sooner had the ship reached Odessa, even before all the passengers 
were on terra firms, the Golovin couple and many others realized what 
a mistake their return was. The majority of returnees get jailed, 
executed or are sent to gulags. The Golovins are spared because the 
Soviets need doctors.
The family is sent to Kiev, in a horrible "kommunalka" apartment 
where at best one gets just room per family, shares facilities (an 
euphemism--we see a man coming out of the toilet carrying his own 
wooden seat!), have no peace, no privacy, and be subjected to 
miseries by others. The people are also always spied upon, informed 
on, betrayed. It's not a wonderful life.
Very, very soon Marie wants to return to France -- and she would be 
stupid if she did not--but in the Soviet Union, what's done cannot be 
undone. Stalinist paranoia and mass madness rule, no one is safe, not 
even in his or her thoughts, not to mention that the least act or 
action can and will result in catastrophes.
Alexei agrees with his wife, but being more realistic (as well as of 
Russian extraction) he advises patience --which will lead a split in 
the couple. It's all very believable and very well documented and 
shown. A third, important character, depending on your set of mind, 
may or may not be considered a melodramatic addition. He is Sacha, 
the teen-ager and star swimmer (played by the son of one of the 
film's writers) who, under circumstances that I find not at all hard 
to believe, enters into a special relationship with Marie and later 
becomes part of her scheme to be taken back to France. The latter is 
a thread (a fat one too) that runs throughout the plot as it deals 
with the failed efforts of the woman (partly because her French 
passport was torn up by the Soviets) to contact French authorities in 
Russia.
There is a great more in incidents, events, surprises, suspense and 
criticism of Stalinist Russia. The movie was filmed in Russia for the 
most part, and has an undeniable  visual authenticity. It is, of 
course, manicheistic, with white hats vs black hats, but there is 
really no way to maintain half-tones and subtleties in situations 
which, in real life, were black and white with little in-between.
Political films are becoming rare and more's the pity. Wargnier 
(pronounced Var-NYEH) had earlier won the Best Foreign Film Oscar for 
his also political "Indochine."
I hope he stays on the track of history and politics, which teaches 
audiences a great deal more than space travel fiction.

Title
Review for Story of Us, The (1999)
THE STORY OF US (1999) **1/4  Directed by Rob Reiner. Written by Alan 
Zweibel & Jessie Nelson. Photography, Michael Chapman. Editing, 
Robert Leighton. Production design, Lilly Kilvert. Music, Eric 
Clapton and Marc Shaiman.  Cast: Bruce Willis (Ben Jordan), Michelle 
Pfeiffer (Katie Jordan), Colleen Rennison (Erin at 10), Jake Sandvig 
(Josh at 12),
Tim Matheson (Marty), Rob Reiner (Stan), Julie Hagerty (Liza) and 
Rita Wilson (Rachel).
Produced by Reiner, Nelson & Zweibel. A Universal release. 92 
minutes. R (strong sexual language).
1.Why I Saw This Movie. The able and smart main film-critic of this 
country's best newspaper, unlike many other reviewers, is especially 
kind to movies. Yet this person's write-up on The Story of Us was so 
unusually scathing that it piqued my curiosity.
2. Whom I Saw It With.  A substantial audience. They seemed to like 
it, laughed often. I did too, but much less.
3. What Does The Film Remind Me Of. The same director's When Harry 
Met Sally (1989) --in reverse. Call it When Ben and Katie Separated 
After 15 Years of Marriage and Two Kids. But this wouldn't fit the 
marquee.
4. What I Learned About Bruce Willis. He is left-handed, bald and 
uses terrible hairpieces. He plays a writer, but I didn't figure out 
precisely what he writes. More importantly, he can not only do action 
flicks but he can also act.
5. What I Found Out About Michelle Pfeiffer. She is 42, lovely as 
ever, still at the very top of the list of appealing stars. Her eyes 
continue to fascinate me by their beauty and the oddity than they are 
always ever so slightly bloodshot. This reinforces their power to 
suggest sorrow.  Here Pfeiffer is a professional crossword-puzzle 
editor, undoubtedly a most instructive job.
6. How Her  Profession Is Worked Into The Movie. Just a little. On 
the other hand, as a working Mom she has a normally frantic life.
7. What  Genre The Film Belongs To.  The romantic comedy. (You know 
even before you get your ticket that there will be a happy ending. It 
takes the form of a long speech by Pfeiffer, is phony , and too 
artificially emotional for the usually cool Michelle). The real 
sub-genre is Comedies of Remarriage. Couples split for whatever 
reason but get back together. Some great old movies in this group are 
My Girl Friday, My Favorite Wife, the Hitchcock rarity (not a 
thriller) Mr and Mrs Smith.
The couple hide their ever-increasing differences, gripes and other 
Bad Things from their teen-age children so as not to upset them. 
Which is ridiculous as the presumably intelligent kids ought (but 
have not?) seen or sensed their parents' problems. The separation 
starts after the parents have taken the children to summer camp. 
Willis moves to an hotel, then an apartment.  Pfeiffer enters, by 
chance, into a relationship with a divorced family acquaintance. 
Honor is Safe. Supposedly nothing happenes between this new  twosome, 
beyond cooking beautiful Thai food together. Come on!
A familiar yet realistic touch. When the man finds out that the 
couple has split up, he expresses his strong sorrow then makes an 
immediate pass. But other sections are over the top: a sequence of 
Willis and a close friend (played by director Rob Reiner) 
philosophizing about couples is forced;  a sequence where Willis, 
Reiner and the latter's wife (Rita Wilson) go to a posh restaurant 
and Willis starts shouting out his problems is ham-fisted; a scene 
where Willis tells pal Dave (Paul Reiser, unusually sufferable) that 
he wants to write a book about his (Willis's) grandmother is gauchely 
worked into the story.
The story is related in bits, with a profusion of flashbacks, 
flashforwards, flashsideways, and with the spouses addressing 
directly the camera. One of the flahsbacks, a trip to romantic Venice 
(in Italy, not California) in order to rekindle the old passion and 
make them an "us" again, is rather amusing Especially when they meet 
an older couple of obnoxious, loud and jocular tourists from 
Cleveland. But the return home is artificially made into an instant 
fight. There are, too, three flashbacks to shrinks/marriage 
counselors, all three forced.
The flick travels in time non-stop. It uses sitcom humor with 
sitcom-ish fragmented action, the only difference being the 
uncensored language. There is brio, albeit overdone, in a raucous 
restaurant sequence in which Pfeiffer and her best friends Julie 
Hagerty and Rita Wilson discuss husbands and sex. This is 
mechanically paralleled (though also lively ) in a restaurant meeting 
of Willis, Reiser and Reiner who discuss  wives and women. Both have 
some humor, plus a lot of four-letter and sexual anatomy descriptions 
by Rita Wilson.
If all this sounds like a sloppy script, it is. Curiously, however, 
the picture does not feel irritating, dull or overlong -- at least 
not until about minute 80 (out of 92).

Title
Review for Sabrina (1995)
SABRINA (1995) ** Directed by Sydney Pollack. Screenplay by Barbara 
Benedek & David Rayfiel. Based on the film "Sabrina" (1954) directed by 
Billy Wilder, written by Wilder, Samuel Taylor, Ernest Lehman, from the 
play "Sabrina Fair" by Samuel Taylor. Photography, Giuseppe Rotunno. 
Editing, Frederic Steinkamp. Production design, Brian Morris. Costumes, 
Ann Roth. Music, John Williams.  Cast: Julia Ormond (Sabrina Fairchild), 
Harrison Ford (Linus Larrabee), Greg Kinnear (David Larrabee), Nancy 
Marchand (Maud Larrabee), John Wood (Fairchild), Lauren Holly (Elizabeth 
Tyson), Angie Dickinson (Ingrid Tyson), Richard Crenna (Patrick Tyson), 
Dana Ivey (Mack), Elizabeth Franz (Joanna), Fanny Ardant (Irene), 
Patrick Bruel (Louis), Valerie Lemercier (Martine). A Paramount Picture. 
130 min. Rated PG.  
Except for special effects and technical innovations, Hollywood's 
exponentially increasing lack of imagination keeps it hacking away at 
remakes and sequels. The original "Sabrina" by Billy Wilder was almost 
unimprovable. There was no artistic reason to make it again, unless it 
was to make you appreciate the first movie even more.  
Much of the remake follows "Sabrina I" scene-for-scene, especially in 
the early sequences. For the rest, the changes add little, subtract a 
lot. Both films deal with a family of magnates on Long Island. Larrabee 
Industries is run by senior brother Linus (Humphrey Bogart then,  
Harrison Ford now), while junior brother David (William Holden, now Greg  
Kinnear), a company director in name only, keeps busy with wine and 
women (we don't know about song). 
Years ago, the Larrabees imported from England a Rolls Royce along with 
chic chauffeur Fairchild (now a widower) and his daughter Sabrina 
(Audrey Hepburn in 1954, Julia Ormond in 1995). Sabrina has had forever 
a crush on David, who never noticed it  or her.  As a cure, she is sent 
to Paris by her father. She returns transformed into a lovely, 
sophisticated young woman on whom David puts the make. Bad news for 
Mother Larrabee (Nancy Marchand, awfully gowned and photographed like a 
gargoyle) and Linus. 
David is engaged to Elizabeth Tyson, the daughter of powerful 
industrialists. Well beyond class distinctions is the fact that a 
Larrabee-Tyson merger is in the works. It will vanish if David does not 
marry Elizabeth. To eliminate the Sabrina danger, Linus begins to court 
her. She responds and Linus is hoist on his own petard, as anyone could 
have guessed from the start . 
The superficial differences between the Wilder and the Pollack films are 
in the updating of the story by adjusting for inflation (the 1954 
million is now a billion), and means of locomotion (the Concorde, 
private helicopters and jets).  The real differences are in the cast, 
the direction, the Paris sequences and the dialogue.
No one, including Julia Ormond (pronounced OR-mond)  could in a million 
years approach the beauty, charm, elegance, distinction and 
distinctiveness of elfin, doe-eyed, adorable Audrey Hepburn--who, by the 
way,  also speaks excellent French. The Ormond hype of reviewers 
(e.g."We're melting") or of morning TV anchors ("So beautiful as to make 
you faint") has no basis. While throughout the first film, Hepburn 
convinces us with her many expressions and her romantic, schoolgirl 
crush on David, Ormond looks by comparison, older, stolid, rather 
expressionless, and generates about 70 watts of electricity with Ford 
and 40 watts without him.  
Greg Kinnear makes an OK screen debut yet lacks the warmth of William 
Holden, an actor who while never a pretty-boy had a commanding presence, 
without even trying to assert it. You may disapprove of Holden the 
playboy, but he charms you nonetheless, whereas Kinnear is more leering 
than attractive.
Ever likable Harrison Ford is appealing but here there is vagueness 
about his part and murkiness about his courtship. It is said that in the 
original Humphrey Bogart looked uncomfortable and actually said so, but 
Billy Wilder knew what he was doing. Casting Bogart against type was a 
coup. The contrast of a familiar persona shifting from tough guy to a 
romantic  upper-class pretender (in both senses) added a funny element 
that is lacking in the Ford character.  
In "Sabrina II,"  Nancy Marchand replaces Walter Hampden as the nominal 
head of the Larrabees. She has a few quips but I miss eccentric Old Man 
Larrabee who brought much amusing zip in his complicity with Linus.  At 
the same time, the economically stated poignancy in the first film's 
chauffeur Fairchild is now replaced by gimmicks.  
The direction is another problem. Writer-director Billy Wilder, a 
sophisticate from Austria, Germany, France and Hollywood, was among many 
things the collaborator and inheritor of Ernst Lubitsch and arguably the 
premier film-cynic of his time -- along with the gentler Preston 
Sturges. His work reflected European sophistication. At his best, Wilder 
put layers of meaning beneath what seemed to be obvious situations, 
lines or gags. His "Sabrina" was far funnier than the remake. In this 
film, Sydney Pollack, a first-rate craftsman with a first-rate crew, 
there are no subtleties or sub-texts.  
"Sabrina I" was part Eisenhower-era fantasy and part throwback to 1930s 
films that gave the poor of the Depression something to dream about. The 
remake is all of that plus a post-yuppie tale. 
Bogart may have been a one-track-mind businessman, but he had a 
definite, marked sense of humor.  Ford is given little of this and 
though younger is more like a caricature of the entrepreneur with 
obsessive tunnel-vision who only thinks, works, lives business.  Notice 
how, during a big Larrabee garden party, one glimpses Bogart indoors, 
demonstrating a new product to potential buyers. In "Sabrina II," Ford 
is shown doing this twice (and with more screen time), to Arabs and to 
Japanese.
In general, the moneyed class in Number 1 was shown as rather natural 
within its wealth. In Number 2 there is something offensive,  
ostentatious, crass and tacky about the rich and famous. Typically, 
Kinnear says about his mother's birthday :"I bought her a little 
Picasso." Ford "How much did that cost me?" Kinnear: "I don't know." 
Later, Ford takes Ormond on his private plane and is twice rude to the 
bubbling lady-attendant. There's more along those lines too. 
The Paris sections of "Sabrina I" are utterly charming. Sabrina goes to 
cooking school where the teacher-chef is very funny, while Marcel Dalio 
plays an elderly student, a delightful nobleman who sophisticates 
Sabrina.  In "Sabrina II," somehow Sabrina works for Vogue magazine. The 
sequences are way too long, disconnected and cliched. Sabrina almost 
loses her virginity to a young Frenchman (who gives her silly, pithy 
advice, too). There is forced semi-slapstick. The French scenes feel 
like the hundred-franc first-timers' tour of Picturesque Paris as well 
as a visual derivative of the Astaire-Hepburn movie "Funny Face." The 
movie's guiding principle seems to be that more is more. 
The first date of Linus and Sabrina is pretty straightforward in 
"Sabrina I" but needlessly long and complicated in the remake. Linus 
falling for Sabrina is gradual in "Sabrina I," too sudden in "Sabrina 
II." Then Ford tells Marchand something like "Don't worry, I'll ditch 
her" yet minutes later is ooohing over the girl.
There's overkill in several ways. For example, back from Paris, at the 
Long Island train station, Sabrina  arrives outrageously overdressed for 
someone fresh off a plane. Ask any transatlantic traveler. (In the 
identical scene of "Sabrina I" the same error was made, but at least the 
young lady had come by boat).    
The new film lacks the wit, class and pacing of the original. There are 
some improvements, no doubt, but those that come readily to mind are 
mostly the amusing Dana Ivey as Linus's secretary and the way in which 
David finds out that the chic lady he picked up at the railroad station 
is Sabrina. 
For those who worry about May-December couples, they will find the 
remake more acceptable. Ormond looks pretty mature and Ford not at all 
over-the-hill. In real life Ford (age 53) is 23 years older than Ormond 
(age 30).  
In "Sabrina I," Hepburn, then 25, was 11 years younger than William 
Holden and 30 years younger than Humphrey Bogart. In all of her movies, 
she looked convincingly very much younger than her age. And in something 
of a convention in Hepburn films, she was involved with much older 
leading men. The age gap ought to have been blatant, but the handling of 
most of those movies plus Audrey's charm made the difference in years 
more acceptable than expected.
Audrey Hepburn, born  1929 . Films where she was much younger than her 
leading men. 
Roman Holiday 1953, Peck born 1916 ,then 40 / AH then 24 --age 
difference 16 yrs
Sabrina  1954,  Bogart b. 1899, then 55 /  AH  then 25 -- age difference 
30  yrs
War and Peace 1956, Henry Fonda, b. 1905, then 51 / AH then 27-- age 
difference 34 yrs
Funny Face 1957  Fred Astaire, b. 1899,  then 58/ AH by then 28 ---age 
difference 30  yrs
Love in  the Afternoon 1957, Gary Cooper, b. 1901, then 56/ AH by then 
28 --age difference 28 yrs 
The Unforgiven 1960, Burt Lancaster b.1913, then 47 / AH then 31 ---age 
difference 16 yrs  
Charade 1963 , Cary Grant b. 1904, then 59 / AH then 34 --age difference 
25 years
My Fair Lady 1964, Rex Harrison, b. 1908, then  56/ AH then 35 --age 
difference 21 yrs
Paris-When it Sizzles, 1964,  William Holden b. 1918, then 46/ AH then 
35 -- age difference 11 yrs  
Green Mansions, 1959, Tony Perkins b. 1932, then 27/ AH then 30, 3 yrs 
older
Breakfast at Tiffany's, 1961, George Peppard  b. 1928, then 33 / AH then 
32,  1 yr younger
The Children's Hour, 1962, James Garner b. 1928, then 34 /AH then 31,  1 
yr younger
How to Steal a Million, 1966, Peter O'Toole b. 1932, then 34/ AH then 
37,  3 yrs older
Two for the Road, 1967, Albert Finney b. 1936, then 31/ AH then 38, 
====>  7 yrs older 

Bloodline 1979, They All Laughed 1981, Always 1989 : comparisons 
irrelevant. AH's age was respectively 50, 52 and 60. 

Title
Review for Civil Action, A (1998)
A CIVIL ACTION ***1/2. Directed, written, executive-produced by Steven
Zaillian. From the book by Jonathan Harr. Photography, Conrad L. Hall.
Editing,Wayne Wahrman. Production design, David Gropman.Music, Danny
Elfman.Produced by Scott Rudin, Robert Redford and Rachel Pfeffer. Cast:
John Travolta (Jan Schlichtmann), Robert Duvall (Jerome Facher), Tony
Shalhoub (Kevin Conway), William H. Macy (James Gordon), Zeljko Ivanek
(Bill Crowley), Bruce Norris (William Cheeseman), Kathleen Quinlan (Anne
Anderson), Peter Jacobson (Neil Jacobs), Mary Mara (Kathy Boyer), James
Gandolfini (Al Love), Stephen Fry (Pinder ), Dan Hedaya (John Riley),
Sydney Pollack (Al Eustis), et al. A Touchstone release.113 minutes. PG-13.
In these days of lawyer-jokes, the legal profession could use some
redemption. It comes in "A Civil Action," which is excellent, intelligent,
touching,complex, impeccably scripted, directed, produced and beautifully
served by all its performers.
It's a true story, one that gave birth to a prize-winning book. In the
1970s, in Woburn, Mass., many children died of leukemia. It was a mystery
for most people, but not for their parents who identified the culprit:
water polluted --better yet, poisoned--by two industrial giants, the Grace
Co, and Beatrice Foods.
The Boston firm of Jean Schlichtmann (Travolta), a personal-injury lawyer
(aka an ambulance chaser) is doing very well. When the children's families
ask him to take their case, Travolta politely declines. On the way to
Woburn in his speeding Porsche, he gets a ticket. On the way back,whether
by cinematic device or real coincidence-- I cannot tell , but it matters
little--comes a second ticket, next to the very location of the toxic
dumping.
Is Schlichtmann having an epiphany? Does it dawn on him that a win over the
mega-corporations could fill his firm's coffers? Is it a combination of
both? Hard to tell. But he takes the case and, in the long run, becomes
haunted by it, to the point that he and his associates have to keep
borrowing from banks, mortgaging their possessions, homes, insurance
policies, and going broke.
The fluid, meticulous but unforced script and direction are by Steven
Zaillian, who rightly jumped to fame with his scenario for Schindler's
List. His credits also include the writing (from other true-story books)
the hospital-based Awakenings, and The Search for Bobby Fisher (Zaillian's
first directorial job) about  a child who was a chess prodigy.
All those titles, plus the scenario for the fictional Jack the Bear, are of
works that move and highlight Zaillian's unquestionable compassion. He
moves you without resorting to kitsch, phony dramatics, manipulation of
emotions. A Civil Action avoids flamboyance, yet shines by its empathy for
human misery. It is also a great thriller-plus-courtroom drama, superior
because of its (mostly) low-key approach, its refusal to yield to flashy
dramatics, its exceptionally good characterizations, whether full-blown or
just sketched in.
At the root of the film we have a David and Goliath story of common
working-class people against corporate King Kongs, and of a small law firm
versus the infinite funds of Grace and Beatrice. The latter's platoons of
lawyers are headed by a powerhouse memorably --if a little too colorfully--
played by Robert Duvall, a prince of foxes.
Every moment counts in the suspenseful depiction of who will outsmart whom,
which strings will be pulled. Each deposition is a self-contained,
mesmerizing drama. We are made painfully conscious that this David is not
the Biblical one; that lawsuits seldom win outright; that the whole
procedure is a preamble to settlements; that  of fifty appeals, only five
win in the courts.
Of course, the film gets its momentum and its thrills from the use of the
tricks of the movie trade, but these are in pastels rather than screaming
colors. From photography to editing, from framing to continuity, from
dialogue or confrontations to the first-rate score by Danny Elfman, the
picture remains discreet and unexplosive.
To put the movie in a historical context, we are, in a sense, in
postmodern, post-post-post-Frank Capra populist territory of the little
people and the Masters of the Land, all framed by the fact-of-life that
Justice and the Law are far from synonymous.
Details are chosen with extraordinary care, from repressed tearfulness, to
the gradual impoverishment of the smaller law-firm, to the Harvard Club
encounter of Travolta and Grace's CEO. He is wonderfully, quirkily played
by director Sydney Pollack.
As for Travolta --or should I say Lazarus? -- I'll just say that he
continues his extraordinary comeback like a speeding bullet.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Hurricane, The (1999)
THE HURRICANE (1999) *** Directed by Norman Jewison; written by 
Armyan Bernstein and Dan Gordon, based on "The 16th Round" (1974) 
autobiography by Hurricane Carter, and on "Lazarus and the Hurricane" 
(1991) by Sam Chaiton and Terry Swinton. Photography, Roger Philip 
Rosenberg. Music, Christopher Young. Produced by Bernstein, John 
Ketcham and Jewison. Cast: Denzel Washington (Rubin Carter), John 
Hannah (Terry), Deborah Kara Unger (Lisa), Liev Schreiber (Sam), 
Vicellous Reon Shannon (Lesra), David Paymer (Myron Beldock), Dan 
Hedaya (Della Pesca), Harris Yulin (Leon Friedman), Garland Whitt 
(John Artis), Rod Steiger (Federal Judge Sarokin). A Universal 
release. 146 minutes. R (physical and psychological violence)
Several sources list this movie as 125 minutes long. The theater I 
saw it in says  146, as does the site of its chain. I had intended to 
use my chronometer, but I was engrossed enough to forget doing this.
I am also somewhat baffled by the hullabaloo raised by "The 
Hurricane," about historical inexactitudes and omissions.  The movie 
falls in the genre of biopics. There's no more fanciful type than 
this, barring total fantasies like Hercules fighting the Incas. 
Biopics are notoriously manipulated, falsified, misleading and wrong. 
Think of films from great  (even prize-winning) to junky, about 
figures ranging from Attila to Zola   Napoleon, Zapata, Pasteur, 
Hitler, Lawrence of Arabia, Lord Nelson, Ferdinand de Lesseps, Queen 
Victoria, Buffalo Bill, Juarez, Mata Hari, Al Capone, Bonnie and 
Clyde, Hemingway and so on...
In fact, even with the best, most scholarly and historical 
intentions, the most faithful stories of a life have to have cuts, 
simplifications, amalgamations or condensations when they are turned 
into films.
The fact remains that the story of boxer Rubin "Hurricane" Carter has 
been made into a very good, very moving, very well-acted, very 
well-produced movie. It follows the life of a black boy who is sent 
to reformatory for pulling a knife on a white, influential local who 
is a child molester. The kid spends years in that prison, eventually 
escapes, joins the Army, becomes its lightweight champion abroad, 
returns home, becomes a middleweight contender. Two men enter a New 
Jersey bar and gun down three people (white). Carter, then 29 is 
arrested along with his 21-year old admirer John Artis (black). They 
are falsely accused and sentenced to three consecutive life 
sentences. They spent 19 years in prison.
Claiming his innocence, Carter set to prove it from his cell. As 
played by the extraordinary Denzel Washington, he is a mixture of 
fascinating personalities that complement one another: the rebel, the 
good convict, the man in despair, the man who educates himself, the 
writer of his autobiography "The 16th Round" published in 1974 while 
he was still in jail. It is this book that comes to the attention of 
Lesra, a 15-year old African-American boy whom some Canadian 
activists and commune-dwellers in Toronto had rescued from a bad 
family environment and "adopted" so as to prepare him for high school.
Lesra's fascination for Rubin Carter communicates to his hosts. These 
are Sam, Terry and Lisa, the prettiest chain-smoker in film history. 
They dedicate themselves to proving Rubin innocent, and eventually 
succeed.
The film has superior photography, and acting by Washington and by 
Vicellous Reon Shannon (Lesra) who is already an experienced actor 
and who is in reality far older than what he seems to be. The choice 
of music is one of the best, including the song "Hurricane" by Bob 
Dylan. Dylan was one of the defenders of Rubin's, along with many 
other champions, celebrities and non-celebrities, but it would seem 
that it was only the Canadian friends who showed enough staying power 
to finish the job.
"The Hurricane" is a grab-your-heartstrings, moving motion picture, 
even a two-handkerchief work. Its director, Norman Jewison, is a 
Canadian and an old "liberal" (a nice word that has been made into a 
pox by the Right). His credits include themes of discrimination, "A 
Soldier's Story" (about a black army officer) and "In the Heat of the 
Night"(about a  black Philadelphia policeman in the South). He knows 
his subject.
"The Hurricane" is not without some inventions (over and above the 
omissions), such as a vengeful cop who is Rubin's nemesis the way 
Inspector Javert was to Jean Valjean in "Les Miserables." I will not 
detail them. They are for a good cause. They are also counterbalanced 
by some discreet touches, e.g. a prison guard who likes  Carter, 
probably believes him, yet shows it silently simply through 
photographic angles and close-ups.
I disregard, or at least don't get hot under the collar for,  several 
of the objections to the movie's historicity. But one aspect annoyed 
me: the fact that the three Canadians were unexplored characters. In 
reality there were several more people in the commune, here reduced 
to just three, the pro-Rubin activists. But eliminating the others 
leads to confusion. Are Terry, Lisa and Sam a menage a trois? Can one 
call three cohabitants a commune? What exactly did the micro-commune 
do besides taking in Lesra and fighting for Rubin?  (We are not told, 
either, that eventually Lisa and Rubin married, then divorced --but 
that could be justified as a personal fact that comes after Carter's 
liberation).
Lacunae, some distortions and all, the film is valid, involving and 
anti-racist.. Its flaws of omission and commission are characteristic 
of the arguments of true believers in causes, of  political 
movements, of schools of thought, where the activists draw blanket 
conclusions. Imperfect, but a fact of life.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for From Dusk Till Dawn (1996)
FROM DUSK TILL DAWN * 1/2. Directed and edited by Robert 
Rodriguez. Written by Quentin Tarantino. Photography, 
Guillermo Navarro. Production design, Cecilia Montiel. Music, 
Graeme Revell. Cast: Harvey Keitel, George Clooney, Quentin 
Tarantino, Juliette Lewis, Cheech Marin, Fred Williamson, 
Salma Hayek, Tom Savini, Ernest Liu.  A Miramax release. 100 
minutes. Rated R (language, graphic violence, more violence, 
sex, sex and horror exploitation) 
"El Mariachi," the made-for-pennies first major work of Robert 
Rodriguez, was better than "Desperado," his big-budget sequel. 
His third movie, a segment in "Four Rooms," intensified the 
slide. In the latter, writer-director Tarantino did even 
worse."From Dusk till Dawn," written by Tarantino, directed 
and edited by Rodriguez, is also a disappointment.  
Mister Ugly (Tarantino) and Mister Pretty (Clooney) are the 
Gecko Brothers.  Their name (remember Michael Douglas's Gordon 
Gekko in "Wall Street"?) is the starting point for smug,mostly 
ineffectual filmic in-jokes and references. The Geckos are 
sadistic robbers and killers. Escaped convict Seth (Clooney) 
seems relatively rational  by his standards (but  how could he 
be?) and is in nominal control. Dumb,trigger-happy Richard 
(Tarantino) is a card-carrying delusional nut, sex maniac and 
rapist . Real-life hyper-kinetic, weirdo Tarantino is well 
cast. Clooney too. He slips easily into the strong, menacing 
character of Rodriguez or Tarantino movies. 
The pair have just robbed a Texas bank, killed many and taken 
a hostage. (All this is later reported  on TV with amusing 
black, media-satirizing humor). In  a roadside gas station the 
brothers add to the body count. It's so gratuitously, crazily 
shown that the violence is stylized and surreal. As they're 
fleeing to Mexico, another in-joke, a kind of  X-ray of their 
car's trunk, reveals momentarily their trussed up hostage. 
Someone has been watching Godard and Truffaut movies; someone 
ought to have learned from them more about substance and 
subtexts. 
A family of three in an RV are the next hostages. The parts 
are performed with unusual calm --another in-joke.  Harvey 
Keitel is a widowed pastor who has lost his faith. In another 
joke on the audience, Keitel's daughter Juliette Lewis, whom 
we would expect to join the brothers as a Natural Born Killer, 
does not. In a logic-defying gag, Chinese-American Ernest Liu 
plays the son. Clooney wonders :"How can he be your son? He 
looks Japanese." "No" retorts Keitel," he looks Chinese."  
Of such bits is the first part made. They are sort of  
promising,  although for a good, oddly lyrical yet 
based-on-fact killing spree movie I would recommend "Badlands" 
(1973) with Martin Sheen and Sissy Spacek. 
Entering Mexico, the brothers rendez-vous with their Mexican 
contacts in Titty Twister, a huge, crass, baroque, surreal 
strip joint in the middle of nowhere. It is full of nude 
dancers and swarthy, murderous-looking Mexican bikers and 
truckers. (Texican Rodriguez keeps perpetuating movie 
cliches). One of the customers has a miniature cannon strapped 
to his private parts. The joint almost makes you smell sweat, 
body odors, and think of V.D. Violent things happen. 
After a lull, Satanico Pandemonium (beautiful Salma Hayek from 
"Desperado") does a number with a huge snake. Suddenly she 
morphs into a ghoul --as does everyone else.  Becoming allies, 
captors and hostages unite against an onslaught of vampires, 
the Undead, monsters. The struggle goes on forever. How long 
is "forever"? My stopwatch 's battery got so fed up that it 
died. 
At the start of this second half there are sporadic gags. 
"Does anyone have a cross?" (to stop the vampires). "No, but 
two pieces of wood would do. Peter Cushing does it all the 
time."  A disquisition on vampires follows.  "We need a book, 
a real book" "Like  a Time-Life book?"  Cheap humor, but still  
preferable to the mayhem.
Interminably, the morphing and re-morphing disgusting vampire 
critters attack. The lurid, incoherent hodge-podge of 
massacres is an orgy of gore and dismemberment. It also kills 
whatever character development was present earlier. 
Unrelieved, very dull, this becomes a second, tacked-on, 
irrelevant movie.  The visuals and other special effects are 
skillful, but so what? It's all deja vu. The only original, 
also surreal gag, at the very end, when we see the back of the 
joint. It  is built like a Mexican pyramid. 
The fortune all this cost could have Rodriguez's parents, nine 
siblings and extended family live in comfort for a lifetime, 
with money left over for another ten generations. This flick 
is not merely over-the-top, it tops the topper. It is not 
plain old pulp fiction either. Much of it is what happens to 
pulp after it's been digested. 

Title
Review for Addicted to Love (1997)
ADDICTED TO LOVE *** 1/3. Directed by Griffin Dunne. Written by Robert
Gordon. Photography, Andrew Dunn. Editing, Elizabeth Kling. Production
Design, Robin Standefer. Art Direction, Stephen Alesch. Music, Rachel
Portman. Cast: Meg Ryan (Maggie),  Matthew Broderick (Sam), Kelly Preston
(Linda), Tcheky Karyo (Anton), Maureen Stapleton (Nana), Nesbitt Blaisdell,
Remak Ramsay, Dominick Dunne. A Warner Bros. release of an Outlaw
production in association with Miramax Films.  97 min. R (sex, language)
Back from the Cannes Festival where even in weak years excellent films can
be found, I felt apprehensive about what  US summer movies held in store
for me. I chose the prosaically titled "Addicted to Love" as my first local
outing, knowing little about it beyond the fact that its lead actors were
attractive. My worries increased as the movie unfurled.
Astronomer Sam (Broderick) works in some unnamed rural area, worries when
his schoolteacher forever-love Linda decides to accept a brief educational
assignment in New York City. In one of the several scenes that require a
leap of faith, he waves at her from his truck as he follows the airliner
she's in on the tarmac. Don't try this at home.
In another jolt, but this time wonderfully screwy, as Sam prepares to
welcome back Linda, he gets instead her father reading him a Dear John
letter. Linda has found a new love. Sam goes bananas with worry, but I felt
that things were looking up. (Much later the same gentleman has an  amusing
reprise of a different Dear John letter).
After the fastest packing job in film history, Sam flies to the Big Apple,
begins to search for his lady-love and, improbably, locates her in SoHo
where she shares the apartment of her new amour Anton.  Improbably (again!)
Sam finds a racked-and-ruined space in a condemned building just across
from Anton's.
Accumulating impossibilities, our jilted hero sets up a camera obscura to
spy around the clock on the new twosome. This requires an explanation. If
you know about the development of photography, you may be familiar with the
camera obscura principle, one that dates back many centuries. Imagine a
room like a big cube. You make a small hole in one wall. This acts as a
lens and projects what it "sees" outside on its opposite wall. Some
painters used this trick ages ago, and later this became the primitive
"pinhole" camera.
The wall picture is upside down, but since Sam knows all about optics he
Rube Goldbergs a lens system that rights the picture up on the wall he has
just painted white. The final result is a Peeping Tom's (or Sam's)
voyeuristic-masochistic super-gizmo that the audience must take on faith.
Next a mysterious motorcyclist, helmeted hence faceless, shows up in Sam's
loft. To no one's surprise, the biker is Maggie, the jilted fiancee of
Anton's. A photographer, collage and, somehow, audio expert,
Maggie teams up with Sam and adds sound to images by bugging Anton's place.
Both Sam and Maggie are cuckoo. Sam, a scientific whiz but a rube in
matters of the heart, is convinced that Linda's infatuation will wane. He
sets up weird charts on which, with self-deluding hope, he follows Linda's
symptoms, such as the diminishing (he thinks) intensity of her smiles. He's
willing to wait until Linda sees the light.
Maggie however wants Anton "vaporized," needs revenge, impure and
un-simple. She's like a maenad, but even as a Gorgon with snakes for hair,
Meg Ryan would still be Miss Cute Universe -- notwithstanding grungy
leopard blouses, black-rimmed eyes, coarse vocabulary and all. But she is
certainly stretching her film persona and doing it very well. (You'll find
that as matters advance, Maggie's looks get gradually un-grunged and her
speech un-coarsened).
Even before the movie starts it is a given that the Ryan-Broderick duo will
turn into a cooing couple, that their initial aims and tactical differences
will result in harmonious co-conspiracies. No matter how you cut it, they
make an nice couple, in love and war. Unlike Ryan, Broderick is not cast
against type, since, in so many of his roles, he has been a rather quiet
reactor rather than a flaming personality.
At some point between the setting up of wild gadgetry and the Maggie-Sam
rapprochement, the movie makes you disregard disbelief. Instead, it begins
to captivate and amuse you, to enjoy its cleverness and chain of surprises,
to make you conscious that there's more originality than meets the eye.
In the other couple there is a nominal imbalance that plays with, then goes
against, movie cliches. Linda is your film-typical wide-eyed beauty who has
lost her heart and mind to a wily Latin lover, Anton, the owner of a new
French restaurant. For a long stretch, he is your movie-typical flashy,
suave, self-assured French seducer whose affair with Maggie seems to have
been a ploy towards legal U.S. residence -- the Green Card syndrome. Yet as
the story proceeds, we find out that Anton may be a hustler but he is not a
heel or a villain, not one-dimensional, and above all, not untouched by
love.
Tcheky Karyo,a heavy in "La Femme  Nikita" and other films, becomes here a
splendidly comic figure, a man whose panache obscures feelings that are
complex yet do not include complexes. In an improbable but beautifully
written kitchen sequence (which doubles as gentle mocking of American
xenomania), he tells his admiring staff about his rise from a simple cafe
waiter in Paris to an entrepreneur in New York. In the New World, a French
accent, piling on the sophistication, having a culinary lexicon, audacity,
brashness (or chutzpah) have made him a glamorous figure and opened Horatio
Alger possibilities.
Maggie and Sam feel increasingly comfortable together. In fact, as they sit
on a sofa and watch the wall-movie of Linda and Anton they seem to enjoy it
the way the silhouettes do in Mystery ScienceTheater 3000, without the
latter's obnoxious comments. And as they plot anti-Anton activities, you
almost feel that the fun of the tricks proper is bigger than the
perpetrators'  original aims. There's improbable, off-the-wall
inventiveness at work here. Such as discrediting Anton in Linda's eyes by
(don't ask) having a monkey mark the Frenchman's shirt with lipstick, or
kids squirt-gun expensive perfume on him.
Those guerilla tactics expand when Sam infiltrates Anton's life, taking a
job as a dishwasher, becoming the model employee, getting appreciated by
Anton --and then ruining the restaurant by (literally) bugging it.
(Writer-reporter Dominick Dunne, the director's father, has a cameo as a
food critic).
Unexpectedly, what hurts Anton's soul most is the loss of Linda. What hurts
his body is a devastating allergy inflicted by Maggie, followed by broken
bones inflicted in a mix-up by Sam, by now sort of a pal . The suffering
Gallic sophisticate has, at this point, become the most interesting figure
of the movie. Though this is not  quite a "noir" comedy, it is transformed
into high-energy slapstick with all the ingredients of farce : raucousness,
physicality and funny cruelty.
An interesting point is that the only product-placement item in this film
is the Leica M-series camera -- as classy and fine an item as can be. It is
symbolic of the movie's own smooth elegance and mechanism once you get past
the unlikely bits.
Actor-producer's Griffin Dunne's first directed feature may have started
out as a potential loser but ends up as a clear winner. Photography, sets
and all production values do justice to the maverick, novel, first produced
feature script by Robert Gordon, one that took over seven years to reach
the screen.

Title
Review for Con Air (1997)
CON AIR ** Directed by Simon West. Written by Scott Rosenberg.  Produced by
Jerry Bruckheimer Pictures / Buena Vista Pictures.Photography, David
Tattersall. Editing, Chris Lebenzon, Steve Mirkovich. Music, Mark Mancina,
Trevor Rabin. Special effects, Computer Film Company / Dream Quest. Cast:
Nicolas Cage (Cameron Poe), John Cusack  (US Marshal Vince Larkin),  John
Malkovich  ( Cyrus "The Virus" Grissom), Steve Buscemi ( Garland "The
Marietta Mangler" Greene),Nick Chinlund  (Billy "Billy Bedlam" Bedform),
Rachel Ticotin ( Guard Sarah Bishop), Colm Meaney ( Agent Duncan Malloy),
M.C. Gainey  (Jimmy Earl "Swamp Thing" West), Ving Rhames (Nathan "Diamond
Dog" Jones), Brendan Kelly ( Conrad), Mykelti Williamson (Baby O),  Danny
Trejo (John "Johnny 23" Baca), Renoly (Sally Can't Dance), et al. A Buena
Vista  release. 115 min. Rated R (extreme violence and language).
As I staggered from the excesses of "Con Air" into the daylight, I thought
that the category this and many other pictures belong to is "Traction
Movies," short for Trash and Action. What sets "Con Air" in a niche within
Traction films, seems to be that no other film I remember has had such a
colossal number of camera shots.
This is done by keeping them brief and keeping them coming at you at  an
average rate of about one shot per second. Since, minus final credits, this
movie runs about 112 minutes, times 60 this makes it a total of 6720
seconds or 6720 images. If I am wrong, it still feels that way.
Thanks to a cast of able actors  ( Cage, Cusack, Malkovich, Buscemi,
others) the film survives. The performers, given a lot to do physically and
very little thespianly are caricatural, one-dimensional cliches, yet each
does the most with what he has. The good guys (plus Guard Rachel Ticotin)
though not always pleasant, are in law enforcement. The
much-worse-than-bad, arch-criminal  guys are convicts.
The real hero, however, is Cameron Poe whom Nicholas Cage plays with a
drawl and with what might just be a certain amount of boredom. As a  just
discharged ace Army Ranger, he meets his pretty (blonde, of course)
waitress wife who is pregnant. Defending her against some drunken scum, he
accidentally kills one of them.
This involuntary manslaughter sends Cage to the pen for eight years in  an
unlikely miscarriage of justice. The man is a model prisoner. He keeps fit,
betters himself, reads constantly, does origami, corresponds sweetly with
wife and daughter --  and in case you missed that fleeting shot, also has a
lithograph of Jesus on his wall.
Paroled, Cage is improbably put on a special plane, a flying high-security
jail, along with a bunch of the worst serial killers, serial rapists and
serial you-name-it imaginable. Not merely  The Dirty Dozen but the
Amazingly Filthy And Then Some Dozen. In ways that stun one's imagination,
the cons, though thoroughly searched, carry the means to take over the
plane. They do just that, triggering the Law's search for and duels with,
the beastly hijackers.
Their leader is Cyrus the Virus (Malkovich) whose viciousness is matched by
his amazingly high I.Q. and who initially wears an absurd Hannibal Lecter
mask. The smartest lawman is John Cusack, whose efforts are complicated by
Agent Colm Meaney, here a sort of  meanie, but  familiar as a wonderfully
warm  Irish dad in "The Snapper," and warm too in the lesser "The Van."
Cage is, of course, The Man Who Will Save the Situation. A Great Guy
through and through, at times almost saintly, he must vanquish the
criminals if he wants to see his family, also to save Guard Ticotin from
rape and to get insulin for his best buddy who is also in the plane.
The machine-gun-fast succession of events or fractions of events becomes
from the start such overkill (in all senses) that you can't really keep up
with details. The facts are  impossible to describe, remember, or to make
any sense of. It's an orgy of plot-holes,   contradictions and
impossibilities. The audience sits there with eyes and brains numbed. By
the time the may try to formulate an objection or ask a neighbors "what
happened?" a new situation is already on the screen, then another, then
another.  (Among the myriad question marks is why Buscemi is given such
slick aphorisms and why he does not assassinate a little girl).
The movie is as understanding-proof as it is critic-proof, meaning that it
will make money even if all the reviews are bad. And bad they should be,
except that "Con Air," no matter how insane or guilty of esthetic, moral
and cinematic crimes, is not boring. It keep going and it keeps you going.
"Con Air" climaxes with a preposterous destruction of much of Las Vegas as
the airplane, piloted by convict "Swamp Thing" plows through the city, then
a fire engine, driven by the same man keeps up the mayhem. The immense
absurdity is campily comical. It makes you wonder if Swamp Thing should not
get a medal.

Title
Review for Mifunes sidste sang (1999)
MIFUNE (Mifunes Sidste Sang) (Denmark, 1999) ** 1/4 Directed by Soren 
Kragh-Jacobsen. Written by Kragh-Jacobsen and Story by 
Kragh-Jacobsen. Photography, Anthony Dod Mantle. Editing, Valdis 
Oskarsdottir. Music by Nulle Og Verdensorkestret. Cast: Anders W. 
Berthelsen (Kresten), Iben Hjejle (Liva), Jesper Asholt (Rud), Sofie 
Grabol (Claire), Emil Tarding (Bjarke), Anders Hove (Gerner) and 
Paprika Steen (Pernille). Produced by Birgitte Hald and Morten 
Kaufmann. A Sony Pictures Classics release. In Danish with subtitles. 
99 minutes. R (language, violence)
Sometime  in 1995 A.D. a bunch of the boys (Danish moviemakers) were 
whooping it up in Copenhagen.  Whether in merriment, seriousness, 
put-on, or all the above, they came up with a sort of collective, 
Dogme 95. It was followed by a serious manifesto, the full reading of 
which is a howl.  It is a set of "indisputable rules" which they 
called The Vow Of Chastity.  As I see it, it was a cinematic "back to 
nature" micro-movement whose purpose was  to purify film by refusing 
certain techniques and conventions.  Put differently, it was a 
neo-Luddite attitude which, I suspect, was a mix of 
tongue-in-cheekness, getting publicity, and  good intentions.
The Dogme contains 10 rules, a la Moses : Location shooting only. 
Sound and image must be simultaneously recorded. Hand-held cameras 
only. Color film only. No special lighting, no optical work or 
filters. No "superficial action" (murders, weapons, etc.). Film must 
take place here and now. Genre movies are a no-no. Academy 35mm 
format only. Directors must not be credited.
"Mifune" is also listed as "Mifune Dogme 3" because it is the third 
officially Dogme acredited movie made by following the Ten 
Commandments. It was preceded by Lars Trier's "The Idiots" and Thomas 
Vinterberg's "The Celebration."
The plot. In Copenhagen, yuppieish Kresten marries Claire, the 
daughter of his tycoon boss. The wedding night has Claire demonstrate 
sexual bliss in the longest and loudest way. It gets a 9 in non-porno 
film history. (Why not a 10? Because one should always allow for 
future records).
An urgent phone call  informs Kresten that his father has died in 
Lolland (Denmark's southermost island). The young financier's 
presence is required. It comes as a shock to Claire since Kresten had 
declared that he had no family at all. His hurried excuse is that he 
had been alienated from his people for many years. He promises to be 
back in 48 hours.
He (and his wife's BMW) reach the island by ferry-boat. The family 
property turns out to be a dilapidated mess of a farm and farmhouse. 
The inhabitants are Daddy's corpse and Rud, Kresten's mentally 
defective older brother. Among Rud's many peculiarities are a 
conviction that space people are landing and a refusal to take 
showers. He is kind of sweet but needs care and supervision.
Kresten's calls in all sorts of excuses to his wife to explain that 
he will be delayed. Since Rud cannot be left alone (but one wonders 
what the incapacitated father had been doing for him) Kresten 
advertises in a Copenhagen paper for a housekeeper.
In most unlikely record time the classified ad is answered by Liva, 
who shows up pronto. She is (but of course does not disclose it) one 
of a small group of upscale call-girls who seem to have mostly kinky 
clients. Liva plies her trade out of necessity:  to pay 
private-school fees for her unruly young brother. But she has to flee 
the big city because of problems with her pimp, with an irate client, 
and with a threatening, anonymous caller.
That's the story so far. Will there be mutual attraction between 
Kresten and Liva? Are there some nasty neigbors around? Will Claire 
get suspicious and show up? Or Liva's fellow-workers?  Is there a pot 
of gold at the end of the rainbow? Shall we meet Liva's brother 
Bjarke? Will he and Rud become fast friends? Should we expect a happy 
ending?
If writer-director Soren Kragh-Jacobsen was looking for an original 
storyline he has another look coming. If he wanted to apply Dogme 
95's Decalogue to his film, he was relatively successful. I repeat, 
relatively. For example, the handheld camera bit. Time and again I 
was sure that the steadiness of some images could not have been 
achieved without a tripod. Anotherr example: the anti-genre bit. The 
affair between Liva and Kresten falls squarely in the prostitute with 
a heart of gold category. The director bit.  Dogme movies always get 
around the non-crediting of the director. And so on. But the film 
does hew to the lighting part of the Commandments and the avoidance 
of technical devices and special effects.
Kragh-Jacobsen does admit "that he bent the rule on using available 
props a bit --pruning a few bushes in an overgrown farm garden and 
borrowing a few chickens from the farm next door."
Along traditional criteria, the performers are the major 
beneficiaries of the Dogma. They are all suprisingly good, and our 
unfamiliarity with them makes us see real people rather than 
performers. Only one player may be known to us, Iben Hjejle 
(pronounced EE-ben YI-leh) who made her American debut opposite John 
Cusack in "High Fidelity."
The film's title is not all that esoteric. In Danish it is "Mifune's 
Last Song." From their youth, Kresten and Rud, fans of samurai films 
(which Rud calls "samovar") have  played a game in which the famous 
Japanese actor was impersonated by Kresten, complete with 
Japanese-type grunts.
Despite weaknesses, the movie's rough look and "faux naive" strategy 
does give it a nice succession of believable slice-of-life scenes in 
the "what you see is what you get" vein. The camera and microphone 
constantly observe and record without providing any explanations or 
comments. It's a kind of hybrid: staged but not elaborated 
cinema-verite with a fitting uncomplexity of characters. As it stands 
until now, Dogme 95 is more of a shaggy dogma than anything else, but 
it could be a plus in the most unlikely possibility that it might rub 
off on some movie-making, even microscopically, and reduce today's 
cinema's suffocating reliance on gimmickry.
"Mifune" was Denmark's nominee for foreign language Oscars. At the 
Berlin Film Festival  it won the Silver Bear. The top prize, the 
Golden Bear, went to "The Thin Red Line."
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Giardino dei Finzi-Contini, Il (1970)
THE GARDEN OF THE FINZI-CONTINIS (IL GIARDINO DEI FINZI-CONTINI) (Italy,
1970) . *** 3/4  Directed by Vittorio De Sica. Written by Cesare Zavattini,
Vittorio Bonicelli, Ugo Pirro, Giorgio Bassani, from Bassani's
semi-autobiographical novel. Photography, Ennio Guarnieri. Editing, Adriana
Novelli. Art direction, Giancarlo Bartolini Salimbeni. Sets, Franco
D'andria. Music, Manuel De Sica. Cast: Dominique Sanda (Micol), Lino
Capolicchio (Giorgio), Helmut Berger (Alberto), Fabio Testi  (Malnate),
Rmolo Valli  (Giorgo's father), et al. A Sony Classics release. In Italian
with subtitles. 95 min. (Rated R --but this is an old, unbelievably severe
rating)
The best film around these days may well be the 27-year old "The Garden of
the Finzi-Continis,"  re-released in a beautifully restored print, with
updated sound. It was made by Vittorio De Sica, one of a handful of masters
of neorealism, the Italian "movement" (in subjects and style) that appeared
during World War II and widened incalculably the scope of film.
"The Garden of the Finzi-Continis"" won the Best Foreign Film Oscar in 1971
and a slew of other honors. It was said to be De Sica's comeback, but he
had really never gone away. There was and still is a general misconception
that De Sica's star waned after 1953.
There have been so many misapprehensions and hasty judgments about De Sica
that a short evaluation is in order.
De Sica started his career as a stage performer. He soon became very
popular. He then became also a film actor. From the early 1930s on he was
idolized in Italy by the public and the critics. As in the Fascist period
the once-great Italian cinema had declined enormously, it is safe to say
that De Sica's presence salvaged a big percentage of the 20 or so films he
appeared in during the Mussolini era. Some years ago, a retrospective of
Italian movies of that era at the Pesaro Festival  proved beyond question
the importance of De Sica as an actor.
He began directing films in 1939, with good results right away, notably
"The Children Are Watching Us" (1942). Soon his lifelong collaborator was
Cesare Zavattini. Arguably the best of Italian scriptwriters, he worked on
practically all of De Sica's movies. In 1946 began the director's golden
neorealist period, with classics like "Shoeshine,"" Bicycle Thieves,""
Miracle in Milan, and "Umberto D."
Between 1953 and 1963 he directed eight films and a very good episode in
the omnibus "Boccaccio 70."  "Indiscretion of an American Wife" (Stazione
Termini) (1953) has its virtues but was hampered by the tug between the
director and the producer, and its original release print cut down to 63
minutes. Next, De Sica showed that he had a talent for comedy in the
excellent "The Gold of Naples." "The Roof" is a touching return to
neorealism. "The Last Judgment," unknown in the US and little-known
elsewhere, is very good. The realistic, gripping "Two Women" is a superb
drama which won Sophia Loren an Oscar. Two more features, "Anna from
Brooklyn" and "Il Boom," hardly  circulated in the States, if at all. And I
cannot remember clearly "The Condemned of Altona" to give an opinion.
Then came in 1964 the very colorful, funny yet touching "Marriage Italian
Style" with Sophia Loren and Marcello Mastroianni. It won a 1964 Oscar
nomination for Loren, and (oddly, in 1965) the nomination for Best Foreign
Film, while De Sica's "Yesterday, Today and Tomorrow," also with
Loren-Mastroianni, won the 1964 Oscar  for Best Foreign Film.
Even those movies that, for some viewers, seemed  beneath what they
expected of De Sica, have more than a few flashes of brilliance. This was
confirmed a few years back during a major  De Sica retrospective at my
favorite film festival, in La Rochelle (France). (La Rochelle has
repeatedly opened our eyes to other "auteurs," whether unknowm,
little-known , neglected or misunderstood.)
After his Oscar triumphs, De Sica, driven by his need of money, made six
(or parts thereof) commercial films in so many years. Three of them, "A
Young World," "The Witches" may be unknown in America.  "After the Fox" and
"Woman Times Seven," are underrated. The very commercial "A Place for
Lovers" (Mastroianni and Faye Dunaway " and "Sunflower" (Mastroianni-Loren)
are admittedly duds.
A second comeback followed with "The Garden of the Finzi-Continis." Finally
came his last three works, one good, two excellent, all of a serious nature
"A Brief Vacation," "We'll Name Him Andrea" (1972) --sadly not seen in
America--and "The Voyage" (1973).
Throughout his life De Sica continued to play in several films. Most were
by others. Some he directed himself but he hardly appeared in any of his
top works. By my count he was in at least 74 movies, probably more. Both
his accepting roles and directing some pictures stemmed from his perpetual
need of money. He was a compulsive gambler who kept losing fortunes. In the
early 1970s I once sat not far from him in a casino. It was a sad sight.
"The Garden" chronicles the years 1938-1943 fitfully and with some clear
flashbacks (but has none of the customary dating of World War II's
developments), around a wealthy, cultivated and aristocratic Jewish family
in Ferrara. Their large, walled-in estate and mansion, open to friends and
family, become a gilded ghetto when Mussolini  starts his anti-Semitic
decrees. At first it's like an avoidance reaction: stay apart and things
may improve. This is not stupidity. Jews in other countries were clinging
to similar hopes. After all, in places like Germany or Italy so many of
them were totally assimilated and respected that it was inconceivable that
patriotic people (many had fought bravely for their country in the Great
War ) would be treated savagely.
But the measures get nastier: exclusion from clubs, no military service for
Jews, no phone directory listings, no obituaries in papers, no non-Jewish
servants, no going to schools or public libraries and other places, etc.
And World War II is looming. Says main character Giorgio, a son in another
Jewish family: "The war will be even harder for us -- the Negroes."
Giorgio's parents are well-to-do Ferrarans. His father is a proud Fascist
--until he sees the light. For ten years, Giorgio and the Finzi-Contini
daughter Micol, have been best friends. Now grown-up, Giorgio has an
unrequited passion for the girl. She would like to keep the camaraderie but
love is out of the question. Is there another man? Does cool, elusive,
self-possessed Micol have an incestuous relationship (whether in thought or
in deed) with her beloved, terminally  ill brother Alberto? Is he
homosexual? Is it by chance that Micol is reading Jean Cocteau ("he is
chic") who deals with both gayness and incest?
The film weaves with skill and pertinence its various elements, reactions,
personal relations. Discrimination is mostly dealt with in a low-key
fashion, without the shown or verbally described physical brutality of most
Holocaust pictures. There are questions and ambivalences yet the whole
remains lucid. A major role held by Malnate -- Giorgio's best male friend,
a Communist and a non-Jew -- adds veracity and complexity to the story.
The Fascists' anti-Semitic measures may not have been anything like the
Nazi ones, and were disapproved by a large number of Italians, but they did
exist. There was no deportation of the magnitude in other countries. For
example, in Thessaloniki, the second largest city in Greece, were
concentrated most of the Jews of the country,  in a community of at least
60,000. During the Occupation of Greece in World War II, the Nazis deported
all of Thessaloniki's Jews to death camps from which an infinitesimally
small  fraction returned. (Of the few thousands of other Jews living
elsewhere in Greece, some, warned by the Thessaloniki disaster, managed to
hide. Still, many others were sent to death camps).
But then, the horror of persecution both is and is not a matter of numbers.
The focus on the Finzi-Continis makes it come terribly alive. Even if the
people in authority, as they herd off the victims, keep saying "Prego"
(Please).
Without symbolic obviousness, the film contrasts intelligently changes of
seasons, the beauty of nature, young people or old buildings, with the
ugliness of the events. Ferrara is not a studio set but the real city. The
performers are, in neo-realist fashion, mostly non-professionals except for
the headliners: Austrian-born Helmut Berger; the first-rate Lino
Capolicchio and Romolo Valli;  and Parisian Dominique Sanda. She had
already made her mark in three films : by Robert Bresson, Maximilian Schell
and especially in Bernardo Bertolucci's "The Conformist."  The latter plus
"The Garden" made her a major star.
This is a film without audience manipulation or pulling of heart-strings.
The actors are surprisingly "un-Italian" by not engaging into big, overt
emotions, not to mention that wonderful Italian theatricality that would
have been out of place here. There are no heroes. We watch the protagonists
with their strengths and weaknesses in an almost cerebral fashion as we do
the senior, dignified Finns-Contini members. Yet emotion gradually builds
up, climaxing with the final off-screen singing of a heart-breaking
Kaddish, the Prayer for the Dead.

Title
Review for Frantic (1988)
FRANTIC  (France-USA, 1988) *** 1/2 Directed by Roman Polanski. Written by
Polanski and Gerard Brach. Cinematography, Witold Sobocinski. Editing, Sam
O'Steen. Production design, Pierre Guffroy. Music, Ennio Morricone.
Produced by Thom Mount and Tim Hampton.  Cast: Harrison Ford,  Emmanuelle
Seigner, John Mahoney, Betty Buckley, Jimmie Ray Weeks, Yorgo Voyagis,
David Huddleston, Gerard Klein, et al. A Warners release. 120 minutes.
Rated R.
>From its first shots, FRANTIC generates and keeps up  such terrific
suspense that it makes most (if not all) other thrillers of the 80s  taste
like porridge. The suspense is  deliberate, slow, stretched out in an
utterly commonplace atmosphere --and  it is exceptionally effective. San
Francisco doctor Walker ( Harrison Ford) arrives in Paris, with his wife
Sondra (Betty Buckley, ) for a medical convention, with a bit of tax-exempt
sightseeing on the side and  a second honeymoon  away from the kids. They
are exhausted  by the  long trip  and jet-lag.  On the "peripherique" --
the belt-road around Paris-- their taxi has a flat. Even  this red herring
happening carries suspense. They  later totter into the Grand Hotel. The
bleary-eyed  couple of generic American tourists are dutifully determined
to start their stay with  croissants and a roll in bed. But bed and
breakfast are not to be. While Ford is showering noisily, with gleeful
anticipation of things to come, the phone rings and his wife  answers. When
the man  steps out of the shower, the lady  has vanished.
You' re made to feel  all along that something ominous is going to happen,
but since you don't know what this might be, every moment, object and tiny
event is laden with suspense.
Director Polanski  has assimilated  better than any other filmmaker the
techniques of Alfred Hitchcock, where the most common thing could be
uncommon, where the blandest face could become sinister, where the
extraordinary lies within the ordinary. Later, Polanski    also pays
additional,  discreet homage to the Master in  ways that Hitchcockians will
spot -- from the ironic use of the Statue of Liberty to a rooftop scene.
But there's a  difference in attitudes. Hitchcock mocks  gently both his
principals and their entourage, while Polanski  practices a restrained
irony only on the surrounding people and places . He is entirely serious
about his  protagonist Harrison Ford.
Tension mounts  unrelentingly  as Ford goes from puzzlement to questions in
the lobby ,  from  fruitless inquiries on the spot to the police station,
then to the US. Embassy.  Finally  he is forced to embark  on his own,
desperate, frantic search.
Every imaginable frustration  stands  in his way, and every  stumbling-
block is genuine and observed with sardonic precision  --even black humor
-- by the script and its execution.  Ford speaks no French and is at the
mercy of the good will of interpreters. The hotel personnel is amiable but
skeptical : wives have been known to fly the coop --  not a big deal in
France. The familiar quirks and annoyances of daily life in Paris add to
the difficulties   --like people on the phone who don't want to be
disturbed and hang up. Complicating   Ford's miseries are the  peculiar,
private and official Gallic  attitudes toward any problem. Compounding this
are their specific attitudes toward  Americans, whom they see as
un-Cartesian, unsophisticated simpletons. Underlying that is the familiar,
slightly sadistic pleasure (which the entire planet shares) in getting back
at the Yanks who have had it so good for so long. Let the Americans stew.
The cops treat  Ford with haughty superiority. The American Embassy people
-- once  the breathless Ford  has run  through the gauntlet of security
measures-- are cold , indifferent and unhelpful. The doctor is on his own,
in a Paris   shown with superb calculation and naturalness,  neither as Gay
Paree nor as an artificially sinister metropolis.
Against all odds, Ford --who ought to be distracted to  perdition with
worry -- somehow   keeps his wits. Taking his main clue from a wrong
suitcase, the  harassed, dead-tired  husband doggedly follows it and
becomes involved in a nightmarish investigation . It    leads him to  odd
but very real places, and to  fringe people. Among them  stands out a
black-leather young woman, Michelle (Emmanuelle Seigner). She's  sexy, with
long legs that Polanski's  camera caresses with low-angle shots, but Ford
does not .
The film is smart.  It   gives you some of the conventions of "film noir"
but it  does not  get into  all-out cliches. The girl 's erotic presence is
palpable (her dancing is like vertical copulation), but  this  is  not used
as a distraction or a love interest.  Keeping  up mercilessly the suspense
of the search is what matters.
There does come a point where some  filmic overkill sets in --and I mean
this more figuratively than literally-- where, in plot  twists and in
persons introduced, too much is too much, especially by the standards of
Alfred Hitchcock who would have built up developments more soberly while he
would have kept going with character development. (That's why I think of
the construction of his  pictures as "clean." )  Even so, the first part of
Frantic is  masterly, the second part  confident of itself, and the third,
in spite of its gimmickry, still has some good touches.
Harrison Ford, a true professional whose talent and versatility tend to be
forgotten because of his  Han Solo and Indiana Jones roles, confirms here
the appeal of his unpretentiousness. Newcomer Emmanuelle Seigner gets off
to a pretty indecent  start. She's the granddaughter of the legendary Louis
Seigner, star of the Comedie Francaise. The supporting cast, especially the
hotel and police people, are perfect in their realism: the more you know
France the better those actors are. Polanski chose them and directed them
with impressive precision.
Roman Polanski was born in Paris in 1933 of Polish-Jewish parents who
returned to Poland three years later. Soon after came the occupation by the
Nazis, the persecution of Jews and the deportation of his family to death
camps. Roman, who had escaped the Germans, survived. Later he studied and
made films in Poland, became famous. A cosmopolitan who knew well big
cities, he used them in his works with moody authenticity:  London in
Repulsion, Paris in The Tenant, New York  in Rosemary's Baby, Los Angeles
in Chinatown.
The production values of Frantic are outstanding. Polanski  surrounded
himself with a who's who of  collaborators. French scenarist (and director)
Gerard Brach worked here with Polanski for the ninth time. Among his
fifty-odd screenplays are The Two Of Us ("Le Vieil homme et l'enfant"),
Quest For Fire, The Name Of The Rose, Jean De Florette ,  Manon of the
Spring, Maria's Lovers. Editor Sam O'steen  had already three Oscar
nominations (Who's Afraid of Virginia Woolf?, Chinatown, Silkwood).
Designer Pierre Guffroy had won two Oscars (Tess, The Discreet Charm of the
Bourgeoisie). Composer Ennio Morricone is a legend in his field. Director
of photography Sobocinski, a Polish collaborator of Andrzej Wajda, proved
again what an incredible source of  great cinematographers Poland is,
especially  the  film school at Lodz, Polanski's  alma mater.
Curiously,  this is the second movie called "Frantic," at least in English.
The first  (called in France Elevator to the Gallows) was also a thriller,
also made in France, also set in Paris. It was  one of the very first works
of the French New Wave, and the first fiction feature  by Louis Malle, who,
curiously, as in the case of Polanski, was one of the few European
filmmakers to be very successful with the pictures that they made in
America.
Oddly, except for a small, faithful following, Frantic has been underrated
and paid little attention to from the time of its release on.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Point of No Return (1993)
POINT OF NO RETURN (1993) ** 1/2 .  Directed by John Badham. Written by
Robert Getchell and Alexandra Seros, based on "Nikita" by Luc Besson.
Cinematography, Michael Watkins. Editing, Frank Morriss. Production design,
Philip Harrison. Music, Hans Zimmer. Cast: Bridget Fonda, Gabriel Byrne,
Dermot Mulroney, Miguel Ferrer, Anne Bancroft, Olivia D'Abo, Harvey Keitel.
A Warners release. 108 min. Rated R (violence, language, adult situations).
>From almost its beginnings, Hollywood has remade more French films that
products of other nations. As is the rule, remakes of any sort suffer in
the process. Think of the current "Sommersby" and "The Vanishing."
"Point of No Return" however fares much better. For one thing, its 1990
modish French model was already filmed "a l'americaine" by movie junkie Luc
Besson. More importantly, "Point of No Return" is not, as its credits
state, simply "based" on "Nikita" ("La Femme Nikita" in this country). It
could, instead, be called the first fac-simile film of the FAX era, since
it is mostly a scene-by-scene copy of the original -- with some shifts to
transpose the story from France to the U.S.A.
In "Nikita," Anne Parillaud plays 19-year old Nikita, a member of a gang of
crazed, murderous junkies. In a stupor during a shootout with a SWAT team,
she blows out the brains of a cop and is condemned to life.
A mysterious government agency fakes her death and, for logic-defying
reasons, makes of the unwilling Nikita a political killing machine. Held
for a long time within a center of operations, she is trained in weaponry,
martial arts and other procedures. She is groomed and metamorphosed from
super-violent slattern to chic lady.  Given a new identity, Nikita is
molded into a lethal Jane Bond and let loose with Terminator assignments.
In quality "Point of No Return" is on a par with the original. Some parts
are a little better, others a little worse, yet most of its strengths and
weaknesses correspond to those of "Nikita."
Bridget Fonda (called Maggie) replaces Parillaud; Gabriel Byrne, as Bob, is
her Pygmalion-like control; Anne Bancroft plays her finishing-school
teacher; Dermot Mulroney plays J.P. who becomes Maggie's lover after her
release from the compound.
The first parts of both films are the strongest and the most alike: the
opening violence, the woman's defiance, her relationships with Bob and her
Miss Manners mentor, and the climactic "graduation exercise" in which
Nikita-Maggie, in a posh restaurant,  pumps bullets into a man and his
bodyguards.
It is in the restaurant sequence that some differences begin to emerge.
John Badham directs with extra energy the fracas, makes it longer and
deadlier than the French, and close to Westerns where the protagonist's aim
in unerring, while he/she remains unscathed. This adds to the disbelief,
but also to the pleasure of gun battle fanciers.
In the French film Nikita is headquartered in Paris. Her first assignment
has her helping with the termination of some unseen people in a Paris
hotel; her second is in Venice, Italy; her third, back in Paris.
"Point" relocates Maggie from Washington to Venice, California, the place
where more people glide than walk. This may be a cute conceit (one Venice
for another) but the facile Hollywood overuse of Venice, CA. (cf."Falling
Down") is a cliche in itself.
Maggie's first assignment however, in a Los Angeles hotel, is more graphic
and detailed. It includes a spectacular explosion that, I am sure, the
French film skipped not out of delicacy but because of its cost.
In "Point"'s Assignment Two, New Orleans replaces Venice (Italy). The plot
nicely folds in some actual Mardi Gras footage, while it can't resist a
short addition of kick-boxing. Hollywood won't leave well enough alone, but
no harm (to the film structure, that is) is really done.
In Assignment Three (Paris and California respectively) incredibility grows
exponentially in both versions. "Point" has a slight edge, as the French
episode was very confusedly plotted. On the other hand, California's
sunnier and airier setting diminishes the mood of "Nikita"'s somber Paris,
a tone also present earlier in the French Center's more realistic blend of
high-tech and grunginess.
In neither film does the intensive social training of the girl (such as
lessons on table etiquette, and for Maggie, also learning French and
improving her English) get sufficiently worked into the plot. But it is
amusing to have Bancroft enjoin her pupil : " Say  'I feel badly, not 'bad'
-- 'bad ' is an adjective. And remember to say ' It remains a  secret
between her and me, not she and I." Non-killers, note.
Bridget Fonda's Maggie, first monstrously wild, then tamed but sad, is
quite effective. And her parallel physical transformation -- bad skin,
yellow teeth and all -- into fashionable glamor, is a good illustration of
the movies' magic through makeup.
On the debit side, while Fonda is very good as a killer, she makes a pallid
"normal" person. In the interludes of her enjoying life and love, mixing
ravioli and sex (a vulgar addition), doing fun things with her boyfriend
in a bad, cliche montage of short scenes, yet desperately wanting to quit,
Maggie becomes insipid and the movie gets tedious along with her.
The original's romance and pathos were better in their understatement,
vulnerability and, oddly for a French film, in their sparser dialogue.
Worse yet, in "Point", Bob and J.B. are flat and colorless. J.B. especially
lacks the underplayed sensitivity of "Nikita"'s Marco. You win some, you
lose some.
In the opening sequence, film buffs will recognize character actor
(generally a villain) Geoffrey Lewis, as the gunned down drugstore owner.
They may deplore his very early demise.
If you liked "Nikita" and bought its outlandish premise, execution and
executions, and if you are intrigued by fine points of difference between
twins, "Point" is a quite watchable curiosity. First-timers too may find it
entertaining. It's essentially a mainstream fantasy-action film camouflaged
by soulful and stylish twists.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Black Robe (1991)
BLACK ROBE (Australia-Canada,1991) Directed by Bruce 
Beresford. Written by Brian Moore from his novel " Black 
Robe."  Photography,  Peter James. Editing, Tim Wellburn. 
Production design, Herbert Pinter. Art direction, Gavin 
Mitchell. Set design, Real Proulx.  Costumes, Renee April, 
John Hay. Music, Georges Delerue. Cast:  Lothaire Bluteau  
(Father Laforgue), Aden Young (Daniel), Sandrine Holt 
(Annuka), August Schellenberg (Chomina), Tantoo Cardinal 
(Chomina's Wife), Billy Two Rivers (Ougebmat), Lawrence Bayne 
(Neehatin), Harrison Liu (Awondoie), Wesley Cote (Oujita),
Frank Wilson (Father Jerome), and many others. A 
Canadian-Australian production. Released by Samuel Goldwyn Co. 
100 mins. Rated R (graphic violence). 
Australian Bruce Beresford is an "auteur" filmmaker, less for 
his style than for the consistency of his world-view . He is a 
master of ethnic characterizations: rambunctious Aussies 
(DON'S PARTY); an independent Australian girl (THE GETTING OF 
WISDOM); American country folk (TENDER MERCIES); 
U.S.Southerners (CRIMES OF THE HEART), a colonial African 
infatuated with things British (MISTER JOHNSON).Beresford is 
also preoccupied with ethnic or racial groups in the process 
of clashing, evolving or coming to terms: THE FRINGE DWELLERS 
(aborigines), MISTER JOHNSON, DRIVING MISS DAISY.
BLACK ROBE fits those schemes perfectly. In 1634 New France 
(Quebec),  Jesuit Father Laforgue (Bluteau)  a young French 
missionary, is assigned by the famous geographer/statesman 
Champlain to trek some 1500 miles to the mission in a Huron 
settlement. Blackrobe, as the Indians call him, is accompanied 
by eight canoefuls of Algonquins and young French translator 
Daniel (Young). 
The trip through the wintry wilderness is a physical adventure 
for all, a sentimental journey for Daniel who falls in love 
with chief Chomina's (Schellenberg) daughter Annuka (Holt), 
and a spiritual voyage for Father Laforgue. 
Nature is alien to the Frenchmen but not beyond their grasp. 
The cultures however are mutually uncomprehending. The Indians 
see the Europeans as ugly, stupid and speaking in riddles, 
even as demons.  Father Laforgue suffers from carnal 
temptation (he mortifies his flesh after seeing Daniel and 
Annuka making love) and from Christian doubts about his 
mission to "bring about the salvation of these poor 
barbarians." 
The journey takes the party through gorgeously wild 
landscapes. The  Algonquins abandon the devil Blackrobe, but 
return, for mixed reasons: to keep their word to protect the 
priest and from fear of reprisals by Champlain. The party is 
attacked by the Iroquois, the survivors are tortured, in 
harrowing scenes considerably toned down from the novel. 
Annuka, Chomina and the two Frenchmen escape.   Blackrobe 
reaches his destination alone and with renewed faith. 
We were really never in doubt about the solidity of his  
beliefs. Among the clues: the Father visualized a cathedral's 
pillars while looking at a canopy of trees -- a risky old 
romantic metaphor, but  in this context not a cliche.   
The movie inevitably brings to mind THE MISSION and DANCES 
WITH WOLVES. Yet it is infinitely more metaphysical, authentic 
and un-Hollywoodish than DANCES. Like that picture, it 
subtitles the native languages. Its critical reception was 
even better than for the Costner film, but unlike the latter, 
BLACK ROBE seems to have had no budget for promotion, media 
exposure and hype. Since it was a severe affair without any 
feelgood fireworks or aspects, it was seen by few people.
BLACK ROBE raises a not-entertaining moral question: why 
proselytize?  It offers no facile answers and though made in 
our revisionist times of comparative ethnography, neither 
prettifies, romanticizes, analyzes or "un-savages" the North 
American Natives. Nor does it elevate or deride the 
spirituality of Father Laforgue. Blackrobe is totally a true 
believer of his period, sustained by a faith which stipulates 
that salvation is conceivable only within the Catholic Church. 
This is a 1634 movie, not a 1991 one. It comes close to an 
audiovisual version of diaries or memoirs by explorers of the 
time. There are minimal concessions: Algonquins twice --and 
surprisingly-- utter good English; Annuka is played by an 
exotic but not Algonquinish fashion model.(The other actors 
too are unknown to U.S. audiences, except for Bluteau, the 
lead in JESUS OF MONTREAL.)  
Ideologies aside, BLACK ROBE is an esthetic triumph. The 
natural settings are extraordinary. Production design, 
costumes, as well as the performances make everything look 
genuine. Rhythm and editing are superior. The photography by 
Peter James (DRIVING MISS DAISY) is exquisite. Georges 
Delerue's romantic score is perfectly dosed.  With the demise 
of Film Societies, whatever audiences exist for this work will 
see it on video. How sad. BLAK ROBE needs a large theater 
screen. 

Title
Review for All Through the Night (1942)
ALL THROUGH THE NIGHT (1942) Directed by Vincent Sherman. 
Humphrey Bogart is shady Gloves Donahue, a master gambler with 
a touch of a Godfather. Everyone loves him. He and his  
sweet-pugnacious ma (Jane Darwell) dote on each other. His 
retinue is a big cast of familiar, typecast "funny" and/or 
"lovable"  Damon Runyonish characters. 
They're played by character actors ranging from Frank McHugh 
and William Demarest to Phil Silvers. An unimpressive Jackie 
Gleason has a bit part. He stumbles on a killing and a pretty 
(but unwilling) German agent (Kaaren Verne) who leads him to a 
nest of deadly Nazi Fifth Columnists (Conrad Veidt, Peter 
Lorre, Judith Anderson). They control a horde of traitors. 
The film consciously tries to reconcile patriotism, action and 
comedy, but exists solely on the level of unconscious camp.  
The dialogue is simplistic, approaching the moronic. "All 
Through the Night" is one step removed from Bob Hope (or 
Abbott and Costello) spy comedies, but has none of the  funny 
lines and zingers of Hope pictures. 
Moving in too pat and neat generic studio sets,for all his 
heroics and authority over those around him, Bogart is really 
a naive, simple-minded character. He plays--or rather 
reacts--in a rudimentary, light fashion, with Bogartian 
mannerisms that parody themselves. The year before Bogart and 
Lorre had been in "The Maltese Falcon." The year following, 
Bogart, Lorre and Veidt were reunited in "Casablanca"  But 
there's just no comparison between those other roles and 
films.  
Made in the fall of 1941(before Pearl Harbor), this flick 
amounts to  nothing filmically, yet won't put you to sleep. 
It's worth seeing as  prime evidence of the  period's 
mentality and conceptions, both Hollywoodian and at large. 
Among them: the incredible naivete and cliches about the 
super-organized, efficient  nasty Nazis; the dumb New York 
cops; the preposterously nice all-American gangsters, 
gamblers, con men, nightclub owners who bury the hatchet to go 
after the  sinister swine. Kaaren Verne is the generic 
nightclub singer. 
The film is not without racial stereotypes. In an atrociously 
self-demeaning "joke" Bogart's black servant says "Don't worry 
Miss, things ain't always as black as they look." 
There is also that standard Hollywood association of suave, 
often "Continental" manners and accents (Veidt speaks 
German-accented, but excellent English; Anderson goes for 
high-toned speech), with sinister people. On the other hand, 
the good ole' boys like "Gloves"  speak "Amurrican" say things 
like "buddy," "sister," and "scratch." 
The music,by Adolf Deutsch, has sometimes an interesting 
resemblance to the Max Steiner score for the later Bogart 
vehicle, "The Big Sleep." (Edwin Jahiel )

Title
Review for My Son the Fanatic (1998)
MY SON THE FANATIC (UK, 1998) *** Directed by  Udayan Prasad. Script 
by Hanif Kureishi from his short story. Photography, Alan Almond. 
Music, Stephen Warbeck. Cast: Om Puri, Rachel Griffiths, Stellan 
Skarsgĺrd, Akbar Kurtha, Gopi Desai, Harish Patel, Bhasker Patel. A 
BBC production released by Miramax. 89 minutes. R (sex, prostitution, 
drugs) At the New Art Theater.
Om Puri, a major actor in India (with credits in Western productions 
too), was 46  or 47 when MSTF was made. With his leathery, pitted 
face, he looks older than that, but is as energetic as a younger man. 
He plays Pakistani-born taxi-driver Parvez who came to Bradford, in 
the industrial Midlands, 25 years ago. He has a Pakistani wife 
(Desai) and one child, the  English-born, twentyish Farid (Kurtha).
he film opens with dad, mother and son visiting the home of 
Madeleine, the daughter of the local Chief Police Inspector, to 
celebrate her engagement to Farid. Quickly and deftly it sketches 
Parvez as an exuberant, voluble extrovert who is happy with his 
family's new connection with (for him) upscale Brits. But a discreet 
subtext implies that the Inspector and his spouse are politely 
displeased by their alliance.
Proceeding to its main themes, MSTF makes its main points clearly. 
These are based on a reversal of the more familiar mentality of 
immigrants, where the older, often-homesick and traditional 
generation has trouble assimilating, while the young people feel at 
home with their Englishness. Here, Parvez feels totally Westernized 
and happy to be so. But soon enough, Farid falls under the spell of 
Muslim fundamentalists, joins them, breaks his engagement, gets 
religious fervor, even transforms his parents' home into a 
guest-house for visiting, white-garbed co-religionists. The friction 
with his father grows. The young man accuses him of being blind to 
the decline of a West that has no values yet demonizes the Muslims: 
"You have swallowed all this white and Jewish propaganda."
Farid's mother seems to accepts ther son's changes. She also accepts 
her new status as the inferior gender that  cooks for the visitors 
and takes her own meals alone in the kitchen. Kureishi's script is 
not overtly political. It is obvious that he does not want the fate 
of Salman Rushdie. But it is also obvious where his sympathies lie.
>From the very beginning two threads are developed. In his taxi Parvez 
also ferries prostitutes and their clients, considers sex in the back 
seat and his providing visitors with information about hookers to be 
natural parts of his job.
One girl in particular, Bettina, has a friendly rapport with Parvez. 
An attractive, quiet, natural charmer, she is  played by Aussie 
Rachel Griffiths with a certain cachet and inner elegance. Her 
excellent movie debut was in the Australian "Muriel's Wedding" where 
she was second-billed, as Muriel's lively and promiscuous first 
friend. Her other credits include "My Best Friend's Wedding" and 
especially "Hilary and Jackie" (NOT about Mrs. Clinton and 
Mrs.Kennedy ) which brought her several festival nominations, plus 
one for an Oscar.
Parvez and Bettina are thrown closer when the cabbie is regularly 
hired by  Mr.Schitz, a visiting German businessman (played by the 
Swedish actor Stellan Skarsgĺrd) who also keeps hiring Bettina. 
Skarsgĺrd has been in many movies since 1972, yet is familiar mostly 
from the 90's films "Breaking the Waves" and "Ronin."  His accent is 
oddly American, his part so underdeveloped that no persona emerges. 
We only know that he is heavily  and cynically  into sex and does 
drugs. He uses Parvez as a sort of pimp, even pays him to recruit 
hookers and organize taxis for their transportation for an 
ill-defined orgy, presumably to improve his business contacts. At the 
end of this affair, Parvez is given money to pay the girls one by one.
The several scenes that include Schitz are murky. There is also some 
lack of connection, continuity and development in other sections, 
including those with or about Parvez and/or Bettina. But at least 
there is enough rapport as well as superior acting (it feels 
effortless and natural)  between the older Pakistani man and the 
British girl, before, during and after they become lovers. In fact, 
in different, diffident, idiosyncratic ways, the cabby and the hooker 
have sweet --but never maudlin-- and touching personalities and an 
evolving relationship treated with much originality.
The gulf between father and son reaches a point of no return when an 
intolerant  Muslim group sets fire to a dwelling of hookers, attacks 
them physically. Farid beats Bettina, his father comes to her rescue.
With the young convert taking off with his fellow-believers, and with 
the mother leaving the home, Parvez finds himself alone in an empty 
house. But without hints about the fuure. There is, to the picture's 
credit, no closure.
MSTF, though imperfect, is a warm, gripping film. Its major flaw, in 
common with many contemporary British movies, is that no concessions 
are made to non-British ears. The melding of British English and 
sing-song Eastern  intonations (Parvez, his wife, etc), as well as 
the "white" Midlands accents , made the film critics at the movie's 
preview agree that only  50 percent of the dialogue was understood. 
The sounds of speech, and their recording are increasingly neglected 
in many movies from the UK and the USA.
Much of this is avoidable. The proof is that Parvez has an erratic 
enunciation which ranges from impenetrable to (in his quiet talks 
with Bettina) perfectly clear. On the other hand, the dialogues we 
miss are not all that important, since Parvez and Bettina
are wonderful at body language and facial expressions. There is also 
a particularly good (and symbolic) use of Western pop and jazz  that 
Parvez loves, while some Muslim chants and sounds are heard as 
counterpoint.
Although MSTF was released in England in 1998, it was premiered in 
the Directors' Fortnight series at the 1997 Cannes Film Festival. Its 
source was a short story by Hanif Kureishi in the New Yorker 
magazine, later collected in the writer's Love in a Blue Time. Three 
previous films scripted by Kureishi were "My Beautiful Laundrette" 
and "Sammy and Rosie Get Laid" directed by Stephen Frears and "London 
Kills Me" directed by the writer.

Title
Review for In Dreams (1999)
IN DREAMS  *  Directed by Neil Jordan. Written by Bruce Robinson and
Jordan, based on the novel "Doll's Eyes" by Bari Wood. Photography, Darius
Khondji. Editing, Tony Lawson.  Production design, Nigel Phelps. Costumes
by Jeffrey Kurland Music, Elliot Goldenthal. Produced by Stephen Wooley.
Cast: Annette Bening (Claire Cooper), Aidan Quinn (Paul Cooper), Robert
Downey Jr. (Vivian Thompson), Paul Guilfoyle (Detective Jack Kay), Katie
Sagona (Rebecca Cooper), Stephen Rea (Dr. Silverman). A Dreamworks release.
99 minutes. R (horror. violence, language)
It's not just Viagra. Every day, the press reports a new chemical product
that promises long-awaited relief, if not cures. But there are no reports
of the best of drugs for insomniacs: films such as In Dreams.
This movie, ripping off a variety of horror flicks and then adding some of
its own tricks, has a first-class actress (Bening), a capable performer
(Quinn), and the occasionally brilliant Robert Downey Jr. who must
currently be in the process of returning to normal (???) Hollywood life,
after having been in substantial trouble.
Irish-born Neil Jordan is no mean director. Among his films are The
Butcher Boy,  Michael Collins, Interview with the Vampire, The Crying Game,
Mona Lisa, and his early, little seen and underrrated, scary fairy-tale The
Company of Wolves (1984), also scripted by him. How he and his cast  got
involved in In Dreams is beyond me.
In a small, graphic New England town, Claire is a book illustrator, her
latest, in this grim story, being Grimm's Tales. Husband Paul flies 747
passenger planes. Their daughter Rebecca is a cutie. Their dog Dobie does
not look like a Doberman to me.
Claire is suffering from terrible, grim visions which she believes are in
the head of someone else,who in turn is in her head, and which announce
horrible events before they even happen. One such is the disappearance and
the killing of a little girl when a nearby town was submerged to create a
reservoir.  Underwater photography opens the film and regularly punctuates
it, with recurring shots of a church front. I expected, but in vain,
strains of Debussy's La Cathedrale Engloutie (The Sunken Cathedral)
When young Rebecca disappears too, Claire goes into her (Claire's) mind and
out her mind too. Hubby has her hospitalized. What follows are such
incoherent, artsy, over the top attempts to inspire fear and loathing in
New England, that they becomes exponentially soporific. The whole is a
hodge-podge that's filmed with good but irrelevant, industrial-strength
photography, symbols galore, surrealism, Kafkaisms, and all the stuff that
(bad) dreams are made of.
Bening is at center-stage and always good, in spite of the nonsense she is
subjected to, such as (one example among one hundred) the screen of
Claire's computer showing her thoughts. Red (as in blood) is the dominant
color. Red, too, as in apples doing strange and unfriendly things.The
computer, however, is not an Apple machine.
A good actor, Stephen Rea, the specialist in dream psychology, stands
around as if wondering what the heck he's doing in this movie. What's
needed here is an exorcist, since Claire is possessed and (neat trick!)
even watches herself dreaming.
Serial-killer Downey, who is Claire's "control" (her visions are his
thoughts), shows up 20 minutes or less before the finale in a part even
more dull than unappealing. It is politically incorrect  (i.e. gay-bashing)
too as Downey's manner and speech clearly imply homosexuality.
The movie makes no sense, has no heads, tails or anything in-between. It
feels as dull and  as long as watching, these days, Washington, D.C. on
television. Let us hope, fervently, that In Dreams will not add to the
dumbing of the public by giving a boost to the so-called psychics who
pervade the airwaves.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Four Rooms (1995)
FOUR ROOMS  no * . Written & directed by Allison Anders, 
Alexandre Rockwell, Robert Rodriguez, Quentin Tarantino. 
Produced by Lawrence Bender. Photography, Rodrigo Garcia, Phil 
Parmet, Guillermo Navarro, Andrzej Sekula. Production 
design,Gary Frutkoff. Costumes, Susan Betram, Mary Claire 
Hannan. Editing, Margie Goodspeed, Robert Rodriguez, Sally 
Menke. Cast: see text. A Miramax Film. 96 minutes. Rated R 
(language, sex, violence)
The mainstream is where most movies thrive financially but 
drown artistically, unless the particular mainstream adds 
imagination and quality. Offbeat films can hold promise, point 
to progress and in some cases be most rewarding. But while a 
bad mainstream film is plain bad, a bad offbeat movie can be 
awful. Such is the case with "Four Rooms."
"Four Rooms" is an omnibus of four films averaging 25 minutes 
apiece, each written and directed by a different person. 
Already, that concept is iffy. Few multi-episode pictures are 
successful. I can think of many failures--but to be fair, of 
some exceptions too, like the classic British "Dead of Night," 
the also British "Quartet" from Somerset Maugham stories, or 
the multinational five-parter "Love At Twenty" with its 
striking episode by Andrzej Wajda and the superb "Antoine and 
Colette" by Francois Truffaut. 
"Four Rooms" starts out with cutesy, dumb and unfunny 
animation, often an indication of troubles to come. Then we 
have the overture.  On New Year's eve, in a Hollywood hotel 
that had known better days, bellboy Ted (Tim Roth) is taking 
over from a retiring employee. If you are a movie buff you 
might get a pleasurable little shock of recognition by 
identifying the old man as Marc Lawrence, the supporting actor 
who played villains in so many gangster movies and westerns. 
At age 85 he reappears on the screen after more than a 16-year 
absence, then vanishes.
Tim Roth is the connecting link among all episodes. The 
segments' other two points in common are that they take place 
in different rooms of the Monsignor Hotel and that they are 
all bad. Tim Roth, seen generally in menacing roles, has done 
very well in such movies as "The Hit," "A World Apart," 
"Vincent and Theo" (as Vincent Van Gogh), "Reservoir Dogs" " 
Little Odessa" or "Pulp Fiction." In 1965 he just about stole 
the show in "Rob Roy." 
Roth's Ted is probably the lowest point of his career. He 
mugs, flutters, minces, sways, twitches his facial muscles, 
gestures idiotically, tries miserable imitations of silent 
comics, and of the Jerry Lewis of "The Bellboy." Roth's nose 
(which ought to get him the nickname "Il Nasone" in Italy) 
seems to get more prominent with each successive episode. His 
accent undergoes changes from Cockney British to Fake 
American. A washout.
Filmlet #1 by Allison Anders ("Gas Food Lodging" and "Mi Vida 
Loca") is about the meeting of a coven of seven witches, 
including Sammi Davis, Valeria Golino  and Madonna. There is a 
fixation on breasts and much pulchritudinous toplessness. The 
latter might be enjoyed in a Politically Correct way since the 
director is a woman. There is also much ado about body fluids 
and especially semen that Ted will have to provide to Ione 
Skye. The less said about all this, the better. 
Episode #2 by Alexandre Rockwell ("In the Soup") has Ted, on 
room   service duty, becoming involved with pantless David 
Proval who holds a gun, has gagged his wife (Jennifer Beals) 
and tied her to a chair. The subject is unworthy of 
description and critique. When Beals, who shows no trace of 
acting ability, gets un-gagged, she proceeds with porno-flick 
language.
In Number 3, by Robert Rodriguez ("El Mariachi," "Desperado"), 
tough, tuxedoed Antonio Banderas, wants to take his Oriental 
wife to a New Year's celebration. He hires Ted to check on 
their kids every half-hour. The 6-year-old boy, also wears a 
tux. He smokes, smells his feet. His 9-year-old sister, in 
evening clothes, smells them too, as well as hers. The odors 
have ramifications. There's also a champagne bottle, a 
stripper on TV, a huge hypodermic syringe, a mysterious 
corpse, and so on. Though a tad less dull than the other 
vignettes, coming from the promising Rodriguez it is 
appalling.
Number 4, by Quentin Tarantino, unites two of the most 
unpretty male faces in Hollywood, Tarantino's and Roth's.  Set 
in the penthouse, it gathers a group of pals: Tarantino, Bruce 
Willis, Paul Calderon and Jennifer Beals. Like the other 
episodes it has echoes of surrealism and of the Theatre of the 
Absurd, both undigested and not understood. 
Media freak Tarantino feebly attempts in-jokes on film-making 
plus  other references to film and TV, all without any trace 
of intelligence, finesse and appropriateness. There is more 
talk of Jerry Lewis. The core of the episode is to recreate 
"The Man from Rio"--not to be confused with "That Man From 
Rio," a French, heavy-footed James Bond parody with Jean-Paul 
Belmondo. The model here is the "Alfred Hitchcock Presents" 
item in which Peter Lorre bets his new car with Steve McQueen. 
If McQueen can light his lighter ten times running he gets the 
car. Otherwise, he loses his pinky.  
All this episode shows is that Tarantino may be an an "ersatz 
wunderkind."  All the movie as a whole proves is that the 
Brothers Miramax, while now belonging to Disney -- but with 
their own unit-- are asserting how independent they can be.
Apparently they try proving this by making an 180-degree turn 
away from Disney's sugariness. However, over and above the 
"risque" nature of "Four Rooms" is the choice of language: the 
f-word pervades the movie not just from A to F but also from G 
to Z. This monotonous repetition points to a lamentable lack 
of imagination --linguistic or other--and to a low-life 
conception of humor. 
In life and in films, crass terms are often inevitable, 
perhaps even made necessary by the situation. But this movie 
goes over the top. So prevalent is the f-word in the speech of 
all characters (females and males, children and adults) that 
if you were to eliminate it you might be left with just half 
of the total dialogue. 

Title
Review for Mondo (1996)
MONDO (France,1996) *** 3/4.  Directed by Tony Gatlif. Written by
Jean-Marie Le Clezio  from his short story. Produced by Michčle Ray-Gavras.
Cast: Ovidiu Balan, Pierette Fesch, Philippe Petit, Jerry Smith, et al. A
Shadow release. In French with subtitles.77 min. Not rated.
First things first. I would give "Mondo" a rating of G while stressing that
adults will find this wonderful, warm realistic-poetic work totally
engrossing. Mondo is  a handsome gypsy boy who cannot read, does not know
his age (he must be 10 or 11), whose provenance is unexplained and whom we
meet wandering about Nice, that picturesque city  of 350,000 people on the
French Riviera, close to Monte-Carlo and the Italian border.
In 1929, Jean Vigo who was  called "The Rimbaud of cinema" and died at age
29, made an experimental, classic short called "A Propos de Nice," in which
he treated slices of life in that city, juxtaposing with irony the wealthy,
mostly old, tourists and with affection, the locals. In a sense, "Mondo" is
the inheritor of that film. It is about the meanderings of its young
protagonist, explorations that are put in the context of the city and
several Nicois (Nice dwellers). All , like Mondo, are treated with immense
sympathy and not a hint of mockery. And none of them reacts to the
youngster in the standard way, i.e. "Gypsies are undesirables, thieving and
smelly."
All the performers are amateurs. Mondo is played by Ovidiu Balan, a
Rumanian gypsy about whom I know nothing (I am writing this review without
benefit of press information) except that after the movie was made he and
his family were deported back to Rumania.  He lives by what is commonly
known as "his wits, " but without  all the tricks and illegalities this
expression may imply.
First he is seen at one of those great farmer markets where he scrounges
for discards. He sleeps outdoors on the grass. (In a surreal sequences, he
is near statues of famous men and there's a voice-off commentary. One of
the busts is Balzac's)  \
One of the first locals he meets is a man on a bench, reading Flaubert .
Out of a blue sky the kid asks him "Will you adopt me?" It's a brief,
heart-rending moment that will be repeated later to a passerby. (In both
cases the boy runs off). Mondo is curious, friendly, lovable. His smile is
infectious, irresistible. I would adopt that boy without thinking twice
about it.
He then encounters a kindly ex-sailor who is fishing, teaches the child,
discusses exotic ports with him, and later teaches him the alphabet in the
most ingenious way. In succession, Mondo also meets  aged Dadi (aka Dove
Man, as he keeps two birds) who is played by real homeless Scot; a magician
played by  famous tighrope walker Philippe Petit; an older woman, Thi Chin
in her big house and garden (of Eden?) who cares for him when he has a
fever and befriends him. Seeing her garb he asks  "Are you Vietnamese?"
"No, I am a Jew born in Vietnam and I came here years ago." The cast
includes a Turkish Kurd woman, a political refugee, who sings
beautifullyand adds to the splendid variety of music here;  a postman who
is areal postman; and other "real people."
As Mondo explores the world around him, looks and listens, asks questions,
tries his first elevator, gets soaked in rain and still scrounges for food,
the persons he comes in contact with are just about all kind, including a
bakery lady who repeatedly offers him bread. There'something both subtle
and obvious as Mondo is placed in an environment of enticing French foods,
supermarkets, fresh fruit and  vegetables--yet at times has to get his
sustenance from nature.
J.M. Le Clezio, one of France's best writers, has found an ideal director
in Mr. Gatlif. Their collaboration results in something entirely fresh,
novel, yet in the great French tradition of films in which children are
seen with undertsanding, love, realism but also imagination. As in the
classic "Zero for Conduct" by the same Jean Vigo mentioned above. As in the
films of Francois Truffaut and several filmmakers of all periods.
Is it an accident that a welfare officer says that Mondo is "a wild child,"
the title of a Truffaut movie? Or that in Truffaut's "The 400 Blows" the
child hero worships Balzac whose statue we see and who is also the author
of "Colonel Chabert," a name that appears on a prospectus that the postman
hands Mondo as "mail for you"?
The appeal, the warmth of the boy Mondo and of the movie "Mondo" cannot be
described. Tony Gatlif, the filmmaker of Rom (Gypsy) lineage who made,
among other Rom-themed movies, "Latcho Drom," combines in with much talent
and in credible ways, fact and imagination, emotion without sentimental
schlock, selective realism --extremely well photographed and edited
--without cheating.
Mondo disappears as mysteriously as he had appeared. His absence, like
Gypsy magic, causes odd perturbances. The last  words of the film's are
voice-off: "We looked for Mondo everywhere. Then we forgot a little."

Title
Review for Illuminata (1998)
ILLUMINATA (1998) *** Directed by John Turturro. Written by Brandon
Cole and Turturro, from Cole's play. Photography, Harris Savides. 
Editing, Michael Berenbaum. Production design, Robin Standefer. 
Music, William Bolcom with Arnold Black ans others.  Produced by John 
Penotti and Turturro.  Cast: Katherine Borowitz (Rachel, the star and 
manager), Beverly D'Angelo (Astergourd, theater owner), John Turturro 
(Tuccio), Christopher Walken (Bevalaqua, the critic), Ben Gazzara 
(Old Flavio, actor), Bill Irwin (Marco, actor), Donal McCann 
(Pallenchio, theater owner), Susan Sarandon (Celimene, aging diva), 
Rufus Sewell (Dominique) and Georgina Cates (Simone)  (juvenile 
leads), Leo Bassi (Beppo, the clown), Aida Turturro (Marta), David 
Thornton (Orlandini) (supporting players), et al. An Artisan 
Entertainment release. 112 minutes. R (language, sex)
Pirandello might have called it A Dozen Thespians in Search of Love. 
You could also call it Post-Modern Commedia dell'arte, what with 
improvisations, marionettes, and physical comedy. It is also a 
part-time descendant of the Theatre of the Absurd.  Whatever the 
labels, it is most certainly Turturro and Company's love song to the 
theater.
Actor Turturro  had previously directed one movie, also written by 
him and his friend Brandon Cole. That was Mac (1992) which is very 
good, heartfelt but was not circulated widely enough. For sundry 
reasons the 1998 Illuminata was released only recently.
IIlluminata is set in New York City, in 1905. Its multiple focus is a 
single, struggling, probably talented repertory troupe. As they are 
ending their Cavalleria Rusticana -- not the Mascagni opera but the 
1884 play by Giovanni Verga -- they are manoeuvered by their 
playwright-in-residence Tuccio (Turturro) into performing next his 
latest, yet unfinished opus, Illuminata.
What goes on on that stage, behind and around it, defies description 
because of its zig-zags. Brandon Cole's original play was entitled 
Imperfect Love, which sums up matters, more or less. Life and theater 
are juxtaposed, contrasted, equated, complemented. No one is immune 
from stage worship or love in various forms.
The main thread is the love of Tuccio for lead actress Rachel, who in 
real life is Turturro's wife. Young, middle-aged, older people are in 
a constant hubbub which melds (or tries to) the realities of life and 
those of the theater. An extreme case is Christopher Walken as 
despised, feared critic. He is a fop, has hair like a bad version of 
an Oscar Wilde cut, and pursues a younger actor. Everything he does 
or says is funny. Example: "They say I like nothing. It's not true. I 
like chocolate and Caravaggio." Walken's ever-odd appearance, with 
his ambiguous, hairless face, reaches a peak here.
Most of the players are mature, a wonderful relief from teens, babes 
and twenty-somethings. It is wonderful to see older, experienced and 
fine actors like Walken, the great Ben Gazzara, the charming Susan 
Sarandon. She is oddly named Celimene, after the character in 
Moliere's The Misanthrope. (I don't know what is the point of this 
conceit). Their roles are quite unlike their past portrayals. I wish 
Rip Torn were also in the cast.
The women, from ingenue Georgina Cates to Turturro's plump cousin 
Aida Turturro, the lovely Beverly D'Angelo, and of course the 
enchanting Katherine Borowitz, are, each in a special way, "real 
women" and most  appealing. Various situations also bring about a 
celebration of exposed breasts, from A to D cup -- and also give rise 
to some fine farcical scenes.
Turturro, in what we wish were a sign of the times, but is only 
mildly so, marks again the pleasurable notion of cinema not being 
exclusively limited to pretty-boys. Abroad, this happens with actors 
like France's Daniel Auteuil. Not that John T. is ugly here. His 
beard is a flattering argument for not using razors. And his 
intensity shows in his acting, writing and directing.
Too much intensity tends to overwhelm and obscure the plot. I quote 
Turturro: "For me, Katherine's (Borowitz) face and sensibility, 
delicate but strong, intelligent and grateful, and her modesty were 
the inspiration, the soul of the piece. I tried to build everything 
around her."
What a Valentine to a spouse! Let us pray that unlike almost all 
actors, those two will not ever divorce. On the other hand the 
"building of everything" could have used more mortar and 
architecture. Turturro continues: " I looked at Rules of the Game, 
Jean Renoir's masterpiece, read the script of it, and was struck by 
the fact that he was inspired by Georges Feydeau's farces and then 
took that structure to explore serious themes."
As a specialist and admirer of both Feydeau and Renoir, I believe 
that the film does not succeed in this respect. Renoir's very French 
film is a mordant but tolerant satire of French society, from 
celebrities to the idle rich, from old soldiers to new lovers, from 
the ruling classes to their copy-cat servants in an Upstairs, 
Downstairs fashion.. It is all directed with clarity and cool, even 
when agitation reigns.
Feydeau's hilarious comedies spare no one but they are built like 
clockwork so fine-tuned that his plays' extravagant complications can 
be followed without a single "what? who? why? where?."
By contrast, this movie is a maze, a non-stop pile-up of people, 
dialogue --which can drag a bit,-- actions and tributaries to the 
main stream that could, and probably will, confuse you, especially 
since within the limited space of the settings there's no limit to 
the number of scenes.
The settings are very good. So are the photography, the costumes, the 
music and its use. Note that the main music credits go to William 
Bolcom, a major American composer who just wrote the score for the 
opera version of A View From the Bridge.
An oddity of this work is that its entire ambience and context are so 
overwhelmingly Italian or Italianate that some absent-minded viewers 
might miss the references to New York and think it all takes place in 
Italy.
Many scenes  or parts thereof ought to delight spectators. Other 
viewers may have mixed feelings because of the construction. They 
probably wish that Illuminata would illuminate us more than it does.
  One thing is clear to me: Never start an affair with a thespian. You 
will never know (nor will she or he) what is performance and what is 
reality.

Title
Review for Uranus (1990)
URANUS *** (France, 1991) Directed by Claude Berri.  Adapted 
by Berri and Arlette Langmann from the novel by Marcel Ayme. 
Cast: Gerard Depardieu, Philippe Noiret, Jean-Pierre Marielle, 
Michel Blanc, Gerard Desarthe, Michel Galabru, et al.  A 
Prestige-Miramax release. 100 min. French with subtitles. Not 
rated.(might be PG for language) 
The career of hugely talented and prolific writer Marcel Ayme 
took him from irony to mordant satire to scorn and black-humor 
sarcasm. During the German Occupation of France, Ayme wrote 
for some Vichy weeklies, including the notoriously 
anti-semitic "Je Suis Partout." 
With the liberation of France came the settling of accounts, 
as some 4,500 collaborators  (real,suspected or imagined) were 
killed by the Resistance,that is, by genuine or fictitious or 
eleventh-hour "patriots". Later, in more formal purges some 
125,000 people were tried, 38,000 received prison sentences 
and 764 death sentences, as traitors or collaborators. 
Although not found guilty of collusion with the enemy, Ayme 
was under a cloud. But he was also vehemently indignant at the 
hypocrisies and excesses of the purges which, it is a sad 
fact, only too often were a means of exacting petty personal 
revenge or settling scores. Films like HIROSHIMA MON AMOUR and 
THE SORROW AND THE PITY have illustrated those 
rush-to-judgment tendencies. The prevailing climate pre-echoed 
at times  the  American naming of names and  guilt by 
suspicion of the HUAC and McCarthy days. 
Ayme was particularly vexed by the  ascendance of the 
Communists, who became most influential as they claimed to 
have been the pure body, heart and soul of the Resistance. 
Much of that was true, as were many of the accusations flung 
at collaborators. But as it often happens in democratic times 
of retaliation, reinless injustice can also reign -- and 
that's certainly not an exclusivity in the France of the 
mid-1940s. 
Ayme published his novel URANUS in 1948 as his own settling of 
scores with the (in his view) false patriots and opportunistic 
(or misguided) Communists. His setting was a bombed-out town 
where, as elsewhere, many had guilty pasts yet all protested 
their purity, claiming to have been  Resistants, or denying 
collaboration. Ayme populated his stage with the spectrum of 
political pollution, from civilians to returning POWs to  
boot-licking officials.
Claude Berri (JEAN DE FLORETTE, MANON OF THE SPRING) and his 
sister have adapted as well as they could  Ayme's shortish but 
dense and complex book. Inevitably, cuts, condensations and 
simplifications had to be performed,  but the main characters 
are present and  played by a Who's Who of French 
stage-and-screen actors : loving, humanist professor Watrin 
,an Anatole France-like creation (Noiret); engineer Archambaud 
(Marielle) a cynical chameleon who, however, hides at great 
risk a wanted French Nazi ; the fugitive Loin (Desarthe) who 
faces death, yet has the odd "nobility" of sticking to his 
beliefs; still-thriving and still sickening black-market 
tycoon Monglat (Galabru); decent Communist Gaigneux (Blanc) 
whose family is billeted in Archambaud's apartment; bar-owner 
Leopold (Depardieu), a smalltime collaborator and  
black-marketeer, now a scapegoat for the Communists; and 
others. 
The inevitable loss in the transfer is palliated by the fact 
that Ayme --also a scenarist and playwright-- wrote striking, 
easily adaptable dialogue. Both story and dialogue have a kind 
of furious immediacy that comes from Ayme writing while events 
were still hot. A scriptwriter originating this in the 1990's 
couls never sound so authentic.  The text's humorous, 
sarcastic narration (which, oddly, sometimes reminds me of  
Dave Barry's devices) is gone however. It finds a modicum of 
equivalence in sounds and images, especially in the original 
creation of the mountainous, extroverted, alcoholic Leopold, 
whom Depardieu hams to the hilt. He wears a little Hitler 
mustache and is, heart and mind,totaly enraptured by his 
newfound love,the neo-classic,alexandrine verses of Racine's 
play ANDROMAQUE. 
The performers, even when they underplay, are mostly in the 
old French tradition of larger-than-life, rhetorical 
speakers--which  ought to  please those who miss grand screen 
dialogue. The production values are impressive in their 
precise reconstruction of a period, with its sights, sounds, 
artifacts and ruins. And the moral lesson is universal. 

Title
Review for Music of the Heart (1999)
MUSIC OF THE HEART (1999) ***1/2. Directed by Wes Craven. Written by 
Pamela Gray, based on the life story of Roberta Guaspari and 
inspired by the documentary "Small Wonders." Photography, Peter 
Deming. Editing, Patrick Lussier. Production design, Bruce Miller. 
Music, Mason Daring. Produced by Marianne Maddalena,Walter Scheuer, 
Allan Miller and Susan Kaplan. Cast: Meryl Streep (Roberta 
Guaspari), Aidan Quinn (Brian Sinclair), Gloria Estefan (Isabel 
Vasquez), Angela Bassett (Janet Williams), Jane Leeves (Dorothea von 
Haeften), Cloris Leachman (Assunta Guaspari), Kieran Culkin 
(Teen-age Lexi), Charlie Hofheimer (Teen-age Nick), Josh Pais(Dennis 
Rausch) et al. A Miramax  release 110 minutes. PG
Wonders will never cease, said Sophocles.(Not the ancient Greek but 
a friend who speaks in cliches). Wes Craven, a shockmeister( plus 
schlockmeister for some), the creator of Freddy Krueger (Nightmare 
on Elm Street), is synonymous with horror flicks such as Scream, The 
People Under the Stairs, Shocker, The Swamp Thing, The Hills Have 
Eyes, Vampire in Brooklyn, etc.
The 77-minute documentary Small Wonders, released in 1996, made by 
Allen and Lana Miller, and Oscar-nominated, dealt with East Harlem 
violin teacher Roberta Guaspari-Tzavaras, whose sheer dedication, 
persistence and missionary-like zeal succeeded in educating hundreds 
of kids in the face of lack of funds and equipment, elimination of 
music and arts programs in the city's budget, and personal 
difficulties.
Craven, a professorial-looking, classical music lover, now 
middle-aged,  saw the documentary, was enthusiastic about making a 
theatrical feature of it, pursued his project with fervor. 
Overcoming raised eyebrows and  several stumbling blocks, (Madonna 
was to be his star), he was at long last able to enlist Meryl Streep 
who had never seen any of his films, to come up with a first-rate 
writer, other good performers, an amazing array of children, and 
finally a movie that looks, sounds and plays beautifully.
The film caught me by surprise. Its previews don't do it justice. 
The title is sentimental, old-fashioned. (It was originally 50 
Violins, which suggested a musical film, hence a probable loss of 
public). Every sign pointed to a feelgood, inspirational picture, of 
which too many are schlock without shock. But watching the finished 
product I realized that I, too, had fallen into the trap of 
preconceptions and generalizations about films with dedicated 
teachers. I had forgotten Mr.Holland's Opus; or the marvelous 
ancestor of them all, Goodbye Mr. Chips (1939); or the 
sweet-and-sour gem The Blackboard Jungle (1955), the British To Sir, 
with Love (1967), the less-known The Corn is Green (with Bette 
Davis, 1945) and others.
I suspect that my suspiciousness came from too many films made for 
teen tastes in the last two decades. They were school comedies 
--often funny for adults too --in which students did everything but 
study and their teachers were gamekeepers or ridiculous figures or 
ineffectual wall paper.
In any case, Music of the Heart is a first-class movie. I have not 
seen Small Wonders, so I cannot tell how faithfully MOTH develops it 
-- but I have the feeling that scriptwriter Pamela Gray and the 
director have stuck close to the documentary, with a few changes. 
(From a tiny picture I located the real Roberta is definitely a 
brunette). The feature is convincing throughout, with warmth and 
sentiment not exploited to the hilt.
In my audience no one wept audibly, but eighty-one percent of the 
viewers had moist eyes. (The margin of error is 3 %). My only 
criticism is that there is just a tiny bit of background given for 
Roberta. Her presence is alive and lively; her past is nebulous..
Roberta Guaspari, a mother of two boys, is ditched by her husband 
for one of the couple's close female friends. Roberta takes on a 
dumb store job, meets old school chum Brian who sends her to his 
friend Janet, a school principal. I'll omit general developments as 
well as details so as not to undo the pleasures of discovery 
--except that the movie wraps up with a large group of Roberta's 
kids playing in Carnegie Hall along with such fiddle greats as 
Itzhak Perlman, Isaac Stern, Arnold Steinhardt and several others.
All the actors are exceptionally good. Angela Bassett, who shared 
top billing with Eddie Murphy is Wes Craven's Vampire in Brooklyn 
is, additionally, gorgeous at 41. Gloria Estefan whom I knew only as 
a singer, has a perfectly performed supporting role.
On the screen, Aidan Quinn has always had a most likable persona. He 
can also be differentiated from others, an exception today when too 
many faces are interchangeable and semi-anonymous. It was a good 
move not to make too big a deal of his relationship with Roberta, 
and to have Quinn vanish for a couple of big stretches. The same 
non-hammering of several supporting characters is also a clever 
decision. It allows concentration on Roberta, her pupils and her 
struggles -- time well spent and never dull.
And Merryl Streep? Now 50 yet entirely credible as a woman in her 
late 30s, she is a marvel.  Let me mention an apocryphal story. In 
the 19th century, a famous Polish actress came to Paris. She was 
received like a queen. Appearing on the Opera's stage, she declaimed 
some things in Polish. The Who's Who audience did not know this 
language, but the lady was so great that she had them all moved to 
tears and applauding wildly. Later it was disclosed that the actress 
had recited the Polish alphabet, and La Marseillaise, the French 
National anthem. Streep could do the same.
For this movie she also learned to play the violin, from scratch (an 
apt expression in this case). Add this to her past feats, and you 
get not merely the Woman with a Thousand Faces, and Accents, but of 
a thousand capabilities too.
MOTH, on top of its other plusses, quietly yet firmly stands as a 
social triumph for race relations. The children, young and older, 
their parents, the overall milieu in Black and Hispanic Harlem, and 
so on, come in all sizes, flavors and ethnic backgrounds. Yet there 
are no sides formed, no racial conflicts, no mentions of prejudice. 
Striking a realistic note is the mother of black child who first 
rebels at the incursion of a Whitey teacher who does irrelevant 
white music. But Roberta wins her over.
The commonplace element of drugs and violence is played way down 
too. There is no X-rated language. Not that the film has been 
bowdlerized. Roberta has ex-cons working on the dilapidated house 
she bought, but furious at their methods, incapacity, and drinking, 
she fires them all. A student simply tells of her dad hitting her 
mother. Otherwise, there are no goody-goody passages in this early 
contender for the next set of Oscars.
This is indeed a feelgood movie, but with natural, realistic 
feelgoodness. We can use this in these rather cynical movie-days.

Title
Review for Reindeer Games (2000)
REINDEER GAMES (2000) * Directed by John Frankenheimer. Written by 
Ehren Kruger. Photography, Alan Caso. Editing, Tony Gibbs and Michael 
Kahn. Production design Barbara Dunphy. Music, Alan Silvestri. 
Producers, Marty Katz, Bob Weinstein and Chris Moore. Cast: Ben 
Affleck (Rudy), Gary Sinise, (Gabriel), Charlize Theron (Ashley), 
Dennis Farina (Jack Bangs), James Frain (Nick), Danny Trejo (Jumpy), 
Donal Logue (Pug), Clarence Williams III (Merlin). A Dimension (i.e. 
Mramax) release. 99 minutes. R (violence, language)
Director John Frankenheimer was once a big name in films as well as TV.
Among his 1960s  pictures were Birdman of Alcatraz; the political, 
paranoid cult-thriller The Manchurian Candidate; the political 
conspiracy thriller Seven Days in May; the WWII Resistance adventure 
The Train; the affecting melodrama of skydivers, The Gypsy Moths; the 
touching The Fixer; the haunting, chilling, humanistic sci-fi 
Seconds,  the best film ever starring Rock Hudson.
By the 1970s Frankenheimer had crested but still made some gems: The 
Iceman Cometh; the sequel French Connection II -- which my minority 
opinion rates above the original French Connection;  Black Sunday, a 
suspenseful, intelligent entry in the terrorist sub-genre. Then came 
a decidedly mixed bag, although when Frankenheimer returned to 
television in the 90s, he did very well with TV features 
(Andersonville, The Burning Season, George Wallace). On the big 
screen he stumbled in 1996 with the ludicrous yet campy The Island of 
Dr. Moreau., followed by the disappointing Ronin  (1998).
Now comes the sad news that Reindeer Games is a genuine flop. It was 
supposed to be released during you guessed it, the Christmas 1999 
season, presumably as
an action "film noir" that might stand out among the sugary 
end-of-year items. But they postponed it.
It's a heist movie of sorts.  Cell mates Nick (Farina) and Rudy (as 
in Rudolph the Red-Nosed Reindeer, ha-ha) played by Ben Affleck, are 
inmates of Michigan's Iron Mounatin Prison. (In fact the movie was 
shot in Canada). At Christmastime, those two about to be released, 
which is not as bad as releasing this film.
At the last minute, there is a nicely shot  food riot caused by 
cockroaches being served to the prisoners.  Nick gets stabbed, to 
death, we assume. Outside the prison Rudy meets Ashley, Nick's the 
pretty pen-pal  who did not know what Nick looked like. Rudy says 
"I'm Nick" and before you can say Jack Robinson or Jack Frost, the 
two are making passionate love. To maintain his deception Rudy even 
flushes down the toilet his Michigan driver's license. (But was it 
valid after five years in the slammer?-- Rudy by the way had been 
imprisoned for car theft).
The Love Games are savagely  interrupted by a gang  of  low-life, low 
I.Q. types led by truck  driver Gabriel,  said to be Ashley's 
brother. They think that the new Nick is the real Nick. He denies it. 
They beat him up mercilessly. Again and again. They don't believe 
him. The violence level is high. It turns out that Nick (the real 
McCoy) had sent Ashley (don't ask) a hand-drawn map of the American 
Indian  Tomahawk Casino, where Nick had worked. The gang plans to 
"take it down."
Skipping the skippable, which is most of the movie, under major 
duress Rudy admits he is Nick, claims that the casino has been 
remodeled while he was in prison. Ordered to case it  incognito, 
Rudy-Nick goes there as a ridiculous cowboy.
Enough, enough. Miscast Ben Affleck, who looks like a nice boy from 
the 'burbs, foils and re-foils the villains, gets re-beaten, gets 
chained to a bed, etc. His face which should have been a pulp, 
magically recovers from scene to scene. He knows, near-magically, how 
to undo his lock. And so on.
Gabriel is an almost comically brutish, savage guy. The dialogue is 
for the birds, which is an insult to our flying friends. Performances 
are pathetically bad. The casino heist is done by the gang members 
all dressed up as Santa Clauses. Bur as the Marx Bros, would say, 
there is no Sanity Clause at any time, be it so tiny, in the picture.
I'll say zero about the plot's twists, turns, re-twists and re-turns. 
It is beyond the unbelievable. If you keep watching it is to see how 
far ludicrousness can go. The movie was written  by  Ehren Kruger 
whose scripts for Arlington Road and Scream 3 call for a five-year 
sentence in Iron Mountain Prison.
Through the stupidity of it all you might just  sense that 
Frankenheimer still knows how to direct, to be like an orchestra 
conductor who keeps things going. But the score is much too dismal 
here. Perhaps he will take a gun to Kruger after he reads the reviews.
A major character is a humongous 18-wheeler. The movie is like that 
vehicle. It has 18 wheels, but no two of them run at the same time.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Arise, My Love (1940)
ARISE, MY LOVE (1940) Directed by the often great Mitchell 
Leisen, this is one of the best American romantic adventures 
with comedy. Written by the terrific team of Charles Brackett 
and Billy Wilder from an original story (Academy Award) by 
Benjamin Glazer and John S. Toldy.  With Claudette Colbert, 
Ray Milland, Dennis O'Keefe, Walter Abel, Dick Purcell, George 
Zucco, Frank Puglia, Esther Dale, Ann Codee.  
Leisen said that he made this film  day by day from headlines, 
waiting to improvise as things changed.  In 1939 , when the 
Loyalists have lost the Spanish Civil War, reporter Augusta 
("Gusto") Nash (Claudette Colbert ) rescues American volunteer 
flyer Tom Martin  (Ray Milland ) from a Franco jail and 
execution, in a great, suspenseful,farcical  and 
black-humorous sequence. 
They hijack a plane, escape to Paris, have a wonderful 
interlude there. The sequence of Colbert in her hotel room, 
trying to be a professional first and resist her attraction to 
Milland is a gem. That's when, to force herself not to meet  
Milland who's waiting in a cafe across the street, she has the 
astounded hotel's night clerk lock all her shoes in the safe.  
Later, Gusto and Tom, respectively  on their way to  Berlin 
and Warsaw, don't make it as Hitler attacks Poland. Returning 
home on the S.S. Athenia which gets torpedoed, they survive 
and return to the Continent, she to cover the war, he to fly 
against Germany. Reunited after the fall of France they now 
will go to America to prepare flyers and appeal for an end to  
America's isolationism. There's definitely a resemblance 
between the end of this film and the pep-up broadcast to 
America by Joel McCrea Alfred Hitchcock's "Foreign 
Correspondent" of the same year, 1940.
Walter Abel, in of his very best supporting roles, plays 
Colbert's harried, frustrated editor who keeps repeating "I'm 
not happy; I'm not happy at all..." He has superb comic 
timing. 
Good, sophisticated touches of humor and sentiment  abound, on 
a then-delicate,tricky and ever-changing  political 
background. The camerawork (Charles Lang) and the score 
(Victor Young) were Academy nominated.  In 1988 Miss Colbert 
said it was her favorite film  because "it started out as a 
farce and became very serious."  
Joel McCrea was the original choice for the male lead and 
might have been better than Milland, whose harsh voice and 
sometimes monotonous acting are a mild liability. But Colbert 
is superb and the film is a delight.   

Title
Review for Keeping the Faith (2000)
KEEPING THE FAITH (2000) **3/4  Directed by Edward Norton. Written by 
Stuart Blumberg. Photography, Anastas Michos. Editing,  Malcolm 
Campbell. Production design, Wynn P.Thomas. Music, Elmer Bernstein 
Cast: Ben Stiller (Jake), Edward Norton (Brian), Jenna Elfman (Anna), 
Anne Bancroft (Ruth), Eli Wallach (Rabbi Lewis), Ron Rifkin (Larry 
Friedman), Milos Forman (Father Havel), Holland Taylor (Bonnie Rose), 
Ken Leung Don), Brian George (bartender) et al. Produced by Hawk 
Koch, Norton and Blumberg. A Touchstone release.  129 minutes. PG-13 
(delicate sexual setups)
Edward Norton is an excellent, versatile actor who has successfully 
avoided becoming stereotyped. This goes for this film too, where he 
plays a Catholic priest. And where Norton, in his first seating on a 
director's chair, has the tricky task of directing himself.
The results are OK. Not great, but still acceptably comedic-farcical. 
The script is pure feelgood Hollywood. You are always conscious that 
you are watching, and listening to, a movie.
In their teens, New Yorker schoolmates Brian, Jake and Anna were 
inseparable. Then the girl's family moved away. Cut to some 16 years 
later. The two men never ceased being best friends. Brian (Norton) is 
now Father Brian, a Catholic priest. Jake has become a rabbi. Both 
see each other all the time, even cooperate on projects. They are 
modern fellows, hep, hip and big hits with their congregations in New 
York's Upper West Side. (Jake's is noticeably upscale).
Anna, now a corporation executive in California is equally successful 
in her line of work. She goes back East for an indeterminate stay, to 
improve the efficiency of her company's New York office. She and the 
men meet for the first time in ages. The moment they see her at the 
airport they are stunned. The trio resume their old companionship.
Now here's the catch, and the movie's "raison d'etre" : both males 
fall in love with her, which means that they have a Big Problem 
--Brian because he is a priest, Jake because Anna is a "shiksa," a 
non-Jewish female.
While. of course, Brian cannot possibly get married, Jake knows that 
he should if he is to get promoted. In his synagogue, parents, and 
especially mothers, find him a most eligible catch for their 
daughters. Jake dates young women, with humorous results. But his 
attraction to Anna keeps growing. They become secret lovers, while 
Anna's relationship with Brian is such that the priest believes she 
feels unbrotherly love for him. What a mess!
Scenes and sequences more amusing than pathetic ensue, some directly 
involving the three principals, others colorfully peripheral.
I confess that I was constantly distracted by questions of height. 
When the three are seen together at the airport, it is obvious that 
Junoesque Anna is taller than Brian who is taller than Jake. But this 
keeps changing all the time. Take a reception attended by the 
Anna-Jake twosome. Within seconds the man goes from equal height to 
taller to less tall, and so on. There must have been hours spent on 
the sets placing boxes under Jake's feet, changing camera angles and 
perspectives, re-changing them.
Other aspects are less questionable, notably the funny ones. Such as 
a thirteen year old boy whose voice is breaking preparing for his 
Bar-Mitzvah. It's a scream and a screech. Such as the inevitable 
cell-phone gags. Or salesman Don whom the two clergymen visit for a 
Karaoke set. The young man switches from Asian English to New York 
accent in a flash, not to mention his singing performances. Or the 
irruption in the synagogue of a black choir, another device by Jake 
to shake up traditionalism. My favorite, seen early in the movie in a 
pre-flashback situation, is when a drunken Brian confides his
troubles to a barman. The latter, a Sikh with a multi-national, 
multi-ethnic family background has the best and most humorous 
bar-person role I can remember. And so it goes.
On the negative side, the Anna character was uninteresting and left 
me cold. The film entertains, but while its comedy works the romantic 
part (as in "romantic comedy") is unconvincing. Jake, in a variety 
of  ways,  plays up too much to his congregation. The happy ending is 
a tacked-on cop-out. And the common wisdom that comedies have to be 
on the sorter side is ignored, to the story's detriment and creation 
of some yawns.
On the whole, however, "Keeping the Faith" is most watchable.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Picture Perfect (1997)
Picture Perfect  * 1/2 . Directed by Glenn Gordon Caron. Producer Erwin
Stoff. Screenplay by Arleen Sorkin & Paul Slansky and Glenn Gordon Caron,
based on a story by Arleen Sorkin & Paul Slansky & May Quigley.
Photography, Paul Sarossy. Editing, Robert Reitano. Production design,
Larry Fulton. Music, Carter Burwell. Cast: Jennifer Aniston (Kate), Jay
Mohr (Nick), Kevin Bacon ( Sam), Olympia Dukakis (Rita), Illeana Douglas
(Darcy), Kevin Dunn ( Mr.Mercer), et al. A 20th Century Fox release.105
min. PG-13 (sex)
Jennifer Aniston (of NBC's "Friend's") has mostly TV credentials. Here she
makes her debut as the lead in a legit movie. The writers of "Picture
Perfect" also have a TV background. So does Glenn Gordon Caron, the
director and co-writer.
The first film feature Caron directed was the very good "Clean and Sober"
(1988), starring Michael Keaton. The second "Wilder Napalm"(1993) is said
to be a total fiasco, was shelved for some time, later hardly seen by
anyone. The next one was "Love Affair" (1994), the dismal re-remake of the
terrific "Love Affair" (1939) by Leo McCarey who had himself remade it as
the good "An Affair to Remember" (1957).
All this TV parentage may explain why "Picture Perfect" is really like an
extended sitcom -- except that sitcom episodes run well under 30 minutes
and don't make you suffer for 105. It may also explain why Ms. Aniston's
unremarkable, overkinetic (but not bad) performance is, in TV style, full
of close-ups of facial expressions. (There's also a plethora of bosom
shots).
All this may fill the screen but does not the story."PP" has a far-fetched
script that tries to pass for a romantic comedy that's neither comic nor
romantic. It is about Kate who has a middle position in an advertsing
agency. She comes up with the best way to hype a new mustard, yet while
Kate cuts it, she doesn't get put in charge of the account. The reason big
boss Mr. Mercer gives is that Kate is single, without obligations or debts,
therefore has no "stability" and could easily quit for another job. Mr.
Mercer adds that she dresses in nondescript casuals instead of "dressing
for the job."
At a very recent wedding Kate had casually met Nick in Boston where he
makes a modest but happy living by taking videos of weddings and such
occasions. Conveniently, days later Nick gets (I'll skip the details) his
fifteen minutes of fame on TV and tabloids. Kate also happens to appear
next to him in one of the hundreds of photographs of the wedding. So Kate's
colleague and good friend Darcy has the brilliant notion of giving Kate
"stability" by inventing a fiance: Nick.
Kate starts reinventing herself by appearing at a reception in an
eye-catching, chic (for some), very low-cut  dress. Her colleague Sam
(Kevin Bacon) is a rake who avoids unattached women, including Kate and in
spite of their mutual attraction. But now he finds the new, affianced Kate
both irresistible and attached. "I like you" he tells her at the party, as
his eyes glance at her breasts. These are outside the frame, the look is a
discreet fraction of a second. Cut  immediately to the new twosome in bed.
I have just mentioned three of the minor editing virtues of a film that I
find lacking in major ones.
Kate parades her new outfits in scene after scene. The plot thickens to the
texture of a  consommé: Kate arranges for Nick to come to New York, stay
with her, go to a dinner given by Mr. Boss in the couple's honor and then
have a fight with Nick and break her "engagement." It makes minimal sense.
In a big switch from his role in "Jerry Maguire" Jay Mohr plays Nick as a
sweet boy who, for much of his screen time with Kate, has the vacuous look
of a college student who doesn't quite get what his professor is saying.
If you fail to guess with certainty where the plot is going it is probably
because you expect certain developments involving Kevin Bacon (who also
shows good pectorals), since he is the single Big Name in the cast. The
fact however is that Bacon has a supporting role. This is an originality
and a red herring that constitute another of the film's small virtues.
More of them include the fleeting digs at the hypocrisies (as in phony
congratulations) and a couple of other depressing aspects of the business
world -- not that you don't get the same in politics, academics and
especially in showbiz. There is also irony in the crass dinner host who
assumes that Nick's videos are porno, and who with second-in-command sings
the praises of marriage. It must be a good institution since all husbands
and wives present are number 2 or 3. As in almost all of today's films, the
fuss about marriages feels like a joke.
The last virtue,  one increasingly common in pictures, is casting in top
roles actors whose looks are far from picture perfect, far from the old
canons of beauty and glamour.
Those are just about the only tasty crumbs in the dumb loaf of "PP." The
dialogue is flat, boring, uninteresting. Characters are woefully
undeveloped. Subplots are limited to giving Kate a widowed mother (a wasted
Olympia Dukakis) who owns or runs a hairdresser shop and is vociferously
anxious to see her daughter marry someone, anyone. The film does not
specify "Jewish Mother" but it does point to the stereotype. Curiously,
both Miss Aniston and Miss Dukakis are of Greek ancestry.
Arguing with Kate, Mom shouts with Mediterranean theatricalism "You are 28,
I am 56, I'm going to be dead soon." She was probably thinking "I'm really
66, and if there were good parts for older women I wouldn't have been
caught dead in this flat tire of a movie."

Title
Review for Ronin (1998)
RONIN ** Directed by John Frankenheimer. Written by J.D. Zeik and Richard
Weisz. Sory by Zeik. Photography, Robert Fraisse. Editing Tony Gibbs.
Production design, Michael Z. Hanan.
Music, Elia Cmiral. Produced by Frank Mancuso, Jr.. Cast:  Robert De Niro
(Sam), Jean Reno (Vincent), Natascha McElhone (Deirdre), Stellan Skarsgard
(Gregor), Sean Bean (Spence), Skipp Sudduth (Larry), Michael Lonsdale
(Jean-Pierre),Jonathan Pryce (Seamus), et al. A Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer
release. 121 minutes. R (violence, self-surgery)
If you're reading this, the first thing that catches your eye is the **
rating. It is sadly low for those who, like me, know and appreciate much of
John Frankenheimer's "oeuvre."
Frankenheimer  (now 68) was big in the 1960s,  with a succession of
notable, often great movies including Birdman of Alcatraz; the political,
paranoid cult-thriller The Manchurian Candidate; the political conspiracy
thriller Seven Days in May; the WWII Resistance adventure The Train; the
affecting melodrama of skydivers, The Gypsy Moths; the haunting, chilling,
humanistic sci-fi Seconds, and arguably the best film starring Rock Hudson.
By the 1970s Frankenheimer had crested but still made some gems: The Iceman
Cometh; the sequel French Connection II -- which my minority opinion rates
above the original French Connection;  Black Sunday, a suspenseful,
intelligent entry in the terrorist sub-genre. Then came a decidedly mixed
bag, although when Frankenheimer returned to television in the 90s, he did
very well with TV features (Andersonville, The Burning Season, George
Wallace). On the big screen he stumbled in 1996 with the ludicrous yet
campy The Island of Dr. Moreau.
In Ronin he shows an amount of pizazz that would put most younger
filmmakers to shame, but he does not add the wisdom, logic and
thoughtfulness that ought to come with age and experience. A combination of
The Dirty Half-Dozen, Mission Improbable and flicks of older decades, this
movie-movie belongs to what might be called "Explosive American Cinema,"
all action and no substance.
A bunch of mostly older, experienced mercenaries -- the old "motley group"
cliché-- is hired by  Deidre, a young Irish woman, to recover a case, a
metal thing like those used by photographers to carry their cameras in. The
(too) atmospheric beginning in a  (too) seedy Paris cafe gives no clue as
to who is who, what is what, whose orders Deirdre is passing on. This
murkiness will prevail throughout the picture. In bits and pieces we get
vague crumbs of information about the "motley group" (itself an old
cliche), none about anyone's (on all sides) psyches, motivations, and zero
about contents of the case. The soldiers of fortune (if this is what they
are) are of various nationalities (not all of them clear), individually
specialize in this or that, may or may not be renegades or operatives of
such outfits as the CIA, the KGB,the IRA...One man handles complicated (and
probably not yet invented)  computer stuff that tracks cars which whoosh by
at the speed of rockets.
"Less is more" is a wise formula, but less can also be less, as here, while
"more is more" (overkill, as here, in the action) is  always definitely
less, a handicap. When the action gets going, man, does it go!  Never
flagging for a moment, the chasers and the chased (who are also mysterious,
undefined types) shoot it up, then shoot some more (both en masse and
individually), then yet more, and get involved in triple,quadruple, perhaps
even quintuple crosses.
Above all, there are endless car chases that take us from Paris to the
Riviera and back. It is painfully clear that Frankenheimer is out to beat
all records of vehicular movie pursuits, such as those in Bullitt, among
others, and especially in French Connection I which was directed by
Willliam Friedkin, the man who in 1985 tried to top himself with To Live
and Die in L.A. Here Frankenheimer comes up with a movie in contemporary
settings but in the spirit of actioners of past decades.
The South of France, the scene of incredible mayhem, is also shown in a
colorful (and genuine) way that ought to make French  Tourist Offices
recommend that the filmmakers be awarded the Legion of Honor. We go from
the Hotel Majestic in Cannes to the Corniche--the sinuous mountain highway
by the sea where Princess Grace of Monaco had her fatal accident. (Later,
the whizzing within Parisian car tunnels recalls Princess Diana's demise).
We go, always with guns and bazookas blazing whilst the cars bounce off
civilian property, through villages, Mediterranean resorts, the city of
Nice. What happens in the streets of Nice has to be seen to be believed. In
fact, the more it is seen the less it is believed. How the chasers and the
chased elude each other, how too little and too late the cops are, how so
few pursuers, pursued, innocent Nicois and others are killed or maimed,
beggars the imagination. But since, already quite early into the movie
imagination has been so anesthetized, it plays no role.
The Duels in the Sun continue in the city of Arles (170 miles west of
Nice), mostly in the old Roman Arena where the opposing sides, made
increasingly confusing, fight it out mano a mano as well as group vs.
group. By now Frenchman Jean Reno and American Robert De Niro are pals but
still keep their secrets. Somewhere near the return road to Paris, Reno
takes his wounded friend to the country house of mysterious (read:
illogical and undefined) Michael Lonsdale who is not a doctor, but has all
sorts of surgical equipment which he does not know how to use. So De Niro
operates on his own self. It's all done with mirrors, literally.
In Paris, more dumbness takes place.How fast the searchers locate the
Russian Mafia re-boggles the non-mind, for example), and exploits,
coincidences, and more get complicated by a traitor, the Russian Mafia, and
an ice-skating show starring "Natacha Kirilova." She is played by the
real-life German (made Russian here) Olympic champion Katarina Witt whose
gyrations provide the only --and unplanned-- sexy moments of the movie.
After she is shot dead by a sniper (don't ask) and the other side  (don't
ask either) gets hold of the precious case, AND there is another
double-crossing, AND unexplained persons come and go, De Niro gives a 100%
unbelievable car chase all over Paris at Mach II speeds, destroying in the
process chunks of the city and a fleet of innocent automobiles.
The breathless action is a single-minded series of messes on top of
unexplained and inexplicable messes. And we never do find out what's in the
case. Think of Luis Bunuel's Belle de Jour and the mysterious box that a
Korean client brings to a high-class brothel -- but then, Bunuel had a
teasing sense of humor and mockery that "Ronin" lacks. The case may be like
Alfred Hitchcock's MacGuffins, but "Ronin" is light years away from
Hitchcock's clean story lines, his humor and mischievousness, the richness,
fascination  and humanity of his characters.
A text that opens the movie tells us that in feudal Japan, those masterless
samurai who wandered the land and hired themselves out as swords or
bandits, were known as Ronin. Later there is some verbal elaboration of the
legend (from fact) of "The Loyal 47 Ronin" which was made into a filmic
two-part classic (1941, 1942) by Kenji Mizoguchi. But "Ronin" hardly fits
those references.
Frankenheimer's movie is another case of the desperate attempts to find
something to replace the Cold War duels that sustained action flicks over
decades. There's no doubt that "Ronin" has excellent technical values and
great photography, that its performers are mostly striking within the
limitations of their one-dimensional roles. But the human side is absent,
the dialogue minimal and unrevealing, the entire thing a mindless
tour-de-force. Its writer J.D.Zeik is a first-timer. David Mamet was called
in as script doctor and rewrote most of the scenario as "Richard Weisz."
Doctor Mamet should have healed himself.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Gattaca (1997)
GATTACA ** Written and directed  by Andrew M. Niccol. Produced by Danny
DeVito et al. Photography, Slawomir Idziak. Editing,Lisa Zeno Churgin.
Production design, Jan Roelfs .Music, Michael Nyman. Cast: Ethan Hawke
(Vincent/Jerome), Uma Thurman (Irene Cassini), Gore Vidal (Director Josef),
Xander Berkeley (Lama), Jayne Brook (Marie), Elias Koteas (Antonio), Blair
Underwood (Geneticist), Mason Gamble (Younger Vincent), Vincent Nielson
(Younger Anton), Chad Christ (Young Vincent), William Lee Scott (Young
Anton), Clarence Graham  (Personnel Officer), Ernest Borgnine (Caesar, the
top janitor), Tony Shalhoub (German,the black-marketeer), Jude
Law(Jerome/Eugene Morrow, Alan Arkin (Hugo Coldspring), Carlton Benbry
(Gattaca Hoover), Loren Dean (Investigator/Anton Freeman), et al.  A
Sony/Columbia film. 106 min. PG-13.
Released in 1936, and just a stone's throw away from World War II, the
futuristic 1936 movie "Things to Come," from a much earlier novel by
H.G.Wells, was a vision of disastrous conflicts that were much later
followed by the new, utopian start of the space age. "Gattaca," set "in a
not too distant future", does not have a such a redemptive conclusion.
Life in it is pretty dreary. Genetic engineering divides people --at least
the limited groups we see, in two : the elite and all the others. The elite
comes from those babies that were created in vitro. They are all perfect
specimens. The rest , conceived in the nice old-fashioned way (including
the back seat of automobiles), are, like us, all born with weaknesses that
are predicted by immediate tests.
Of two brothers born respectively via the new and the old method, Anton
will join the Valid people's favored class, Vincent the In-Valids, the hoi
polloi. There is sibling rivalry. From his earliest years, Vincent dreams
of becoming a space explorer but realizing that he has the chance of a
snowball in hell, becomes bitter, albeit wonderfully well self-taught. Like
a few others (how many, we never learn), he eventually rebels against the
system. His tactic is "if you can't lick them, join them).
He hires a "DNA broker" whose illegal business is to have In-Valids assume
the genetic identity of Valids. For me this echoes the oft-made old film
"Imitation of Life," (from the Fannie Hurst novel), in which Claudette
Colbert (and later Lana Turner), had a black friend whose daughter's
complexion allowed the girl to "pass" for white. There is also "Pinky" and
other films.
In "Gattaca" this passing is called "a borrowed ladder." Vincent, modified
in sundry ways, borrows his identity from Jerome, a cynical, sad, boozing
former Silver Medalist swimmer, now wheelchair-bound after an accident. He
trades identities with Vincent and provides him with samples of blood and
urine. These are routinely, constantly used for identification.
As "Jerome," Vincent goes from janitor to scientist, joins the aerospace
(plus more, but this remains hazy) corporation called Gattaca, and hopes to
be among the chosen astronauts for a coming exploration of the planet
Titan. His impersonation is not without suspense yet works out until a
director of Gattaca is murdered. This brings in the police and heats things
up for our hero.
Much has been made in the media about "Gattaca" being a sci-fi picture that
shuns the deja vu effects, blasts, chases, shootings, ray-guns, morphing
and such of the contemporary sci-fi genre. There is, indeed, merit in a
picture that shifts gears from high to low in order to offer us a variant
of dystopia based on class distinctions. The film keeps the gadgetry down,
though not entirely out. It creates a sterile (rather than frightening)
atmosphere through people who act like semi-zombies, all in identical
business suits and moving in near lock-step.
There's much hidden irony here in the parallels with the hordes of
similarly desk-bound office-workers, whether in real life or in older (I'd
say pre-1960s) pictures. But "Gattaca" almost unremittingly takes itself
seriously. The "humorous relief" items that I remember are two. In one, a
pianist plays a Schubert  "Moment Musical," then is revealed to have 12
fingers. The other bit is linguistic. The terms for investigators are "J.
Edgars" or "Hoovers," doubly witty expressions since "to hoover" in British
English means to vacuum-clean.
In investigations, everything is "hoovered," as a single human hair or
flake of skin can prove the real identity of a suspect.  To protect himself
Vincent-Jerome engages in lengthy, vigorous ablutions to remove particles
of skin. But this is a patent impossibility and a flaw in the movie's
reasoning.
"Gattaca" is a high-concept film that tries to be an un-silly think-movie
too. Both ideas work, but feebly. Beyond the DNA premise we just don't have
enough --or any-- information about the minds, psyches, life or non-life of
the people; about the form of government; about anything else beyond the
narrow focus of Vincent's ambitions, and so on.
More attention is paid to the look of things than to their substance. No
doubt, the stage settings are good in their oppressive monotony,
uniformity, curves (rather than angles), dull colors and low light
levels--the latter typical of places where  computers do not require strong
ambient light.  No doubt there is superior camera work by the late director
Krzysztof Kieslowski's favorite cinematographer. But the rhythm is too
languid; there are enough holes to drain spaghetti through; a certain,
mixed retro look that includes cars and a depressing ballroom sequence goes
unexplained, as well as other sights.
In no order of importance, here are some other weaknesses. The  return to
obligatory cliches with the inclusion of Vincent's unexciting affair with
co-worker Uma Thurman who is more decorative than functional. The answer to
who was the killer, which I guessed effortlessly. Repetitions that include
the musical score. The lack of edge-of-seat suspense. The improbable
revelation that a major character bore close kinship to another person. The
lack of dimensionality of characters.
Like an increasing number of first-feature makers --often
promising--writer-director Andrew Niccol comes from the world of
commercials. (He is a New Zealander who made them in England). His
background may explain the lack of depth of this cautionary tale. The film
is by no means a failure, but as food for thought, it is a Continental
breakfast rather than a four-course meal of high cuisine.

Title
Review for Gods and Monsters (1998)
GODS AND MONSTERS (1998) *** 1/2   Directed, written by Bill Condon, based
on the novel "Father of Frankenstein" by Christopher Bram. Photography,
Stephen M. Katz. Editing, Virginia Katz. Production design,  Richard
Sherman. Music, Carter Burwell.  Produced by Paul Colichman, Gregg
Fienberg, Mark Harris. Executive producers, Clive Barker, Stephen Jarchow.
Cast : Ian McKellen (James Whale); Brendan Fraser (Clayton Boone); Lynn
Redgrave (Hanna, the housekeeper); Lolita Davidovich (Betty, the barmaid);
Kevin J. O'Connor (Harry); David Dukes (David Lewis); Brandon Kleyla (young
James Whale); Jack Plotnick (Edmond Kay, the student interviewer); et al. A
Lions Gate release.  105 minutes. Unrated. (Nothing really shocking in
words or deeds)
Hungarian salami is one of the joys on life. U.K ham is another
--figuratively speaking. (So is Italian ham, literally, as found in Parma
and figuratively, as found in Cinecitta).  English ham is that
extraordinary, bigger-than-life quality one finds in a certain class of
English (Scots, Irish, Welsh, etc.) actors, often stage-trained, who can
mesmerize you with their voices,over and above their other talents. Whether
the voice is thunderous, insinuating, scratchy, snobbish, lyrical or
anything else, it is as characteristic of the player as a fingerprint.
Here's an extremely incomplete roster: Sir John Gielgud, Sir Laurence
Olivier, Sir Alec Guinness, Basil Rathbone, Robert Morley, Roger Livesey,
Claude Rains, Charles Laughton, James Mason, Robert Newton, Richard Burton,
Trevor Howard, Laurence Harvey, Noel Coward, Alastair Sim, Michael Caine,
Michael Gambon, Richard Harris, Alfred Hitchcock (yes), Stephen Fry --I'll
stop here before I drown  in nostalgia. Most of them are now dead.
Ian McKellen (b.1939) is alive and well. His voice falls on our ears like
heavenly manna. In Gods and Monsters, you almost expect him to address
Brendan Fraser as "dear boy", the way so many of the thespians above (and
others). I don't think he says it, but  it's there alright.
The movie is about the last days of James Whale. James who? Well, this is
what separates the men from the boys, the film fanatics from the fans, the
connoisseurs from the kibitzers.
Whale (1889-1957) the son of very poor, working-class Britons, started out
as newspaper  cartoonist  then served in the British army during World War
I. He discovered theater in a German P.O.W.camp. After the war he began a
stage career, was eventually successful as a set designer and director.
Hollywood's Universal Studios brought him to America. He hit paydirt  with
his fourth film, Frankenstein (1931), folllowed by the successful The Old
Dark House (with Boris Karloff, Melvyn Douglas,Charles Laughton), and six
more movies, notably The Invisible Man (with Claude Rains, his voice and
extraordinary special effects). The apex of his career was Bride of
Frankenstein (1935).
In 1936, financial difficulties at Universal added complications. Whale
also complained that he, the studio's star director, was ill-treated and
that the studio had butchered his The Road Back (1937).This was a sort of
sequel  to Universal's own classic All Quiet On the Western Front (directed
by Lewis Milestone). It wa about German ex-soldiers'  problems when they
return to civilian life.
In spite of interesting movies that included Show Boat, The Great Garrick
and the Man in the Iron Mask, by 1941 Whale had had it. He retired totally,
to paint and to enjoy his openly gay lifestyle.
Gods and Monsters, based on a novel about Whale is an invention rather than
a biopic, yet its essence, well-informed by the real  life and character of
the man, is true. Whale lives in Pacific Palisades, in a very nice house,
not a mansion. His health is rapidly deteriorating after a stroke. His
gayness is not. When his eyes land on a twenty-something garderner, the
hunk and ex-Marine Clayton Boone (Brendan Fraser), he makes friendly
advances and asks him to pose for drawings.
What Whale's inititial intentions were is left beautifully hazy and
ambiguous. The young man knows little about movies or about life beyond his
working-class milieu. He is properly --for the naive 1950s--shocked to find
out that Whale is a homosexual. But the undeniable fascination the older
man exerts makes Clay tolerate Whale's otherness, one that goes beyond sex.
The former director opens for him a new world of past and present. It's
done through a constantly serpentine succession of excellently staged,
graduated and never blatant touches.The two men keep their physicalities
apart yet bond in odd but believable ways.
For Clay, this is a kind of introduction to another culture, an immense
expansion of his horizons, a most original psychological and deviously
sentimental education, to paraphrase Flaubert. His relationship to Whale
moves along the lines of one step back and two steps forward.
For Whale, Clay fills the need for an audience and a sounding-board,
although he is not immune to thoughts of carnality. Through Clay's physical
appeal, Whale recaptures not the fact, but the idea of a past where
handsome young men would gather au naturel in the director's swimming pool
as a prelude to weekend follies.
The film has a complex structure,with real or surreal flashbacks to Whale's
destitute youth (that's after he stops posing as a patrician); to scenes of
World War I and Whale's love for a comrade. The connections between wartime
carnage and horror films are unavoidable.
Excerpts from The Bride of Frankenstein dot the movie. As poignant as any
is the meeting of the two pariahs, the Monster and the Blind Man, in a
celebration of friendship that  prefigures the Whale-Clay rapport.
There is also a reconstruction of filming The Bride. For me, it's the only
fly in the ointment, since so many of us have vivid remembrances of the
movie. No matter how cleverly and skillfully depicted, the substitute
actors remain just that.
The title comes from the Bride,where Dr. Frankenstein's teacher, then
collaborator  Dr. Praetorious (the unforgettable Ernest Thesiger) exclaims
"We have created a new world of gods and monsters!" (There is another Dr.
Praetorious in film history. He is the mysterious, generous professor Cary
Grant in 1951's People Will Talk).
Subtleties come at a quick pace.Whale sees in Clay a kind of continuity of
his Monster. The young man's head shape and flat-top haircut help . Whale
sees ( deftly and discreetly) his own self as both "creator" of Clay and as
a monster, a wronged artist  outside the main stream of Hollywood, doubly
so since his unabashed gayness in times of strictly closeted homosexuality
had its price.Clay gets no flashbacks. Yet he too has a secret from his
days in the Marines. Not a world-shaking secret, but enough to have given
him a trauma that Clay will help cure.
McKellen-Whale's sense of irony, humor, wit and the outrageous is
succulent. It's one of the picture's pillars, along with remembrance of
things past, the growing rapport between the two men, and the sick old
fellow's intimations of mortality. There's a "piece de resistance" in which
he takes Clay along to a garden party given by crypto-gay director George
Cukor in honor of Britain's Princess Margaret, shown as a pre-airhead.
Cukor (more than once) is the butt of Whale's acerbic jokes. Other barbs
and one-liners fly. "My driver Clay" he tells Margaret "is impressed.He's
never met a Princess before - only queens."
That McKellen is superb comes as no surprise.That Brendan Fraser is so
good, does. His impressive debut was in School Ties (1992), as a  boy who
in the 1950s goes to an exclusive prep school, hides the fact that he is
Jewish and comes out of this particular closet as a reaction to bigotry.
Perhaps the connection of "being different" between the two movies inspired
Fraser who's been in mostly lesser films. Here he does himself proud in all
in details in speech, tone, gestures, body English, expressions-- from the
way he eats new foods, handles drinks other than beer from a bottle, to how
he smokes an unfamiliar cigar, sucking it his gauchely. Whale sucks his
Freudianly.
 A nice supporting role goes to Lynn Redgrave, practically unrecognizable
as Whale's stern but sweet, familiar,outspoken but polite (it's Mister
Jimmy this, Mister Jimmy that), clear -sighted housekeeper. Her strong
accent is a puzzle-- a blend of Transylvanian, German, Irish and more. She
gets the spotlight near film's end when, on May 29, 1957 she and Clay find
Whale, fully clothed, floating in his pool a la Sunset Boulevard. (It was
suicide, since the man knew his days were counted). Unexpectedly, this is
the moment when a splendid bit of black humor comes in.
G & M was nominated for 3 Oscars: Actor, Supporting Actress, Screenplay
from previously produced or published material. It won the latter.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Mother (1996/II)
MOTHER ** 4/5 . Directed by Albert Brooks. Written by Brooks and Monica
Johnson. Photography, Lajos Koltai. Editing, Harvey Rosenstock. Production
design, Charles Rosen. Music, Marc Shaiman.  Cast: Albert Brooks (John
Henderson), Debbie Reynolds (Beatrice Henderson), Rob Morrow (Jeff
Henderson), Lisa Kudrow (Linda),Isabel Glasser (Jeff's wife), Peter White
(Charles, Mother's boyfriend)A Paramount release. 106 min.  PG-13.
It starts with John (Brooks) and his ex at a wrap-up meeting with their
divorce lawyer.  The scene has the right degree of compactness and deft
humor. Next, when John walks into his living room that's now empty save for
an armchair and a table, comes a gag involving those two pieces. It's a
good gag symbolizing that the man is back where he started from, but it is
also too long and predictable. The tone is set for the virtues and the
weaknesse of the film .
John, a 40-something writer of sci-fi novels, has had two marriages and
three serious affairs --all ending in fiascoes, whereas his businessman
younger brother Jeff is a contented husband and father. Jeff's house,
cleverly (because it is done discreetly) exudes bourgeois values.
The brothers have an equally cleverly-written talk about their mother
Beatrice (Debbie Reynolds) and the fact that Jeff is her favorite son.
It's as though a hidden microphone is recording real people. The dialogue
is broken as Jeff, who calls Mother daily, speaks to her on a new
video-phone that (more gags) she handles ineptly.
In another early sequence, John has his first post-divorce date. Trying to
make conversation in a restaurant he asks the young woman who her favorite
authors are. Her reactions are topped by the name "Charlie Chaplin" to whom
she attributes the writing of "A Tale of Two Cities." What the dickens,
this may be broad humor but it is hilarious.
John, overly conscious of his failures with relationhips, concluding
somehow that all this started with his mother. He decides that the cure is
to go and stay with her for awhile. The visit is the film's substance.
Debbie Reynolds, not seen in a major movie role since 1971, is trim,
soignee and with a mind of her own. (She was 64 when the film was made;
Brooks was approaching 50.  Both seem younger).
The mother and son encounters are fraught with misunderstandings and
non-understandings as they revolve around such mundane matters as food,
John's old room, shopping, Mother's visiting beau, her matter-of-fact
mentions that she is having sex, her compulsive discussing of John with
acquaintances or strangers, her reactions to his books, and much else. For
a comedy, the welcome of John is pretty chilling. There's not much
affection in the air, on either side. For John the bottom line is that
Beatrice has been and remains a non-approving mother. And what amouns to an
intrusion on a woman who has lived alone for twenty years does not help
either.
There are also throwaway bits all over, like the dig at Stephen King
who"writes something over and over again," and several smart inventions,
actions and reactions. To reveal only one category, John does not eat meat,
yet Beatrice absent-mindedly keeps offering warmed-over meat dishes. She
also presents him with a gigantic slab of Gruyere cheese that has been in
her freezer for three years, with antique frozen salad and other items kept
by her un-needed frugality vis-a-vis money. It's not always clear, but
Mother must be stocking up on wholesale-priced specials. It reminds of
Woody Allen's saying "In my family there was just one sin -- to buy
retail."
Brooks was Los Angeles born and bred.  "Mother," set in California,
contains Californian Brookisms, sharp observations of psychology,
lifestyles and behavior,  as well as an underlayer of Jewish humor. It's
funny stuff but  it should have been funnier. "Mother" feels more like a
two-character play than a movie. Compared to most films, it far fewer
sequences. These go on too long and are often overdone.
Debbie Reynolds's very good performance is carried out with minimal facial
expressions and body language. But the script takes her idiosyncrasies too
far. Bothersome too is the fact that Mother just might be a sly cookie but
comes through  as a mix of flutterheadedness and vagueness.
There is a generation gap. The satirical treatment of older people (note
the ladies at the supermarket) makes me wonder if Brooks is not something
of an ageist. Still, the principal gap is one of mutual incomprehension
unrelated to age.
Like the many fans of Albert Brooks I appreciate his abstaining from
second-rate projects or from overexposing himself. Starting in 1979 he has
acted in a dozen movies, including all five that he wrote and directed:
"Real Life," "Modern Romance," "Lost in America," "Defending Your Life" and
"Mother." All are original, none is cookie-cutter formulaic.
The last time I saw him as a performer was in "I'll Do Anything," It was
generally underrated because in its first life it was a musical. After
audience tests, it had its music removed -- yet it was one of the best
pictures of 1994, with Brooks's manic performance contributing a great
deal. In "Mother," Brooks does the opposite, keeps a rein on histrionics,
at the cost of seeming a rather dull fellow--a wise decision.
Less wise is the arbitrary two-step happy ending. It  uses the artificial
trick of a revelation that brings mother and son close to each other; it
suddenly makes of her a woman with unexpected,hidden talents and
intelligence; it closes with a phony "new beginning" for John.
Although the film needs tightening as well as more development (what  made
and makes  John and his mother the way they are?), it still is definitely
recommended.
Note: Writers-directors-actors Mel Brooks, James L. Brooks and Albert
Brooks are not related by blood. But the last two might be called the
Brooks Brothers as they have worked so much together. James L. was in
Albert's "Real Life" and  "Modern Romance." Albert was in James L.'s
"Broadcast News" and " "I'll Do Anything."

Title
Review for What Dreams May Come (1998)
WHAT DREAMS MAY COME *  Directed by Vincent Ward. Written by Ron Bass, from
the novel by Richard Matheson.Photography, Eduardo Serra. Editing, David
Brenner and Maysie Hoy. Production design, Eugenio Zanetti. Music, Michael
Kamen.Visual effect producer/supervisor, Ellen M. Somers. Painted world
visual effects, Mass Illusions. Visual effects, POP Film & POP Animation.
Visual effects supervisor, Stuart Robertson.Special visual effects and
digital animation, Digital Domain. Digital visual effects, CIS Hollywood.
Produced by Stephen Simon and Barnet Bain. Cast: Robin Williams (Chris
Nielsen), Cuba Gooding Jr. (Albert), Annabella Sciorra (Annie Nielsen), Max
von Sydow (the Tracker), Jessica Brooks Grant (Marie Nielsen),  Josh
Paddock (Ian Nielsen), et al. A Polygram  release.106 minutes. PG-13.
The title comes from Hamlet 's "To be, or not to be": "To die- to sleep
--To sleep! perchance to dream: ay, there's the rub--For in that sleep of
death what dreams may come--When we have shuffled off this mortal
coil--Must give us pause..."
But do not look for Shakesperean parallels in this sentimental, kitschy,
would-be tear-jerker fantasy whose sole reason for being is its display of
computerized special effects.
The film's preliminaries, made to coincide with the opening credits, have
Chris (Williams) and Annie (Sciorra) meet cute on a lake bordering
Switzerland, re-meet cute on land, do kiss-kiss (but no bang-bang), marry
cute. Later their two cute teen-age kids die in a car crash. Cut to four
years as we see Chris practicing pediatrics while being oh-so-warm and cute
with a young patient and looking at the little girl's X-rays AND at slides
of Annie's paintings. The sugar content keeps rising. Then Chris dies in a
freak crash inside a tunnel.
He reappears in the hereafter which is a color riot of living (sic)
elements (such as water he can Biblically walk on), of  profuse vegetation,
flowers, etc. --all seemingly inspired by Annie's artwork. The sights, made
with advanced digital computer techniques, are impressive as gimmicks but
don't get you anywhere. They look like combinations of paintings by French
Impressionists gone berserk with acrylics and loading their canvases to the
max, some unmistakable bits of Van Gogh swirling brushwork, and often
heavily romantic 19th century German oils by Caspar David Friedrich and
fanciful, massive scenes of the American West by Albert Bierstadt. The orgy
of colors and special effects becomes oppressive and may give you visual
overload with its lushness.
With hops, skips and jumps, more views appear, from flying, Peter Pan-ish
people to graphics that mix the Book of Hours of the Duke of Berry with
Byzantine icons.
Chris is, of course, in Paradise--though not in Heaven, since he learns
that Annie, in her despair at her husband's demise, has committed suicide.
An angel (though not identified as such) is Chris counselor-guide. His name
is Albert (as in Bierstadt).  He spouts cliches of sagacity, like "Thought
is real. Physical [sic] is the illusion."
Chris, an Orpheus for our times, searches for Annie-Eurydice, even though
there's no place in Heaven for the dead by suicide. Are you listening Dr.
Kevorkian?  "They go somewhere else" dixit Albert, who explains that Annie
"has violated the moral order." The somewhere else is in the nether regions
which Chris reaches via the Tracker -- the Virgil to Chris's Dante. The
Tracker is Max von Sydow, wasted here, especially if your remember him from
Ingmar Bergman movies.
The tour of the Underworld takes us to sundry dark locations. In one,
flames are combined with Sisyphus-like beings who go up and down
excavations akin to those of the much more powerful  Hell on Earth images
of  Brazilian gold-mines workers in the documentary Powaqqatsi (1988). Yet
another of Albert's profundities goes:  "Hell is not fire and pain. The
real hell is your life gone wrong." In this murkiness of sights and
concepts, Chris also has to step by an immensity of human heads projecting
from the ground -- a not-so-oblique derivation of Cambodia's Killing
Fields.
Throughout, Robin Williams maintains forced expressions of smiles,
beatitude or sorrow-- all forced, unconvincingly stiff and theatrical, all
making you miss Williams the kinetic, wild clown. Annabella Sciorra
delivers her lines flatly.
"What Dreams..." is the first American feature by director Vincent Ward, a
talented New Zealander who had previously made Vigil,  Navigator: A
Mediaeval Odyssey, and Map of the Human Heart. He also wrote the story for
Alien 3.  Ward is very oriented toward imaginative visuals and ambitiously
original stories, but I find his work frustrating, with a reach exceeding
his grasp. Here, his movie is not so much frustrating as it is plain dull,
what with too many poses and visual overkill,. The determination to be
super-poetic makes it repetitive and pedestrian.
The film is, in fact, a very expensive production in two LSD genres. LSD
One is the look of the picture, like visions and hallucinations under the
influence. LSD Two is the very general subject Love is Stronger than Death,
which has been around for decades in sundry movies about reincarnation,
ghosts, etc.
I might suggest renting far more satisfactory titles. A sampling: Death
Takes a Holiday, A Guy Named Joe (remade by Spielberg as Always); Stairway
to Heaven (aka A Matter of Life and Death); Heaven Can Wait (by Ernst
Lubitsch); Here Comes Mr. Jordan (remade as Heaven Can Wait though not a
remake of the Lubitsch picture); and above all the delicious The Ghost and
Mrs. Muir.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Uomo delle stelle, L' (1995)
THE STAR MAKER (L'UOMO NELLE STELLE)(Italy,1995)  *** 1/2  Directed by 
Giuseppe Tornatore. Written by Tornatore and Fabio Rinaudo. Photography, 
Dante Spinotti. Editing, Massimo Quaglia.Production design, Francesco 
Bronzi. Music, Ennio Morricone.  Cast: Sergio Castellitto (Joe Morelli), 
Tiziana Lodato (Beata), many professionals and non-professionals. A 
Miramax release. In Italian with subtitles. 113 minutes. Rated R (sex)
Behind his battered but professional  movie camera, Joe Morelli 
instructs his subjects: "Right profile. Left profile. Center profile." 
Center profile indeed! It makes as much sense as the streams of rural 
Sicilians who pose for what has been sold to them as a "screen test." 
You know right away that they are all the victims of a fraud.  In 
postwar Sicily,  scam artist Joe covers villages and small towns. The 
phony talent scout arrives in a truck covered with Hollywood posters, 
its loudpseaker blaring come-ons. He sets up his equipment in a large 
tent, dazzles people with name-dropping ("great actors I have 
discovered") and especially with the astronomical earning of stars. He 
then offers to shoot screen tests that will be examined by a big film 
studio in Rome. " I promise nothing" says "Doctor" Morelli, but that 
won't kill any dreams.  
He adds that a small service fee will be charged - 1,500 lire, which was 
about a dollar, not a trivial sum for impoverished Sicily around 1950.   
Naivete, ignorance, hopelessness propel the locals into Joe's tent, but 
there are as many diverse reasons as there are faces among the 
wannabees. And voices. Joe records them on what must have been the last 
of the wire-recorders. (Its high fidelity is astounding). He has them 
learn a sentence or two from "Gone With the Wind," which adds to the 
ludicrousness and comedy of the situation, one made even more enjoyable 
for those who know Italian and are aware of Sicilian speech. (When Joe 
thinks that the local cop is on to him, he is relieved to find out that 
the man just wants his own test, to recite The Divine Comedy" which he 
had translated into Sicilian). 
Sicilan-born Giuseppe Tornatore's second big screen feature (he came 
from photography and then TV), was the splendid, Oscar-winning "Cinema 
Paradiso." It was a hard act to follow, but the next movie, the entirely 
different "Everybody's Fine," was a very good picaresque road film about 
a Sicilian widower. Tornatore then did an excellent episode in an 
omnibus film. Then, the 1994 "A Pure Formality" broke with the 
writer-director's Sicilianness, was an ambitious, semi-Kafkaesque 
failure. With "The Star Maker" Tornatore follows the hard act of "Cinema 
Paradiso" with  confidence and ease.  Not with a sequel but by working 
the downside of the movies'magic.  
The film's early section is one of light irony and mockery. Yet in a 
tour-de-force that is not at all obvious, Tornatore's sensitive script 
and Castellitto's layered acting never allow condescension toward the 
subjects. Joe may be fleecing his customers, Joe sometimes mutters " 
Animals, dumb beasts, rednecks!" but at the same time he has soft spots 
and a  comprehension of the underprivileged. There's a duality here. Joe 
shoots his footage on outdated film, yet on the job he seems to have an 
odd sort of professional conscience.
Gradually, the film gets more serious as it goes from the amusing to the 
satirical to the pathetic. Joe is perceived as influential in the film 
trade. A penniless mother offers him her body, hoping to promote her 
daughter.  A man in a Mussolini hat, delivers a Duce-style harangue.  An 
aged veteran who never spoke after his return from  the Spanish Civil 
War,   suddenly finds his speech before the camera, and, in Spanish, 
speaks insultingly of Franco, lyrically of his "Fifth Regiment." 
He is touching. Pathetic too is the gay hairdresser who states that all 
others, including bandits and women (sic) now have rights, but not the 
gays. Eventually though, this moment with Joe, this confession to the 
camera, result in courage and optimism, change the man's life for the 
better. Later too, Joe is reproached for hearing more confessions than 
any priest. But, like a priest,  he does nor intrude on privacy -- and 
some confessions may have a salutary effect. 
The encounters are not mechanically plotted. Tornatore can go from a sad 
moment to an outlandish scene, as when, in an episode worthy of The Book 
of Chutzpahs,  bandits who rob Joe end up by paying him for screen 
tests. Or as when Joe must take pictures of a never-photographed, now 
dead, Mafia Don. The sendup of Mafiosi is a gem. 
Pathos arrives again on the scene in the shapely form of Beata,  
convent-born and bred, age 15 or 18 (she doesn't know),a cleaning woman 
for many, including an older man who gives her the 1,500 lire for a 
screen test, in exchange of Beata giving him a look at her naked body. 
Joe, moved by her simplicity, shoots additional footage of her, as 
though -- in another key to the movie -- he himself took his scam for a 
reality. In intriguing ways, Beata now becomes, off and on,  part of 
Joe's life.
More travels through Sicily show the land's uniqueness and beauty, never 
postcardish,   never artsy,  but as glimpses on what is part of the 
action. 
Joe's manipulation of his customers is a scaled down version of politics 
and exploitation.
He gives a ride to an educated doctor who tells him of a  whore who 
cheats villagers, as all others do, from the government to the local 
authorities. "We don't want those who sell dreams, like you, to take 
advantage of us." There's always a bigger fish that swallows the next 
size down. Soon, Joe himself uis victimized.  
"The Star Maker," has superior photography  (especially in the tricky 
tent shots) and one of those scores in Italian movies that cleverly use 
American pop songs, "Stardust" in this case. Subtler, much less 
sentimental, nostalgic or audience-manipulating than "Cinema Paradiso," 
the new film will, for those reasons, not attain the earlier movie's 
popularity. A pity, since it speaks volumes on a specific society and 
its culture. 
In a sense Joe's travels are like Gulliver's (but among the gullible) 
and even closer to the classic 1941 film "Sullivan's Travels"  which  
concluded  that the more miserable people are, the more they need to 
escape into fantasy. Like Joe's clients who have stars in their eyes and 
get their little moments of dreaming movie dreams. 

Title
Review for Xizao (1999)
SHOWER (Xizao) (China, 1999) *** 1/4  Directed by Zhang Yang. Written 
by Liu Fen Dou, Mr.Zhang, Huo Xin, Diao Yi Nan and Cai Xiang Jun. 
Photography, Zhang Jian. Editing, Yang Hong Yu and Zhang Yang. Art 
director, Tian Meng. Music Ye Xiao Gang. Produced by Peter Loehr. In 
Mandarin, with English subtitles) Cast: Zhu Xu (Master Liu), Pu Cun 
Xin (Da Ming), Jiang Wu (Er Ming), He Zheng (He Bing), Zhang Jin Hao 
(Bei Bei), Lao Lin (Li Ding), Lao Wu (Feng Shun), et al. A Sony 
Pictures Classics release.  92 minutes. PG-13.
An excellent, warmer, gentler, kinder Chinese film, and a special 
case. It was made neither as a State project or with foreign moneys, 
but with funds raised within China by its American producer. It is 
the second of three highly successful features by the same 
director-producer team..   On the international festival circuit 
"Shower" has won many top or major awards (Toronto, San Sebastian, 
Thessaloniki, Rotterdam, etc.)
Chinese cinema is a force to be reckoned with nowadays.  Movies shown 
only within China's borders deal -- in politically correct ways--with 
proud accomplishments, such as Mao's famous March. Others, including 
exports, have historical themes or at least deal with the past. It is 
unusual for us to see works on the human condition today, including 
about tradition and modernism.
Shower opens with just that, a shower. In a busy downtown street of 
the modernized southern region of Shenzen, a man presses a button to 
enter a booth the size of  those portable potties used in 
construction sites or crowded public gatherings. It is The Amazing 
Automatic Shower which, like those clever Parisian street toilets 
(successfully tried in New York City but I do not know if they caught 
on) is a modern wonder.
The thing is rather like a mechanized car wash but now humans replace 
the cars. Water jets, liquid soap, rotating brushes, automatic drying 
are used in this fantastic People Wash. Our fellow takes off his 
clothes (real nudity here), safely stores them in a waterproof gizmo, 
gets a thorough mechanical going over, special massages, other 
treatments, and even an application of cups. (For the millions in the 
USA who don't know that the latter means, it consists of glass cups, 
heated inside to make a vacuum, applied to the back so that the 
vacuum raises the skin and theoretically sucks up bad humors and 
other enemies of good health. This was and maybe still is a common 
treatment for colds -- in Europe and in many other parts of the 
world.) This opening sequence of the film is by itself worth the cost 
of a theater ticket. I would like to apply for an importing license.
The Chinese never had it so good. But the scene, while wonderfully 
funny to foreign eyes as well as an impressive sample of Chinese 
technology, is also a serious, symbolic  element of melding the old 
and the new.
Cut to Beijing, which is in the North. In what seems to be a popular, 
old-fashioned, run-down neighborhood,  Master Liu runs a public 
bathhouse for men, with the help of his second son Er Ming. The 
latter always has an endearing smile, is mentally retarded, yet 
perfectly able to help with the establishment. The relationship 
between father and son is one of tremendous warmth and understanding, 
shown in discreet, un-gloppy scenes.
Er Ming's older brother Da Ming is handsome, chic,  married, and a 
modern, successful businessman. He lives in the south . Having 
received a cryptic postcard from junior brother, Da Ming thinks that 
Dad is either dead or seriously ill.  He catches the first available 
plane, he flies north... and finds Dad in seemingly good health.
The bathhouse is quite old-fashioned in an attractive way, spacious, 
well-equipped with hot tubs, hot and cold showers, steam rooms, 
massage-tables and the like. And it is more than a place for cleaning 
one's body. It is like the corner cafe in European, African, 
Middle-Eastern and other lands --and like the general store in older, 
rural US. small towns. For the customers, mostly aged regulars, it is 
a gathering place, a neighborhood club where talking, chatting, 
gossiping, arguing among friends is essential to life, where they 
cleanse their souls and minds. The elders (and some younger persons) 
drink tea, play chess, organize cricket fights. (There is no 
statement at film's end that no animals were harmed)
Master Liu is not only a host to his clients (a word that hardly 
expresses the friendly relationships) but a mediator and 
problem-solver. Some warm, often funny plot threads show this and add 
much to the film's atmosphere. The tale, however, is complicated by 
unwelcome news. Area authorities are going to tear down the entire 
outdated (?) neighborhood to make room for a modern mall.
Da Ming tarries awhile, behaves politely, but never cracks a smile. 
He must find that whole culture passé. Yet, as he prolongs his stay 
and more developments follow, there is a gradual understanding on his 
part, and like the movie's characters as well as for the audiences, 
comes a strong confirmation of how sad it is to have modernism 
displace yet not replace certain old traditions.
"Shower" is quietly rich in humanity, excellent acting and moving 
incidents. It has a lovely sense of humor, heart, sentiment --but no 
artificial sweeteners. There is even a flashback sequence (in old, 
arid Northwest China) which adds touching lyricism and symbolism to 
this first-rate urban movie.

Title
Review for Cry, the Beloved Country (1995)
CRY, THE BELOVED COUNTRY *** 1/2  Directed by Darrell James 
Roodt.  Written by Ronald Harwood, adapted from the novel by 
Alan Paton. Photography, Paul Gilpin. Editing, David Heitner. 
Production design, David Barkham.  Music, John Barry.  
Produced by Anant Singh.Cast: Richard Harris (James Jarvis), 
James Earl Jones (the Rev.Stephen Kumalo), Vusi Kunene 
(Theophilus Msimangu), Dambisa Kente (Gertrude Kumalo), 
Charles S.Dutton (John Kumalo), Eric Miyeni (Absalom Kumalo). 
A Miramax release.108 minutes.Rated PG-13.  
"There is fear in the land. And fear in the         hearts of all who 
live there. And fear puts an end to understanding and the need 
to understand. So how shall we fashion such a land when there 
is fear in the heart? The white man will put more locks on his 
door and get a fine fierce dog, but the beauty of the trees 
and of the stars, these things we shall forego.
"Cry, the beloved country, for the unborn child that is the 
inheritor of our fear. Let him not love the earth too deeply. 
Let him not be too moved when the birds of his land are 
singing, nor give too much of his heart to a mountain or a 
valley. For fear will rob him of all if his gives too much. 
Yes cry, cry, the
beloved country."
Even for people familiar with world literature, their first 
acquaintance with a South African novel was "Cry, the Beloved 
Country," by  Alan Paton (1903-1988), a white who had been 
principal of the Diepkloof Reformatory since 1935.  
The film (released in 1995) has adapted the beautiful, sad, 
poetic book with  maximum fidelity, including descriptions, 
dialogue and voice-over narration. It relates events in 1946. 
Stephen Kumalo, a Zulu pastor (James Earl Jones), leaves his 
rural area for his first trip to Johannesburg. With the sum 
total od his money, a paltry 14 pounds 6, and with dogged 
determination, he is looking for his sister and for his son.  
"My son, Absalom" echoes both the Bible and William Faulkner.
He finds the woman. She had become a prostitute of the saddest 
sort -- not from greed but by necessity.  He rescues her and 
her child. Then he eventually locates Absalom -- in prison.  
The young man had fallen in bad company and had a penal 
record. During an attempted burglary, with two companions, 
Absalom, panicking when the white occupant returned, shot him 
fatally. 
By coincidence, the victim, Arthur, was the only child of a 
landowner from Kumalo's area, James Jarvis (Richard Harris).  
There is no doubt that Absalom, as he stated to his father and 
the Court, fired unthinkingly because he was frightened. While 
no excuse in the eyes of the law, this is  a terrible 
indictment of a society of separate and unequal races, where, 
in the dominated group, "Fear Eats the Soul," to quote the 
title of a Fassbinder film.
Ironically, Arthur was a liberal and the creator of a black 
center (the Claremont Boys Club). Says a club official to 
James: "He gave us all of this,"  and adds: " He is the only 
man, black or white, to see me as I am."
Among Arthur's writings, James  reads: "It is not native crime 
which is the problem, but white crime..." James, not shown as 
a bigot, is, like so many others, guilty by ommission and 
ignorance. He learns from tragedy. During a sleepless night, 
he tells his wife: " There was something Arthur wrote, that 
day that he... He said we taught him nothing. He means that we 
taught him nothing about the country in which he lived. He 
said that we called ourselves Christians, but we were 
indifferent to the suffering of Christians. He said that  when 
we say we are Christians, what we mean is that we are 
white.... Oh, why... Why, why, why, why do we bring children 
into this world?" 
In ways too delicate and complex to detail or reveal here, the 
two distraught fathers meet. Jarvis, unaware of who the 
anonymous visitor is ( Kumalo almost collapses from emotion), 
treats him kindly. Then the preacher, with immense pain 
declares: "It was my son that killed your son." Jarvis, still 
gentle: "I understand what I did not understand.  There is no 
anger in me." They part with "Go well, umfundisi" (a 
respectful expression for "pastor")  and "Stay well umnumzana" 
("sir"). The sequence is heartbreaking, the actors superb, 
both tens on a scale of 1 to 10. 
James Earl Jones has an enormous presence, all the stronger 
for his contained agony. Richard Harris, in  his most 
underplayed, quiet role ever, is also a paragon of moving, 
unrhetorical, unshowy reactions.  The strange but believable 
bond between the two men is reinforced in the scenes that 
follow.  
I confess that I was a bit worried at the start of the movie, 
first because the music by James Barry sounded like a clone of 
his score for "Out of Africa," secondly because the trek of 
the Rev. Kumalo to Johannesburg, where he gets scammed and 
robbed on arrival, might overdevelop the aspect of a rube in a 
big city. But neither musical nor plot cliches appear. 
Instead, we get a series of events that go from touching to 
moving to devastating, both for the characters and the 
audience. The poignancy is cumulative, impossible to resist. 
It lasts to the very end when the preacher goes up to the 
mountain, with more Biblical echoes, not to mention Martin 
Luther King.
There is true emotion, dignity and nobility in this film, yet 
none that you might suspect of pulling out all the stops in 
order to influence the audience.  There is also, in the eyes 
of many critics, a great deal of true Christianity, but in my 
opinion the story transcends Christianity, Judaism, ancestor 
worship or totemism, reaching instead deep levels of humanity 
that cut across religions or non-faiths. 
Not everything is obvious. Neither the police nor the 
prosecutor or the judge are made into racist villains. During 
Absalom's trial, whenever Arthur Jarvis  is mentioned, it is 
not by name, but as "the white man." This speaks volumes. So 
does the richness of the film in major elements ( like the 
kindness and help shown Kumalo by a white Bishop and a black, 
complex clergyman), small touches (impasses for blacks, the 
hostility of the bordello's madam), integrated incidentals (a 
bus boycott that forces the two preachers to walk 11 miles), 
and much else. 
By Hollywood standards, this is an Un-American movie, I mean 
one that takes its time with feelings, reflections and 
reactions. Yet slow it isn't.  The running time is listed 
variously as 108 and as 120 minutes. It is quite possible that 
after its initial screening the film was cut, but even in that 
case, no harm was done. It still plays like a Greek tragedy 
for our time. Not to be missed. 

Title
Review for GoldenEye (1995)
(1995)
**
Directed by Martin Campbell.
Second Unit director, Ian Sharp.
Written by Jeffrey Caine & Bruce Fierstein from a story by Michael France.
Photography, Phil Meheux.
Second Unit Camera, Harvey Harrison.
Additional Unit directed & photographed by Arthur Wooster.
Production design, Peter Lamont.
Editing, Terry Rawlings.
Costumes, Lindy Hemming.
Special effects supervisor, Chris Corbould.
Miniature effects supervisor, Derek Meddings.
Visual effects photography, Paul Wilson.
Music, Eric Serra.
Cast: Pierce Brosnan, Sean Bean, Izabella Scorupco, Famke Janssen,
      Joe Don Baker, Robbie Coltrane, Tcheky Karyo, Gottfried John,
      Alan Cumming, Michael Kitchen, Serena Gordon, Desmond Llewelyn,
      Samantha Bond, and Judi Dench as "M."
A UA/MGM release.
130 minutes.
Rated PG-13.
     I keep reading respected reviewers who say that this is the 17th
James Bond flick, when I count it as the 18th.  I guess too many people
have read the presskit that mentions "the 16 previous Bond films"
without double-checking.  Never trust pressbooks.  They can provide
useful information, but they also abound in hype, often have bad
grammar, and bad spelling errors.  In their biographical notices,
unlike the total listings of credits you find in many European
pressbooks, they can also conveniently omit references to movies that
have bombed.
     The new Bond is Pierce Brosnan.  I'd rather see a Pierce-Arrow
classic car than a Pierce Brosnan.  Mind you, I wish him all the best,
along with the rest of humanity.  But without being bad, he is no suave
Sean Connery, no "isn't this a joke?" Roger Moore, no eager-somber
Timothy Dalton.  By comparison Brosnan lacks a marked personality, is
rather inexpressive and delivers his lines without panache.
     Dalton, by the way, was in the much-maligned 17th Bond movie,
LICENSE TO KILL (1989).  It is perhaps the most serious, cruel and
sadistic Bond movie, and for sure the most personal one, and
additionally the best role of Robert Davi (the villain).  It stands
high on my list of 007 entertainments.  And another Bond, George
Lazenby in ON HER MAJESTY'S SECRET SERVICE, has also been unfairly
defamed.
     Bond films have been a blessing, a mix of fantasy and adventure
that, because of their very whimsy, defanged their violence, unlike so
many other action movies.  Bond films never outstayed their welcome,
but GOLDENEYE seems to.
     I don't think that we've reached the point of saturation with 007,
or that lacking the Soviet adversaries or their surrogates, Bond has
run out of steam.  There is a great deal that could be Bonded if
cleverly adapted to the changing times--easily as much as before
since villainy is still all over and technology keeps leaping and
bounding, There are always new opportunities for 007 to reappear.  This
is still the time for all good men to come to the aid of their
country.
     GOLDENEYE opens with 007 and 006 (Sean Bean) facing unexplained
villains in Russia.  The pre-credit sequence has Bond do the longest,
most incredible bungee jump ever, fly through the air into a small
plane's seat, and other such goodies.  It is so outrageous that it
could put you in a state of amused euphoria.
     Then we cut to nine years later ... and filmic erosion sets in.
Bond's new boss M is played by talented Judi Dench.  She may be
familiar to you from the current, clever PBS British series "As Time
Goes By" in which she has the female lead as a mature lady who runs a
secretarial agency and who meets up with her former amour Geoffrey
Palmer--after 38 years.  Dench adds a so-called feminist or PC touch,
but is not especially interesting and her part is quite small.  Michael
Kitchen (whose credits are not in the presskit) is the actor who played
superbly Charles, Prince of Wales in something I saw on TV.  He has a
cultivated nasal voice, beautiful manners, a memorable presence.  Alas,
his role in GOLDENEYE is tiny too.
     The Aston-Martin auto of yore is now being upstaged by the blatant
product placement of a BMW.  How sad to see Great Britain yielding to
Germany.  The BMW is given nothing to do so far as I know, but then I
may have closed my eyes.
     The female villain (Famke Janssen) goes by the name of Xenia
Onatopp.  She is a paragon of unsafe sex, the summit of
sex-and-violence as one entity.  This long-nosed woman has killing
legs, like long-nose pliers that crush her bedmates to death during
copulation.  This is not particularly amusing, nor is the name
Onatopp.  It repeats the mistake of GOLDFINGER where a woman was called
"Pussy Galore," and the additional lapse of taste, almost twenty years
later, of baptizing another lady "Octopussy," in the eponymous movie.
Those names may have been in Ian Fleming's texts but they were
aberrations, snickering schoolchild humor that here becomes crass
stuff.  It takes away from the would-be classiness of 007 films.  And,
no, I am not a prude.
     Bond finds himself facing military and para-military Russian
gangsters who are out to join Capitalism (with a capital C) through the
use of a secret weapon.  I won't let the cat out of the bag save to
opine that unlike Bond's "shaken but not stirred" vodka martinis (yes,
these drinks are back too) the story neither shakes nor stirs you.
     Many of the old conventions are around, minus the old humor.
There are some attempts at jocularity but feeble and forced ones.
Boris the super-programmer who's also supposed to provide comic relief
is poorly handled.
     We get a car race, a baccarat duel with a mysterious woman at
Monte-Carlo's gambling tables, cleavage, kinky sex, orgies of action,
several locations, gadgets, and so on.
     What's new is the use of the paramount 1990s cliche: computers,
their wizard manipulators, the impossible things they do.  What's
almost new is that Bond, as sartorially impeccable as can be in his
Savile Row tailoring and what look to me like Turnbull and Asher
shirts, gets no tears, wrinkles, soot or spots and remains immaculate
while engaging in outlandish action.  See Bond driving a tank in the
streets of St. Petersburg as he chases a car.  See him attacking a
train with his tank.
     What's also new is the containment of Bond's sexism.  When Pierce
Brosnan vanquishes the villainness it is not because she's female but
because he is Bond.  For a change, there's just one new woman carnally
involved with James Bond.  She is no sex object but the pretty
Assistant Programmer who has brains as well as guts.  The actress is
Izabella Scorupco, a Pole from Sweden who has been a model abroad,
became a singer, was in a couple of Swedish films. "Scorupco" may sound
like the movie's fabrication, but is not.
     In case you wonder, the killer-lady Famke Janssen's real name is
apparently not a concoction either.  She is Dutch, moved to the States
eleven years ago, majored in writing and literature at Columbia
University, studied acting, has been on TV's "Star Trek: The Next
Generation" as Picard's love interest.  She had her movie debut in
FATHERS AND SONS.
     New too is the actual use of location shooting in the former
Leningrad.  I tip my synthetic fur hat to the filmmakers for achieving
feats of SFX (special effects) under impossible conditions and perhaps
surpassing most other Bonds in production values.  This is the reason I
exceptionally include some of the countless artisans/technicians in the
credits above--and upgrade the film to two stars.  By itself, the
technical prowess rates an A, but there's more to movies than
gizmoism.
     GOLDENEYE uses the splintered approach.  It is so busy with
action, explosions, computers, guns, planes, trains and automobiles
that it has no time for vignettes, relationships, or expanding
anything.  It is incoherent, diffuse, convoluted, with non sequiturs
and gaps as big as the Baltic sea--as opposed to wide lakes in most
other Bond films.
     The progression is artificial.  Past a point, its arbitrariness
becomes annoying.  Past the next point, it becomes a yawner,
dehumanizes the movie, desensitizes the viewer.  Gadgets and action and
SFX make the film illogical, not by ordinary standards of course (which
is to be expected) but by James Bond wild fantasy standards.
     New Zealand-born director Campbell has done some nice work in
England.  In the US his latest is the ho-hum NO ESCAPE with Ray
Liotta, not a hit but no disaster either.
     Richard Maibaum, the American who was the habitual screenwriter of
007 movies, died in 1991.  The new writers, also American, and here
with their first produced feature, seem to have taken ideas from
fifteen different Bond films and strung them together.  They are big on
lapses and mistakes.  For example Ms. Scorupco survives a catastrophe
magically.  The arch-villain suddenly turns lecherous for a brief
spell--and then nothing is made of this.
     The exchange of bullets goes beyond ordinary conventions: we
accept that movie bad guys will shoot the hero 100 times and not score
once, while the protagonist's marksmanship is perfect.  But a ratio of
1,000 to 1 in both cases?
     Saving graces.  A few bits are funny, like the tank's mayhem and
its snatching the statue of a winged horse, or like Russian gangster
club-owner Robbie Coltrane having a singer girl-friend who demolishes
amusingly the song "Stand by Your Man."
     There is also one subtlety of sorts.  In the Gospel According to
Bond it is the Brits who are the salt of the earth, often assisted by
their second-fiddle American cousins.  Bond has been played by a
Scotsman (Connery), an Englisman (Londoner Moore), an Aussie (Lazenby)
and a Welshman (Dalton).  Now comes the Irish Bond (Brosnan).  No
matter, they are all loyal subjects of H.M. in the films.
     The Bondian Standard has mostly odd-looking-and-sounding
foreigners as the enemy.  In GOLDENEYE there is a Very Bad person who
though not a foreigner, through a specious explanation does turn out to
be one after all.  It's really pushing the envelope, but at least the
trick saves British honor and fealty.  I can't give away more, but
you'll see what I mean if you watch the movie.

Title
Review for Father of the Bride Part II (1995)
     FATHER OF THE BRIDE II follows the 1991 FATHER OF THE BRIDE,
itself a remake of the 1950 movie by the same title.  The original was
a nice, high-bourgeoisie, mainstream film.  The father was Spencer
Tracy--who could do no wrong in his roles.  The daughter was Elizabeth
Taylor.  That film was followed by FATHER'S LITTLE DIVIDEND (1951),
also with Tracy and Taylor.  It is that last movie that has been now
remade as FATHER OF THE BRIDE II.
     I have not seen the 1991 picture and my memory of FATHER'S LITTLE
DIVIDEND is hazy, so no comparisons will be made.  But I have seen
FATHER OF THE BRIDE II and I can tell you that if you want to see Steve
Martin in fine fettle in a good picture, find something else to watch.
There's ample choice, including four fine films that  for mysterious
reasons averaged poor-to-mediocre reviews: PENNIES FROM HEAVEN, THREE
AMIGOS, MY BLUE HEAVEN, and HOUSESITTER.
     The script of FATHER OF THE BRIDE II is based on that of FATHER'S
LITTLE DIVIDEND, but this time there are two pregnancies.  George Banks
(Martin) is a wealthy man approaching 50 contented with his life, kids,
wife and house.  He say so at the start of the movie, addressing the
audience.  There is more of this later too.  The uncreative way the
monologue is handled shows that it is used as a crutch.
     When his married daughter announces that she is pregnant, George
goes into a blue funk at the idea of aging and becoming a grandfather.
This too is handled lamely, opting for sentiment instead of having
Steve Martin do a manic-depressive turn.  George tries rejuvenating his
appearance by dyeing his white hair and other steps.  In a moment of
abandon he makes love to his wife Nina (Keaton) on the kitchen floor.
     Let's cut to the chase.  Some time later the  senior couple find
out that Nina is pregnant, to her delight and to his shock.  But he
comes around and everything goes swimmingly as mother and daughter both
produce babies next door to each other in the same hospital and at the
exact same time.
     If you can swallow that much coincidence you should see the
infinitely funnier (but naughty) "Micki + Maude," a 1984 farce by Blake
Edwards in which bigamist TV reporter Dudley Moore has two wives giving
birth at the same time and place.  Skip, however the 1995 pregnancy
movie "Nine Months" (with Hugh Grant), which is pretty poor, except for
Robin Wiliams's turn.
     FATHER OF THE BRIDE II is phony throughout and disconnected from
real life, or at least the life of the huge majority of viewers.  The
Banks live in a mansion that would make Cary Grant and Myrna Loy (in
MR. BLANDINGS BUILDS HIS DREAM HOUSE (1948) green with envy.  George's
profession and source of income are a mystery.  The only time we see
him in his work-place is when he crosses a large office while getting
from his secretary a list of famous people who are his seniors.
     FATHER OF THE BRDIE II is a Rich People's film.  When for reasons
I will not go into, George has sold his house then wants to buy it back
from Mr.  Habib (Eugene Levy) the entrepreneur, he thinks nothing of
returning Habib's check plus a bonus of $100,000.  With the help of
another entrepreneur, the family friend played by Martin Short, George
then gets going on building an addition, a "Baby Suite" that could
easily house a small family.  Then comes a luxurious two-babies-shower,
also orchestrated by Martin Short.  Wnna bet that George and Nina do
not clip grocery coupons?
     Very, very little is funny about this film, in spite of Martin's
unquestioned abilities.  Instead we get a lot of delighted squealing
(as when the daughter makes her announcement) and dumb, silly scenes
(as in the dog sequence).  We get oceans of glop and an overall
atmosphere that is like an updated or transplanted Eisenhower-era
mentality, when much of America was optimistic and thriving.
     The picture also wallows in corny sentiment, like a flashback of
George teaching basketball to his then-little girl to the sounds of
awful swelling music. (Normally composer Alan Silvestri does a lot
better than in this picture).
     What's even worse is that the film is so lethargic that a
sleeping-pills incident stands as a symbol of the whole.  At the same
time the movie manages to offend people right and left: Arabs (the
grasping, cold Mr. Habib), hospital staff (they make an initial
mistake) and doctors (there is mistrust of obstetrician Dr. Eisenberg
who is young and a woman).  Canines too.
     More irritating yet is the role of Martin Short as Frank
Eggelhoffer.  He is an unexplained friend (unless perhaps you know
FATHER OF THE BRIDE) who is now an interior decorator, now a
contractor, now a caterer.  Introduced as a flaming gay, in gestures
and speech he minces, flounces, overdoes everything so much that he is
an insult to both gays and straights.  With vague European origins, he
speaks with an accent that's neither German or anything else.  It
starts out highly exaggerated then ebbs, flows and changes as the movie
unreels.  His nom-de-film is taken, I bet, from the screwball classic
NOTHING SACRED (1937) where the great supporting actor Sig Ruman
played Dr. Eggelhoffer.
     The only four things I liked in FATHER OF THE BRIDE II were Jane
Adams in her small part as the  charming and most professional
Dr.Eisenberg; the two Dobermans; and George's beautiful two-seater
convertible.  Neither the end credits nor the body of the movie
identify the car.  For once, product placement would have been
welcome.

Title
Review for Avengers, The (1998)
THE AVENGERS  (USA-UK) no *  Directed by Jeremiah Chechik. Written by Don
Macpherson. Photography, Roger Pratt. Editing, Mick Audsley. Production
design, Stuart Craig. Music by Joel McNeely. Produced by Jerry Weintraub.
Cast: Ralph Fiennes (John Steed), Uma Thurman (Dr. Emma Peel), Sean Connery
(Sir August de Wynter), Jim Broadbent (Mother), Patrick Macnee (voice only
as Invisible Jones), Fiona Shaw (Father), Eddie Izzard (Bailey),Eileen
Atkins (Alice).
A Warner release.  90 minutes. PG.
In major film markets, i.e. big cities, the distributors of new movies
organize regular pre-screening for the press. The fact that there was none
for "The Avengers" loudly suggested that the film was a bomb. It is.
The new feature is taken from the eponymous, popular TV series that spanned
most of the 1960s and starred as investigators the duo of John Steed and
Emma Peel, respectively played by Patrick Macnee and (after the series had
started) Diana Rigg. Now Ralph is John and Uma is Emma. Or rather, try to
be and in so doing fail miserably. It is not merely a matter of miscasting
but one of mis-scripting, mis-directing, mis-conceiving and a hit-or-miss
attitude.
(Jeremiah Chechik  made his directorial debut with Christmas Vacation
(1989), one of the very best in the National Lampoon series. He followed
this up with the warm, intimate and offbeat Benny & Joon. I have not seen
(nor have many others) seen his Tall Tale: The Unbelievable Adventures of
Pecos Bill (1994). His next film, Diabolique (1996), was a big fiasco, a
remake of a French classic).
My familiarity with the TV series being modest, I asked a most reliable
informant and true enthusiast of the old programs for her reaction. Her
e-mail to me:
"TOTAL waste of time. Technique is out, technology is in. Wit is out,
weapons are in. Subtlety is out, special effects are in. Charming is out,
coy is in. Or, as one of my less talkative film instructors used to say
when judging student films: Travesty. Cut. Flunk. Next."
In the originals, in ways that oddly parallel those of Italy's neorealist
films of the 1940s, restrictions imposed by low budgets were a
blessing--they obliged the makers to use imagination and to concentrate on
characters and dialogue. On the contrary, the 60-plus million dollar
feature production is a bloated mess. The film retains the old look of an
eerily empty England but stuffs it with expensive, technical gimmickry that
goes nowhere.
Steed, still impeccably dressed like a City banker, is  an operative for
the Government agency known as "The Ministry."  He is assigned Mrs. Peel as
a partner. Their task is to undo the evil project of  Sir August de Wynter
(Sean Connery), a billionaire super-scientist who lives in an eye-popping
estate (Blenheim Palace was used), can change the weather at will, and
bring on tornadoes, rain,snow and ice. Why he does this is as clear as
slush, until, much later, when he appears, all dolled up in  Scots regalia,
before an august audience to blackmail the nation. "I want 10% of your GNP,
otherwise I'll freeze out the United Kingdom."
Why the fabulously wealthy Sir August wants all those riches is
unexplained, except for the movie being peppered (but un-salted and
un-spiced) by James Bondian characteristics. But at least in the Bond
flicks the villains had specific purposes, whereas here there is not even
the facile alibi of a  Mad Scientist.
I will spare you (and myself) details, all of which are dumb, all of which
contribute to the total incoherence of the non-plot. There is a great deal
of action that signifies nothing and keeps adding to the confusion and
disorientation. Again, far too much of it comes from comic-book treatments
of James Bond episodes, but so lacking in continuity or sense that they
make Agent 007's adventures look positively Cartesian in their logic.
The story's holes are mega-crater-sized. Sean Connery's attempts at being
suave fall flat. Unlike the TV series, the flirtatious, bantering, repartee
and zingers between Steed and Peel have now degenerated into pedestrian
sentences, leaden phrases, and un-sexy glances. The excessive banter - like
all else - is so keen on being cute that boredom sets in from almost the
start of the movie.
In the old series, less was more. In this jumble, more is more. The makers
seem inebriated with visuals that are either deja vu, totally unconvincing,
mostly gratuitous or all of the above. Only a tiny amount of good special
effects ( like a swarm of insect-like helicopters pursuing the heroes' car)
hold your attention.
On the infinitesimally meager side of little plusses, Uma Thurman's British
accent is fine for American ears, though no doubt some Brits will cavil.
She does what she can given the catastrophic context, even though she lacks
she brainy sexiness of Diana Rigg. Ralph Fiennes' real talent, here buried
under the debris, results in an indifferent presence.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Newton Boys, The (1998)
THE NEWTON BOYS (1998) ** 3/4  Directed by Richard Linklater.Written by
Linklater, Claude Stanush, and Clark Lee Walker, based on the book by
Stanush.Photography, Peter James.Editing, Sandra Adair. Production design,
Catherine Hardwicke.Musical score, Edward D. Barnes with music by Bad
Livers. Cast: Matthew McConaughey (Willis Newton), Skeet Ulrich (Joe
Newton), Ethan Hawke (Jess Newton), Dwight Yoakam (Brentwood Glasscock),
Chloe Webb (Avis Glasscock), Julianna Margulies (Louise Brown), Vincent
D'Onofrio (Dock Newton), et al. A 20th Century Fox release. 121
minutes.PG-13
The Online Encyclopedia Britannica contains 533 articles that include
"Newton" (including a lot of Isaac and a bit of Huey) but nothing about the
Newton bank robbers. Even Boolean searches turned up nothing.
In my amateur poll, no one had ever heard of the Newton Boys. I suspect
that today very few Americans have, most likely people over 80. So, score
one for movies that  add to our knowledge of  pop culture.  I suspect too
that back in 1967, when "Bonnie and Clyde" came out, its characters were
far less familiar to a broad public than names such as Capone or Dillinger.
Ditto, in 1969, for Butch Cassidy and the Wild Bunch -- except for people
in Wyoming and neighboring states.
Yet, for the period 1919-1924, the four Newton brothers (plus the
oddly-named Brent Glasscock, the nitroglycerin expert) were responsible for
a record number of successful bank robberies and for the biggest train
robbery in American history, arguably in the world, after the British coups
of 1855 and 1963.
Why the Newton gang has not, until now, entered history in a big way is
probably explained by a statement presumably made by Willis Newton, the
leader: " We don't kill anybody, we don't steal from women and children, we
don't  rat." Apocryphal or not, this sets the quintet apart from the
violence and lack of thieves' honor that prevailed in the Chicago (and
Midwest) school of gangsterism.
The Newtons are poor Texas farmers from Uvalde, which happens to be also
the hometown of Matthew McConaughey (Willis Newton). Willis is out of jail,
to which he was railroaded for something he had not done. Or so he claims.
(The film is frustratingly sparse on details and information). He opts for
something more fruitful than farming as a career: robbing banks.
With not-so-odd rationalization, he figures that to take money that way is
no big crime. After all, banks are insured, the insurers are crooks, the
banks inflate their losses, everybody is a thief, so why not rob robbers?
One step farther and we could get into the Robin Hood logic, except that
the Newtons keep their loot. While watching the film it is worth
remembering that it takes place during the affluent Roaring Twenties and
not during the future Great Depression when suffering was generalized and
banks (those that did not fail) were not only a target but the enemy.
The action starts with a wonderfully quiet and matter-of-fact heist made
colorful by a microscopic bank in the middle of a flat nowhere landscape,
and doubling the color as an old flivver chases after three hold-up men on
horseback.
Then comes the formation of the five-member gang.Willis decrees they must
stick to night robberies and use nitroglycerine to blow up safes. It works
beautifully, with more piscturesquenes and some quite funny episodes. The
protracted spree (five years is a very long time for this sort of thing)
takes the Newtons from Texas to Nebraska to Canada, and back to northern
Illinois for the train robbery. The train hold-up comes after the gang goes
from riches to rags because --ironically-- Willis had made a legitimate
investment that turned sour; and after banks started using more
nitro-resistant safes.
The Newtons are, by and large, likable fellows, often well-mannered, not a
bit nasty or bloodthirsty. But their saga doesn't really work dramatically.
The robbers seem to be doing this for a lark, a lark which results in
fashionable clothing, new cars, ritzy hotels, and, moderately, in wine,
women and song.
Director and co-writer Richard Linklater is a triple-A "new" filmmaker:
"Slacker" (1991),"Dazed and Confused" (1993), "Before Sunrise" (1995),
"SubUrbia" (1997). An exceptional, original filmmaker, he has, in many
ways, adapted to American mores and modified in style and substance, the
old French New Wave (notably Godard and Rohmer) in films that are different
from one another yet retain a superb sense of humor and of life-
with-absurdisms. Throughout his works, Linklater maintains a laid-back
attitude (but never twice the same,) sharp eyes and ears, and un-gooey
sympathy for his creatures.
Those qualities are in The Newton Boys, but backfire somewhat in what one
expects to be a genre action movie. The film has a tendency to meander,
pack down too much in sketchy episodes, and occasionally confuse.It even
features a standard montage for the passage of time. Willis, as the leader,
is the key personage; the others,oo much of a supporting cast, receive
scant character development. They are somewhat differentiated but not
sharply, and lack fleshing-out. An unintentional red-herring is Brent's
wife Avis whose initial appearance suggests sexual possibilities, but
nothing comes of that.
The maker of "Slacker," slackens his pace before mid-film. He picks up with
his characters' misguided, Keystone-cops-in-reverse fracas with several
bank messengers in Toronto and later with the oddball train robbery.
Linklater's laid-backness purposely omits other possible tensions while
making of the gang nice ole boys whom we perceive as robbers yet not as
criminals.
There are, however, several very good touches. A love-affair between Willis
and Louise (a single mother who works at the cigar stand of an hotel) may
add a diversion that is so-so, yet there is an excellent, early, throwaway,
subtle scene of reactions when Louise's date comes to get her as she sits
flirting with Willis.
Where "TNB" is admirable is in its production values. Sets, music,
costumes, artifacts and paraphernalia combine into a beautiful,
authentic-feeling ensemble of period recreation, with much attention to
details --down to wristwatches that are right for the time.
The photography is just as good. Cinematographer Peter James has spoken of
the visual progression, from the beginning's "prairie feel," to the
pastel-using robbery scenes, to the brighter look of the gang's affluent
period and the darker look of their downfall days.
Beyond the basic facts, to what extent the movie embroiders on the Newtons'
deeds is hard to tell. I feel skeptical about the early scene of a bank
director (sic) offering the Newtons an improbable 85 cents on the stolen
dollar and giving them a list of 41 banks that still use old-style safes.
And, for reasons which you will understand if you see this movie, the
brothers have been prettified from the hicks they really were into
semi-gentlemanly cowboy-thieves.
Judged by the breathless standards of the genre, "TNB" falls short of
expectations. But as a departure from that category, weaknesses and all,
the film, while only occasionally gripping, does remain interesting.
Some of the best sections are at the beginning and at the end. The opening
credits are like silent movie film cards. I wish the rest of the film had
stuck to black and white and I would guess that so did Linklater,but
economic imperatives are against this notion. What comes with the end
credits is very funny. Do not leave your seat prematurely.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Eyes of Tammy Faye, The (2000)
THE EYES OF TAMMY FAYE  (2000) **1/2 . Produced and directed by 
Fenton Bailey and Randy Barbato. Photography, Sandra Chandler. 
Editing, Paul Wiesepape. Music, Jim Harry. With: Tammy Faye Bakker 
Messner, Roe Messner, Jim Bakker, the Rev. Mel White, Pat Boone, 
Tammy Sue Bakker Chapman, Steven Chao, Jim J. Bullock, Roseanne, Greg 
Gorman, Charles Sheperd, James Albert.  RuPaul Charles narrates. A 
Lions Gate Film. 79 minutes.  PG-13
One of the major banes produced by the media revolution is so-called 
celebrities of all kinds. They are the good, the bad and the ugly; 
the objects of cult, of paparazzi and groceries' check-out counter 
tabloids, of most glossy magazines; they fill the airwaves; they 
regularly elbow out substantial news items; etc.
Per se, the "celebrity"-mania may not cause any major harm. But since 
human life and time are finite, the frills of  the excessive 
documenting of mostly entertainment figures has to be at the expense 
of more important knowledge and information. A vivid example of this 
is the Jay Leno show's sadly funny "Jaywalking" segments. (They are 
edited interviews, of course, and require that the people in them 
give permission --sign releases -- but is it not horrible that they 
accept to be idiots in public for the sake of being on TV?
On a more elevated level, too many college students who might be 
smart, and who almost all know by heart the names, performances and 
trivia of "celebrities," have lacked the time to learn (even 
slightly) general culture: history, geography, current events, 
literature, the arts and so on.
In fairness I must add that it was ever thus. College education is 
time-consuming; it offers limited opportunities for students to go 
beyond certain specialties. But then,  this state of things has 
reached exponentially abysmal proportions with the exponential rise 
of the media. Sadly too, while TV, the most influential of all, can 
also be also a major boon, an amazing and vivid source of learning, 
this very positive aspect of the media is far too little exploited. 
In fact, any polling of persons "being educated" reveals that
the small percentage of those who profit from 
educational/informational television consists overwhelmingly of older 
persons.
The same tragic situation applies to books, magazines, etc. You name 
it. And, alas, not only to the United States but to most, if not all, 
other countries.
Having gotten this off my chest I'll turn to "The Eyes of Tammy 
Faye." It is a documentary about "celebrity"  Tammy Faye Bakker, now 
Tammy Faye Bakker Messner. Its two directors (who seem to be Brits) 
are experienced in the genre. They are not impartial. They set out 
to redeem Tammy--or at the very least to induce in their public 
second thoughts about Tammy. The film goes overboard. The information 
that comes with it shows this clearly.
Examples: "Tammy is one of the most adored and reviled women of her 
time." Do the makers really believe that she was/is  a concern of 
most Americans, not to mention the rest of the planet?  They admit to 
having drawn an "  affectionate portrait."  But documentaries of this 
sort should not be partisan and take no sides openly, even though 
subliminally or indirectly documentaries always have a point of view 
(That's the old argument about "cinema verite")  Tammy is "both 
surprising and endearing." Says who? "The Bakkers were crucified in 
the court of public opinion for their supposed greed and corruption." 
If this is not a partisan opinion, what is? And so on.
Entertaining the film certainly is --and this is what makes me give 
it 2 1/2 stars. But it also falls between two stools. At first it 
seems to be akin to the satirical exposes by film-makers such as 
Michael Moore ("Roger and Me," " The Big One," et al.) But it rapidly 
evolves into a gentler, kinder portrait of Tammy and her adventures.
"Celebrities" can be, and often are, ridiculous figures. Make your 
own list. Tammy was and remains a Class A oddity who cannot be taken 
seriously as she recounts her life from its beginnings to the Odyssey 
of the Tammy-Jim Bakker duo, its rise and fall, to developments and 
updates through recent times.
The movie follows her mostly through interviews in which Tammy 
speaks to the camera.  Her interviewers are mostly unseen and unheard 
but many other "names" do appear and add their favorable, pro-Tammy 
opinions.
For many members of the movie's audience the main interest will be 
the light shed on the aspect of Americana known as televangelism. The 
couple's debut, in the 1960s, was when almost unknown Pat Robertson 
had them create for his own TV program in his one-station "network" a 
Jesus-based puppet show. (The puppets are in the film as 
chapter-announcers). Then the Bakkers invented  "The 700 Club,"  the 
first Christian talk-show.  Jealous of their success Robertson dumped 
the couple.
Moving to California the couple co-founded TBN, and were betrayed 
again. Moving on to North Carolina, they founded PTL (Praise the 
Lord), which became the jewel in their crown and was one of the very 
first 24-hour satellite networks.  Its thriving televangelism 
business culminated with the creation of the first Christian theme 
park, the mammoth Heritage USA.
Eventually came financial troubles, irregularities, deficits, money 
problems. Added to them was Jim Bakker's one-night stand with his 
employee Jessica Hahn (who later told her side of the story in 
Playboy). There also came research and exposes by the Charlotte 
Observer's reporter Charles F. Sheperd. All that spells scandal.
Hard-right televangelist Jerry Falwell now enters the picture. He had 
his own empire. Apparently he hated PTL because (among the reasons 
given by Tammy) he was against its all-embracing nature, its 
acceptance of  all denominations, of gays, addicts, and so on. And he 
had no satellite.
Oddly  (on the surface only) when PTL became a sinking Titanic, 
Falwell offered help, flew in to the rescue (in his private jet), 
made an offer that the Bakkers could not refuse: he promised money 
--and to get more funds, he said he would take over PTL for a short 
time only, to fix things, and so on.
As per Tammy, he cheated. Within a month he declared  PTL's 
bankruptcy, exposed the Bakkers' financial tangles, attacked Jim for 
his "homosexual audiences" and dishonesty ---and added one more 
betrayal to the J & T saga.  Falwell is the arch-villain of this 
story. There's no honor among thieves.
Soon after Jim was sentenced to 45 years in prison. The marriage 
dissolved. Tammy married their friend Roe Messner, the contractor of 
Heritage USA. Messner was also tried and sentenced to a sojourn in 
jail.
A tawdry tale, it keeps its steady focus on Tammy, a monument to bad 
taste in  makeup and vestimentary horrors. (At one point, her huge 
rings reminded me of gladiators' shields.) The camera and microphone 
show her as freaky but gutsy, pathetic (in both senses), with a 
meowing baby voice that matches her celebrated (in effect a huge joke 
to all but Tammy) treatment of her eyes. She speaks of her private 
troubles in an endless, often lachrymose litany :her betrayal by Jim, 
her drug addiction, her fight with colon cancer, her formerly 
alienated children, and much else. We follow her undaunted search for 
(un-realized or failed) Tammy-starring, outlandish TV shows (such as 
"Medicine Today with Tammy Faye") ,her singing, her recitations of 
her doggerel-plus poetry, her "beautification" for cameras, her 
visits to Oral Roberts University where she warbles ( the radio guy 
calls her "a fabulous singer" --sic) her determination to pull on 
heartstrings.
If this movie plays in Europe, where televangelism is still a rarity 
and a novelty, whether or not understood by non-Americans it is bound 
to become a mega-curiosity. That's another reason I rated it  **1/2 .
Tammy takes herself so very seriously that one might (or not) doubt 
her faith. There is a notable, disturbing passage when job-seeking 
Tammy talks about switching to "secular TV." Quote: " I am a very 
secular person. Christ is only part of me." And from start to finish, 
with the word "God"  kicked around as incessantly as a ball in a 
soccer game, one can't help thinking of the Commandment:
"You shall not take the name of the Lord your God in vain; for the 
Lord will not hold him guiltless who takes his name in vain. "

Title
Review for Wise Girl (1937)
WISE GIRL (1937) Directed by Leigh Jason. Written by  Charles Norman 
& Allan Scott . Photography, J. Peverell Marley. Editing, Jack 
Hively.  Art Direction Van Nest Polglase. Cast :Miriam Hopkins (Susan 
Fletcher), Ray Milland (John O'Halloran),  Walter Abel (Karl) Henry 
Stephenson ( Mr. Fletcher),  Alec Craig (Dermont O'Neil), Guinn 'Big 
Boy' (Mike Williams), Betty Philson (Joan), Marianna Strelby (Katie), 
Margaret Dumont (Mrs. Bell-Rivington), Jean De Briac (George), Ivan 
Lebedeff        (Prince Michael), Rafael Storm ( Prince Ivan), et al. 
An RKO film. 70 minutes.
Miriam Hopkins plays the wealthy society gal who, upon the death of 
her sister, sets out to find her two orphan nieces, in New York's 
Bohemia. She tracks them down in Greenwich Village, living with their 
uncle Ray Milland, a painter. Their abode is one of those houses with 
a courtyard surrounding the apartments. Expectedly, all kinds of 
original, artistic types dwell there. All are colorful, impoverished 
but happy free souls. All are friends, all are sweet and wacky. 
Hopkins wants to get an inside view of her nieces' life, so she poses 
as a poor - indeed broke - woman. Expectedly the kids are darlings 
and wise for their age. Expectedly they and Miriam bond. Expectedly 
Milland and Hopkins get sweet on each other.
Less expected are the turns of the plot, with Hopkins getting a job 
in a restaurant where she throws amorous, posh customers into turmoil,
The film is pure Depression era escapism. Not a great unknown movie 
to discover but still a pleasant 70 minutes with several moments of 
charm and comedy, almost screwball though not fully so. The two girls 
are most cute. They speak French, with a pretty atrocious accent -- 
but who's surprised. Hollywood was ever sloppy with languages, had a 
tin ear and never seemed to invest a little money in 
language-checkers.
The movie's director, Jason Leigh, is far from being high on the 
directorial totem pole. Nevertheless, he has some nice items to his 
credit, such as the pleasant musical That Girl from Paris (1936), 
with Lily Pons (Lucille Ball in the supporting cast), and the 
screwball mystery The Mad Miss Manton (1938), with Barbara Stanwyck 
and Henry Fonda.
Wise Girl inevitably brings to mind several films by Frank Capra, 
notably the next year's  You Can't Take It With You (1938; Oscars for 
Best Film and Best Director) another escapist movie where eccentric, 
happy, non-materialistic "little people" show the rich a thing or 
two.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Love and Death on Long Island (1997)
LOVE AND DEATH ON LONG ISLAND (Canada-UK, 1997) *** 1/3  Directed and
written by Richard Kwietniowski, based on the novel by Gilbert Adair.
Photography, Oliver Curtis. Production design, David McHenry. Editing,
Susan Shipton, Music, The Insects, Richard Grassby-Lewis. Cast: John Hurt
(Giles De'Ath), Jason Priestley (Ronnie Bostock), Fiona Loewi (Audrey),
Sheila Hancock (housekeeper Mrs. Barker), Maury Chaikin (Irving
Buckmiller), Gawn Grainger (Henry), Elizabeth Quinn (Mrs. Reed), Linda
Busby (Mrs. Abbott), Bill Leadbitter (Eldridge), Ann Reid (Maureen). A
Lions Gate release. 93 minutes. PG-13
The source novel by talented British writer and film critic Gilbert Adair
was a rather parodistic reworking of the Thomas Mann novella "Death in
Venice" told in the first person. Writer-director Kwietniowski (London-born
in 1957) reworked that reworking intelligently, sympathetically, with a
strong sense of visuals, editing and benevolent irony.
Before this, he had made about six gay-themed short films shown in several
festivals. "LDLI," his first feature, at the 1997 Cannes Fesival, received
a nomination for a Golden Camera and a special mention, as did John Hurt,
from the International Critics Association.
John Hurt is present in just about every scene. The thespian has a
marvelous track record, mostly in roles as different from one another as
they are from deja vu. Among them, in "A Man For All Seasons,"" Midnight
Express, ""The Elephant Man" (title role),"1984,""The Hit,""White
Mischief,"" Scandal,"" Rob Roy." He looks like no one else and can act like
nobody's business. Now in his  late 50s, he has the age of Giles De'Ath in
"Love and Death on Long Island."
British writer De'Ath lives in contemporary London but not in this century.
A widower (significantly, his wife was older than he, and they had no
children), he inhabits a world of books in a posh, old-fashioned apartment
where his housekeeper follows the man's clockwork routines without
intruding into his reclusive habits.
He gives no interviews, but when he is finally talked into an appearance on
BBC-Radio, it is  hilarious. Giles is befuddled by the questions, the
interviewer by the replies. De'Ath is truly out of the 20th century in
every way. "Do you use a word processor?" "I am a writer" he snaps," I
write words, I do not process them." Not that he has the foggiest about
what a processor is. Or even a typewriter.
A notation in the BBC ledger shows us just two words about the man: "fogey"
and "cult." This nagged me throughout the movie. If Giles has not a clue
about life-at-large, we don't have any about the kind of writing he does;
or why he is a figure in the literary Establishment; or what kind of cult
surrounds him, and why. Nonetheless, Giles is a hoot.
The radio interviewer had pointed out to Giles, who had not been to the
pictures in ages, that films have been made of the novels by E.M.Forster.
Later, locked out of his apartment and caught in the rain, Giles notices
such a film on a movie-house marquee and goes in. But unaware that there
are such innovations as multiplexes, he wanders into an American teen
flick, "Hotpants College 2." With comic slowness it dawns on him that
"this is not Forster." He  stands up to leave, but sees on the screen a
young performer (Jason Priestley) and  is entranced by him. Giles gets a
"coup de foudre," his first ever love-at-first-sight  and undoubtedly his
first  love ever, at any sight. The heart is a mysterious thing.
A major fixation is born. The besotted writer sees the picture again,
acting at the box-office like the traditonal, funny kid who wants to buy
condoms in a drugstore. Tracking down the name of the actor (it is Ronnie
Bostock) in comically awkward ways, he loads up on teen magazines which he
buys and disposes of as though they were pornography. He reads and
memorizes all about Ronnie, starts a cut-and-paste "Bostockiana" album.
Giles further enters pop culture by renting (more comedy here) all the
Bostock videos possible. He purchases a video-player, after first mistaking
microwave ovens for such machines, has it delivered by a stupefied young
man who explains to Giles' surprise that a TV set is required to watch the
tapes.
Passion escalates. After more research, howlers and howl-making episodes,
Giles takes off for the USA, to the Long Island village where Ronnie and
his supermodel girlfriend Audrey live by the sea. Giles, the innocent at
home, becomes the innocent abroad. But by now, the comic tone of the first
part acquires a lining of pathos, though without losing various funny
delights.
The second, American (though shot in Canada) half, has Giles take a room in
a motel where mostly couples meet furtively; be obsessed by his wanting to
meet Ronnie; resort  to a series of investigations and stalkings that
involve everything, from Ronnie's dog, his Porsche ragtop to  Giles'
becoming a regular at the greasy spoonish establishment owned by Irv. It is
called "Chez d'Irv," which somehow sounds like "chef d'oeuvre" (French for
"masterpiece") --a most unlikely bilingual pun, given Irv's
simple-mindedness
Love is the mother of inventions. The hitherto very low-key Giles  goes
energetically through loops and hoops, contrives a supermarket "accident"
to meet Audrey, turns on the charm, makes friends with her while waiting
for Ronnie to return from California. Finally, he meets him.
De'Ath's task is vastly aided by the small community --including the young
couple-- being one of naive people with little or no culture.No denizen had
ever heard of De'Ath, perhaps even of   literature. But all are hugely
impressed by having an English author in their midst. Dull, duller, dullest
Giles becomes an exotic creature.  It reminds me a bit of the newly rich
vulgarians who mistake Bob Hope for an Earl in "Fancy Pants."
Hurt's performance is probably his best, along with his Quentin Crisp in
"The Naked Civil Servant." In speech, expressivity, body language, timing,
he is impeccably in character, ludicrous and absurd yet believable, quasi
farcical yet touching. Wide-eyed Priestley, sporting Elvis  sideburns that
make him look even dimmer, performs with restraint a persona that's partly
an un-blatant send-off of his "Beverly Hills 90210" heartthrob, partly that
of a young actor who confusedly feels that there are things to do higher
than his teen-junk movie roles. The ground is fertile for Giles to lay on
with a trowel compliments, bold and bald statements about  Ronnie's talents
and potential, the imaginary film script Giles is writing for him. All
this, of course, leads to implanting the idea that things can go better,
not with Coke but with De'Ath as a mentor. To what extent Giles believes
what he says remains an open question.
Ronnie's is a supporting role to Giles' and Audrey's (well played by a
relative newcomer) is one level below this. The balance of the cast are
sub-supporters to the top trio, yet all appearances, down to the tiniest,
are sharply sketched out. Throughout the film, Kwietniowski also fleshes
out ambiances through light, economical, amusing touches in the
peripherals, from TV watching to weather predictions, not to mention
telephone answering machines or faxes.
November's attraction to May is something common. So is the mismatched
attraction of persons widely separated by social class, taste, intellect,
culture. Examples abound in movies, from  Somerset Maugham's novel "Of
Human Bondage" (the good version was filmed with Leslie Howard and Bette
Davis) to "Citizen Kane" and beyond.
In the case of " Love and Death" all this acquires new twists and an
outcome that I cannot disclose. But I can reveal that there is no sex,
there are no caricatures. Instead, we get heartfelt sentiment and much
humor at the expense of the nadirs of pop culture, teen adulation, as well
as of stuffy "high art."
No closure in its fullest sense comes at the end. Certain things are left
in the air, with an upbeat last-moment hint about Giles.There is audience
manipulation here, since the title's "Death" is a red herring. The name
De'Ath (pronounced Deh as in Irish or Italian names) does really exist, but
used without the apostrophe, it suggests to the unprepared public dire
events rather than a verbal joke.I'll grant you though that it is a good
mnemonic device.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Z (1969)
Z (France-Algeria, 1969) ****  Directed by Costa-Gavras (Constatine
Gavras) Written  by Gavras & Jorge Semprun from the eponymous novel
by Vassilis Vassilikos. Photography: Raoul Coutard. Music: Mikis
Theodorakis.  Cast: Yves Montand, Jean-Louis Trintignant, Jacques
Perrin, Irene Papas, Charles Denner, Francois Perier, Marcel Bozzufi,
Georges Geret et al.  127 minutes. Available  without cuts on a
superior Criterion laser-disc
In 1963, Grigorios Lambrakis, MD,  a popular leftist Member of the
Greek Parliament, was assassinated in Thesssaloniki by goons employed
by the extreme Right. Eventually the right-wing establishment fell
and a precarious democracy was established, only to lead to  a coup
on 21 April 1967,  by a military junta. The colonels' dictatorship
lasted for 7 years.
A Greek writer, Vassilis Vassilikos, recounted the events around the
Lambrakis murder in a thick novel, Z , in 1966. The title comes from
a combination of the sound of the Greek letter Z , which  is
pronounced  approximately like  "Long Live" , and the English sound
of Z, which means in Greek, " he lives, he is alive" . Such shouts
were  uttered by the record crowd which attended Lambrakis' funeral
in Athens. (Some people think that Z symbolizes the end, but the last
letter of the Greek alphabet is Omega.)
When the movie came out, the Junta was already in place. The film was
made with French money. It could not, of course, be shot in Greece,
so Algeria was used as a substitute. Sharp-eyed viewers will detect
Algerian faces and places, but overall the stand-in country works
nicely.
The movie never mentions Greece by name, but its anonymous country is
patently and transparently Greece.  The uniforms are Greek, the
references are Greek, the names are Greek Among others, note the
scene of  Yves Montand, (The Deputy and victim-to-be)  in a police
office : he looks up and  sees  on the wall the portraits of King
Paul and Queen Frederica,  but with faces hidden by the reflection of
lights on the glass frames.
Z was a sensation in its time and, even today, when shown to students
who don't even know the first thing about the American Civil War and
the two Word Wars --not to mention modern Greece! -- the film works
very well as a high-pitched, easy- to -grasp, technically excellent
thriller.
Z is a film of Greek inspiration, made by a Greek filmmaker, but as a
=46rench production it  straddles French and Greek cinema , and is
considered a part of the French repertory.
Costa-Gavras is really Constantinos Gavr=E1s  (note the accent). His
father, a Greek from the USSR, has  started to emigrate from Russia
to  the USA--but his stopover in Athens became a permanent residence.
The son, Constantinos (Costas for short) was born in Athens in 1933.
The father, a small bureaucrat, was suspected of communism and
harassed, even after the war, at a time when leftists could be denied
such niceties as passports, driver licenses and entrance to the
university.  The son suffered much of that.
Costas went to Paris at age 20 to study literature at the Sorbonne.
Later he went to the main French film school, the IDHEC. He worked
with major directors, made a fine  murder thriller, THE SLEEPING CAR
MURDERS, which starred Yves Montand and his then-wife Simone Signoret.
C-G's next work was about choice and conscience set among the French
Resistance in World War II.   Fame came with Z.  In the meantime the
name had been fancifully and mysteriously changed by the French (and
the acquiescent director) to the easy, hyphenated, Costa-Gavras.
In Z, Gavras used a simple trick, so to speak, but a revolutionary
one. His innovation  was  to combine European political  awareness
and commitment with  the vigorous , dynamic, well-paced style of
Hollywood action movies.  The combination was unique and uniquely
effective.  There had been political films in Europe but these were
in the intellectual mold or -- in the case of the more familiar ones
-- in the shape of propaganda movies, whether Eisenstein's  classics
on the Russia Revolution (The Battleship Potemkin, 10 Days That Shook
The World, etc.) or  Leni Riefenstahl's paeans to Naziism ( The
Triumph Of The Will, Olympia) .
Gavras' s method  was not free from good-guys  vs. bad-guys
reductionism, but it was fresh. It  appealed  both to finicky
film-lovers and to the masses . It popularized, and awakened a new
interest in ugly problems of contemporary  political history.
Z 's rousing cinematography, music, kinetic editing and clear-cut
figures ,  as graspable as the white hats and the black hats in
westerns , made the film an unmistakable political statement. Later,
when the novelty was dimmed, came the usual gripes about of
commercialism and slickness. But  no one has, to my knowledge, come
up with  suggestions of how Z might have been made in a different,
more subtle way, yet retained its impact.
In fact, even by commercial standards, Z is to this day is a much
more skillful movie than most  others in the  political thriller
genre., partly because it is well made and partly because the film is
angry, and not the work of opportunistic movie-making as is mostly
the case in big films dealing with political or social causes.  Z
also  sets the tone for what would become  a remarkably consistent
Gavras specialty : docudramas on  contemporary history, directed
against  the abuse of state power.
Gavras's subsequent work in this vein was increasingly less manichean
and  more shaded , and  did some  serious probing of minds and souls.
Many of those films starred Yves Montand,  the director's fetish
actor.
With THE CONFESSION Gavras took on another kind of extreme right,
that of the Stalinist purges in the Czechoslovakia of the 1950s, and
he explored the nature of True Believers in communism.  STATE OF
SIEGE dealt with the CIA in Uruguay, while exploring  dramatic
problems of conscience and of  moral ambiguity. Ironically, it was
made in then-democratic Chile, just before the fall of  Allende.
SPECIAL SECTION denounced the French collaborationist  tribunals of
the Occupation during World War II.  MISSING was on the overthrow of
Allende in Chile and the U.S. role in it .  HANN  K. dealt with
justice,  Palestinian  and Israeli. Called pro-Palestinian, it had a
very short life in theatres. BETRAYED does not denounce state power
but the power of lunatic fringes within the state: it takes off from
the infamous murder of Jewish radio personality Alan Berg and exposes
neo-fascist organizations in America. The underrated THE MUSIC BOX
tells of a man (German actor Armin Mueller-Stahl in his first US
movie) who immigrated to Chicago after World War II, was a pillar of
the community and the father of brilliant lawyer Jessica Lange. In
the 1980s he is accused of war crimes.
In his best films, the strongly political ones, C-G does not
propagandize for a special point of view, but illustrates the
oft-quoted (and oft-misquoted) "Power tends to corrupt and absolute
power corrupts absolutely."
Almost all those movies were anchored in fact. All were
controversial. In film after film  Gavras pleased many people and
alienated  others: Greeks, Czechs, sundry die-hard  Stalinists,
Americans (including  the State Department, Washington agencies or
white supremacists), French lawyers and lawmakers, Latin Americans
and  more.
Back to Z.  An example of its impact. I saw it in London during the
period of the Greek colonels' dictatorial, far-rightist and imbecilic
regime.  The movie was playing in a small art house full of attentive
people. At the end they cheered,  while looking as though they had
undergone a mystical experience. Outside the theatre, a collection
was being taken up for an  anti-junta cause. The  departing
spectators, British, Greek, Cypriots, East and West Indians and
others, did not merely give change but also pound notes, with a
generosity that few had ever witnessed before.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Dr. T & the Women (2000)
DR. T AND THE WOMEN *** (2000) Directed by Robert Altman. Written by 
Anne Rapp. Photography, Jan Kiesser. Editing, Geraldine Peroni. 
Production design, Stephen Altman. Costume design, Dona Granata. 
Music, Lyle Lovet. Produced by Robert Altman and James McLindon. 
Cast: Richard Gere (Dr. T), Helen Hunt (Bree), Farrah Fawcett (Kate), 
Laura Dern (Peggy), Shelley Long (Carolyn), Tara Reid (Connie), Kate 
Hudson (Dee Dee), Liv Tyler (Marilyn), Robert Hays (Harlan), Matt 
Malloy (Bill), Andy Richter (Eli), Lee Grant (Dr. Harper), Janine 
Turner (Dorothy).  An  Artisan Entertainment release. 122 minutes. 
This film is rated R. (sex, nudity)
In recent times, I cannot remember a film by a first-rank maker 
creating as much controversy as "Dr. T." Its reception runs from 
admiration to vilification. The title's doctor is a Dallas, Texas 
gynecologist whose clientele are chic, wealthy, idle,  upper-class 
ladies. They all love him, as does his large staff. His popularity is 
immense --for good reasons.
He is clearly a very good OB-GYN.. His interest in his patients is 
extraordinary,  personal, sincere as well as intelligent. Though 
overworked he is also patient with the patients. And if the women 
love him, he loves them back.  And he looks like Richard Gere.
The ladies, from young to old, mostly know one another or are 
friends, practice air kissing on occasion, fill his waiting room to 
capacity, chat and gossip among themselves, request Dr. T  with 
persistance, keep him non-stop busy. The women are all nice looking, 
some even beautiful, .Janine Turner is spectacular. But, cleverly, 
none of those ladies is shown as a vamp.
The place is like a women's club. It's also bedlam where T and his 
fantastically good staff manage to keep their heads above water, 
their cool, their genuine smiles, and their humanity.
The whole scene is as Altmanesque as can be. The director juggles 
characters, dialogue (overlapping, synchronized, credible), images 
and action with his usual, impressive skill. The viewer may be kept 
busy following things and people, but there's clarity and method in 
this madness.
One might normally suspect that within this framework are affairs 
between T and "his" women. But the catch is that Dr.T worships and 
deifies women, calls them saints, respects them even at their 
nuttiest, and is crazy about his own wife Kate (Farrah Fawcett) whom 
he has always pampered.
In such films the overall atmosphere and numerous characters can be 
more important and interesting than the main story line. Here the 
start has a magnificently roving camera that  follows Dallas ladies 
through an upscale Dallas mall -- ironically, critically but not 
cattily. It's an A-plus sequence in which a Tiffany's and other 
elegant sites are like a fine orchestral score.
At the mall Kate behaves oddly, takes off her clothes and dances in a 
pool.  Back in the Travis home, she refuses her husband's sexual 
advances.  "We can't do this any more. It's not nice."  She is 
diagnosed as suffering from a Hestia Complex. In ancient Greece, 
Hestia, goddess of the hearth, pursued by Apollo and Poseidon decided 
to be a virgin forever. The complex--assuming it exists -- is caused 
by too much male love and attention and results in a retreat to a 
child-like state. The subject despises, then rejects love.
That's the kernel of the plot. With Kate apparently not quickly 
curable, Dr.T  distracts himself a bit by continuing to meet his 
buddies for golf and hunting. He meets the new assistant golf coach 
Bree (Helen Hunt). Writ as large as a sky-writing plane's message is 
an affair, predictable yet handled with some originality.
The film, orchestrated as well a choreographed, thickens with the 
themes of T's grown-up daughters, one a guide for a Conspiracy Museum 
(on JFK's assassination), the other a pretty-by-the-numbers 
cheerleader who is about to be married.
Other ingredients are thrown into the sauce gradually. Kate;  wedding 
preparations; T's head-nurse (Shelly Long) who is in love with him; 
weird patients; lesbianism; an outdoor wedding ceremony attended by a 
20 to 1 ratio of women to men--in stormy weather; much else. I will 
not disclose the film's progress, surprises, its peculiar last parts, 
and the shocking (to some) ending which is upbeat and a kind of 
epiphany for Dr. T.  I can't say more.
All this has fine, precise acting by all. Gere who bears the main 
load, plays quietly and discreetly. The movie also has originality, 
imagination, creativity and a host of clever bits. In one, a 
chain-smoking patient  whom T allows exceptionally to smoke during 
her examination. Then he's had enough and hands the ashtray to a 
nurse... who disposes of it but not before taking one puff behind T's 
back.
There is also a plethora of filmic and non-filmic in-jokes and 
references, gratuitous, often elusive, but amusing.  Dr. T's name is 
Sullivan Travis, which recalls the great 1941 comedy by Preston 
Sturges, "Sullivan's Travels."  Behind the pool where Kate dances 
nude is a Godiva store. The storm in the last part of the film seems 
to wink at the Helen Hunt-starring "Twister" (1996). Hunt's name Bree 
is like Jane Fonda's in "Klute" (1971). Jokes are made about Brie the 
cheese, though this movie is not cheesy. And much else.
The main objection to this work is Robert Altman's alleged misogyny. 
It is true that hardly any women look really intelligent here but the 
few men don't either, and that's not unusual in movies today. True, 
few of the women are not charmers, but in the small roles of T's 
assistants and especially Shelley Long's, they are. . (Hunt has 
charms for Gere but  there's a twist )  Yes, the ladies are from 
Dallas (though few sound like Texans) as are the girls in the 
discreetly ludicrous cheerleading class, but they could have been in 
many other wealthy cities.
All this reminds me of an interview with Clint Eastwood who said that 
he did not expect his "Unforgiven" to be a hit. "It's too 
intelligent." .

Title
Review for That Thing You Do! (1996)
THAT THING YOU DO *** Written and directed by Tom Hanks. Photography,Tak
Fujimoto.Editing,Richard Chew.Production design, Victor Kempster. Music,
Howard Shore. Cast: Tom Everett Scott (Guy Patterson), Steve Zahn (Lenny),
Charlize Theron (Tina), Johnathon Schaech (Jimmy), Ethan Embry (the bass
player), Liv Tyler (Faye Dolan), Tom Hanks (White), Jonathan Demme
(Director), Phil Horace (Chris Ellis), Lamarr(Obba Babatunde), Bill Cobbs
(Del Paxton), Rita Wilson (Marguerite) et al.  A 20th Cent.Corp. release.
110 min. Rated PG.
The appealing, sure-footed debut of Tom Hanks as writer and director takes
us on a trip that follows the quick rise and disbanding of a rock group
from Erie, PA. It's a sweet picture that is in keeping with the movie
persona of Tom Hanks, though not necessarily with his role in this work.
It is February 1967, when the Beatles appeared on the Ed Sullivan Show and
revolutionized pop music. Guy (Tom Everett Scott), far more devoted to his
drums than to humdrum work in his father's appliance store, is recruited by
a garage-band for a one-night gig as replacement for the member who broke
an arm. They play "That Thing You Do," composed by guitarist Jimmy. Guy's
vigorous beat  is a decisive factor in making the group win first prize.
The One-Ders foursome have a fifth member who is no fifth wheel.  Jimmy's
cahrming girlfriend Faye (Liv Tyler) is always around, helping
enthusiascticcally, while bimboesque blonde Tina, Guy's girl, is more
concerned with her looks than with the band. Later, smitten with her
hunkish new dentist she will part from Guy. She is played by Charlize
Theron, unrecognizable from her very different role as the Norwegian
accolyte in "2 Days in the Valley."
The band goes on to local fame, gets more provincial celebrity after
stranger Phil Horace, a small-time promoter, becomes their manager and puts
their signature song on the radio. Then, realizing that he did all he
could, Phil passes them on to Mr. White (Hanks) of Play-Tone Records.
Rebaptizing them "The Wonders," Mr. White takes the boys on to bigger and
better things.
That the movie has a slight subject cannot be argued, but this is no big
deal  since Hollywood makes so few think-films, hardly ever  probes into
Big Themes, and, except for special effects, makes pictures (from comedies
to blockbuster actioneers) that are slight in content.
What's interesting about "TTYD" is the accumulation of details that don't
shout at you, that may not even be noticed, yet build up to a very good
debut of Tom Hanks as writer-director.
In no hierarchical order here are some good points scored by Mr. Hanks:
1) The music. The audience takes a nice shower in 60's groove music--not
great but typical and right for the group. Guy's brief jamming with his
idol Del Paxton (a black jazz pianist) is delightful.The title song, much
repeated in different settings, gets increasingly better and more
energetic. The songs are all original (some are by Hanks) and sound like
authentic 60s, not pastiches.
3) The period look of the film. It is well-studied to plunge us into the
mid-60s, from overall ambiance to details of artifacts. The Patterson
Appliance Store is a cunning way to show us refrigerators, stoves, clock
radios, TV sets, rabbit-ears and such. There's minute attention to items
from dresses or "diamond"-studded eyeglass frames. Unlike films that lean
too heavily and colorfully on period recreation, this one handles visuals
discreetly,with no overkill.
4) The smitten audiences. Again, cleverly but not broadly weighed are the
details about them. Note especially the excellently sketched flirtatious
girl early on.
5) Tom Hanks himself. A real pro as the Play-Tone company man and as
manager, he is forceful but not dictatorial, friendly but not gushing, cool
but not cold, knows all about promotion. Calmly, without caricatural
cynicism, he is upfront about his function, which it to make money for
Play-Tone.
6) Un-cliched editing. In their first major appearance, in Pittsburgh, the
band, subject to jitters, falling mike stands and sound-system glitches,
fails in the afternoon performance. It's after this that Mr. White takes
over. He sends them off to the evening session with advice not to get
rattled if they don't do well. We don't see that performance which, in most
films would be included as a small triumph. Instead, the movie says nothing
but cuts to the next concert, in Columbus, Ohio.  Also, the eventual new
twosome of Faye and Guy is not heavily telegraphed.
7) The tour and California. A good montage parallels the Wonders' rise on
the Billboard and carefully dosaged details of the boys' sartorial looks,
self-confidence, character differences, and performances with back-up
singers.
8) Hanks again. He does not try to catch the spotlight but by keeping his
role to exactly what's necessary in relatively little screen-time, he
manages the tour-de-force of being a big, functional presence--and to make
himself quietly likable.
9) The cast. All are good. Guy (who does remind one somewhat of a younger
Hanks) and Jimmy are interestingly handsome. Well sketched bits of
personality and behavior. Jimmy may be the nominal leader of the group, but
it is Guy who has the brains and is in the discreet limelight. Which brings
me to...
10) Ringo's Revenge. Among the Beatles, Ringo Starr was less visible,
adulated and important than the other three. Here it is the drummer who is
central to the band.
11) Liv Tyler. In all her films, from many angles she bears an eerie
resemblance to Ava Gardner, down to a miniscule strabismus that lends
women's faces a touch of dreaminess: Karen Black, Madeleine Stowe,Jane
Greer, etc.
12) The supporting cast and nice touches. In Erie, the first manager may
make you think for a moment that he is out to exploit the group, but he
turns out to be a good guy. At the L.A. hotel, African-Amercian doorman
Lamarr is a humorous, sharp and debonair fellow whose short appearances are
perfect. In the lounge, note the gentle, sly irony when waitress Marguerite
starts telling her life story. Or one of the players who, having joined the
Marines, naively does push-ups before uniformed soldiers. Note also the
Play-Tone boss who is realistically coarse and not exactly pretty in pink.
13) Contrasts. As "artistic" Guy performs, his disapproving father reads
the ad of a rival store: "Telemark. They got barbecue kits for $7.89. Open
Sundays 12 to 6. What kind of world is this when you can't stay with your
family on Sunday!"
There's more, like the movie's good, fast but not hectic pacing.
There's a fantasy side to the film. The young people are very clean-cut,
their milieu seems free of booze, drugs, sex or four-letter words. Faye and
Jimmy have been going together for two-and-a-half years, yet apparently
only kissed a lot. All that adds a 50s tone to a movie set in the 60s,
which may be anachronistic but adds to the film's charm.

Title
Review for Tacones lejanos (1991)
HIGH HEELS (TACONES LEJANOS, Spain, 1991) *** 1/2 Cast:
Victoria Abril, Marisa Paredes, Miguel Bose', Feodor Atkine,
Bibi Andersen, Rocio Munoz. Directed and written by Pedro
Almodovar. Produced by Augustin Almodovar. Photography,
Alfredo Mayo. Editing, Pepe Salcedo. Music, Ryuichi Sakamoto.
Spanish with subtitles. A Miramax release. 112 minutes. Rated
R. (Adult situations). Art Theater.
Enfant means "child" in French. Why then do we still call
enfant terrible certain revolutionary or shocking artists when
they're no longer young? Think of Salvador Dali, Pablo Picasso
and Jean Cocteau, or closer to our time, England's Ken Russell
(b. 1927). Is it because those people's work, lifestyles and
self-promotion had an eduring youthfulness? Whatever the
reasons, enfant terrible sounds right with some names though
not with others. I suppose the criteria are like those of the
judge who could not define pornography but knew it when he saw
it.
Pedro Almodovar (b. 1951) is the enfant terrible of modern
Spanish cinema with his odd, anarchic, lurid movies, his mix
of melodrama, camp humor,provocation and sexuality. Openly
gay, Almodovar must be the filmmaker of detente, since, with
equal bounciness, he deals with all sexual persuasions.
"High Heels" revolves around the kind of parent-child
relationship that has been such Hollywoodian fodder since
Nickelodeon days. Becky Del Paramo (Paredes)is a self-centered
pop star of stage and screen, married to a lout. Her daughter
from a previous marriage, Rebecca (Abril) feels neglected, but
loves Mama and loathes her stepfather. When the latter
dictatorially orders her to stay in the kitchen (those were
Franco days), the precocious Rebecca, then 12, causes,
undetected, a fatal car accident. But she gains nothing. Her
widowed mother, the career-oriented Becky, takes off on a
world tour and forgets about her child.
After a 15-year absence, aging but still sought-after, the
Lauren Bacall-ish Becky (note the diminutive of the name)
comes home to Madrid, and, incidentally, to the Rosanna
Arquette-ish Rebecca (note the "adult" name).
Now 27, Rebecca is a TV news anchor, ill-married to the
station owner Manuel (Atkine), who used to be her mother's
lover. We're in an an ocean of Freudisms, complexes, conscious
and unconscious revenges.
Rebecca, in an outrageously inventive Almodovarian stroke, has
been seeking a maternal presence of sorts by attending the
shows of her best friend, Femme Lethal (Bose), a female
impersonator of Becky in her prime.
What follows is too complicated to detail and too juicy to
reveal. Almodovar's imagination, febrile and fertile -- to the
point of gaminess sometimes -- is for sure as wild and woolly
as David Lynch's ( "Blue Velvet" , "Wild at Heart").It is in
the general tradition of the German melodramas of Rainer
Werner Fassbinder--but with Spanish zip instead of Teutonic
dourness--and along the lines of movies made by Fassbinder's
model, Hollywood master soapsmith Douglas Sirk--but without
Sirk's slickness.
Almodovar takes additional nutrients from the overflow of
Hollywood lore, on-screen and off, like the murder of Lana
Turner's lover, Johnny Stompanato by Turner's own daughter. He
adds to those a postmodernistic irreverence, not without
resemblance to Robert Altman's "The Player" or the films by
the Coen Brothers.
Sex permeates the movie. There is, early on, a memorable,
unexpected, funny, and acrobatically erotic scene between
Rebecca and Femme Lethal. It comes right after a scene of
parody twice removed, in which a trio of Lethal's devotees
mime right along his/her own imitation of Becky.Shades of "The
Rocky Horror Picture Show" !
Then the movie becomes a tongue-in-cheek thriller, a
serio-comic film noir, but with garish, poster-like colors
instead of the genre's dark moods and photography. It contains
odd encounters and red herrings. It features kooky supporting
characters, like an exceptionally nice judge and his bedridden
(though healthy) mother who collects scrapbooks of
(significantly) Brigitte Bardot, Mother Teresa, and Becky Del
Paramo. Or like a statuesque prisoner who leads a lesbian
ballet a la "West Side Story" in the courtyard of a women's
prison. There are also references, both throw-away and eager,
to Igmar Bergman's mother-daughter movie "Autumn Sonata."
As it proceeds, the plot becomes a dedalus of twists , with,
often, holes the size of the Prado Museum, but these matter
little given Almodovar's effervescence. Gradually, the earlier
proportions of humor and satire to melodrama are reversed. But
even during this shifting of gears from black humor to
sentiment, the comic aspects never go away. Whenever the
public might identify with the characters and their pathos,
Almodovar throws in preposterously amusing details that
eliminate all possible mawkishness.
Some of those turns are Bunuel-cruel but rather subtle, as
when Becky, delivering on stage a song dedicated to her
daughter, reveals, in her low-cut gown, a back wrinkled by
age. Others bits are surrealistically funny, like the mother,
at film's end, telling her child : " You must find another way
to deal with men." In context, this is a howl within a
naughty, entertaining movie fantasy. 
The English title is not as apt as the Spanish one, "Tacones
Lejanos" ("Distant Heels"), a reference to the yearnings of
Becky as a child when she used to watch, from the basement
window of her janitor parents, the elegant heels of affluence
on the street above.

Title
Review for Queen of Hearts (1989)
QUEEN OF HEARTS (UK, 1989) ***  Directed by Jon Amiel. Written by Tony
Grisoni. Photography, Mike Southon. Editing, Peter Boyle. Production
design, Jim Clay. Costumes, Lindy Hemming. Music, Michael Convertino. Cast:
Vittorio Duse, Joseph Long, Anita Zagaria, Eileen Way, Vittorio Amandola,
et al.  A Cinecom release. 103 min.  Not rated but in the PG area.  At the
New Art Theatre.
A mini-saga of a family of  Italian immigrants in London, "Queen of Hearts"
opens with a wonderful, dialogue-less sequence, like something recollected
from an old-fashioned silent drama. In an Italian village,  Rosa, promised
to the butcher's son Barbariccia , runs away with her true love Danilo in a
scene worthy of "The Perils of Pauline."
We next meet the couple in England, with several kids and Rosa's mother.
Ten-year old Eddie narrates the movie, from his point of view, a perception
which mixes fantasy and  fact.
The Luccas start out small but become  modestly prosperous when, one
Christmas,  a talking pig head on a platter advises ineffectual Danilo, a
waiter, to gamble. Danilo parlays five pounds into enough to buy The Lucky
Cafe.
The film follows with obvious affection the life of the Luccas within an
Italian enclave in London.  Beyond small  character skits nothing major
happens , until  spurned ex-fiance Barbariccia shows up, with loads of
money and shady connections. Bygones are bygones, says he, but  he's
really on a vendetta and tries to ruin Danilo.  Not to worry:  Eddie is
watching and he   devises a complex scheme to save the day.
The movie is low key, played with reserve, a more British than Italian
trait. It has improbabilities, anachronistic clothes and artifacts -- but
one must remember that nearly everything is filtered through the boy's
imaginative memory.
This is  the first theatrical feature by Jon Amiel., who  has been much
praised for his British TV movies and series , notably "The Singing
Detective."   "Queen Of Hearts" feels like  a transition  between the small
and the big screen.  Possibly,  Amiel tried to do for Italians in Britain
a little of what "My Beautiful Laundrette" did for immigrant Pakistanis.
The film has pleasantly original aspects, yet also has connections to
earlier movies: it is like a glimpse at the sunny side of "The Godfather,"
uses  comedy in the spirit of the Ealing Studios movies of the late 40s and
50s, and ends like  "The Sting."
These factors  come together  nicely , though not   flawlessly.  There are
some gratuitous or padded passages ,  especially after Danilo's father
joins the family. Past the early parts and noticeably in the mid-section,
there is slackness and gauche connections. The camera work is lively, with
flourishes and spirals like those of a brilliant cinematography student let
loose with professional equipment, but more probably this may be the
influence of stylists like Ken Russell,  with whom director of photography
Mike Southon has worked .
In spite of some imperfections  the movie spins its story with charm, uses
a lovely  score --a hybrid of Fellini movie-music and  Verdi operas ,-- and
has  soberly appealing , unfamiliar  actors from Italy and England.
After "Queen," John Amiel made, all in the USA, the nicely off-the wall
"Tune in Tomorrow,"then two so-so pics: "Sommersby" (the Hollywoodian
remake of "The Return of Martin Guerre") and "Copycat,"  followed by two
fizzles "The Man Who Knew Too Little" and "Entrapment"(1999)
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Payback (1999)
PAYBACK ***  Directed by Brian Helgeland. Written by Helgeland and Terry
Hayes, from the novel "The Hunter," by Richard Stark. Photography, Ericson
Core. Editing, Kevin Stitt. Production design , Richard Hoover. Music,
Chris Boardman. Produced by Bruce Davey. Cast: Mel Gibson (Porter), Gregg
Henry (Val), Maria Bello (Rosie), David Paymer (Stegman), Deborah Kara
Unger (Lynn), William Devane (Carter), Bill Duke (Detective Hicks), Kris
Kristofferson (Bronson), Lucy Liu (Pearl), James Coburn - uncredited, et
al. A  Paramount release.110 minutes. R (much violence, kinky sex,
language, dope)
Released at the same time, there's a movie called Simply Irresistible.
Haven't seen it, don't know whether or not it 's irresistible. Mel Gibson,
however, is. This may sound like a gushing fan's judgment, but I don't do
gush and don't do fan. The opinion is objectively supported by the man's
acting record and his versatility. It is buttressed too by Gibson as a
producer, by his directorial debut (and performance) in the overlooked The
Man Without  a Face, his helming of Braverheart (Best Picture Oscar). Then
there's his unexpectedly fine job in the title role of Franco Zeffirelli's
Hamlet.
The now 43-year-old Mel (still quite young by male Hollywood standards) is
an original presence - not only because his wife is expecting their 7th
child!  Offhand, what comes to my mind is a soupcon of Cary Grant-ish
appeal in many performances. Not all of them have been in winner movies,
but there are enough combinations of film and acting to place Gibson in the
constellation.
The two main pillars of Gibson's popularity -- up to Braveheart-- have been
his Australian Mad Max pictures and the American Lethal Weapon series in
which he plays mad cop Martin Riggs. But there's a lot more than just that.
Now his company has made Payback. Mel apparently took a big hand in shaping
it.  It is so violent  and brutal (including gore and torture), so kinkily
sexual (Sadism & Masochism) that perhaps some raters were tempted by an
NC-17. A tricky work to judge. Action fans who love Gibson will applaud.
Fans of just Gibson might say "ho-hum.". Haters of blood and guts;
traditionalists;"nice movie" partisans;  many older viewers, will
doubtlessly stay away.
The plot is simple: a tale of dishonor among thieves and revenge, a
reinterpretation --not a remake-- of the now cultish Point Blank (1967)
which came from the same book by Richard Stark (a pseudonym for Donald E.
Westlake).
Gibson, called Porter (just one name) is a thief and all-around criminal.
He is involved by his pal Val in a violent robbery of Orientals who
regularly carry money for a mob, here referred to as The Outfit. The two
men are aided by Porter's junkie wife Lynn. Lying Val had dangled to Porter
a sum of up to half-a-million  though he knew full well that the gangsters
always carried $140,000. Worse yet, Val and Lynn take Porter's portion and
shoot him dead, or so they think.
Porter improbably survives. The underworld doctor who takes out the bullets
surpasses in shabbiness and filth even the stock figures of earlier crime
movies. He is closer to back-room abortionists.
The penniless, improbably fully healed man, with improbable dexterity picks
a wallet, gets himself money, clothes and other necessities, sets on the
road to recovery. Not of his health (that's a done deal) but of his half of
$70,000, from Val.
Double and triple crosses abound. So do improbabilities. A couple of the
latter can be tolerated in most films, but twenty or more improbabilities
make one huge impossibility. Even so, because of Mel Gibson and the movie's
vigor and momentum, aficionados will put up with big plot-holes and have
some dirty fun following this "guy" flick.
For one thing, Porter narrates the movie in the tough voice-over  style of
earlier (especially 1940s) films noirs, say, like Dick Powell's Philip
Marlowe in Murder, My Sweet. A bonus of this device is to reassure the
audience that the protagonist has survived. For another, there is a quota
of Gibsonisms in jokes and humor of speech and behavior. While some work
and others don't, there is enough irony to keep us going.
Then there's the outrageous dominatrix Pearl (Lucy Liu  of "Ally Mc Beal"),
a high-price call girl and hoodlum associate who gets such high kicks from
S & M that she steals all the scenes she's in.
Porter's journey to recover his 70 grand takes him through a full array of
situations and characters, starting with his stoned-out wife, a
heroin-delivery boy (whose nose ring Porter yanks out (an homage to Jack
Nicholson's slashed nose in "Chinatown"?), a small-timer (nicely weasely
David Paymer), to a black and white duo of corrupt cops (an upending of
Lethal Weapon), to Val and to Val's bosses in The Outfit. Persistent Porter
gets to the hierarchy of the Big Boys.
Amusingly, Porter keeps correcting those who quote him as claiming the full
$140.000. He only wants his half back. Thieve's honor for a change?  Suave
mobster James Coburn, whose chic clothes and luggage gives an extra meaning
to "outfit" is shocked at the modest request. "My suits cost more than
that!" Coburn, smooth and delightful as ever, cringes when Top Man Kris
Kristofferson, for reasons I cannot reveal,  has captive Porter savagely
treated and tells him "I'll make you last for weeks. I'll give you blood
transfusions, if needed, to keep you alive."
The female element is enriched by Rosie, a fancy prostitute connected with
the Outfit,  erstwhile and now again Porter's girlfriend. Though not the
traditional Girl Friday, she assists the man and vice-versa. And her
character implies (but does develop) the distantly Godardian touch that
she's the kind of woman one can rent, but not buy. The saddest moment in
the film for me was when her guard dog got shot in a fracas, but to my
boundless relief, he recovered. Miraculously. Just like Porter.
Mel Gibson plays what is essentially a sociopath, so bloody but unbowed
against all odds that he does get your sympathy. Then again, the sympathy
is continuously distracted by our having to suspend our disbelief. Just
about everything Porter does, he does so well that unbelievability crops up
in scene after scene.
The makers of Payback clearly had the ambition to make a tale for all
seasons. It takes place in an unnamed, fabricated city (much of it shot in
Chicago), in a recent but still unfathomable period. Moody hues  are used.
The composite look of the place and its artifacts, some archaic expressions
of the 1930s, the tone of older Warners or RKO thrillers, modernistic
touches, anonymous contemporary cars but of no discernible decade,
pointedly located dial telephones and more anachronisms will puzzle
audiences that know their cinema.
Director and co-writer Brian Helgeland (b. 1961)  has scripted
L.A.Confidential, Kevin Costner's  The Postman, Conspiracy Theory (starring
Gibson).  Payback is his first big directorial job. Gibson, dissatisfied
with the finished film, made changes, shot new scenes, re-shot extant ones,
added 20 minutes-- partly, 'tis said, to make his role more likable. This
may or may not have added to Helgeland's problems with disconnections, gaps
and loose threads. The result, however, warts and all, has enough
comic-book inventiveness to keep some of us taking it all in, in a silly,
un-bored way.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Return to Me (2000)
RETURN TO ME (2000) *** Directed by Bonnie Hunt. Written by Hunt &
Don Lake. Story by Hunt, Lake, Andrew Stern, Samantha Goodman.
Photography, Liszl Kovics. Editing, Garth Craven. Production design,=
Brent Thomas. Music, Nicholas Pike. Cast : David Duchovny ( Bob
Rueland), Minnie Driver (Grace Briggs), Carroll O'Connor (Marty
O'Reilly), Robert Loggia (Angelo Pardipillo), Bonnie Hunt (Megan
Dayton), David Alan Grier  (Charlie Johnson), Joely Richardson
(Elizabeth Rueland), Eddie Jones ( Emmett McFadden), James Belushi
(Joe Dayton), et al. Produced by C.O. Erickson,  Melanie Greene,
Jennie Lew Tugend. An MGM release. 114 minutes. PG
Is Chicago thriving? More and more movies are shot there. In the real
city, not "Chicago-in-Toronto," "Chicago-in-the-Studio," and all
that. New releases include "High Fidelity" (a good title) and "Return
to Me,"  (a sappy title) which make good use of their location. They
could not be more different in content and style.
"Return to Me" is an old-style romantic comedy, the kind that a lot
of adults who may pass up action-violence-sex films, experimental
techniques, complicated stories, visual pyrotechnics, etc. would most
likely enjoy. Of course, I am not talking here about film-fanatics,
viewers likely to see a great deal of pictures in almost any genre.
It does not take a card-carrying movie nut to figure out "RTM." All
you need to know is that its stars are David Duchovny (Bob) and
Minnie Driver (Grace). The film starts by stressing unhurriedly how
very happily married a couple is. Bob owns a construction company.
Elizabeth ( played by Joely Richardson) is the Lincoln Park  Zoo's
specialist on big apes.
But since the film's female lead is Ms. Driver and not Ms.
Richardson, you may  guess right away that Elizabeth will have to die
in an accident. That's just what happens.
Cut to chronic bad heart sufferer Grace in a hospital bed, in a
life-threatening state. In crucial need of a transplant, she waits
almost hopelessly for a heart to become available. One does, at the
last moment. Yes, the heart is Elizabeth's.
A year goes by. Grace and Bob do not know each other. She is in fine
physical shape. He is inconsolable and almost reclusive outside his
work. Grace, of mixed Irish-Italian ancestry, is a charmer. She is
the apple of the eye of her grandfather Marty O'Reilly (Carroll
O'Connor) who has brought her up. Marty is the co-owner of O'Reilly's
Irish-Italian Restaurant (sic), along with his partner, friend and
chief cook Angelo Pardipillo (Robert Loggia). Grace waitresses there.
The partners dote on Grace, but then everyone around loves her.
In earlier times, Grace was presumably held back from boyfriends by
her formerly bad heart. Though healthy now she is haunted by the fear
that any future man in her life will stay away when he discovers the
scars on her chest.
Charlie, a colleague of Elizabeth's and a great friend of the couple,
has been trying in vain to get Bob out of his house. He finally
convinces him to meet Charlie and two girls (one a blind date for the
widower) at a restaurant. Guess which eatery it turns out to be?
An amusing chain of events brings Bob and Grace together. It's
attraction at first sight for both, with love not far behind.
Grace and grandpa live above the restaurant. After closing time,
Marty, Angelo and two old cronies invariably get around a table to
play cards and such and hold lively arguments about pop singers,
baseball and other matters. Now they also become matchmakers for
Grace. Egged on, the new twosome meet again and again. The
relationship blooms, not sexually however. Grace says nothing about
her new heart. Chest makes chaste.
The developments which will lead to the inevitable happy ending are
interesting and well concocted. Comedic actress Bonnie Hunt, in the
first movie she directs, does a very nice job of avoiding blatancy or
supercharged scenes. She also co-scripted. And also has a major
supporting role as Megan, Grace's best friend and confidante.
Megan, who has five kids, is married to burly Joe. James Belushi
plays him with perfect working-class realism. The small details of
life, tasks and duties in such a family come through convincingly,
and amusingly. As Joe attempts to get all his children to sleep
before he can make love with Megan, he exclaims "I'm trying to put
you to bed. And I want to get Mother to bed too!."
"Return to Me" is appealing. It also has a plot that hangs from a
thin thread, like Grace's life at the hospital, but the characters
are simpatico, believable and well-played. There are several funny
tidbits: a major "anonymous" donor to the zoo who keeps advertising
his anonymity;  Grandpa's having Grace meet a fellow "who also had a
transplant" which turns out to be a hair transplant about which the
man rambles on comically; an insufferable but comical blind date; and
other lighthearted scenes.
I could have done without a small number of setups. The film is not
free from clich=E9s. Hollywood has a thing about  " hyphenated
Americans, mainly Italian-Americans, Irish-Americans and
Jewish-Americans. One wonders where colorfulness ends and caricature
starts. On the other hand, give the movie credit for picturing
Charlie, the African-American friend, with no "minoritisms"
whatsoever.
Some details might have been skipped. Before meeting Bob, Grace had
sent him a "thank you for my heart" letter. But what revolves around
this is murky.  The matchmakers' eagerness is overdone. The music
track has a corny bit a la "Ave Maria" and a sudden phrase, just a
Hallelujah, from Haendel's "The Messiah.". It reminds me of the
saying that whenever a movie-maker does not know what to do next,
he/she can throw in a Hallelujah.
In Rome, Grace tells her story to a most unlikely waiter. She also
schleps from Chicago Bob's gift of a heavy bicycle -- this to a land
of sleek, racing bikes. Its only function, combined with some overly
cute nuns, is to be an artificial prop for the denouement.
But then, credit the movie for the subtle use of Bob's beautiful dog.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Get Over It (2001)
GET OVER IT (2001) ** 1/2  Directed by Tommy O'Haver. Written by  by 
R. Lee Fleming Jr. Cinematography, Maryse Alberti. Editing,  Jeff 
Betancourt.  Production design, Robin Standefer. Music, Steve Bartek. 
Cast: Kirsten Dunst (Kelly), Ben Foster (Berke), Martin Short (Dr. 
Desmond Forrest Oakes), Melissa Sagemiller (Allison), Colin Hanks 
(Felix). Swoosie Kurtz and Ed Begley, Jr. (Berke's parents), Sisqo 
(Dennis), Shane West (Striker). A Miramax release. 87 minutes. PG-13
Do we need another teen flick? Do we need a hole in the head? We 
don't, assuming that "we" stands for minimally mature, objective and 
sophisticated viewers. But since the huge market for youth movies 
fills Hollywood's coffers, such pictures will be made ad infinitum 
and ad nauseam.
Still, once in a blue moon something acceptable pops up. "Get Over 
It" --filmed last summer in Toronto--has an unzapping title, comes 
unannounced,  had no advanced hoopla or press previews. But it is 
sort of OK.
The basic plot is strictly deja suffered through --since the dawn of 
cinema. Boy meets girl,  boy plus girl, boy minus girl, boy and other 
girl, other girl sweet on and better for boy, boy too dumb to see 
this -- until the last reel.
Fate (read US mobility) separates childhood playmates Allison and 
Berke. They meet again in high school, become sweethearts in a flash. 
After 16 months of cohabitation and bliss (at least on Berke's part) 
Allison drops him. For him it is like a sudden attack by friendly 
fire. Allison's reasons are not specific, but rather interestingly 
illustrate the French saying " tout casse, tout passe, tout lasse," 
meaning that sooner or later " everything breaks, goes away, gets 
tiresome."  Allison is emblematic of the many and short relationships 
of "celebrities." In fact, 16 months and 3 days is a long 
relationship-affair-mariage by Hollywood standards.
The girl did not ditch Berke for another fellow, yet soon enough she 
starts an affair with Striker, whose prestige includes having been in 
a boy-band. The new twosome successfully try out for the school's 
spring musical "A Midsummer Night's Rockin' Eve." (That show is 
after, you know, Shakespeare, sort of.)
The inconsolable Berke, still hoping to get Allison back, also tries 
out --against all logic--for the musical, for which he is not 
qualified (his thing is basketball) but somehow he makes it. Felix 
(Colin Hanks, the son of Tom Hanks) his best friend, has a cute 
younge sister, Kelly. She writes songs and sings pretty well.   She 
helps, instructs and encourages Berke, who, of course, does not 
notice that Kelly is drawn to him. But give them time. (Felix is 
protective of his sister, but this doesn't add anything significant 
or useful to the movie).
Expectedly mild developments and predictable complications ensue -- 
nothing really original or notable, with the big exception of the 
musical's director. The composer-writer of its twelve songs, its 
producer and part author (move over, William S!) this flick-saving 
character is the school's Chair of Fine Arts, Dr. Desmond Forrest 
Oakes. In a style as theatrical and grandiose as that name,   Martin 
Short plays him with all stops out,  no holds barred, alternating 
between cutting criticism, merciless put-downs (but you know he's 
deep down a kind person), booming imperial commands, haughty advice, 
sage orders and self-promoting declarations. and steals the show over 
and over again.
Short has been around quite a bit, on TV and in movies. The latter 
did not do right by him. They were mostly mediocre items, with an odd 
exception --odd because that was Short's first major role.
The 1986 hilariously absurdist take-off "Three Amigos!" by John 
Landis, also starred Steve Martin and Chevy Chase. It is still an 
underrated feature but has many partisans, of which I am one.
  In "Get Over It" Martin Short is given the best lines, in fact the 
only funny ones. "Bill Shakespeare was a  wonderful poet, but Burt 
Bacharach he was not!" The absurdism of this declaration is anywhere 
from amusing to delicious, depending on one's taste. So is Short's 
over-the-top, no-holds-barred mannered delivery, flamboyant in choice 
of words, intonation, gesture and body language. It's also 
gay-leaning, so that it comes as a surprise, a joke, or a gag (you 
choose) when late in the movie his secretary tells him "Your wife 
called." This bit is the only raison d'etre of Mrs. Oakes.
When the film was shot, Short was a youthful 50. Most of "the kids" 
were in their early twenties, but this is not blatantly obvious. What 
is however is that very strong impression that the film was cut down 
to its unusual  87 minutes, no doubt to qualify for a PG-13 by 
removing raunchy or vulgar passages.
Some of the latter remain, and might have been excised too, but then 
the film would have shrunk too much. Whether or not the cuts are the 
guilty parties, the picture is episodic, fragmented and choppy. This 
vagueness is not lethal, since the two best elements appear to be 
intact: Martin Short, and the updated Midsummer Night's Dream which 
we see often, in sections, from rehearsals to fantasy scenes to the 
final product. That's when things fall in place, love blooms, the 
villain is punished. There is quite a bit of pleasing imagination as 
Shakespeare, the musical and the lives of the students mix and 
reflect one another. It is the second movie by director Tommy 
O'Haver, whose debut was "Billy's First Hollywood Kiss."
Movie reviews by Edwin Jahiel are at : http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel 

Title
Review for Phar Lap (1983)
PHAR LAP (Australia,1983)***. Directed by Simon Wincer. Written by   David
Williamson. Produced by John Sexton. Photography, Russell Boyd. Editing,
Tony Paterson. Production design, Lawrence Eastwood. Music, Bruce Rowland.
Cast: Tom Burlinson,  Richard Morgan, Robert Grubb, Simon Wells , Kelvyn
Worth, Justin Ridley, Martin Vaughan,  Ron Leibman, et al. 107 minutes.
Warm, well-told, attention-keeping  story of Australian racehorse of late
20s-early 30s, a champion who apparently is still a legend in equine
circles, and a household name in Australia. Phar Lap won 37 races in three
years, died abruptly in 1932, in California, perhaps the victim of Mob
interests that it menaced.  The film stresses faith and affection felt from
the start by stable boy Tommy Woodcock (Tom Burlison) for a horse that
seemed to be an unlikely champion.
The boy-horse-racing formula is sure-fire, but here it is buttressed here
by truth and uncontaminated by goo or overstatement. Familiar elements of
training, suspense, and thrilling victories are enhanced by good, offbeat
touches: a main trainer who is not lovable or colorful; stuffy, uppercrust
Anglos at the Jockey Club who discriminate  against a proletarian horse and
its American-Jewish owner (Ron Leibman, very good) and  who  handicap Phar
Lap increasingly, unfairly, and cruelly.
Phar Lap was the second feature by director Simon Wincer, who until then
had worked in TV. His first movie, Snapshot, seems to be as obscure as they
come. But Phar Lap turned out to be a success. Wincer had the good sense
(or luck) to use as his cinematographer the very talented  Russell Boyd
whose record already included such top films  as Picnic at Hanging Rock,
The  Last Wave, Gallipoli, The Year of Living Dangerously, Tender Mercies.
Depression-era sets, very good  but never gratuitously flashy camerawork,
stunning races, interesting biped-to-quadruped relations , all add up to a
gratifying film. Ten minutes were cut from the American print  for the sake
of better suspense and clarity
After this movie, Simon Wincer did good work: the war picture The
Lighthorsemen  (Australia);  Quigley Down Under (suspense with Tom Selleck
in Australia); the TV series  Lonesome Dove  and The Young Indiana Jones
Chronicles, the popular kidpic Free Willy and the entertaining Operation
Dumbo Drop (reviewed in E. Jahiel's site). Some other features were
weak-to-fair.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Just Visiting (2001)
JUST VISITING (2001) * 1/2 Directed by Jean-Marie Poiré aka 
Jean-Marie Gaubert. Written by Poiré , Christian Clavier, John 
Hughes. Photography, Ueli Steiger. Cast: Jean Reno (Count Thibault), 
Christian Clavier (André the servant), Christina Applegate (Julia 
Malfete), Malcolm McDowell (the wizard), et al. A France-USA 
coproduction by Gaumont.  88 minutes. PG-13
In 1993, the French comedy "The Visitors" became the most profitable 
French film ever. It dealt with a 12th century nobleman (Jean Reno) 
and his servant (Christian Clavier)  getting magically transported 
into modern France. "The Visitors 2, " by the same writer-director 
and leading actors, followed and bombed. Now the Count and his 
servant are resurrected in "Just Visiting," a remake of the first 
film, but this time the medieval characters are transported to 
today's Chicago.
"Just Visiting" is in English. It was released first in the USA in 
early April 2001, and soon after, in France, as "Les Visiteurs en 
Amérique."
And it's pretty weak. I won't go into the so-called plot. It hurt 
enough to watch much of it without hurting again by describing it in 
print.
Time-travel movies come in many shapes. They can range from poor 
(many titles) to pleasantly innocuous funny stuff (A Connecticut 
Yankee in King Arthur's Court) to smart, entertaining but "serious" 
items such as The Time Machine and the superior Time After Time. The 
current item is a comedy-farce.
The main actors have a vague, burlesque kinship to Don Quixote and 
Sancho Panza.  On the plus side we get some good special effects, 
transformations, morphings and the like; some lush -- if totally 
false-- medieval spectacles; a couple of nice minutes of salsa; etc.
Those are minor aspects. What we get overwhelmingly is an avalanche 
of physical gags of which pitifully few are well thought out. The 
great majority of them deals with body parts and functions. It's 
bathroom, toilet, scatological humor.
"Just Visiting" is, of course, not a screwball comedy any more than 
items with the Three Stooges are. Consequently the actors perform in 
forced and sweeping ways--which is to be expected.
I cannot speak in comparatie terms about Christian Clavier (André, 
the servant), who also co-wrote the script. He is a popular French 
comedian with whom I am not familiar.
Jean Reno, however was the stylized hitman in another French 
production by Gaumont, "The Professional" (1994), shot and set in New 
York City. It was a good movie which got better when its French 
release added almost about a half hour of footage removed from the US 
version. Otherwise, Reno's several roles in European films are 
unknown in the USA, except for sharp-eyed viewers who might spot him 
in the bit role of a hitman in "La Femme Nikita" (1990), and for 
those who have seen the misguided action pic "Ronin" (1998) where he 
was second banana to ) where he was second banana to Robert De Niro.
Christina Applegate became a star as the dynamite sexy but dumb 
schoolgirl in TV's 1987 series "Married... With Children" when she 
was about 16, and very pretty. She played her stupidity with 
intelligence. Since then Ms Applegate has been in several movies, 
none of them memorable so far as I know.  In "Just Visiting" she does 
what she can with her part, is not as beautiful as in her TV days, 
and not one-hundredth as funny.
Malcolm McDowell plays the Wizard with the same freneticism as most 
of the other cast members. He gets to act in broadly farcical ways, 
grimaces and all (like much of the cast), and to perform magic. His 
scenes are even more incredible than the average ones in the movie. 
McDowell's early movie career (late 60s to early 80s) was a triumph 
which included the lead role in classic works. He was the lead player 
in  Lindsay Anderson's "If," in Kubrick's "A Clockwork Orange," in 
the undervalued "Time after Time" (as H.G. Wells),and others. Now 
poor Malcolm is not even listed in the credits of many of the "Just 
Visiting" reviews.
Even in movie fantasies there should be a method in their madness, a 
logic within the illogic. This is lacking here. Example: when Andre 
and a girl go on a shopping spree for clothes, how do they pay for 
them?  In a drinking scene, how come the Americans who join the 
French in singing, sing....in French. How does the wizards' 
heavy-duty magic equipment get into his hotel room? Etc. etc. etc.
Perhaps this is nit-picking on my part. Some of those objections may 
have lent themselves to suspension of disbelief -- as for instance in 
practically all movies with Danny Kaye. But there is too large an 
accumulation of them and not enough good stuff to compensate for the 
bad.
No doubt, I did laugh at some bits. This accounts for my generous 
one-and-a-half stars. I am almost certain that kids who, like most 
normal people, are at the inevitable stage of relishing body gags, 
will give the film a higher grade than mine.
PS.  The director and co-writer is Jean-Marie Poiré who sometimes 
uses the name Jean-Marie Gaubert. Why? No idea, but that's HIS 
problem. J-M is not  woman as some Anglophones might think. Jean, 
means John, Juan, and such.
Double or hyphenated first names are common in France. Think 
Jean-Jacques Rousseau, Jean-Luc Godard, Jean-Philippe Mathy. Note too 
that following the hyphen, a name like Marie does not feminize its 
bearer.
Jean-Marie Whatever started out as a screenwriter for others, then 
wrote and directed his own movies. Few, if any, are known in the USA 
other than the first "The Visitors."
Movie reviews by Edwin Jahiel are at : http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel 

Title
Review for October Sky (1999)
OCTOBER SKY (1999) *** Directed by Joe Johnston. Written by Lewis Colick,
based on the book "Rocket Boys," by Homer H. Hickam Jr.. Photography, Fred
Murphy. Editing, Robert Dalva. Production design, Barry Robison. Music,
Mark Isham. Producers,  Charles Gordo,  Larry Franco. Cast: Jake Gyllenhaal
(Homer Hickam), Chris Cooper (John Hickam), William Lee Scott (Roy Lee),
Chris Owen  (Quentin), Chad Lindberg (O'Dell), Natalie Canerday (Elsie
Hickam), Laura Dern (Miss Riley) et al. A Universal release. 100 minutes.
PG
>From the title, this somehow sounded to me like a Russian film, probably
because the classic movie on the 1917 Russian Revolution, Ten Days that
Shook the World, is called October in Russia. But October Sky is not a
Russian movie. Yet it all started with the Soviet Union launching, on
October 4, 1957, the first satellite ever, Sputnik.
The Space Age began in a sensational way. Sputnik made the Russians proud
to the point of haughtiness. It  scared Cold War America. It gave a huge
boost to the US. space program. And, as in millions of places on earth, it
had the whole population of Coaltown, West Virginia, crane its collective
neck to watch that incredible point of light travel in the October sky.
The boost was not limited to American and other  scientists. In Coaltown,
for example, it fired up the imagination of  high schooler Homer Hickam,
the son of John and Elsie. Coal mine superintendent John radiated
authority, brooked no nonsense or errors from his men, and was totally
devoted to his profession.
Coaltown was just that, a small, modest community where just about all
males were coal miners and all the fathers took for granted that their sons
would become miners. Because Homer's brother Jim was a local football star,
he might get an athletic scholarship after graduation. But Homer? He did
play football but regularly got creamed by the other teams. He took his
punishment  bravely, unflinchingly, stoically,  like a real mensch -- a
term that would puzzle Coaltowners.
As Homer, Jake Gyllenhaal is likable, nice-looking, well-mannered but
essentially just a face in the crowd. Sputnik changes all that. It becomes
for him something like his  Road to Damascus, where Paul the Apostle had
his sudden revelation that made him a Christian. Homer, encouraged by his
teacher Miss Riley, sets out to build a working rocket.
He enlists two of his schoolmates, both "regular guys," then Quentin who
has a high I.Q.,  is exceptionally strong in many areas of science, reads
voraciously and experiments. As the class --if not all of Coaltown's --
nerd ( "a geek" say the students), he is shunned by others as a weirdo. He
keeps to himself. Even Homer's two original collaborators are surprised by
his choice of a fourth musketeer.
But the team is a good one, bonds quickly, works well. They are nicknamed
The Rocket Boys by a population which in its majority sees the fellows as
nutty, time-wasting eccentrics engaged in "all that nonsense,", the very
words of Homer's father.
The kids are not discouraged. Homer doesn't say "I Have a Dream" but could.
Against the odds, the quartet scrounge for materials, build one rocket
after another, meet failure after failure, but also make progress,
doggedly, as they learn from their mistakes --until they triumph. All the
while, the unexpected keeps happening, as does, in Homer's life and
travails, the semi-expected, the inflexible opposition of his dad. Thank
God for the understanding of his sweet, smart and helpful mother, warmly
played by Natalie Canerday..
Since I do not know the source book, the best seller memoir "Rocket Boys"
by Homer H. Hickam Jr. who went on to become a science engineer at NASA, I
cannot tell which poetic-filmic liberties the movie took. Homer Hickam is
said to have been pleased by the movie.
Bits of audience manipulation are unavoidable, but no drawbacks. One
example. A nice metal-worker who had been helping the boys suddenly quits
his job to become a miner. He is older but he has debts and can earn twice
as much by going down the shaft. The scene is touchingly true. But then, as
he checks in (or is it out?) he hangs up his miner's medallion No 723 on a
board. The camera zooms in on it. Any experienced filmgoer will tell you
that something bad will happen later, and that the camera will re-zoom on
tag No 723.
The main shooting was in the town of Petros, Tennessee, in the Knoxville
area, since  Coaltown is no more. The reproduction of the place, times and
people is superior. What also emerges in a near-documentary way is the
hard, pathetic life of the coal mining community. The miners and their
families seem to take their lot  for granted. It is late into the film when
Union protests emerge. Even so, there is little that is militant (the Us
vs. Them --the mine owners-- element) in the story.
The characters have been beautifully cast. Laura Dern as the school
teacher, a smart, helpful and unprovincial West Virginian has a supporting
(in every sense) role which takes her into new directions. Ironically,
Chris Cooper, as Homer's able but intransigent and anti-union father,  had
the lead role as the United Mine Workers'  strike organizer (and hero) in
historically true Matewan (1987), that superb  film by John Sayles about
the coal-mine wars in Matewan, West Virginia, during the 1920s.
Most everything rings true in this realistic yet feel-good picture. It is a
family movie in the  sense of its PG rating, and a family movie in its
depiction of the Hickams.  But the inevitably sad background of the miners'
life not only is not underlined but it is balanced by a great deal of
upbeat parts and humor concerning the Rocket Boys. They are the first to
admit that "we're just a bunch of hillbillies," yet they pursue a dream
that is as far from redneck-ism as can be.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Brothers McMullen, The (1995)
Photography & editing, Dick Fisher.
Music, Seamus Egan.
Cast: Jack Mulcahy (Jack), Mike McGlone (Patrick), Edward Burns (Barry),
      Connie Britton (Molly), Maxine Bahns (Audry), Elizabeth P.McKay (Ann),
      Shari Albert (Susan), Jennifer Jostyn (Leslie).
A 20th century Fox release.
98 min.
Rated R (language)
     THE BROTHERS MCMULLEN is in some ways both like and unlike Whit
Stillman's METROPOLITAN (1990).  Both are first films, both are
independent productions, both are funny, warm, ironic and high on
conversations.  But while METROPOLITAN dealt with fashionable,
high-class preppies and would-be intellectuals, THE BROTHERS MCMULLEN
is close to the other extreme.  Its main characters, three brothers,
are lower middle-class Irish-American Catholics.
     In a clever opening, after the funeral of Mr. McMullen, Mrs.
McMullen and her middle son Barry (the film's writer-director) stand
alone by the grave.  Sweetly but firmly she announces that she's
returning to Ireland.  She will join the man she has loved for
thirty-five years, during all of which, with Catholic patience and
principles, she had remained ill-married to Mr. McMullen.  Here and
later we learn that the husband was a drunkard, a bully, a
wife-and-children abuser.  "Don't make the same mistake" Mom tells
Barry, that is, don't enter into a bad marriage.
     Five years later we meet all three brothers in the Long Island
house of senior brother Jack.  Jack and Irish-American wife Molly are
the ideal couple, married five years, joking, joshing and loving each
other to perdition.  Barry, a budding script-writer just out of
college, takes his religious faith rather lightly, feels lost outside
the academic cocoon, and is cynically-humorously afraid of
commitments.  The youngest, Patrick, makes his to-the-bone Catholicism
as clear and loud as the call of angels' trumpets.
     As Pat andf Barry live temporarily at Jack's, all three brothers
exchange advice and opinions and try to influence one another.  The
talk is almost exclusively about women.  The funny thing is that Pat,
who is more Catholic than the Pope, has a girlfriend, Susan, who is
Jewish.  Their prudent love-making is not for procreation.  The funny
thing about diffident Barry is that after he meets for a second time
beautiful Audry (Maxine Bahns, Burns' real girl-friend), the "thief"
who "stole" an apartment from right under Barry, a very nice
relationship develops.  The funny thing about wife-adoring Jack is that
Anne, a married woman, comes on to him blatantly, calculatingly (and
ludicrously), until the reluctant fellow yields.
     All this  sends the McMullen men into a series of tizzies.  What
with two out of the three having a well-developed sense of sin, and the
third (Barry) being smart enough to realize what a sophisticated gem
Audry is, moral, guilt and conscience problems swell like hot-air
balloons.
     The most complex quandaries belong to bewildered Pat, in whose
life also enters old school-chum and co-religionist Leslie.  She too
has problems with superego and id.  Or something like that.  Smiling,
without rancor, she declares: "You can't be a Catholic and have a
healthy sex life." "Unless" retorts Pat "you meet your true love."
     The plot's details can be quite charming.  While the unknown
actors lack the glamour, acting savvy and smooth delivery of
professionals, this is, not so paradoxically, what makes the male
performers ring true.  In case your attention wanders a bit, Jack is
the athletic one who looks rather like a younger, trimmer and classier
Joey Buttafuoco; Barry is the one with the not very good skin and not
very good voice; Pat is the shorter one and has the most eloquent
face.
     The female performances are a mixed bag.  The film's construction
has awkward bits, minor holes and gauche moments.  Neveretheless the
whole stands up well.  The characters are not really terribly
interesting, but then I seem to be saying that about the huge majority
of recent pictures.  The story is clear, the three men are not all cut
from the same cloth, and the absence of whiz-bang photography, editing
and blind cinematic ambition is restful.
     The film was made over a long series of weekends, with funds from
relatives and friends, for (depending on what you read) anywhere from
$15,000 to $25,000.  Turned down by several festivals (the usual venues
for independent works) it was accepted by the Sundance Film Festival.
Before (so far as I could find out) it was shown there, it came to the
attention of the president of Fox Searchlight Pictures, who took the
film, put some of his people plus Mr.  Burns to work on revamping,
re-editing and shortening it and improving the sound.  He had THE
BROTHERS MCMULLEN blown up (very sharply) from 16mm to 35mm.  The total
cost climbed to $400,000 or $500,000 (reports differ), which is still a
peanutty sum.  Then, at the Sundance Festival, the movie walked off
with the 1995 top award.
     I suspect that the inner monologues were added too--a clumsy
device.  The music was also "revised," whatever that means, and that's
a blessing: the light, lilting Irish or Irishy music by Seamus Eagan is
a delight, and a relief from the heavy, generic scores that prevail
these days.

Title
Review for Can't Hardly Wait (1998)
CAN'T HARDLY WAIT  * 1/2   Written and directed by Harry Elfont and Deborah
Kaplan.Photography,Lloyd Ahern. Editing, Michael Jablow. Production design,
Marcia Hinds-Johnson. Music, David Kitay & Matthew Sweet. Produced by Jenno
Topping and Betty Thomas. Cast: Jennifer Love Hewitt (Amanda), Ethan Embry
(Preston), Charlie Korsmo (William), Lauren Ambrose (Denise), Peter
Facinelli (Mike), Seth Green (Kenny), Jerry O'Connell, (Trip McNeely),
Jenna Elfman (Angel).  A Columbia Pictures release. 95 min. PG-13
High-school kids are human, but you'd hardly think so from a large number
of movies about them, including Can't Hardly Wait. It's the first
directorial effort by Kaplan and Elfont whose main claim to fame was being
among the five writers of A Very Brady Sequel.
A few teen films have been on the thoughtful side: the classic
post-graduation American Graffiti, the excellent end-of-school-year Dazed
and Confused (by Richard Linklater),  some works by John Hughes  (The
Breakfast Club, Sixteen Candles), the funny-to-hilarious Fast Times at
Ridgemont High (by Amy Heckerling), Ferris Bueller's Day Off, Weird Science
(both by Hughes).
Note that the Hughes titles above were set in Illinois, while Dazed and
Confused  is in Texas. The school of the CHW kids is in California, the
center of the universe as per Hollywood. The sad denial of another America
beyond the southern Pacific coast continues, obviously for practical
filmmaking reasons.
The opening credits are a quick, cutesy way to introduce the main
characters, their accomplishments, aims, favorite quotes, etc.  As a rule
this gimmick makes one suspect the worst. One quote is "A true friend stabs
you in the front," attributed to Oscar Wilde. I cannot guarantee its
authenticity, but a search for it turned up a Wildeism more germane to the
film: "There is no sin, except stupidity."
The film's title must refer to the impatience of the kids to leave
adolescence for maturity, as well as to the state of English in schools.
Following the seniors' graduation ceremony, their class has the usual
ritualistic bash--in the home of a girl who ought to have known better
than volunteer the place. The party is a rite of passage --not the Rites of
Spring but the Trites of Spring. The motto, as in other such events, must
be Brew and Screw.
For its characters, the filmmakers round up the usual suspects, all of them
types found in the teen genre. If there is some originality here, it is
well-hidden by cliches gathered from earlier flicks. CHW's  deja vu types
and actions make up a pot-pourri, an expression where "pourri" means
"putrid." But this epithet would be too strong a condemnation of a movie
whose main guilt is total  superficiality.
The action almost entirely takes place at the shindig. Celebrants range
from geeks to nerds to jocks to cuties.  Without a central plot or guiding
thread, the whole thing is just a collection of skin-deep subplots. The
main one is this: athletic Mike, the BMOC, has just dumped Amanda, his girl
since freshman class, as part of "game plan" with his pals. The idea is
that those among them who are going on to college will have women by the
regiment falling into their arms and beds, so why not break with the boys'
current liaisons? It's not only a dumb idea but a revoltingly cynical one.
Learning this, college-bound would-be writer Preston  wants to declare his
love to now-uncommitted Amanda. He is a likable, shy fellow who has been
adoring her silently ever since they both were freshmen. In a flashback to
four years ago, the movie goofs by showing Amanda, Preston and others
looking exactly as they do now. Add to this the sin that Hollywood has been
committing since silent  movie days and in many contemporary films as well:
too many screen students --high-schoolers or undergraduates--are
perceptibly older than they would be in real life.
Preston comes to the party with his confidante and best pal Denise. She is
brainy a la Janeane Garofalo, even  looks like a mix of Garofalo and a
young Kathy Bates. She lacks confidence in her own appearance, is outside
the girlish loop,  critical of others, has a mordant tongue. Another
subplot will involve her being accidentally locked inside a bathroom with
Seth, with predictable consequences. He is  a white boy whose solution to
having an identity has been to adopt a black personality in dress, speech,
manners, music, and the like. (There are, by the way, some merely token
minority students at the party)
As for Amanda, she's been a kind of First Lady all along, Queen of this and
of that. She is nice but, like almost everyone else, not a thinking person.
(You wonder how the vague Preston will perform  as a writer)  Amanda does
get the film' s main profundity when she realizes (and confesses a bit
pathetically) that all her glory came from being Mike's satellite. With
some people, it takes time to see the obvious.
I will not mention other characters, events or gratuitous developments of
CHW. The partygoers, are without exception not just undeveloped but
undersketched. There are  few small saving graces. One is the movie's
relative briefness. Even though the title calls for the joke I Could Hardly
Wait For It To Finish, I did not find it unbearable -- just blah. Another
is that Preston is neither depicted as pathologically shy nor as a
caricature intellectual. There are no drop-dead gorgeous women. And, in a
near-surreal sight, as Preston tries to use a public phone, a woman, a
tired stripper with fake angel wings,  hassles him for the use of the
cabin. She is played by the uncredited Jenna Elfman, who recently had a
major part in Krippendorf's Tribe and is married to the nephew of composer
Danny Elfman.
Obviously made for high-schoolers who may or may not get some mini-shocks
of recognition, and full of references to current pop culture, CHW will
survive only if its target audience shows up.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Teaching Mrs. Tingle (1999)
TEACHING MRS. TINGLE (1999) * 1/2. Written and directed by Kevin Williamson;
Photography, Jerzy Zielinski. Editing, Debra Neil-Fisher. Production 
design, Naomi Shohan. Music, John Frizzell. Produced by Cathy Konrad. 
Cast: Helen Mirren (Mrs. Tingle), Katie Holmes (Leigh Ann Watson), 
Jeffrey Tambor (Coach Wenchell), Barry Watson (Luke Churner), Marisa 
Coughlan (Jo Lynn Jordan), Liz Stauber (Trudie Tucker), Michael 
McKean (Principal Potter), Molly Ringwald (Miss Banks), Vivica A. Fox 
(Miss Gold). A Dimension Films release. 93 minutes.PG-13
Kevin Williamson's first feature as director is a fizzle. He has been 
one of the new,  hot  Hollywood screenwriters since 1996, beginning 
with Scream (and later with Scream 2). His popular but puerile I Know 
What You Did Last Summer (1997) deserves what a critic (in, I think, 
Time) wrote about  the 1965 I Saw What You Did. His full review : " 
And I wish to hell I hadn't."
In 1998 Williamson  also created the TV series "Dawson's Creek,  was 
an uncredited writer for Halloween H20, and  scripted The Faculty. 
According to an AP story  "much of his work is based on things that 
really happened to him." In particular, a high school teacher 
described as a true monster crushed all his hopes for becoming a 
writer. The discouragement was repeated in a college writing class. 
Poor Kevin! But at least and at last  his deep traumas found their 
way into his eventual success as a writer, and certainly in his 
creation of the revenge movie Teaching Mrs. Tingle which centers on 
a small town school's history teacher from Hell.
American high school pictures are a genre with hundreds of entries, 
especially following the success of the appealing Fast Times at 
Ridgemont High (1982). Most of them try to be amusing and depict 
students doing anything except studying and learning.  In the light 
as well as in the few "serious" pictures the teachers are the victims 
of their classes. The grandpa of such works may be the famous The 
Blackboard Jungle (1955) whose screening at the Cannes Festival 
brought out protests by Americans because "of the bad name it gave 
U.S. schools."
Teaching Mrs. Tingle turns the tables on most high-school films, as 
Mrs.T., a martinet and a tyrant, is the persecutor of the kids.
The title was originally Killing Mrs. Tingle, but given the 
increasing rash of real-life school killings, it was changed. There 
may be a loss of audience among some amateurs of teacher-murder, but 
since there are no corpses in the film, "Teaching" is a better title 
and has the benefit of catchy alliteration. Yet even then, the name 
Tingle sends the wrong message. It would have been fine if it evoked 
someone who does things to you, such as appeal or titillation.
On the other hand, could this be an attempt at irony, which is 
something that Mrs. T  likes to define, and to dispense nastily and 
sarcastically to all: students, staff, colleagues, administrators 
--and most likely to grocery clerks, waiters, salespeople and 
everybody else. Worse yet, she's a master of put-downs which 
inevitably make all wilt in her presence and all hate her.  She even 
uses her unpleasantness to get her wishes via innuendoes, as when she 
blackmails the principal whose secret (he's in Alcoholics Anonymous) 
she knows.
The story. Graduating Leigh Ann Watson (Katie Holmes) is the top 
candidate for valedictorian. All she needs is another A, which will 
get her a college scholarship - indispensable, since her mother (a 
single) does not have the means to pay tuition.
The girl slaves over a first-rate project for her history class which 
she presents to Mrs.Tingle. Probably jealous of Leigh's looks and 
promising future, and, as later revealed,  frustrated by her own life 
(she was herself a student in that school and had been unable to 
leave that small town), Mrs T deprecates the project and gives Leigh 
a grade of C.
Desperate Leigh and her best friend Marisa (a lively actress 
wannabe), run into classmate Barry, a good-looking slacker on whom 
Marisa has a crush. He has just gotten an illegal copy of the history 
final.  Horrified, Leigh takes it away from him, puts it in her bag. 
In one of the first artificial developments of the movie, Mrs. T 
walks in, somehow spots the exam, and guarantees expulsion for Leigh.
The youngsters, trying vainly to explain Leigh's innocence, have to 
resort to a visit to Mrs. T's home but the teacher, considering them 
as invaders, throws them out.
And here begin a dumb, dull, unreal chain of events that do not 
deserve analysis. Fake semi-climaxes follow one another. The status 
of the kids goes from bad to worse after they tie Mrs. T to her bed. 
For three (I believe, but who cares?) days, during which Mrs. T gets 
fed but never goes to the bathroom. Involved, among other artifacts 
and events are a crossbow (sic), the loss of Leigh's presumed 
virginity, and a visit by  Mrs. T's secret lover, or at least sex 
partner. He goes by the nickname Spanky, which gives you a clue about 
the couple's activities. The man is an awfully  unlikely a choice. I 
will not reveal who plays him except that it 's a waste of an actor 
who has been marvelous on cable TV.
The movie is a waste of the audience's time and of the performers' 
abilities, including Molly Ringwald. She has been relegated to a 
tiny, innocuous part as office help and substitute teacher. Michael 
McKean, that superbly versatile actor of film (Coneheads, etc., etc.) 
and TV (Brian Benben's Aussie boss in HBO's Dream On) has a mere 
cameo, which cries out for expansion. Otherwise, the movie belongs 
entirely to Ms Mirren.
England's  Helen Mirren has been on much TV and many films for 
decades. She is a great actress who, in the USA at least, in spite of 
dozens of movies in which she held main or supporting roles, is far 
from a household name. The reasons? She is a mature woman and not the 
regulation gorgeous chick. Not all of her films have been displayed, 
and if so, insufficiently. Many of the best were specialty  "art" 
items: The Long Good Friday,  Cal, Pascali's Island, The Cook The 
Thief His Wife and her Lover, Some Mother's Son, and others.  She 
eventually acquired some name recognition through  The Madness of 
King George and the several Prime Suspect TV series (as Detective, 
then Superintendent Jane Tennison)
Her Mrs. Tingle showcases her talent. Not only as a demonic teacher, 
but as a diabolical captive who manipulates her captors with speech 
--while tied to her bed. Proud, coaxing, menacing, scheming, 
attempting to disunite the youngsters, and eventually pathetic, she 
does not merely steal the show, she IS the show. But even  Ms Mirren 
cannot save this concoction where  contrived drama and would-be humor 
co-exist without ever hitting their marks.

Title
Review for Kiss Before Dying, A (1991)
A KISS BEFORE DYING  (1991) ***  Directed by James Dearden. Written by
Dearden from a novel by Ira Levin. Photography, Mike Southon.  Editing,
Michael Bradsell. Production Design, Jim Clay. Music, Howard Shore. Cast:
Matt Dillon (Jonathan) Sean Young (Dorothy and Ellen), Max Von Sydow
(Copper Baron Carlsson), Diane  Ladd (Jonathan's  mother),et al.  A
Universal release. 93 min. Rated R (violence, adult situations).
Ira  ("Rosemary's Baby" ) Levin's thriller  "A Kiss Before Dying"  was
filmed  in 1956  with Robert Wagner, Joanne Woodward, Virginia Leith,
Jeffrey Hunter , Mary Astor, and George Macready.  In the 1991 remake their
counterparts are  Matt Dillon, Sean Young, Sean Young again, nobody, Diane
Ladd and Max Von Sydow.
Jonathan is a psychotic,  fortune-hunting student at the University of
Pennsylvania;  Dorothy is a co-ed (remember that term?) the daughter of a
mining tycoon. She is also Ellen, her identical twin sister who is
alienated from Dad, Carlsson the Copper Baron.  Jonathan's mother is an
abandoned woman.
Jonathan grows up on the wrong side of the tracks and only  feet away from
them, dreaming of the Carlsson fortune as the copper company's cars roll
by.  Later, in college, he becomes Dorothy's ultra-secret lover, conniving
marriage with the heiress. Finding  out that he has made her pregnant  --
therefore sure to be disinherited by her intolerant father-- he throws her
from the top of the Philadelphia City Hall, making it look like suicide.
All this in one of the fastest starts in thriller history.
Sister Ellen suspects murder but no one will listen.  When she sleuths on
her own, Jonathan strangles Dorothy's previous boyfriend, staging it like a
suicide and making this new victim  appear like the  girl's killer.
Months later Jonathan is  in New York , as  "Jay " and  as Ellen's lover
and co-worker in an agency for street people. When they marry he gets his
coveted position with Carlsson . Slowly though Ellen gets suspicious of her
husband,  Jonathan suspects her suspicions , and the tension mounts...
The book had  holes, the 1956 movie had craters the size of the tycoon's
copper mines. The remake too plays fast and loose with credibility.  The
difference is that Dillon and Young  are better than their predecessors ,
hold your attention and  distract you somewhat from the  plot's
illogicalities. But they still can't make all the gaps go away.
Britisher James Dearden is the writer-director of a little gem,
"Diversion," which won  Best Short Drama at the 1980 Chicago Film Festival.
Later he expanded that subject in the scenario of director Adrian Lyne's
"Fatal Attraction,"  a 1987 feature which is flawed, blatant, not
uninteresting however, yet cannot hold a candle to  "Diversion." Dearden is
the first to agree, as he did in private as well as responding to a
question at a Cannes Festival press conference.
[You might wish to read my review of "Fatal Attraction." It also details
"Diversion"]
Next Dearden made "Pascali's Island," in 1988, scripting from someone
else's novel. This is an excellent, colorful, unusual work, but sadly, it
failed because of poor and limited distribution .
"Kiss" is obviously a much more commercial venture, and it does have
problems of verissimilitude. Yet it is good film-making, with good  pacing
, characterizations,  production values and with clever touches.  (
Curiously, its U.S.A. was recreated inside British studios.)
If there's less than meets the eye in the coincidences and gaps, there is
more to "Kiss" than one notices at first sight. Dearden belongs to a
film-conscious generation, and what's more, his father was a famous
movie-maker.  Adroitly, Dearden Junior blends the style of 1940s and 1950's
films noirs with several  homages to  Alfred Hitchcock , some   devious,
others obvious, like Ellen watching "Vertigo" on TV;  or like references to
"Psycho," notably in  a steamy sex scene inside a steamy shower, and a
close-up of the drain .
Dearden improves on the 1956 in many ways. Among them, by  making Dorothy
and Ellen twins, which  reinforces Ellen's feelings of foul play ,  since
twins are said to have mysterious affinities. Or by  eliminating the
ludicrous Jeffrey Hunter character, the weakest point of the earlier movie.
There is some gore in Dearden's version but by contemporay  standards the
graphic violence is restrained, as when  a dismemberment is only implied
by  a suitcase with a grizzly cargo.
Dearden's other bag --of tricks this time --  finds him stressing
Hitchcockianly suspense over surprise in a plot where the menacing details
keep  your attention well,  less through zapping effects than in observing
Jonathan and Ellen. And even then, the best part of the movie is not so
much  Jonathan's fiendishness or Ellen's detection, but the gradual rise
and fall of Ellen's attitude toward her husband.
The 1956 film was and still is overrated .  The new version is vastly
superior to the original and stands nicely on its own feet, even if they
wobble.

Title
Review for Eating (1990)
EATING (1990) *** 1/4.  Written, directed, edited  by Henry 
Jaglom. Photography, Hanania Baer. Set design, Andrea Fenton. 
Cast: Nelly Alard (Martine), Frances Bergen (Mrs. Williams), 
Mary Crosby (Kate) Marlena Giovi (Sadie). Marina Gregory 
(Lydia), Daphne Kastner (Jennifer), Elizabeth Kemp (Nancy), 
Lisa Blake Richards (Helene), Gwen Welles (Sophie), Toni Basil 
(Jackie), Savannah Smith Boucher (Eloise), Claudia Brown 
(Gabby), Rachelle Carson (Cathy), Anne E. Curry (Cory), Donna 
Germain (Gerri), Beth Grant (Bea), Aloma Ichinose 
(Maria),Taryn Power (Anita), Jacquelin Woolsey (Milly). A 
Rainbow release. 110 min. Not rated.  
While lack of food is the greatest concern on this planet, 
among affluent Americans there is too much to eat. This has 
led to an obsession. 
People worry about their jobs, their income, politics, perhaps 
about the environment. But there's no common denominator like 
the fixation on food addiction, its causes, and the bad things 
it does to you. Especially within the large group that is the 
focus of Henry Jaglom's film EATING.
In an incessant stream of giggling arrivals bearing bizarre, 
California-culture, tension-relieving gifts, 38 women come to 
Helene's (Lisa Richards) for her 40th birthday. Most of them 
are younger than she is, and above-average in looks and 
figure. After all, this is Southern California, and the guests 
are in reality professional actresses. They also have heads 
which are probably filled with the helium of the balloons that 
festoon the house. Another reminder of where we are 
geographically.  
Some sanity is introduced by Helene's still-handsome mother. 
As played by Frances Bergen (Edgar Bergen's widow and 
Candice's progenitor), she is relatively wise. Otherwise 
almost everyone else is obsessed with body shape and with 
food. Some are secretly jealous of friends. All are openly 
envious of French guest Martine (Nelly Alard) who's been 
sunbathing topless by the pool. 
"Why do French women have such fantastic bodies?" they wonder. 
The question is valid but also discriminatory. Writer-director 
Jaglom leaves out the millions of men of France who can pig 
out on cuisine and still stay trim. 
Nominally, Martine is there to make a French TV documentary on 
Southern California behavior. Deep down, however, she shares 
the concerns of her American friends. Alternating between 
observing and filming, she is eventually drawn into 
participating. Adding her true feelings to those of others, 
she unexpectedly reveals her own insecurities. 
Jaglom is an oddity, a maverick who works entirely by himself 
and whose subjects are Hollywood people. EATING looks like an 
eavesdropping, voyeuristic Candid Camera film, or at least 
like a theatrical exercise of actors improvising at playing 
ordinary people. In reality this is a very clever, phony 
movie, a "staged documentary" whose every word on cellulite is 
penned by Jaglom and every foot of celluloid is creatively 
edited. Yet the actors are most convincing as real people and 
Jaglom's dialogues are amazingly on target. What an ear, what 
notebooks the man must have! 
The party and Martine's camera catalyze confidences, 
stock-taking and some shifts in relationships. Remember again, 
this is not a cross-section of America but a slice of Southern 
California. It is hard to sort out many of the guests, who are 
different people yet come from basic sets of molds. Hardly  
anyone is really interesting or has any dimensions beyond the 
talk of food. 
The talk brings out connected subjects or worries, such as 
sex, aging, family relations, sex, marriage, ambitions, sex, 
abortions, breast implants, shrinks, sex, and endless 
trivia--but no matter what is said, everything still returns 
to and revolves around the sun of food. The fact that the 
trivia are non-trivial to the speakers intensifies Jaglom's 
irony.   
There have been rather few movies with food as their main 
star. Here is an incomplete list I have hastily compiled.  
Luis Bunuel's surreal THE DISCREET CHARM OF THE BOURGEOISIE 
(1972) where a dinner is always interrupted; Marco Ferreri's 
LA GRANDE BOUFFE (1973), where people gorged themselves 
literally to death; a grotesque restaurant sequence in MONTY 
PYTHON'S THE MEANING OF LIFE (1982); Paul Bartel's EATING 
RAOUL (1982); Juzo Itami's TAMPOPO (1986); Gabriel Axel's 
BABETTE'S FEAST (1987); Peter Greenaway's THE COOK, THE THIEF, 
HIS WIFE AND HER LOVER (1989). 
Since 1990 and EATING we have also seen Jeunet and Caro's 
cannibalistic DELICATESSEN (1991); Alfonso Arau's romantic 
LIKE WATER FOR CHOCOLATE (1992); Ang Lee's THE WEDDING BANQUET 
(1993) and EAT DRINK MAN WOMAN (1994). 
Interestingly, the great majority of those films have been 
notable, even outstanding. Most of them are humorous or black 
humorous, while only BABBETTE, LIKE WATER and EAT DRINK 
glorify cuisine.
EATING is a most satisfactory movie too, while, with its 
realistic, cinema-verite approach, it differs a great deal 
from titles above, except that it can be very funny. A random 
example. A woman, anxious to break into movies, asks her 
actress friend: "Do I have to sleep with someone to get a 
part?" There's a tiny pause before the reply: "How big a 
part?" 
The movie proceeds from one little drama to the next.  All are 
ludicrous, most are comical, but some are funny-sad. A 
daughter reveals to her mother how the birth of her young 
sister Nancy drove her to compulsive eating and vomiting. She 
concludes with what cured her: "I finally threw up Nancy."
All this may not be everybody's cup of tea. Even when it is, 
some viewers may find it overlong. I did not. My main 
objection is that only unsophisticated fare is mentioned, 
chocolate chip cookies, baked potatoes and the like. Couldn't 
Jaglom have refined the bill of fare and added Burgundian 
specialties, pasta dishes, sauerbraten, mid-Eastern or Asian 
delicacies, Linzer, Sacher or Dobosch tortes? 
EATING is somewhat better than just good. It gets my three and 
a quarter stars but will not get even a single one from 
Gourmet Magazine. 

Title
Review for Bean (1997)
BEAN (1997)(Not star-rated). Directed by Mel Smith.Written by Richard
Curtis and Robin Driscoll, based on a character devised by Rowan Atkinson
and Curtis. Photography, Francis Kenny. Editing,Christopher Blunden.
Production design, Peter Larkin. Music, Howard Goodall.Produced by Peter
Bennett-Jones, Eric Fellner and Tim Bevan. Cast: Rowan Atkinson (Mr. Bean),
Sir John Mills (Chairman), Harris Yulin (George Grierson), Peter MacNicol
(David Langley), Pamela Reed (Alison Langley),Burt Reynolds (General
Newton), Larry Drake, et al .A Gramercy release. 92 min. PG-13.
Many of us are admirers, fans and  devotees of Rowan Atkinson on TV. Having
seen the feature "Mr.Bean" I must confess my utter disappointment. "Bean"
is one thing, "Mr. Bean" another. The feature may amuse -- even tickle to
tears -- audiences unfamiliar with Atkinson's TV gems, but for those
gleeful veterans who follow the inspired weekly "Mr. Bean" episodes there's
just no comparison.
American audiences were introduced to Atkinson's mad, sardonic "Blackadder"
series (made for the BBC) some years ago. The combination of very verbal,
acerbic, irreverent and insulting humor, with zany, mock history, physical
farce, was and is unique. Then, doing a 180 degree turn, the amazing
Atkinson became the weird,bumbling (that's an understatement) "Mr. Bean."
The only way to explain him is that, as he seems to get beamed down to
earth, he is really both human and extra-terrestrial. His monumental,
farcical ineptness is expressed in almost entirely speechless sketches,
with superbly funny mumblings, sounds and noises.
Both "Blackadder" and "Mr. Bean" were written by Atkinson and Richard
Curtis, who had They had collaborated before. Curtis was also the
scriptwriter of the feature "Four Weddings and a Funeral" in which Atkinson
has the small, hilarious part as the bumbling clergyman officiating at a
marriage. He also wrote the successful feature "The Tall Guy," starring
Jeff Goldblum (and Atkinson in the supporting cast), directed by comic
actor-writer Mel Smith. So there is a lot of talent in the movie "Bean."
But the picture also confirms that transforming wildly comic and original
TV episodes into features is a bad idea, at least for those who follow the
television items religiously. It has seldom worked, except for Monty
Python.
In "Bean" Atkinson is a security  guard, "the worst employee in the Royal
National Gallery's history." About to be fired, he is rescued (for
arbitrary reasons) by the Chairman of the Board. Simultaneously, the
Gallery has been requested to send to Los Angeles a renowned British
scholar to speak at the inauguration of the "best American painting,"
"Whistler's Mother," just purchased from the French Musee d'Orsay. The
Brits decide (illogically) to dispatch Bean, then give him  a sabbatical,
so as to get rid of him temporarily.
>From the moment Bean steps onto his plane to the film's finale, Atkinson
grunts and  mugs and clowns and grimaces and contorts from top to bottom.
The Atkinson TV aficionados find that the overwhelming majority of
shenanigans are bad, broad and forced. The gags include airplane vomit
bags, urine, laxatives, spit, sneezing stuff, a turkey's rear end, a 2
way-mirror, drunks, more bathroom things, body parts and the like. The last
section's hospital gags -- a delicate genre to start with--are weak. At the
end, Bean's mistaking the giving the finger for a friendly salute, uses it
copiously. Not very funny. Nor is the blindness of the museum people who do
not notice Bean's madness and imposture.
For those who appreciate the punch and vigor of TV's episodes, "Bean" feels
tedious,overlong and synthetic. I counted few good gags, such as Bean
pretending that the painting he is moving is a table on wheels. Or when
Bean -- here exceptionally given a few spoken lines --improvises a short
speech about "Whistler's Mother." Or when he tells Burt Reynolds,the
haughty, millionaire, retired general who purchased the painting:
"Delighted to meet you, Sir." and the General replies "Of course you are."
I saw this film with a smallish audience of more young children than
adults. The kids whooped it up regularly; the adults rarely. I am told that
at a large Saturday night show many grownups were in stitches.I might have
been too, if exposed to the novelty and originality of Bean for the first
time. Do catch "Mr. Bean" and "Blackadder" on PBS or on video.You'll
understand why the movie lets down the Atkinsonphiles.

Title
Review for Better Than Chocolate (1999)
BETTER THAN CHOCOLATE (Canada, 1999) *** Directed by Anne Wheeler. 
Written by Peggy Thomson. Photography, Gregory Middleton. 
Editing,Alison Grace. Music Graeme Coleman. Production design, David 
Roberts. Produced by Sharon McGowan and Peggy Thomson. Cast: Wendy 
Crewson (Lila), Karyn Dwyer (Maggie), Christina Cox (Kim), Ann-Marie 
MacDonald (Frances), Marya Delver (Carla), Kevin Mundy (Paul),  Peter 
Outerbridge (Judy/Jeremy) et al. A Trimark Pictures release.103 
minutes.Not rated (sex but not objectionable to sophisticated adults)
Last week  I saw  Trick, a  gay (merry) gay (sexually) movie. This 
week I saw the lesbian romantic comedy Better Than Chocolate. I keep 
no statistics on film genres, but it would seem that same-sex light 
fare is on the increase.
No doubt, any growing genre entails the creation of its own types of 
cliches. Even the so-called "independent" movies develop formulas. 
But  in the case of gay-lesbian ones, it is rather nice to see cinema 
widening its scope--especially when this is done with total 
un-selfconciousness. If you think of those works as dealing with 
minorities, they could even help to get pictures out of the rut of 
older, mainstream types, by encouraging the making of movies about 
other minorities: vegetarians, atheists, Southern Democrats, 
well-paid teachers, efficient administrators, watchers of good TV, 
good spellers, people who use "whom" instead of "who," foreign-movie 
buffs, and so on. What a reservoir of fresh subjects!
The Canadian Better Than Chocolate is a light, zippy situation-yarn 
which won the top prize at the latest Gay and Lesbian Film Festival 
in London. Actually, it is not very exciting, yet it's not dull 
either, and it has its own charm.
Set in a lesbian milieu of Vancouver, its major focus is on Maggie 
and Kim . Maggie is a 19-year old college drop-out, who wants to be a 
writer and live "real life." She is cute. ( I like this word; it 
means something special and has no precise equivalent in any other 
language I know). By day she works in the lesbian Ten Percent 
Bookstore. By night she performs  (regularly or not, it's unclear) at 
a lesbian club.
Maggie meets the somewhat older Kim, an itinerant artist whose 
drawings and body-painting are not bad at all. Kim lives in her van. 
For the two girls it's love at first sight.  A quick first attempt at 
physical consummation takes place inside the van. It is interrupted, 
to their bewilderment (and laughter) as the illegally parked vehicle 
gets hauled away to the pound. Good gag.
Maggie, on the phone Lila, her mother, learns that she is divorcing 
Maggie's stepfather as that man has been sleeping for a year with a 
younger woman, his partner's wife I believe, but I can't guarantee 
this. Lila, in her upheaval, hears from Maggie that she's not in 
school, but makes no fuss. Instead, she announces that she's coming 
all the way from the distant East of the United States,with Paul (17 
or so), Maggie's hunkish brother.They will  stay (temporarily, I 
suppose) with Maggie.
Metaphorically speaking, trumpets blare and drums beat as Maggie, who 
sleeps in the bookstore and has not fessed up her sexual preferences 
to Mom, rushes to find a place to live in "en famille," which would 
also include "housemate" Kim. From a lesbian lady, she rents, for a 
short time, a large and rather shoddy loft.
Mom and Brother show up.  A charade familiar from hetero-films gets 
going. Lila is     ditzy  and likable. She neither perceives nor is 
told by Maggie of the latter's sex choices. (But on his first morning 
there, Brother catches the girls making love. He takes it with cool 
and naturalness). Semi-complications ensue. These also involve 
30-plus Judy who is also Jeremy, a transsexual in every way except 
that, if I got this right, he hasn't yet had The Operation. He/she is 
very simpatico and strikes a frienship with Mom, who has no clue 
about "her" being a man.
Later at the club Judy performs the song "I'm not a f... drag queen" 
well and with brio.  But how I missed having a youngish Marlene 
Dietrich doing it! There's also a trio of day-glo/black light singers 
who do a lively homage to Julie Christie. (I'll have to find out more 
about her).
There are several small felicities, side events and mini-subplots : 
the Customs impound a shipment of porno (?) books from the United 
States; Judy "outs" her secret love for Frances, the bookstore's shy, 
spinsterish owner; Lila stumbles onto a stash of the loft-owner's sex 
toys and happily experiments with them; Paul gets panting sex going 
with the bookstore's pansexual employee: etc. etc.
The un-rated movie's sex scenes are pretty steamy-hot but ought not 
to annoy a savvy public. The younger actresses are convincing but no 
more. Peter Outerbridge (as Judy) is very good in moods that mix or 
alternate pathos and sophistication. Wendy Crewson (as Lila) all but 
steals the show.
The rub comes in some ways that make the film shaky.The characters, 
beyond functioning as servants to the plot, have really no dimension, 
personality or character. Maggie's efforts to hide her sexual nature 
from Mom are pretty inexplicable, since Lila seems to be receptive. 
And Lila's blitheness or blindness to what is obvious is overdone.
The latter weakness could have been taken care of by clues that Lila 
is so involved in her own problems thats she can't  see the woods for 
the trees; and/or by having her get it but pretend she does not;  or 
by refusing to admit it. Too bad, since Ms Crewson (about whom I know 
nothing, given the lack of press information) is such a colorful and 
dynamic performer.
The film's title comes from a Sarah McLachlan song, "ice cream." Lila 
spells it out : she is a secret chocolate-junkie.  At some point she 
declares to the young ones, with her habitual candor and directness: 
"Since I probably won't ever have sex again, chocolate is the only 
pleasure left me." (That was before she discovered the sex gagdgets).
Let's not get too serious, however. There are side-isssues and 
subtexts about valid, serious matters, but the movie is primarily 
pleasant, good-humored, high-energy  fluff.

Title
Review for Children of the Revolution (1996)
CHILDREN OF THE REVOLUTION *** 1/4. Australia (1996) Written & directed by
Peter Duncan. Producer, Tristram Miall. Photography, Martin McGrath.
Editing, Simon Martin. Production design, Roger Ford. Costumes, Terry Ryan.
Music, Nigel Westlake. Cast: Judy Davis (Joan), Sam Neill (Nine), F.Murray
Abraham (Stalin), Richard Roxburgh (Joe),Rachel Griffiths (Anna), Geoffrey
Rush (Welch),Russell Kiefel (Barry),John Gaden (Dr. Wilf Wilke), Ben McIvor
(young Joe), et al. A Miramax release. 99 minutes. NR.
COTR justifies doubly its being a mockumentary: it is fiction in
documentary clothes and it mocks its subject all the way. It stars Judy
Davis, who was launched internationally in her second film, My Brilliant
Career --a title that turned out to be prophetic for Miss Davis.
In COTR she plays (and I mean plays, as she is a unique performer rather
than just a star), over a span of four decades, an Australian woman called
Joan. She has no private life but is a dedicated believer in Communism, in
the Revolution and in Stalin,  once the Uncle Joe of so many people around
the globe. She has painstakingly learned to write Russian in order to keep
writing letters to the Soviet dictator.
The missives are unanswered, but one day, as they are being read by Kremlin
apparatchiks, all those flunkies-in-uniform are touched to tears. Like
other scenes, there is broad humor here, a la Mel Brooks. The result is
that Stalin learns about Joan and invites her to Moscow.
The man is played (also broadly and amusingly) by F. Murray Abraham as an
aging, horny goat, doubly irascible because he is trying to stop smoking --
another clever touch for those who remember Stalin's eternal pipe.
In Australia, Joan has always looked frumpy, with the kind of  bad hair day
that extends to years -- a touch that  is true of a certain type. In the
USSR she looks gorgeous in sexy red, from dress to accessories, but the
hair remains the same, like Joan's fanatical beliefs.  Stalin is aroused.
Stalin makes passes. Stalin has congress with virginal Joan during the
night of March 4 to 5, 1953. Uncle Joe dies.
In Australia, Joan had met Nine (a name that parodies James Bond's 007) an
investigating Aussie Government spy. In Moscow, he reappears in the regalia
of a KGB Colonel. He coolly explains: "The Australians think you are a spy
for the Russians. They want me to kill you. The Russians brought me over to
look after you. Frankly, it's a bit of a tangle. I'll have to make it up as
I go along." Delightfully, the film too makes itself up as it goes along.
The night Stalin rejoined his Georgian ancestors, a panicky Joan tells Nine
" I killed him." In the ensuing consolation, Joan and Nine sleep together.
The next day, Comrades Beria, Krushchev and Malenkov whom Stalin, ever the
lover of Hollywood flicks, derisively called his Three Stooges, feast Joan
with flowers and song.
Returning to Sydney pregnant, our heroine finally marries her longtime
suitor Welch whose Red politics are mostly a way to stay with Joan.
Geoffrey Rush of "Shine"  does him in a quiet, minor key and sometimes
reminds me of James Woods.
Nine months later, a son is born to her. He is named Joe. The kid grows up
properly indoctrinated, and with a love of jails, something that starts out
as a child's a game --with the assistance of friendly, amused policemen.
As young Joe grows up, the movie, with its knack for the unexpected, slyly
treats his kinky prison complex as a form of bondage. It leads to a
wonderful love affair with arresting, leather- and-handcuffs-bearing
mounted constable Anna. (She reminds me at times of Juliet Lewis). There
are hilarious scenes of touchy-feely sex through the prison parlor's glass
and wire.
Madly inventive details chronicle Joe's career, from learning in prison
about Stalin's crimes to being "tortured" by the authorities with
industrial strength frying bacon smells that are supposed to break him. Joe
becomes a hero during a jail fire, grows a mustache (intelligently, not
exactly like Stalin's) to cover his burned lip, goes on to amassing
political power, but not in the direction that Mom expected.
Joan is not only let down by her flesh and blood, but by the Gorbachev
years  which will lead inexorably to the horror of a Macdonalds in Red
Square and "the end of civilization as we know it." All the while, Joe is
solicitously looked after by  his now-wife Anna, his nominal father Welch,
and by a weirdly sweet and loving Nine who suspects that Joe may be his own
son.
Writer-director Duncan rewrites Australian history with an  uncompromising
courage for unrealistic fantasy. (Note, among other aspects, how some
principal characters hardly age). Duncan treats events and characters as
wildly fabricated history and with bits wildly borrowed from movies.
Duncan's two BAs (1989)-- in Arts and in Laws --were followed by a period
of legal practice. He then switched to a three-year degree from the
Australian Film, TV and Radio school, made short films while at the school
and co-wrote the excellent documentary series Faces of War.
COTR, his grand slam feature debut, began as a discussion he had about
Christianity. This led to thinking about twentieth century passions, and to
remembrances of his own grand-father, a card carrying communist party
member who never wavered in his faith in  Stalin.
The resulting movie goes well beyond socialism and communism. Its subtext
is what longshoreman-philosopher Eric Hoffer (1902 -1983) wrote so sharply
about in books like The True Believer ( on mass movements), or The Ordeal
of Change (on reactions to major  sociopolitical upheavals). Whether or not
Duncan knew those works, their principles underlie his film. Political and
other  -isms are interchangeable. Whether fanatics or opportunists, the
believers can switch to other camps.
Filmically, COTR deals with Marxism in a Groucho Marxian way. Characters
are exaggerated, break into American movie songs ( ("I Get a Kick Out Of
You." "You're the Top"), even dance, at the drop of a cap. The fabricated
facts go into seeming incoherences and non sequiturs as they break the
rules of orderly scripting. Film buffs will find many (but not obvious)
cinematic touches. Such as a parody of the already parodied commissars in
Ninotchka , or as when Joe, gradually alienating himself from others, is
seen isolated  in his large, "inhuman" office that echoes visuals of
Citizen Kane.
There may be too much packed in the movie, although  a second viewing will
sift through the components and makes the film even more coherent and
enjoyable for those who are aware of history and film history. The paradox
here is that this work about the masses is     not a film for the masses.

Title
Review for Tro, hĺb og kćrlighed (1984)
TWIST AND SHOUT (Tro, hĺb og kćrlighed )(Denmark,1984) ***
Directed by Bille August. Written by August and Bjarne Reuter.
Cinematography, Jan Weincke. Sound, Niels Bokkenheuser. Lighting, Soren
Sorensen. Production design, Soren Krag Sorensen. Editing, Janus Billeskov
Jansen. Music, Bo Holten. Cast: Adam Tonsberg, Lars Simonsen, Camilla
Soeberg, Ulrikke Juul Bondo, Thomas Nielsen, Lone Lindroff, Arne Hansen,
Aase Hansen, et al.  A Danish film produced by  Per Holst Filmproduktion
and Palle Fogtdal, in collaboration with the Danish Film Institute, the
Children's Film Council and Danmarks Radio. Released by Miramax.   In
Danish with  subtitles. No rating.
The third feature by Bille August (b.1948) is a very good  work on young
people in suburban  1964 Denmark . I'm resisting labeling their particular
stages of growth as "coming-of-age," since the male protagonists  are
beyond that stage, and the female leads have already achieved their own
relative maturity.
Twist And Shout starts out at the end of 1963 but  is mostly set in 1964.
At first it makes you think that  it will be a straight teen -age romance
with , as background, the early stages of  Denmark 's  Beatlemania. The
kids literally twist and shout to the Liverpudlians' pieces, form their own
groups, even adopt Beatles garb. Middle-class  adolescents Bjorn (Tonsberg)
and Erik (Simonsen) are best friends . Both are perfectly nice, normal
boys. Bjorn is an extremely good-looking, vivacious extrovert who attracts
girls. Erik is a homely, shy introvert, for good reason. In  Gothic- novel
fashion,  he has a dark secret -- a deranged mother who for years has been
kept under wraps, lock and key at home following the strict  orders from
Erik's dour, overbearing father, who also  browbeats his son into a joyless
life.
Blonde, wealthy Kirsten thinks that there is an understanding between her
and Bjorn. So does Eric, who though smitten with Kirsten is too decent and
timid to do anything about it . When  Bjorn falls in love with  a new girl,
Anna (Soeberg), a peeved Kirsten pretends a momentary interest in Eric,
only to penetrate his secret . Later she heaps derision on him at a party
she's giving, throws out Bjorn and Anna.
For those two, head over heels in love, it is a happy time, until Anna has
a horrid backroom abortion, paid for  in part by money that Bjorn,
swallowing his pride, borrowed from Kirsten. The mental and physical  pain
jolts Anna to  break with Bjorn .Though still very much in love, Bjorn, for
whom Anna had been an ideal and a leader,  accepts his fate dumbly, more
like a boy than like a man. Kirsten gets him  back on the rebound, and with
sales pitches from her family, a listless, unconvinced Bjorn becomes
engaged to her...
The movie has a two-part structure. Its first half deals primarily with
Bjorn and Anna. It is sunny, even though Erik's family problems lurk behind
it. What the lovers do is gay, amusing, and not always like the first-love
cliches of their American counterparts. They sit in adult cafes and drink
tea; Anna tries to initiate rocker Bjorn into the beauty of  the music of
Bach, an unknown name that the boy can't  even pronounce correctly. When
Anna goes on a short trip, Bjorn worries and has visions of his girl doing
a lascivious strip-tease. With the abortion though,  the tone becomes
somber, and along with Bjorn's confusion, Erik's own comes more and more to
the forefront. His life as a dog culminates with the boy discovering , in
morally ambiguous conditions, the real nature of his father, and rebelling.
The choice of actors and their performances are excellent.  (Lars Simonsen
(Erik) was voted Best Actor at the Moscow Film Festival.) They also help to
fill gaps in the story and to camouflage improbabilities. Handsome Bjorn's
looks   are like a cross between the angelic Tadzio in Death In Venice and
Jacques Perrin in  Girl With A Suitcase --if your memory goes that far
back. Anna  is most appealing in behavior and physique. The actress playing
her is only 20, but Bjorn looks so much  younger that Anna would be more
convincingly paired off with a more mature man. Kirsten looks like a young,
prim  and calculating Eva Marie Saint. She is so different from Bjorn that
you may wonder what hold she has on him. The explanation, I believe, is
that  the actors playing Bjorn and Kirsten  were also in Bille August's
preceding movie. Zappa, set in 1961, was indeed a coming-of-age film, in
which Kirsten was already Bjorn's girlfriend, with plans for their future.
Both films were co-authored by Bjarne Reuter, a specialist in novels about
adolescents. He must be the S.E. Hinton of Denmark. The scriptwriters may
be assuming in Twist And Shout some  familiarity with the earlier movie,
but even beyond this, they are a bit murky about what's going on. The
explanations for the father's   incarceration of his wife, his refusal to
see a doctor or to place her in an institution, are feeble. (There are
perhaps vague intimations of films like Gaslight, where a husband tries to
drive his wife insane.)  The father explaining to his son that mother has
suffered from post-partum depression which became agoraphobia (fear of
crowds) after she gave birth to the boy, is an improbable "revelation,"  to
say the least. The lady must be close to 50, the boy is not  retarded, yet
he's lived all his life dumbly accepting matters and with no knowledge of
the facts?  There are other murky areas, such as Anna's  family  background
and her sexual past: she initiates sex with Bjorn in a way that hints at
previous experience, but she is dumbfounded when she finds out she is
pregnant.
What  papers over many of the film's cracks, in addition to the appeal of
its young actors,  is its technical skill and above all, the fact that this
is a guilt-edged movie. In Zappa, the responsibility for the kids' troubles
was laid squarely at their parents' doorstep. In the new film too, with
additional types of guilt. Erik's father is guilty of harshness and
puritanical hypocrisy. He makes his son feel guilty for practically
everything, especially his being embarrassed by a mother whom
nonetheless, he cares for lovingly when father isn't looking.  Bjorn feels
guilty vis-a-vis Anna, which explains in part his acceptance of her
decision to break. Anna's mother, to whom the girl appeals for help, is
monstrously guilty of indifference. The guilt may extend to Anna's unseen,
absentee (and illegitimate?) father. Kirsten's parents are guilty of having
spoiled their daughter. And so on...
Gaps and incongruities notwithstanding, this is a fine film. Most of it
makes suspension of disbelief fairly easy, so that you can concentrate on
the more valid parts of the joys and sorrows of adolescence. It is  helped
too by a good soundtrack, both of  pleasant period pop and of classical
music that you would never find in an American teen-age movie.  A
comparison with  some parts of the current  Dirty Dancing, set in 1963,
with its own youth,  rock-and-roll, ballroom dancing, abortion, and
parents-children  relations,  can tell you much about differences and
similarities between Danish and American attitudes and moviemaking.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Tumbleweeds (1999)
TUMBLEWEEDS (1999) ***  Directed by Gavin O'Connor.Written by 
O'Connor and Angela Shelton, based on Shelton's memoirs. Photography, 
Dan Stoloff. Editing, John Gilroy. Production design, Brice Eric 
Holtshousen. Music, David Mansfield. Produced by Gregory O'Connor. 
Cast: Janet McTeer (Mary Jo Walker), Kimberly J. Brown (Ava Walker), 
Jay O. Sanders (Dan), Gavin O'Connor (Jack Ranson), Michael J. 
Pollard ( Cummings), Laurel Holloman (Laurie Pendleton), Lois Smith 
(Ginger). A Fine Line release. 98 minutes. PG-13
Merryl Streep is getting serious competition in the domain of 
accents.  It would take Sherlock Holmes to figure out that Janet 
McTeer is British and not a would-be Southern belle.
McTeer? Who she? She won the Tony Award in 1997 for Best Actress (in 
the revival of Ibsen's "A Doll's House"). She is big on the British 
stage, has been on TV, had smaller roles in movies. Now, in her first 
starring movie McTeer rates an 8.3 on the Richter scale. She's been 
Oscar nominated and collected a huge bouquet of awards and other 
nominations.
The reasons for those triumphs: Janet McTeer endows a two-dimensional 
character with a strong three-dimensional performance  She plays Mary 
Jo Walker, a North Carolina gal in her late thirties who is a serial 
bad-chooser of men. Her life has been a long road trip between 
husbands (four of them), and, undoubtedly, lovers too. (Those who 
might sniff at her lifestyle might consider   the machine-gun 
successions of marriages and affairs in the world of "celebrities," 
especially in show business.)
Each time Mary Jo quits a relationship she moves to another state. 
It's good for geographic knowledge of the land, especially the South. 
It's bad for Mary Jo and her now 12-year old daughter Ava --named 
after Ava Gardner who had a host of husbands and lovers. Yet there is 
one positive constant: the unshakable bond between mother and 
daughter.
In the low-budget, quickly shot "Tumbleweeds" we meet the duo in West 
Virginia as she is having a drag-out fight with her latest male. 
Pulling up stakes again  Mom and Ava get in their beat-up car and hit 
the road. What possessions they take along are limited. It's like the 
rapidly packed minimum that frequent fliers have at the ready. 
Obviously this kind of "blitz" departure is old hat to Ava. She takes 
it all like a veteran of earlier wars.
The youngster's comments and body-English expressions are critical of 
her single parent. But never mind. There is  much giggling, singing, 
laughing and joking on the highways and in rest stops.
The gals are heading west, without any specific plan or destination. 
The trip is relatively uneventful, save for a broken water hose that 
a passing stranger, truck driver Jack, fixes.
The encounter with Jack sums up a lot of Mary Jo's personality. She's 
a big gal with big looks and manners, a born flirt  done up in 
man-trap ways,  big hair, big cleavage, anklet and such.  No clear 
clues are given as to when all this takes place, but I suspect it is 
not today. Otherwise Mary Jo might also have had pierced body parts 
and a tattoo.
They are going West, all the way, and end up in Starlight Beach, by 
the sea, near San Diego. You can't say that they settle there because 
it is blindingly clear that Mom is a recidivist. There's bound to be 
another man and another split.
What would movies do without coincidences? The man, met at a watering 
place, turns out to be Jack-of-the-highway. You guess the rest. MJ 
and Ava move in with him. Mother, now employed, has to put up with a 
deadly dull receptionist-type job and with a weird boss (Michael J. 
Pollard, under-used). Ava, always tsk tsking, is happy in school, 
gets "a new best girlfriend,"(shades of peripatetic Mom's 
relationships), discovers her thespian talent as the class competes 
for Shakespearean roles. (She studies Juliet, ends up as Romeo).
Nothing lasts of course, especially Mary Jo's relationships, except 
for the rock-steady love between the mother and pre-mature (read: 
slowly entering womanhood) Ava.
Mary Jo is perfectly drawn as cheerful, spunky and essentially very 
ordinary. She is based  on the real-life memoirs of Angela Shelton, 
the ex-wife of director O'Connor (he also plays Jack). There's more 
than a mere ring of authenticity here. The people as real. Their 
portrayals avoid the temptations of pathos, heavy sugar, forced 
picturesqueness or comedy. At the movies Ava gets her first kiss. 
It's a fiasco compounded by gaucheness and asthma. But later, after a 
demonstration by Mary Jo,  kiss #2 is a success. "My mother taught 
me" says the girl. In this phrase there's filial love, pride and a 
reminder of Mom's unorthodoxies.
Ava has gotten Mom down pat. The child is mother to the mother, which 
may be a deja vu all over again movie theme but mostly found in films 
about higher classes, typically with flighty socialite moms and 
sensible daughters. I can't say why exactly but the relationship in 
this film reminds me more of "Paper Moon"'s than of other movies.
Mary Jo is a true but not really interesting creation. She's a 
round-heels dame, common, even vulgar, but not coarse.
The lady  may be close to trailer-trash but not quite that. She rises 
above  this in ways rather akin to Anna Karina's 
prostitute-by-despair in  Godard's "My Life to Live." In that film a 
little schoolboy's essays about "La Poule" (French for chicken, but 
also meaning a broad or a whore )  goes: A chicken has an outside and 
an inside. Remove the outside and you see the inside.. Remove the 
inside, and you see the soul." Which you do see in Mary Jo's quiet 
moments, in closeups where her essential loneliness jumps out at you.
What holds your interest here is how the women are drawn, how those 
two are confidantes, acolytes, fellow-plotters.
The construction of "Tumbleweeds" is smooth and believable. My only 
objections  is that within one shot the jiggling camera goes 
unnecessarily from face to face. Also, Mr. Nice Guy widower called 
Dan, who works in Mary Jo's office and befriends Ava  of the camera, 
is a potential replacement after Mom's break with Jack, but he's far 
and away too educated. thoughtful and classy for her.  Minor flaws, 
major performances.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Palookaville (1996)
PALOOKAVILLE(1995) *** Directed by Alan Taylor. Written by David Epstein.
Photography, John Thomas. Editing, David Leonard. Production design, Anne
Stuhler. Music, Rachel Portman. Cast: William Forsythe (Sid), Vincent Gallo
(Russ), Adam Trese (Jerry), Lisa Gay Hamilton (Betty), Kim Dickens
(Laurie),et al. A Samuel Goldwyn Co., release. 92 min. Rated R.(language)
The start of this movie is so amusing that what follows could have been an
anticlimax. It isn't though. The setting is contemporary Jersey City, a
shabby decaying town across the river from the wealth of New York City's
often shown skyscrapers.
Three unemployed, longtime buddies decide to resort to crime--strictly
temporarily.Likable and most unprofessional, in these high-tech times they
use primitive tools to try burglarizing a jewelry store. Instead, they
break into the adjoining bakery, where Jerry keeps gobbling pastries and
stuffing donuts inside his shirt. The sequence is treated with sweet
absurdism, close to Inspector Clouseau territory.
The protagonists' dwellings are low-income, cramped quarters. Interiors and
exteriors could, by and large, have been settings of past decades.Even the
pals' only car is an old clunker.
Handsome Jerry has a kid and a breadwinner wife. Betty is black. This helps
situate the film in recent times and adds a warm element  as absolutely no
special point is made of it.
Sid, whose spouse left him, lives with two shaggy, smelly dogs.
Saturnine-looking Russ lives with his mother, his sister, and her husband,
a sullen cop. Russ occasionally visits a friendly prostitute (Frances
McDormand in a cameo appearance) and regularly goes to bed with young,
pretty Laurie, who lives across the back alley and dreams of
California.Visits are easy as both have street-level bedroom windows.
After bungling their first job, the buddies plot others, with Russ as the
self-appointed brains and leader. Their discussions at their usual cafe can
be quite funny. One man dreams up the semi-legitimate notion of an
unlicensed car service for older people who can hardly afford cabs,
assuming these do show up. The smell of Sid's mutts, as they too travel in
the car,quickly sinks that scheme.
A somewhat forced incident suggests a plot involving an armored car. The
plan is hare-brained, the preparations dumbly funny. They include watching
a video of the 1950 movie "Armored Car Robbery" -- a pretty good film but
absurd in "Palookaville"'s context. The execution is comical. Connected,
unconnected and disconnected episodes flesh out the story, the characters,
the milieu
"Palookaville" is an amalgam loosely based on three early short stories by
Italo Calvino who wrote of the plight of ordinary Italians in the
post-World War II years.The atmosphere gets convincingly transferred to the
USA now.There is also the inspiration from the familiar Italian satire "Big
Deal on Madonna Street" (1958) which was about a gang of incompetent
amateur thieves. (The cast included Marcello Mastroianni, then known but
not yet made a major star by Fellini movies).
The director's first feature and the scriptwriter's first produced
screenplay, "Palookaville"  won the Kodak Prize for Best First Feature at
the 1995 Venice Film Festival. Some   inexperience shows in a certain lack
of clarity about people and places. I am no lover of artificial,
all-explaining expositions but I appreciate what might be called the
Hitchcockian introduction, where you don't have to wonder who is who,
where, and what to whom. And while the main music theme is witttily
Italianate, it gets repetitious.
Otherwise, there are fine gags (the suspecting cop and brother-in-law seen
sniffing Russ' pants by Laurie across the alley is a classic moment) and no
villains. The general shabbiness is,without stressing it, a comment on
financially depressed little people in America today. Yet the overall mood
keeps us smiling with its un-gloppy affection for the three losers.
PALOOKAVILLE. Directed by Alan Taylor. Written by David Epstein.
Photography, John Thomas. Editing, David Leonard. Production design, Anne
Stuhler. Music, Rachel Portman. Cast: William Forsythe (Sid), Vincent Gallo
(Russ), Adam Trese (Jerry), Lisa Gay Hamilton (Betty), Kim Dickens
(Laurie),et al. A Samuel Goldwyn Co., release. 92 min. Rated R.(language)
The start of this movie is so amusing that what follows could have been an
anticlimax. It isn't though. The setting is contemporary Jersey City, a
shabby decaying town across the river from the wealth of New York City's
often shown skyscrapers.
Three unemployed, longtime buddies decide to resort to crime--strictly
temporarily.Likable and most unprofessional, in these high-tech times they
use primitive tools to try burglarizing a jewelry store. Instead, they
break into the adjoining bakery, where Jerry keeps gobbling pastries and
stuffing donuts inside his shirt. The sequence is treated with sweet
absurdism, close to Inspector Clouseau territory.
The protagonists' dwellings are low-income, cramped quarters. Interiors and
exteriors could, by and large, have been settings of past decades.Even the
pals' only car is an old clunker.
Handsome Jerry has a kid and a breadwinner wife. Betty is black. This helps
situate the film in recent times and adds a warm element  as absolutely no
special point is made of it.
Sid, whose spouse left him, lives with two shaggy, smelly dogs.
Saturnine-looking Russ lives with his mother, his sister, and her husband,
a sullen cop. Russ occasionally visits a friendly prostitute (Frances
McDormand in a cameo appearance) and regularly goes to bed with young,
pretty Laurie, who lives across the back alley and dreams of
California.Visits are easy as both have street-level bedroom windows.
After bungling their first job, the buddies plot others, with Russ as the
self-appointed brains and leader. Their discussions at their usual cafe can
be quite funny. One man dreams up the semi-legitimate notion of an
unlicensed car service for older people who can hardly afford cabs,
assuming these do show up. The smell of Sid's mutts, as they too travel in
the car,quickly sinks that scheme.
A somewhat forced incident suggests a plot involving an armored car. The
plan is hare-brained, the preparations dumbly funny. They include watching
a video of the 1950 movie "Armored Car Robbery" -- a pretty good film but
absurd in "Palookaville"'s context. The execution is comical. Connected,
unconnected and disconnected episodes flesh out the story, the characters,
the milieu
"Palookaville" is an amalgam loosely based on three early short stories by
Italo Calvino who wrote of the plight of ordinary Italians in the
post-World War II years.The atmosphere gets convincingly transferred to the
USA now.There is also the inspiration from the familiar Italian satire "Big
Deal on Madonna Street" (1958) which was about a gang of incompetent
amateur thieves. (The cast included Marcello Mastroianni, then known but
not yet made a major star by Fellini movies).
The director's first feature and the scriptwriter's first produced
screenplay, "Palookaville"  won the Kodak Prize for Best First Feature at
the 1995 Venice Film Festival. Some   inexperience shows in a certain lack
of clarity about people and places. I am no lover of artificial,
all-explaining expositions but I appreciate what might be called the
Hitchcockian introduction, where you don't have to wonder who is who,
where, and what to whom. And while the main music theme is witttily
Italianate, it gets repetitious.
Otherwise, there are fine gags (the suspecting cop and brother-in-law seen
sniffing Russ' pants by Laurie across the alley is a classic moment) and no
villains. The general shabbiness is,without stressing it, a comment on
financially depressed little people in America today. Yet the overall mood
keeps us smiling with its un-gloppy affection for the three losers.
This and other reviews are found at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for First Kid (1996)
FIRST KID (for kids under 10 ** ) Directed by David Mickey Evans.
Wrutten by Tim Kelleher. Photography, Anthony B. Richmond.
Editing,  Harry Keramidas. Production designer, Chester
Kaczenski. Costumes, Grania Preston. Music, Richard Gibbs.  Cast:
Sinbad (Sammy Simms), Brock Pierce (Luke Davenport), Blake
Boyd(Dash),
Timothy Busfield (Woods), James Naughton (President Davenport),
Lisa Eichhorn (the First Lady), et al. A Walt Disney Picture. 103
min. Rated PG.
Simms is not a rare last name, yet I wonder if the acronym widely
used in computer terminology (single inline memory modules) did
not influence this choice. Back to back we get David Simms (Don
Johnson) in "Tin Cup" and Sam Simms (Sinbad) in "First Kid." 
This may be the most interesting thing I have to say about "First
Kid," a wan comedy about Sammy who brings sunshine into the life
of young Luke, the son of the U.S. President.
Luke, 13 1/.2, is a pestiferous brat whose every step is followed by
a near-phalanx of Secret Service people. The sullen boy is notorious
for making their life miserable, above all for agent-in-chief Woods
who sticks to the kid (code-named Prince) like a tick. Luke also
uses his pet python to annoy or scare people. 
Matters reach a climax when the kid, reluctant to go and get
outfitted with ("dorky" says he) clothes for High School, moons 
everyone, the Press included, from shopping mall's fitting room.
The First Lady,  reacting peevishly to Agent Woods's reaction, has
him fired. His replacement is Simms whose ambition is to guard
Eagle (the President). Simms is a laid-back, unorthodox joker who
cons his way into getting freebies such as donuts. The assignment
to the Prince from Hell is a punishment. 
If you haven't guess it already, you soon realize that Luke's
nastiness comes from unhappiness. It's the old "Poor Little Rich
Kid," and "Bird in a Gilded Cage" setup. He has no friends ( an
improbable exaggeration in the script), no freedom of movement, no
normal teen-age life. His parents are too busy to take care of him,
even to see him often.
The President is a pallid character (cf. "Independence Day),  
running for re-election (cf. "The American President"). At least he's
not a crude politico as in "Dave," the best of the White House movie
fantasies. He is hardly even sketched in. 
The President is barely sketched in. The First Lady too, though we
sense that she is imperious, ambitious and cold. She could be called
by the epithet that the mother of a major player of the Opposition
to Bill Clinton used about Hillary while talking to reporter Connie
Chung. 
The movie and its development are totally predictable from the
word go. After a period of antagonism, the agent and the First Kid
bond --a cliche also familiar from boy-meets-girl flicks. The
understanding Simms breaks rule after rule to bring fun and
normalcy to Luke. You know that the bond has been cemented when,
following boxing practice in a gym, the two engage in high-fives.
"First Kid" is just a string of episodes. We get school sequences
where Simms has to attend all classes. A pretty teacher is thrown
in as a predictable (and undeveloped) romantic interest for Simms.
There's a class bully, puppy love and other unoriginalities. Hardly
any sequences flow naturally, rise above standard fare or are truly
believable.
The movie, merely mildly funny, is devoid of real humor or wit. It
often looks like an excuse for very pointed product placements,
from cereals, pizzas, doughnuts to a colossal plug for Coke.
The would-be comedic elements go from broad to very broad. At  a
Presidential reception, Simms, who wears flamboyant ties, is
rebuked by his superior "You know that this is black-tie affair."
Simms: "Got it covered. I'm wearing a tie and I'm black." Ugh.
At that reception Luke's python creates a panic. Pratfalls  follow. 
Simms plunges into a huge cake. Pie-throwing in silent films was
masterful by comparison.
The film goofs its details. As when Simms teaches Luke how to
dance, and the kid catches on far too fast. More amusing is when
the agent coaches the boy, via a two-way transmitter, to ask a girl
to a dance. This Cyrano Junior stuff could give some excellent clues
to students taking exams. 
The subject of a lonely, neglected First Kid could be interesting if
done sensitively and intelligently. Here, the closest we get  to
something substantial is when Simms tells the boy " You think it's
tough. You want my youth. Let me tell you about it." But this is not
explored either. 
All characters and performances are sketchy and by-the-numbers,
except for young Brock Pierce who is fair and Sinbad who is good.
The events are harmless and unsensational, until, that is, the film
starts wrapping up with grafted on, jarring scenes of violence,
blood and bullets. Even so, "First Kid" may work well with pre-teen
audiences -- but it is not a movie for unaccompanied adults.

Title
Review for King of Kings (1961)
KING OF KINGS (1961)  Directed by Nicholas Ray. Written by Philip 
Yordan. Photography, Franz Planer, Milton Krasner, Manuel Berenguer. 
Editing, Harold F. Kress, Renee Lichtig. Set design & costumes, 
Georges Wakhevitch. Music, Miklos Rosza. Producer, Samuel Bronston. 
Cast: Jeffrey Hunter,  Siobhan McKenna,  Hurd Hatfield, Ron Randell, 
Viveca Lindfors, Rita Gam, Carmen Sevilla, Brigid Bazlen, Harry 
Guardino, Rip Torn, Frank Thring, Guy Rolfe, Maurice Marsac, Gregoire 
Aslan, Royal Dano, Edric Connor, George Coulouris, et al.  168 
minutes.
In 1927, during the waning days of silents, Cecil B. DeMille made an 
impressive life-of-Jesus film called "King of Kings." Nicholas Ray's 
longer 1961 version goes one better. It is surprisingly moving and 
sober, and while reverential, it amounts to much more than a 
collection of biblical postcards. The narration, spoken by Orson 
Welles, is limited  (that is, not invasive) and well done.
The movie came after a spate of youth-centered pictures such as 
Nicholas Ray's own classic "Rebel Without a Cause" (1955), and after 
silly titles like "I Was a Teen-Age Frankenstein" or "I Was a 
Teen-Age Werewolf." So the wags dubbed it "I Was a Teen-Age Jesus " 
-- a  good jest had the movie deserved it.
But it didn't. The joke was unfair to the film, its makers and Jeff 
Hunter. Hunter's face may lack the necessary intelligence for his 
role, but he is so well directed that he's convincing enough.
True, his King's English is not perfect. Hunter tells the rebelling 
Jews : "Romans are conquerors. If you become conquerors you will be 
no different than them." Good pacifism, bad grammar. Someone ought to 
have caught that jarring "than" and credited Christ with better 
English, so to speak. But then, literacy is not Hollywood's forte.
The picture establishes a clear continuity from Jews to Christians, 
that is, it stresses the Christians as Jews. There are several 
unusual scenes. Among them, Golgotha's disorderly array of crosses 
comes through like a mass of TV antennas --whether by chance or on 
purpose I cannot tell. Curiously, the opening of Francois Truffaut's 
British-made "Fahrenheit 451" of 1967, with its own antennas, bears 
some resemblance to this.
(Interestingly, Ray Bradbury, whose book Truffaut adapted, is the 
uncredited writer of the narration of "King of Kings")
Jesus on the Cross is not a ghoulish sight. We see no torture. The 
descent comes very rapidly and discreetly. Physical violence and pain 
are neither underlined no exploited.
The interesting supporting cast includes Siobhan McKenna, Robert 
Ryan, Hurd Hatfield, Viveca Lindfors, Rita Gam and Rip Torn.
There are many Spanish supporting actors and extras. The movie was 
filmed in Spain, as was the entire quartet of "epics" produced by 
Samuel Bronston. These were Bronston's claims to fame:  "El Cid" 
(1961, also partly shot in Italy and the UK);  "The 55 Days of 
Peking" (1963); "The Fall of the Roman Empire" (1964). The 1960s were 
the heyday of shooting "epics" and action pictures in Spain, 
including the works of Sergio Leone --his justly famous Spaghetti 
Westerns --which were also Paella Westerns.
Beautiful score by Miklos Rozsa. "King of Kings" absolutely ought to 
be shown letterboxed, but is not always.  (Edwin Jahiel)
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for Smoke (1995)
*** 1/2
Directed by Wayne Wang.
Written by Paul Auster, 
Photography, Adam Holender.
Editing, Maysie Hoy.
Production design, Kalina Ivanova.
Costumes, Claudia Brown, Music, Rachel Portman.
Cast: Harvey Keitel (Auggie Wren ),William Hurt (Paul Benjamin),
      Harold Perrineau (Rashid Cole), Forest Whitaker (Cyrus Cole),
      Stockard Channing (Ruby McNutt), Ashley Judd (Felicity),
      Giancarlo Esposito, Jose Zuniga, Steven Gevedon (OTB men),
      Daniel Auster (book thief), et al.
A Miramax release.
112 minutes.
Rated R (language).
     Plain talk.  Barring a surprise, SMOKE, at the Art for two weeks,
is the best film in town and one of the top movies of the year.  While
directed by Wayne Wang (CHAN IS MISSING, DIM SUM, EAT A BOWL OF TEA,
THE JOY LUCK CLUB) it is presented as "A Film by Wayne Wang and Paul
Auster."  Rightly so, as the script (his first) by novelist Auster is
crucial to the movie.
     The title must be taken both literally and figuratively.
Literally as an anachronistic conceit: nearly everyone smokes in the
film, which is something of a challenge today, when smokers are treated
like the persecuted early Christians.  Figuratively as, to quote Auster
" A lot of talk in the movie is a smoke screen, the smoke that obscures
vision, that obscures understanding.  The film is about how people talk
to each other and listen to each other--or don't."
     SMOKE has a GHQ, the cigar store run by Harvey Keitel at a
Brooklyn corner.  It's a pa and ma store, without ma.  The people who
come in it and those around it catalyze a series of interlocking
events.  These involve Auggie (Keitel), who, among other endeavors, for
many years has been setting every single day a camera at the same spot
and the same hour outside the store, and photographing life as it goes
by.
     When writer Paul (Hurt) flips through photos that all look about
the same to him, Auggie admonishes him: "You'll never get it if you
don't slow down."  That's when Paul finds of his wife who, later, while
pregnant, was killed by a stray gang bullet.  Look and learn, learn the
differences, learn what's behind the surface.
     The movie pioneer D. W . Griffith said: "I want you to see."
Decades later, in Antonioni's BLOWUP, looking closely at a photograph
leads to a major revelation.  SMOKE however, adds listening to looking,
like one of those old railroad crossing signs: "Stop, Look and Listen."
     Seldom has an actor's name been more apt that here.  William Hurt,
whose first book was a success, is hurt by the death of his wife and
by the resulting new abstraction and inability to write.  He might have
been fatally hurt by a truck had a 1-year young black, Rashid, saved
him.  Later, Hurt is physically hurt too, but without lasting effects.
     Rashid, complex, confused, cool (in the old sense) yet simpatico
and mysterious, eventually becomes the temporary guest of Paul.  Rashid
is but one of the young man's names.  He is, like his host, a
myth-maker.  He invents facts about himself.  A mix of truth and lies
will later involve $5,000 in Rashid's possession and, separately, a
father who disappeared twelve years ago after his wife had died.
     It would be a disservice to the viewer to get into specifics, as
the movie, in addition to rich character studies, relationships,
atmosphere and tale-spinning, is also something of a suspense tale, not
in the thriller mode, but gently ironical.
     All this involves Auggie's semi-legal importing of Cuban cigars
for connoisseurs; the odd fate of those cigars; a visit to Auggie by
his old flame of 18-1/2 years ago, Ruby (a surprising Stockard
Channing); some hoodlums; Ruby's perhaps true perhaps false tale about
Auggie's grownup, crack-addicted daughter (a wonderfully vituperative
Ashley Judd); a one-armed garage owner (Forest Whitaker in a superbly
quiet performance); and colorful peripheral types.
     The inspiration for the film was "Auggie Wren's Christmas Story"
which Paul Auster published in the New York Times of Christmas Day
1990.  The film goes well beyond it, but is nonetheless incorporated as
a fascinating yarn told by Auggie to Paul, about how he came to own his
first camera.  It is a warm story, like all others in this
affectionate, intelligent movie that is both cinematic and literary.
It celebrates, in many ways, the power and beauty of the word along
with friendship, bonding, and generosity, which makes it a distant
kissin' cousin of the recent THE POSTMAN.  And it used its tales both
as stories and as metaphors.
     One of them, told to Rashid by Paul, is about a young man who
finds, many years later, the frozen body of his father buried in Alpine
snows.  The father, at his death, was younger than the son.  In the
film this leads symbolically to a subtle yet clear connection with
Rashid and his father.  Another deals with a World War soldier, a
writer who used up all the pages of his book to roll cigarettes in the
trenches.
     SMOKE is an entirely original movie, yet not without connections
to the yet unnamed genre of films with no traditional plot-line, but
with coincidences or simultaneous events, with several characters who
criss-cross, affect each other (or not), pick up the story, talk a
lot.  Among them Whit Stillman's METROPOLITAN and BARCELONA; several
Jim Jarmusch movies, notably NIGHT ON EARTH; CLERKS (and its
convenience store); Richard Linklater's SLACKER, all excellent
pictures.
     There is also some ancestry to one aspect of SMOKE, that of the
$5,000 that keep changing hands.  A 1993 sleeper, TWENTY BUCKS with
that smaller sum going from person to person, comes from a script of
the 1930s.  Frenchman-in-Hollywood Julien Duvivier made in 1942 TALES
OF MANHATTAN, about a tail coat that has successive owners.  But the
technique in SMOKE feels looser, truer and more improvised.
     Technically too the film is superior.  The photography is (without
oxymoron) carefully spontaneous, with a camera that's always on the
move, following its subjects as though we were scanning them.  In
contrast to the stillness and "mise en scene" approach of Auggie's
black and white photos, the various rhythms of the color camera and the
editing use "montage" but neither pointedly nor exhaustingly.  This is
buttressed by the topnotch work by the four women who acted as editor,
production designer, costume designer and composer.
     The direction by Wayne Wang is impressive and never obvious.  It
is "invisible direction."  You feel that Wang harmonizes and supervises
the actors rather than give them orders.  And that between Wang and
Auster there are delicate touches of making Auster-the-person into both
the Keitel and the Hurt characters, and bits of others too.
     All the performers are exceptionally good as well as (in the main
roles) likable.  Newcomer Harold Perrineau (Rashid) has, for me, the
most touching and effective presence and, perhaps more than Keitel and
Hurt, turns out to be the film's epicenter.

Title
Review for Todo sobre mi madre (1999)
ALL ABOUT MY MOTHER (TODO SOBRE MI MADRE)  (Spain , 1999) *** 1/2 
Written & directed by Pedro Almodovar. Executive producer, Agustin 
Almodovar. Photography, Affonso Beato. Editing, Jose Salcedo. 
Production director, Esther Garcia. Music, Alberto Iglesias. Cast: 
Cecilia Roth (Manuela), Marisa Paredes (Huma Rojo), Candel Pena 
(Nina), Antonia San Juan (Agrado), Penelope Cruz (Sister Rosa), Rosa 
Maria Sarda (Rosa's mother), Fernando Fernan Gomez (Rosa's father), 
Toni Canto (Lola), Eloy Azorin (Esteban),  Carlos Lozano (Mario), 
Fernando Guillen (Doctor in "Streetcar Named Desire") et al. A Sony 
Pictures Classics release. 101 minutes. R (sex talk, one 
drug-addicted character)
Pedro Almodovar made several shorts in 1974-79 and 13 features since 
1980 ("Dark Habits,'' Matador,'' "Women on the Verge of a Nervous 
Breakdown,'' "High Heels," etc.)  Though in Number 14    Almodovar 
seems to be gentler and kinder, it is no 180-degree departure from 
his past work. The enfant terrible of Spanish cinema, whether on the 
surface or below it, has always been kind,  gentle and humorous, and 
"Mother" has a lot of humor. It also has a lot of sadness, but it is 
mostly overcome by spunk, love and women's solidarity. For this is a 
movie  about women, dedicated to them, and placing them on some 
--admittedly weird--pedestals --and a paean to motherhood.
Enchanting, Argentina-born Cecilia Roth plays Manuela. In Madrid, she 
is a nurse, a coordinator of transplants in a hospital, and the 
single mother of Esteban. The mother-son relationship is beautiful in 
its friendship and affection. The boy, charming, smart, gifted, 
precociously cultured, wants to be a writer. He's already keeping 
notes.  Manuela has told that his father died before Esteban was 
born, but she keeps mum about anything regarding that man. She has 
old photos of herself where one-half is torn off. It is clear to the 
young man that the missing part portrayed his father. Esteban is 
curious.
On his 17th birthday Manuela and her son watch on TV the film "All 
About Eve." Inspired, Esteban titles his notebook "All About my 
Mother."
The two go to the theater. The much-admired Huma Rojo plays Blanche 
in "A Streetcar Named Desire." After the show, as Esteban rushes in 
the rain to get the star's autograph, he gets killed by a car. With 
black irony, Manuela is asked for permission to transplant his heart.
The movie is so rich in characters and episodes that detailing them 
would be a disservice to potential viewers.  Simplifying  the story, 
I will say that Manuela, after an 18-year absence from her native 
Barcelona, returns to find the boy's father, to tell him that he had 
a son, that the son always thought of his father. For the latter, 
also named Esteban, was alive (but not well), and had become Lola.
You have to stay alert to figure out who the characters are, and 
what, including Manuela in her earlier days. Let's just state that 
the milieu in which Manuela will move in Barcelona is one of 
prostitutes, transvestites, transsexuals and other "exceptional" 
cases. Yet it remains an essentially warm and loving circle, partly 
because of a line quoted from "Streetcar," about 'the kindness of 
strangers.'
Coincidences abound in the movie, but do not distract or detract. 
Manuela's quest for Lola starts with a meeting of an old friend, the 
transsexual prostitute Agrado, which roughly translated means "I 
please." This in turn leads to  pretty young nun Rosa, who cares for 
destitute prostitutes. Rosa is the alienated (but not in the usual 
way) child of a mother who paints fake Chagalls, and a father who has 
Alzheimer's or something like that. He's totally out of it.
The plot then adds the presence of the "Streetcar" troupe that is now 
playing in Barcelona; the connections of, first Manuela, then Agrado, 
with the thespians; the lesbian affair between Huma (the name means 
roughly "chainsmoker") and Nina, who plays Stella. Says Huma:" Nina 
is addicted to heroin, I am addicted to Nina." Then comes the 
revelation that Rosa is pregnant (by, guess who? Lola! ) and 
HIV-positive.
This is melodrama --down to the near-miraculous happy ending two 
years later.-- barefaced and proud of it. In American cinema the 
German-born Douglas Sirk was notorious  for his melodramas. Wild and 
woolly Almodovar runs circles around Sirk and such. He is enamored of 
Hollywood melodramatic films (cited among other filmic references) as 
well as Latin American movies of that type. It may sound like a 
penchant for pop culture, but then I remember that the great 
critic-scholar of theater Eric Bentley declared (if my quotation is 
right) that "Melodrama is the essence of theater."
Melodrama with twist after twist, including something that the rich 
American cinema ignores to the point of destruction: literacy and 
culture. Not only film references abound, but literary ones nicely 
worked in: Tennessee Williams, Truman Capote, Boris Vian...
"Mother" is theater of emotions, but it is not judgmental. Nor is it 
"classical" in format. It is shot with Almodovarian avant-garde 
techniques, camera angles and tricks, garishly pleasant colors. 
Almodovar plays a game of Chinese boxes, with film-within-film, 
videos, TV, with symbols within the hyper-realistic context. Think of 
how the transplants, in their own remote way also evoke esthetic 
surgery and transsexual operations.
The word "tolerance" is never spoken but the notion is there, all 
over, not as a plea but as a necessity for life.
What is really surprising is the tolerance of today's Spain vis-a-vis 
subjects that once were taboo. After its Civil War, General Francisco 
Franco ruled the country from 1939 to his death in 1975. Censorship 
and self-censorship reigned in that prudish, conservative nation. In 
the last part of Franco's life, a number of movies appeared which 
--like many Polish films--used on-the-face-of-it politically 
innocuous themes, but in reality had camouflaged sub-texts, 
metaphors, symbols which the savvy audiences understood. Then Spain 
exploded after Franco's demise. I still remember kiosks with 
astounding arrays of "girlie" if not porno magazines. Even so, it 
took Almodovar (who is homosexual) to become the most influential 
agent provocateur in cinema, to the extent that today, a major, 
sexually outspoken film like "Mother" (which was awarded Best 
Director at Cannes 99) is accepted without second thoughts in Spain 
but would have trouble in the United States.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Title
Review for She's All That (1999)
SHE'S ALL THAT  ** Directed by Robert Iscove. Written by R. Lee Fleming
Jr..Photography, Francis Kenny. Editing, Casey O. Rohrs. Production design,
Charles Breen. Music, Stewart Copeland. Cast: Freddie Prinze Jr. (Zack
Siler), Rachael Leigh
Cook (Laney Boggs), Matthew Lillard (Brock Hudson), Paul Walker (Dean
Sampson), Jodi Lyn O'Keefe (Taylor Vaughan), Usher Raymond (Campus D.J.),
Kevin Pollak (Wayne Boggs), Anna Paquin  (Mackenzie Siler), Kieran Culkin
(Simon Boggs), Elden Henson (Jesse Jackson), et al. A Miramax release.
about 90 minutes, PG-13
"She's All That" is a high school picture. roughly, vaguely a descendant of
Fast Times at Richmond High which  started a new sub-genre back in 1982.
The title is even harder to remember that most forgettable ones. It might
mean something in school parlance. Can't tell.
1) The great majority of high schools are in California. That's normal
since the Hollywood gospel tells us that the great majority of anything in
the United States of America is in California.(There was a fairly brief
time when schools of any kind, in film, could be also found in the Midwest
and the East, but those choices seem to be on the downslope.)
2) High school students are either "in" or "out" -- no exceptions.
3) They have two major factions, jocks and nerds. This is an international
phenomenon.  Ages ago, the first person in my family to attend universities
--in Belgium and France--reported that there were two groups: the athletes
and the esthetes. The difference in the USA is that, per Hollywood, the
athletes are in and the esthetes are out .
4) In all high-school movies, at least some "outies" will become "innies"
5) Romance is the main subject studied.
6) Ladies, You Too Can Be Ravishing. Wallflowers, ugly ducklings, plain or
unnoticed types can be transformed into winners, pretty butterflies.
7) Groups or gangs of pals are ethnically mixed. This means Political
Correctness.But does is mean reality?
8) A great deal of students have nice, shiny cars. In most countries on
this planet, if you tell anyone that your cleaning-person drives to your
home, they react as to a Martian story.
9) That (was this said by Dorothy Parker?) "men don't make passes at girls
who wear glasses" may still be a movie cliche though no longer true in the
real world.
At the HS in question, Zack, 18 (top student, top athlete, top everything)
is dumped without a by-our-leave, by semi-statuesque Taylor, the object of
many a desire. She takes up with the improbable, clownish Brock who is
played by an actor featured in TVs The Real World.
With the Senior Prom six weeks away,, Zack finds himself dateless. (If you
ever wondered what tragedy means, there you have it). His buddy Paul taunts
him. Zack claims that he could find the most unlikely girl and transform
her in a Prom Queen. The boys have a bet.
The girl selected is rather petite Laney, 17, who keeps her own counsel,
does not mix, except for colors with which she paints sad stuff (she's
still traumatized by the death, some years ago, of her beloved, artistic
mother ),  uses no makeup, does not dress with chic.  (The clothes thing is
pushed by having her also wear an outrageously ugly outfit at the
restaurant where she works after school).She is shy, gauche, mistrustful of
boys. But, you guessed it, she really has brains and character.
Zack makes awkward approaches, is trapped into saying that he is interested
in art. Laney invites him to a theatrical performance by youths. This is
one of the few funny parts in the film. On a stage there's Performance Art
. It is caricatured, leaves you with the feeling that the moment you call
something Art, it becomes just that. Zack is stuck with improvising a
number with a bean bag. Amusing.
To make an essentially tedious story short. A bond starts forming between
the two. Zack protects Laney's younger brother Simon who works in the HS
cafeteria  from bullies who want the kid to eat a pizza decorated with
pubic hair.
To Laney's surprise Zack mounts a campaign for her to become Prom Queen. He
also brings in a team to clean her house, presumably to free her for a
makeup plus total makeover session with his younger sister Mackenzie.
What do you bet that all that, plus a nice new dress, will transform Laney
into a pretty, cute young lady?  That she even moves gracefully now. OK.
You won. This means that you have watched at least two more HS movies in
your lifetime.
Brock (see above), in bed with Taylor, would rather watch on TV The Real
World and himself in it, than make love with the girl. Without
explanations, just before the prom date,  Taylor tells Zack she wants to go
back to him. Brock has dumped her.
Cutting to the chase. Zack's pal Paul (he who made the bet) starts pursuing
the New Laney. She will lose to Taylor for Queen, but by a small margin.
The prom has a most improbable, professionally choreographed dance.Paul has
paid $300 for a hotel room where he is certain he can seduce the New Laney.
Instead, after a misunderstanding, she and Zack get back together.
The movie is slight, uneven, patchy and crammed with deja vu. There are a
few good moments, but the dialogue among the teens, in jargon, is not among
them. It's on the same level of interest as that of kids phoning each other
by the hour.
Kieran Culkin and Anna Paquin (my, has she grown up since "The Piano"!)
have little to do but do it in likable ways.
The "plot" is all surface and does not develop its sub-sub-themes. Among
them, that of Zack's dad. who's been forever bugging his son. Papa's four
years at Darmouth were the best in his life. He has developed an obsession
for his boy to go to a major institution, and has been hammering this point
ever since the kid was five.The reaction is that while  Zack  has been
accepted at every Ivy League University, he has hidden this from his
parents. Father finds the letters and has a heart-to-heart talk with the
young man. The full situation has potential but remains skin-deep.
Among the many more barely sketched-out themes is the fact that Paul has
betrayed Zack because he (Paul) was falling in love with Laney. But, boom!,
we suddenly learn that he was after carnal knowledge first and last. Then
there's the unexplained blond male friend of Laney's. Her only
pre-transformation pal? A co-nerd?
'Nuff said. The film, apparently enjoyed by the young teens, all girls, in
"my" audience, is, for viewers over 19, not as bad as watching the hearings
in Washington, but not as good as watching the Animal Channel.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Guantanamera (1994)
GUANTANAMERA (Cuba,1994)  *** 1/2  Directed by Tomas Gutierrez Alea and
Juan Carlos Tabio. Written by Eliseo Alberto Diego ,Alea and Tabio.
Photography, Hans Burmann. Art direction, Onelia Larralde. Music, Jose
Nieto. Editing, Carmen Frias. Cast: Carlos Cruz (Adolfo), Mirtha Ibarra
(Georgina, aka Gina), Raul Eguren (Candido), Jorge Perugorria (Mariano),
Pedro Gernandez (Ramon), Luis Alberto Garcia Novoa (Tony), Cochita Brando
(Aunt Yoyita), Suset Perez Malberti (Oku), et al. A Cinepix release.
Subtitled. 104 minutes. Not rated.
Road movie, farce, satire, picaresque picture, black comedy, bedroom farce....
Take your pick as they all apply to "Guantanamera," the last film by the
"Maestro" of Cuban Cinema, Tomas Gutierrez Alea (1928-1996), called Titon
(Tee-TON) by all his friends. He was already ill with lung cancer when he
made it.  As for his penultimate feature "Strawberry and Chocolate" (1993)
he sought the collaboration of filmmaker Juan Carlos Tabio, 15 years his
junior, who also gets directorial credit in both features.
"Guantanamera" means the woman from Guantanamo (the town, not the U.S.
base). It is probably the best-known Cuban song. In Cuba, various singers
put their own lyrics on the melody. Here it is heard several times, with
different comments, descriptions or suggestions.
The film's structure is that of the familiar road  movie in which  people
try to get from point A to point B as events, happenings or adventures
accumulate. In her teens, Yoyita left Guantanamo, became a famous singer,
returned after 50 years to see her niece Georgina (aka Gina), also met
Candido, the great love of her youth who had never stopped thinking of her.
The charming senior citizens have a wonderfully romantic reunion.  They
reminiscences of the same event but with different images, are just like
those of former lovers Maurice Chevalier and Hermione Gingold singing "I
Remember It Well" in the musical "Gigi." Then big-time artist Yoyita dies
suddenly in the arms of provincial brass-player Candido.
The main female role belongs to Gina. She is played by the enchanting
stage-and-screen actress Mirtha Ibarra, whose film debut was in "The Last
Supper" by Alea. Mirtha and Titon married (he for the second time), had
three daughters and were still together 22 years later, when Titon died.
Gina, formerly an economics professor, is now married to Adolfo, an
official fallen from grace (for undisclosed reasons). Sidelined by the
administration as the head of a minor committee on burials, he is now
trying to regain recognition. Adolfo conceives a pea-brained scheme for
savin fuel in gasoline-strapped Cuba:  those who die far from their desired
burial places will be transported by a system of relays between cemeteries.
Fate would have it that the first candidate for this long-distance
experiment is Auntie Yoyita, who must be taken to Havana, almost at the
other end of the island. The trip,  fraught with obstacles and
coincidences, takes through the landscape and, more importantly, the
humanscape. We see a Cuba whose inhabitants do not lose their sense of
humor but have to invent ways to survive financially. Truck-driver Mariano
who has an engineering degree but must make a living, and his more mature
buddy Ramon, who though sensible still believes in witchcraft, take illegal
passengers. Sellers along the roads  offer goods, mostly edibles, for
dollars, not Cuban money. Adolfo has none, but his chauffeur, himself a
black-marketeer (or entrepreneur) does, buys bananas and shares them with
his boss.
A sly reminder by a tour guide mentions that a certain town, over several
centuries was the center of smuggling and had dealings with forbidden
countries. It doesn't take a doctorate in history to see the reference to
contemporary Cuba.
The paths of Mariano's truck and Adolfo's troublesome car (no doubt
Soviet-built) with Adolfo, Gina and Candido as passengers, keep crossing.
Both background and foreground keep pointing to the shortages (of
everything) in Cuba, where one-table "secret" restaurants spring up; where
a fan-belt is a small treasure; where coupons are needed for many things,
even in a cemetery's cantina; where the car's riders munch bananas from the
subterranean economy as the radio spouts positive agricultural statistics
Among many disturbances, there's another romance brewing. I will not let
the cat out of the bag except to say that Mariano is at the love story's
epicenter, and that he complicates things. Mariano is a Don Juan with the
equivalent of a girl in every port. Here it's a lover in every town,
gas-station, truck-stop or train-crossing. (A sex-hungry young woman brings
to mind the Czech satire "Closely Watched Trains.") The relationships are
funny even when the premises are not.
Gags are brought in naturally.  Windshield wipers activate when the car is
bumped;  a woman tells of man who died unexpectedly, then reveals that he
was 107 years old.  But "Guantanamera" is not simply an entertainment. It
is a movie about life, love and death during the hard times of an
impoverished nation.
Alea, started his career as a dedicated celebrant of the Cuban Revolution.
Later, when he made the first big pictures that brought him international
fame ("Death of a Bureaucrat"1966; "Memories of Underdevelopment"
1968),many began to see him as a critic of the Fidel Castro regime, even
though Alea and Castro had been schoolmates and were friends. But it was a
misinterpretation of Alea's complexity, and a matter of semantics.
As Alea repeatedely phrased it (with varations), "to be critical is to make
a militant film for the Revolution". Or, "for the Revolution to grow, for
our country to develop positively, criticism is necessary."
"Guantanamera" has no villains. It looks upon all its characters with
sympathy, understanding or at a minimum, tolerance. The main butt of its
criticism is Adolfo, that misguided, counterproductive, symbolic,
ambitious, egotistic and silly bureaucrat. In its own, rather kinky way,
"Guantanamera" is like Part Two of "Death of a Bureaucrat" of some thirty
years earlier. Like that film, like much of the rest of Alea's output
(about a dozen out of a total of ca. 22 pictures), there's always a tricky
patriotic balancing act of theory against practice, of Marxist dialectics
that uphold principles while they castigate misapplications. The process,
neither obvious nor simple-minded, sometimes caused confusion in the public
as well as the critics.
It seems to me that Alea is sending his viewers, especially the Cubans, a
message about the necessity to clean house. This is colorfully, deviously,
subtly recounted  as the legend of Olofin, the God who created life  but
forgot to create death. There follow millenia of ever-aging populations
which engulf the young -- until the other deity, Iku, brings about rain and
floods, so that all the aged drown and only physically fit younger people
survive. Thus did Iku terminate progress-impeding immortality. All this is
far more poetic than the American "Time for a change," or "We need new
blood."
Among the subtleties of this seemingly simple movie, is the fact that we
see very  few slogans: only one banner says "Socialism or Death." And the
fact that this seriocomic, appealing "realistic fantasy" neither mentions
nor hints at the Big Bad Wolf. One can almost hear Alea saying:  "Yes, the
Yankees are partly to blame for our troubles, but we should not use this as
an excuse or an alibi for our own shortcomings."
"Guantanamera" was nominated for the Golden Lion at the 1996 Venice Film
Festival and honored at several others.

Title
Review for General, The (1998)
THE GENERAL (UK, 1998) *** 1/2  Written, directed and produced by John
Boorman. Photography, Seamus Deasy. Editing, Ron Davis. Production design,
Derek Wallace. Music, Richie Buckley. Cast: Brendan Gleeson (Martin
Cahill), Maria Doyle Kennedy (Frances), Angeline Ball (Tina), Eamon Owens
(young Cahill), Jon Voight (Inspector Ned Kenny), et al. A Sony Classics
release. 125 minutes.Not rated.
The Monday morning post-mortems about why, in the 1999 Oscars, Best Picture
went to Shakespeare in Love and not to Saving Private Ryan, produced some
good guesses.Among them, that the many academy voters who saw Ryan on home
video were not watching the real thing, since Ryan absolutely requires a
large screen.
This also applies to many a movie. So please see The General now, in a
theater.
Made by London-born Englishman John Boorman in his beloved Ireland,where he
lived for some 25 years, The General ranks with his best:  Point Blank ,
Deliverance,  Excalibur, The Emerald Forest, Hope and Glory, Beyond Rangoon.
It is about a major malefactor and his life. Martin Cahill really did exist
in Dublin. His c.v. runs like a catalogue of crime.He was a thief, a
suspected killer, a libertine, a bigamist, a weird art-loving collector who
stole paintings, a perpetrator of much else, all of it illegal.
His disdain for authority was monumental. It included the law, the
authorities, the English, even the Church (which for an Irishman is
anomalous). Hubristically, he defied the power of the police and, better
yet (or as turns out, worse for him), he challenged the might of the IRA.
The film takes Cahill from his assasination to his assassination, as this
event frames the movie. It  segues with just parts of his life story,
starting with the childhood of a preternaturally gifted, audacious and
self-controlled young thief. Cahill the adult is played by Brendan Gleeson
who is said to look uncannily like his model.
Gleeson-Cahill has a potato face and a potato-sack body, which ought not to
be derogatory terms in spud-loving Ireland. As conceived and performed he
makes us sidestep both our potentially romantic views and our indignation.
The picture lets us have our ups and downs in evaluating Martin, who could
be a vulgar but friendly teddy bear one moment, a crass torturer the next.
He became a celebrity in Ireland.The myth around him was often that of a
modern Robin Hood, which he decidedly was not. He may have given some money
way, but not on any large scale. But he certainly was a robbin' hood.
Boorman falls neither for the cliches nor for the conventions of the
gangster film genre. The General is a Thoroughly Modern Movie in every
aspect: conception, construction, editing, camera-work and all. But not of
the kind that shouts "modernism!" and tries to impress you with its
techniques. The techniques are there, but unshowy and clearly harking back
to Boorman's early period as a first-rate director of fifty-plus
documentaries for the BBC.
As an individual, and especially as the leader and brains of a gang, Cahill
was -- and remains on celluloid-- an amazing tactician. He plans and plots
cleverly and minutely, he thinks on his feet, improvises, makes instant
decisions, never loses his cool. He is so brazen that the word could have
been invented for him.  His brazenness may well have been his best weapon.
Scorning all that's scornable, the only thing he did not do was to thumb
his nose, literally, in courts or police stations. This, because in his
public appearances, he favored wearing hooded coats and spreading his hands
over his face, as though this would make him The Invisible Thug. Those
peculiarities add a kind of childish naivete to the man, although my better
guess is that they were his ways to avoid showing his true reactions, those
facial expressions that might have worsened his case.
Brendan Gleeson is the sort of  superbly skilled realistic actor that you
do not watch him as a thespian but as the character he lives, lives in, and
portrays. John Voight, Boorman's old friend from Deliverance, sports an
Irish accent that sounds genuine -- at least to American ears-- as he plays
(very well)  police inspector Ned Kenny whose Holy Grail was to get Cahill.
Somewhere, someone compared Kenny to the French Inspector Javert who
hounded Jean Valjean in Les Miserables. Not so.There is no cruelty, no
villainy about Kenny, and no innocence about Cahill.
The film is elliptical. Not to the point of confusing you but to the point
of asking for concentration. This task is sometimes arduous given the often
undecipherable accents. At  the Cannes Festival where I first saw the
picture, American critics who could not read the French subtitles were
often puzzled by the dialogue. For example, some people were confused by
Cahill's marital status: he has a lovely wife who has a lovely younger
sister with whom he also sleeps -- with the wife's blessing. A menage a
trois that even raised the eyebrows of some tolerant French spectators. In
addition we see our non-Robin stealthily stealing a child's toy while some
neighbors sleep. Its destination is the child he has had with his
sister-in-law.
Boorman decided to film in black and white. Says he: " Color films are too
saturated. They prettify. They vulgarize. And particuarly, they romanticize
poverty.[...] B &W abstracts while color distracts [...] But there are
deeper reasons. Most of us dream in B & W [...] a B & W film approaches the
condition of a dream, of memory, reaches out into the audience's
subconscious. There was often a mythic dimension to B & W movies. They
presented a familiar yet alien world, a contiguous reality."
The movie used color stock which was printed in B & W, a system that can
enhance shadings. And they shot in CinemaScope format which, used
intelligently, allows the screen's expansion to places that need to be
included. The B & W use of Scope reminds me somewhat of Francois Truffaut
's creative photography in Jules and Jim.
Not that friendship is celebrated as in Truffaut's movie. What's generated
is minute, complicated team-planning which is executed with brash
clockwork. There is strong suspense in the carrying out of holdups and
burglaries. The step-by-step preparations and crimes are not as detailed as
in Kubrick's race-track heist-movie The Killers, or Rififi's jewel robbery
that was made in France by American self-exile Jules Dassin. What I do
sense in the Cahill gang is a new element, the amazing luck that
accompanies the General's strategies. And all this has a constant
accompaniment of humor and amusing bits, even while you are aware that
Martin, his men and their actions are far from funny.
The movie's Irishness is beautifully observed, with no sentimentality, no
stress on poverty, no blarney, no unnecessary colorfulness. What there is
instead is Boorman's fascination with Cahill. The bottom line is that
Martin comes through as extraordinarily clever and innovative in his
avocation, but most likely a hollow man with no real interests --except for
his family and his bourgeois menage a trois--outside his profession. He
lived comfortably from his often spectacularly profitable hauls;  he took,
democratically, only one standard share; he did not drink or do drugs; his
home was nfancy middle-class;   and in general his kind of life that a 9 to
5 mid-rank employee might live. Cahill remains a mystery. Were his actions
motivated by a compulsion? As in Robert Bresson's "Pickpocket" but on a
gigantic scale?
Just as fascinating as the film is John Boorman's "A personal  account of
the making of The General" which runs nine tightly packed pages. It is both
an Odyssey and an Iliad  of the endless, complicated steps, search for a
producer and for funds, problems, troubles, financial deals, legal battles,
disappointments, searches, stumbling blocks, etc. from conception to
fruition. The shoot lasted eleven weeks; the preliminaries took years.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Up Close & Personal (1996)
UP CLOSE & PERSONAL ** 1/2  Directed by Jon Avnet.  Written by 
Joan Didion and John Gregory Dunne, suggested by the book 
"Golden Girl" by Alanna Nash. Photography, Karl Walter 
Lindenlaub. Editing, Debra Neil-Fisher. Production design, 
Jeremy Conway. Music, Thomas Newman. Produced by Avnet, David 
Nicksay and Jordan Kerner. Cast: Robert Redford (Warren 
Justice), Michelle Pfeiffer (Tally Atwater), Stockard Channing 
(Marcia McGrath), Joe Mantegna (Bucky Terranova), Kate 
Nelligan (Joanna Kennelly), Glenn Plummer (Ned Jackson), James 
Rebhorn (John Merino), et al. A Touchstone release. 124 mins. 
PG-13.
Hereafter this uncatchily titled movie will be referred to as 
UCAP, which sounds like another University of California 
campus yet. There is nothing academic about the movie though, 
except for the academic response by those who persist in 
connecting the film to "A Star Is Born" or ASIB. In this, they 
have been influenced by the fact that Joan Didion  and husband 
John Gregory Dunne (novelists, non-fiction writers, 
screenwriters), had also penned the third version  (1976, with 
Barbra Streisand) of ASIB -- the fourth, if you include  "What 
Price Hollywood" (1932), the root-film. (Be it said in passing 
that the 1976 film was far inferior to all its predecessors).
In the earlier movies, a male celebrity brings fame and 
fortune to an aspiring younger woman. As her star rises, his 
falls. In ASIB 1 and 2, the man is a Hollywood star named 
Norman Maine. He sinks into alcoholism and commits suicide, 
upon which, his widow Vicki Lester (nee Esther Blodgett) 
addressing the public, starts with the famous: "This is Mrs. 
Norman Maine." 
There is really very little of ASIB in UCAP. Here,Sallyanne 
Atwater (Michelle Pfeiffer) is an untutored nobody from 
Nevada. Determined to make her way into TV, she fakes her 
credentials,does not fool Warren Justice (Robert Redford),the 
news director of a Miami station, yet still gets hired as an 
assistant.
The movie opens like a sitcom, with Sally's silly string of 
little accidents. It also telegraphs immediately the 
inevitable love affair.Indeed, the very names Pfeiffer and 
Redford do this, even if you haven't seen the film or heard of 
it. To its credit, unlike the zillion flicks that set up 
antagonism-that-will-turn-to-amore, the relationship of the 
couple is cool, un-strident and quite harmonious.
To make a long story short (TMLSS), ambitious Sally gets her 
chance, muffs it, but Warren dismisses this, hyperbolically 
declaring that "she eats the lens" (don't try this at home). 
He grooms, protects, molds Sally, rebaptized Tally. She 
becomes, with peculiar swiftness and no obvious reason (except 
her looks), a star. 
The other side of the coin is that Warren, a bastion of 
journalistic integrity, won't play footsie with 
TV-exploitation and will find his star waning. (It had 
happened to him before, but never mind). 
There's a bunch of colorful happenings in the depiction of TV 
station life: professional rivalries, banter, competitiveness. 
These may not be authentic, but, as Hitchcock used to say, 
it's only a movie. Most of the shenanigans are interesting, 
some of the gags and the like fall a bit flat. You can tell 
which  those are by listening the the audience: it laughs 
louder. 
By minute 40 there is a loss of momentum, especially with an 
interlude where Tally goes to Reno to rescue her sister and  
Warren  surprisingly shows up and lends a hand. Unconvincing.
Sex comes in at minute 54, right after Tally gets an offer to 
move to another, bigger affiliate, in  Philadelphia. Pleasant 
romantic stuff, but did writers Didion and Dunne have to 
include the inevitable cliche of the couple having fun on the 
beach to the off-screen sounds and soupy lyrics of a love 
song?  Mercifully,this second interlude is brief.
Tally goes to Philly, has to put up with the barbs of older 
anchorwoman Stockard Channing (as always, very good) who sees 
the handwriting on the wall, meaning that Tally will probably 
replace her. Tally does well, but has some troubles. Warren to 
the rescue. They also marry. 
Warren is out of a job but manages to remote-control Tally, 
stuck inside a rioting prison, into doing a great telecast. (I 
don't see what's great about it, but never mind). Her star 
skyrockets and she's offered to anchor (for weekends only) at 
the network. Oh, bliss. Further developments will not be 
disclosed.
The film, genuinely or not, is well fleshed out with the 
hectic, frantic atmosphere of big-time TV. Above all, there's 
that couple that drips charisma. That Pfeiffer is almost 40 
and Redford almost 60 makes no difference. Her beauty, in the 
small group of a Loretta Young or a Pamela Kohn, is buttressed 
by charm. His oxymoronic laid-back intensity is a joy. The 
electricity is good. And it is not Redford's fault that 
Didion-Dunne dreamed up the silly, in-joke name of Warren 
Justice (Chief Justice Earl Warren, get it?). 
Director Avnet directs well, but, keen as he reportedly is for 
every shot to be perfect, he sometimes neglects the cartilage 
between shots,the editing. 
The movie, at some point, was to be based on the short unhappy 
life of the late TV news-star Jessica Savitch. Happily, 
there's nothing of that left in the final script, which is a 
hybrid of older movies.  
It's no "Network," no "Broadcast News" in depth or intensity, 
no "China Syndrome" in suspense. It is no "Switching Channels" 
(the undervalued remake of "The Front Page" and "His Girl 
Friday" shifted from press to TV) in comedy. UCAP is more skin 
than nerves, yet a good pastime and no rip-off of your time 
and money. 

Title
Review for Heavy (1995)
HEAVY (1995, US release1996)*** 1/2  Directed and written by James
Mangold. Photography, Michael Barrow. Editing,Meg Reticker. Production
design,Michael Shaw. Music,Thurston Moore. Producer, Richard Miller.
Cast: Pruitt TaylorVince (Victor), Liv Tyler (Callie), Shelley Winters
(Dolly), Deborah Harry (Delores), Joe Grifasi (Leo), Evan Dando (Jeff).
A CFP release, 105 min. Not rated. (Nothing objectionable)
Decades ago, the  term "Theater of Silence" was applied in France to
plays in which rhetoric was replaced by restrained speech, where
dialogues comprised hesitations, where the subtext was more important
than the text. The appellation did not last long, yet found its
application in several theatrical genres, such as the work of Samuel
Beckett. 
Most people have forgotten this. James Mangold probably never heard of
it, yet his "Heavy" fits that category well. A first feature yet a true
original, it was rightly awarded the Grand Jury Prize for Best Direction
at the Sundance Film Festival in early 1995. A good guess of why it was
released in the U.K. in 1995 but had to wait for U.S. distribution until
past mid-1996, is that this a maverick work, serious, non-Hollywoodish
and not catering to immature audiences. 
Set in upstate New York in and around a roadhouse, the film has few sets
and even fewer characters. The tavern is named "Pete and Dolly's" after
the long-deceased Pete and his widow (Shelley Winters) who runs the
place. The sign ought to have changed to "Dolly's," but then time stands
still in this story. Regulars come and go as the diner also seems
isolated in space. We guess that it is near a town, but except for the
time when a hospital comes into the picture, "P & D" might as well be
miles from any urban agglomeration.
Molly's son, the thirtysomething Victor, is severely balding, heavy
(like "big" an euphemism for "fat"), 100 percent shy and 99 percent
silent. Not reserved, reticent, laconic. Not romantically taciturn. Just
silent. In the entire movie he utters just a few words, and when, under
stress, he does speak out, he breaks his record with two sentences.
That's near the end when he tells Delores  "You don't have to be nice,
only nicer" "Or what, Victor?" "I'll fire you." In a less restrained
movie you might feel like applauding.
The causes for this are not made known. One facile explanation goes that
Dolly is an overbearing mother --yet we don't see excessive control by
her, while her love for Victor is fairly obvious. There must have been
some sympathy for the heavy Victor character by Shelley Winters who went
from slim to...well, heavy. The Mama's Boy syndrome was much clearer in
"Only The Lonely (1991)"  a fine film where a Chicago policeman  (the
late, lamented, hefty John Candy) falls in love.  
The root of the trouble is more likely that Victor's poundage --tough
the man is far from  a monster of obesity --weighs heavy on his mind,
especially as he can't help eating  high-fat and junk foods. With
typical restraint, the film does not make a big show of this. But then,
to argue with myself, it is also clear that overeating can be a symptom
of other problems -- so we're back to square one.
In the meantime we might wonder at the increasing number of recent
movies that deal, directly or not, with food and sometimes with the
exclusively American problem of obesity. 
Let me only say that "Heavy" is a million times preferable to "Thinner." 
The film opens with Molly hiring pretty Callie as a new waitress, to the
silent jealousy of Delores, the older barmaid and only other employee.
She has been around the block before, semi-flirts with elbow-bending
Leo,the most regular of regulars,ever-present on his bar stool. Delores
just might have views of permanency also with Victor. The un-cliched
Delores, warts and all like Molly, comes through as likable. 
Callie is sweet, natural, none too talkative. He has an immediate,
silent crush on her and becomes even more conscious of his weight. The
rapport between the two, almost wordless, is immediate. But when, at
closing time, Callie declares :"My boyfriend is waiting," you can sense
the sky falling on Chicken Little.
There is little action and plot --as usually understood -- so that the
developments should not be divulged here. The film is, above all, one of
original, quiet yet minute observation of characters and relationships,
notably Victor's. It may, for some viewers, feel a bit heavy and in need
of some pruning, but on second thought, the same viewers might realize
that the length (not excessive by today's standards) allows the movie to
develop, so that several poignant, even heart-breaking passages
(Victor's mostly) can affect us as they do. Mind you, for the little
that is happening, a lot is happening too. What I mean by this paradox
will be understood by a sensitive public.
Lest one get the wrong idea, note that the beauty of "Heavy" is in its
details. The film is under the twin signs of naturalism and minimalism
in everything: script, direction, sets, the excellent photography and
editing, the music that does not obtrude and does the right thing at the
right moments. But naturalism does not preclude some very good scenes of
visions by Victor, including his first kiss with Callie -- as a
mouth-to-mouth resuscitation. And  minimalism does away with
elaborations of unnecessary sights, such as details about the bar's
customers, or the guitar-strumming, singing Jeff, Callie's garage
mechanic boyfriend who is played by a member of the band "The
Lemonheads." 
It came as no surprise to learn that 32-year old James Mangold is the
son of well-known painters, that among his earlier works was a
documentary about his mother, and that his father is a minimalist
artist. 
Mr. Mangold has made no compromises. In its sympathetic but un-gooey
attitudes, the movie avoids the obviousness of melodrama, replaces
audience-pleasing but dishonest twists with real life (there is no
closure, for example), finds perfect interpreters in its cast.

Title
Review for Lonelyhearts (1959)

LONELYHEARTS  (1958) *** Directed by Vincent J. Donehue. Written and
produced by Dore Schary, from the short novel "Miss Lonelyhearts" by
Nathanael West and the play by Howard Teichmann. Photography, John Alton.
Art, Serge Krizman. Sets, Darrell Silvera. Editing, Aaron Stell & John
Faure. Music, Adolph Deutsch, Conrad Salinger. Cast:
Montgomery Clift, Robert Ryan,  Myrna Loy, Dolores Hart , Maureen Stapleton ,
Frank Maxwell, Jackie Coogan,  Mike Kellin, Frank Overton, et al. 100 min.
In the film version of Nathanel West's novel "Miss Lonelyhearts," the
modified title moves from its journalist protagonist to a variety of lonely
people. The movie has the first role played by Montgomery Clift  after the
awful accident in 1957 that began his physical and psychological
deterioration, in spite of some fine performances in good movies.
He is Adam White, a hopeful writer who needs a job. He goes to a newspaper
where he accepts to be engaged by William Shrike (Robert Ryan), the
overberaring newspaper editor whose cynicism is reinforced by his wife
Florence (Myrna Loy) being an alcoholic. This,  in turn, was caused by a
major psychological burden, her bad conscience for having cheated on her
husband.
Adam is given the Lonelyhearts column, which is not exactly what he was
hoping for. He is resented by another writer, an older, grumpy man who had
wanted the Lonelyhearts rubric and who hates editor Shrike.
Adam has a cute girlfriend, Justy Sargent. Her family is a happy one. It
consists of her father and two nice brothers. Justy is played by Dolores
Hart -- an actress with a short career. In some ways she may remind you
somewhat of Grace Kelly or of Dorothy McGuire.
Improbably but convincingly, Adam gets involved in his job almost right
away, so much so that he feels for many of those sending in sad letters.
This in turn leads to complications.
Adam tells all that he is an orphan. At one point, already engaged to
Justy, he announces to her that next Sunday he will visit the orphanage in
which he was raised. In reality, he goes on one of his periodic jail
visits to his convict father. The old man has been in prison for 25 years,
after killing his wife and her lover caught together in bed. It is a
melancholy  visit.There is nothing in common between father and son.
Later Adam and Shrike have a talk. The editor is convinced that all
letter-writers are fakes, "like us, the newspaper people." He even dares
Adam to meet in person one of them.
Adam  does visits one, the working-class, mid-thirtyish Fay Doyle (Maureen
Stapleton). Her story of distress is that Pat Doyle, her husband of eleven
years, was crippled by a shipyard accident seven years ago and has had not
had sex with her since then. Somehow the reporter and the woman have sex.
Soon after Fay turns posessive, with an ugly behavior.
In a bar, Adam Adam meets Pat Doyle who tells him that Fay makes up stories
about him.
At that bar, which is frequented by Shrike and his wife, Adam, a
nondrinker,sits with them and gets pretty tight. He tells Shrike:"You're
right, they're fakes and frauds."
He then confesses to his fiancee what had happened and splits with her.Fay
attacks her husband who is indeed a cripple but not sexually we [resume. He
flees to get a gun. But the ending is murderless, the young couple are
reunited and so are, probably, Shrike and his wife.
This film brought Maureen Stapleton, in her debut role, an Oscar nomination
for Best Supporting Actress. Clift's acting is very good as usual, in fact
reinforced by his disfigured face and what was in reality a soul in turmoil
and sadness. The director, Vincent  J. Donehue, also makes a strong debut,
but I do not know what else he did later on except for "Sunrise at
Campobello," produced by Dore Schary from his own play, in 1960.
Schary, an important Hollywood figure as screenwriter and especially
producer, also wrote the script and produced "Lonelyhearts." It was his
first movie after his second tenure at MGM.
The few weaknesses of  "Lonelyhearts," which are inherited from the book,
are minor and well hidden. Such as the symbolic obviousness of the names
White and Shrike. Such as the too neat, misogynist arrangement of cheating
wives (Loy, Stapleton and Adam's unnamed mother). Also the pat contrast
between them and the happy but wifeless, motherless Sargent family. Such as
the overdrawn character of Robert Ryan. Adam tells him early on: "You're
guilty of a sin. Giant size. You are cynical." Ryan's bitterness and
cynicism are rather overdone, and one wonders whether they are strictly the
result of his marital contretemps or have been there forever. There is also
the newspaper, The Chronicle, which looks like a small operation in cramped
quarters where we see only three reporters and editor, whereas the Shrike
couple looks wealthy.
These are minor points though. The movie is a plus overall and stays with
you.

Title
Review for Devil in a Blue Dress (1995)
     "Film noir" (literally "black film") is a genre indigenous to
American cinema, along with musicals and westerns, all genres present
in foreign films but on a reduced scale.  The French, in their passion
for American movies and in their vindication of their artistic values,
(when most Americans saw those films as mere entertainment) also
identified "noir" as something special.
     The term was no doubt inspired by the collections of hard-boiled
and (mostly) detective fiction that went under names like "Serie
Noire," and, with more stress on detection and less on violence, in
series like "Le Masque" and others.  The "noir" books were
predominantly by American writers, like Dashiell Hammett, James M.
Cain, Raymond Chandler, Philip MacDonald, Cornell Woolrich, etc.  Many
of their novels made an impressive transition to the screen.
     A glossary definition of noir is "a film with a gritty, urban
setting that deals mainly with dark or violent passions in a downbeat
way.  Especially common in American cinema during the late forties and
early fifties, its themes of existential alienation and paranoia have
often been read as signs of postwar malaise and Cold War anxiety."
     But it's not that simple.  Here are some random examples:
FAREWELL MY LOVELY (a.k.a. MURDER MY SWEET) (1944), DOUBLE INDEMNITY
(1944), DETOUR (1945), THE POSTMAN ALWAYS RINGS TWICE (1946), THE BIG
SLEEP (1946), OUT OF THE PAST (1947), THE ASPHALT JUNGLE (1950), THE
BIG HEAT (1952), KILLER'S KISS (1955), TOUCH OF EVIL (1958).
     It is clear that "noir" spills over narrow definitions and into
other genres, with one main constant, crime.  On the other hand, the
first reaction of connoisseurs of "noir" evokes a lone investigator,
night, rain or fog, and terse dialogue.
     In DEVIL IN A BLUE DRESS, writer-director and ex-actor Carl
Franklin has literally a quadruple whammy film noir.  It is not
neo-noir but classic noir, going back to the sources and the
conventions of the genre (though without fog or rain).  Franklin is
African-American; so are novelist Walter Mosley; so are the principal
characters.  The story, adapted with the right changes by Franklin,
comes from the first of four Mosley books about Ezekiel (Easy) Rawlins
     Easy is played by the irresistible Denzel Washington.  The year is
1948 and the place is Los Angeles, a location that, for a change, is
fully justified and not used simply because it's handy, as in thousands
of other films.
     Fired from his air plant job, decorated World War II veteran Easy
is close to a down and out status.  Touchingly, he finds a "raison
d'etre" in his new cottage, but he needs to make payments.  This
leads to his acceptance of a sleazy type's offer.
     He pays Easy $100 for a job.  (I waited in vain for the old slang
"ten sawbucks" or "one hundred fish").  The task, unexplained, is to
locate a white woman who frequents black circles.  She is called Daphne
Monet, a bucolic, peaceful name that contrasts ironically with the
troubles she is causing.
     Easy, moving mostly within packed, lively black neighborhoods,
enters the world of black nightclubs and of streets that are not mean.
It's the white streets that are mean, and some of the whites who come
to the black areas.
     An early lead is a man whose woman, Coretta (Lisa Nicole Carson)
is a friend of Daphne's.  Accompanying the couple to their home, while
the man sleeps off his liquor, Easy has an easy time of bedding down
Coretta.  That's a smart touch about Easy's easy morals, in keeping
with the thin line that often divides gumshoes from upright citizens.
     The new sleuth gets plopped into one damn thing after another, a
morass of violence, murders, blackmail, thugs, corruption, brutal cops
and no-good politicos.   That's the ideal formula for a film noir, yet
DEVIL IN A BLUE DRESS is no slavish copy, but a fresh work with echoes
of old movies, including the neo-noir CHINATOWN.  (I won't explain
why).
     DEVIL IN A BLUE DRESS's main, crucial originality is the
excellently staged atmosphere, a reconstruction (realistic but with
some good cinematic exaggerations) of the black areas where Central
Avenue throbs with movement and color and is for many a memory of the
relatively peaceful old Los Angeles that contrasts with today's
state-of-war violence.
     As for Easy's residential neighborhood, with its pocket-size
lawns, neat little homes, kids playing safely in the street and
neighbors neighboring, it is downright Edenic.
     This, however, is 1948, and the color line, unsubtle and
pernicious, is all over the place.  What is fascinating is the
juxtaposition of vibrant black life with racism, and an unshown,
unspoken suggestion: that period, no matter how unjust, held hope for
racial harmony.  You can't help thinking with sadness that if, on the
books and in much real life, some equality was attained decades later,
but also that today races are still severely polarized.
     Carl Franklin's first film was the admired ONE FALSE MOVE, set
in recent times and about a white Arkansas sheriff going after drug
runners.  Compared to that movie, "Devil" has less of a steely mood and
less nail-biting suspense in expectation of sudden violence.  The woman
in "One False Move" was gorgeous, complicated Cynda Williams, at
center-stage.  Here, fairly inexpressive Jennifer Beals plays Daphne in
a small part trimmed down from the book's, especially an affair with
Easy.  But for the purposes of the movie's plot, she is a good choice.
(I won't reveal why).
     Another such choice is Mouse (Don Cheadle) the pal who comes from
Texas to lend Easy a hand.  He mostly lends bullets, as Two-Gun Mouse
is superlatively trigger-happy.  He also lends quite much gallows'
humor and comic relief.
     The film is narrated by Easy in keeping with one of the many
traditions of noir.  Washington's voice is rather too sweet, lacks the
tough staccato of Dick Powell, or Tom Neal's desperate tones in
DETOUR.  A bigger cavil is that while the ensemble works in DEVIL IN A
BLUE DRESS, the characters are not really terribly interesting, as, for
example, in the classic THE BIG SLEEP.  But, nostalgia apart, you can
do much worse than watching DEVIL IN A BLUE DRESS, a rare, born-again
film noir.

Title
Review for Sphere (1998)
SPHERE 1/2 *  (half a star). Directed by Barry Levinson.Written by Stephen
Hauser and Paul Attanasio, from a novel by Michael Crichton, adapted by
Kurt Wimmer. Photography, Adam Greenberg. Editing,Stu Linder.Production
design, Norman Reynolds. Music,Elliot Goldenthal.Produced by Levinson,
Crichton and Andrew Wald.Cast: Dustin Hoffman,Sharon Stone,Samuel
Jackson,Peter Coyote, Liev Schreiber.A Warner's release. 120 minutes. PG-13

Title
Review for Random Hearts (1999)
RANDOM HEARTS (1999) **  Directed by Sydney Pollack. Written by Kurt
Luedtke and adapted by Darryl Ponicsan, based on the novel (1984) by 
Warren Adler. Photography, Philippe Rousselot. Editing, William 
Steinkamp. Production design, Barbara Ling. Music. Dave Grusin. Cast: 
Harrison Ford (Dutch Van Den Broeck), Kristin Scott Thomas (Kay 
Chandler), Charles S. Dutton (Alcee), Kate Mara (Jessica Chandler), 
Bonnie Hunt (Wendy Judd), Dennis Haysbert (Detective George 
Beaufort), Edie Falco (Janice), Lynne Thigpen (Phyllis Bonaparte), 
Brooke Smith (Sarah), Richard Jenkins (Truman Trainor), Paul 
Guilfoyle (Dick Montoya), Susanna Thompson (Peyton Van Den Broeck), 
Peter Coyote (Cullen Chandler) et al.  Produced by Pollack and 
Marykay Powell. A Columbia release. 131 minutes. R (sex and violence)
Yes, Virginia, there are differences among social classes. More about 
this later. For now, the sad news that Random Hearts is a 
disappointment.
It starts with the title which is sappy, terribly old-fashioned, like 
one of those paperback romances of yore and of now. Everyone who has 
even the minimum of information about movies knows already the 
subject.
He is Sergeant "Dutch," of the Internal Affairs division of the 
Washington, D.C. police. He has a young, pretty wife, Peyton, a 
fashion consultant at Saks Fifth Avenue. No children. She is Kay 
Chandler, a Congresswoman for New Hampshire and the wife of lawyer 
Cullen. They have a 15-year old daughter, Jessica (well played).
The two families don't know each other, but Peyton and Cullen have 
been having an affair. Peyton tells Dutch that she's flying to Miami 
for a  Saks catalogue photo-shoot. Cullen pretends he's going to New 
York on business. In fact the two get on a plane to Miami to have 
some fun in the sun, and out of it too. The plane crashes shortly 
after take-off. The couple is among the many dead.
It takes time and searches for Dutch to become aware of the 
infidelity and death of his wife. Kay finds out in simpler ways. 
Dutch and Kay meet some 45 minutes into the movie. They fall in love.
Before Dutch and Kay meet the film is interesting in events 
(including  airline's after-crash procedures) and in characters. It 
is elaborate, with impressive big- budget cinematography, and often 
functional editing: when Dutch makes an urgent phone call, he dials 
only the first two digits before we cut to the call proper. Good 
economy of means, especially since phones and answering machines play 
a major role. By far the most affecting sections come as 
shell-shocked Dutch pieces together bit by bit  the awful truth of 
his wife's affair. .
But after this go-go-go tempo, the elaborate shifts to laborious, the 
story slows down while its lining of semi-irrelevancies increases. In 
the hallowed tradition of using more than one narrative paths (which 
can be good, but also bad when using is not followed by fusing) the 
plot is murkily padded by Dutch going after some drug-dealers and 
their corrupt police associates. Too much cliché cop-stuff.
In the long second part, the best thing  is a terrific scene at a 
Miami place where couples dancing the tango generate infinitely more 
eroticism than the main story
Why make the main characters a policeman and a Congresswoman running 
for re-election? Because of the TV and movie "glamor" of gun-action 
and politics, and of course sex. Forgotten, as in too many gimmicky 
"love" stories, is the lesson of  Brief Encounter (UK, 1945), that 
paragon of classically simple sentimental tales: two ordinary people 
in ordinary circumstances can move you immensely. Period.
The process of bringing the protagonists "really" together, travels 
through corpses, posh hotels and restaurants and is fairly 
convoluted. It reaches an unconvincing peak after the Dutch and Kay, 
back from their separate (discrete but not discreet) visits to 
confirm to themselves, needlessly and masochistically, the reality, 
the scene and the betrayals of their spouses. They return to D.C. on 
the same plane. At the Washington parking-lot, in Kay's car, there is 
(OUCH!!!) sudden,  startling, logic-defying wild kissing and groping.
The affair that follows, complete with bucolic settings, soupy 
dialogue, some revelations, and both parties' obsessive need to know 
more about their dead spouses, shows only one thing: that the movie 
doesn't know what to do with itself. Well, what do you expect from a 
work which started its planning fifteen years ago with a novel, and 
whose script and "adaptation" have different authors.
Now, Virginia, back to social differences. The main actors are nicely 
matched physically. They are mature, Ford, 57, Scott Thomas, 39, yet 
visually give no impression of a June-November couple. But no matter 
how youthful and vigorous Ford, the likelihood of the pairing is 
strained. She is the patrician daughter of a millionaire who was 
(is?) a political force. And a New England Republican.
The policeman, named  "Dutch" Van Den Broeck -- perhaps to remind 
subliminally a few viewers of aristocratic Dutch-American families -- 
is a commoner who drinks beer from the bottle.  Perhaps a Democrat, 
since, in a good touch, he sports an earring that may denote 
non-conservatism.
This hybrid movie gets increasingly uninvolving. It seems predicated 
on a 100% belief in monogamy. What hypocrisy, when showbiz people are 
notoriously polygamous, megagamous or even gigagamous.
The most affecting sections come in the first part, with 
shell-shocked Dutch learning bit by bit of his wife's affair. There 
is also excellent photography, including a terrific scene at a Miami 
place where couples dancing the tango generate infinitely more 
eroticism than the main story.
Director Sydney Pollack plays  very well Kay's politically savvy 
spinmeister. Pollack is no mean film-maker. He does what he can here 
but has an overall clumsy script to contend with.

Title
Review for Three Kings (1999)
THREE KINGS (1999) ** 1/2 . Written and directed by David O. Russell 
from a story by John Ridley. Photography, Newton Thomas Sigel. 
Editing, Robert K. Lambert. Production design,, Catherine Hardwicke. 
Music, Carter Burwell. Producers, Charles Roven, Paul Junger Witt, 
Edward L. McDonnell. Cast:  George Clooney (Special Forces Capt. 
Archie Gates), Mark Wahlberg (Sgt. Troy Barlow), Ice Cube (Staff Sgt. 
Chief), Spike Jonze (Conrad Vig), Nora Dunn (Adriana Cruz), Jamie 
Kennedy (Walter), Mykelti Williamson (Colonel Horn), Cliff Curtis 
(Amir), Said Taghmaoui (Captain Sa'id) et al.  A Warners release. 114 
minutes. R (language, shocking violence, sex)
In a film as with all else, novelty for novelty's sake isn't much. 
But then again, novelty of any kind may open doors for other creators 
and works. David O. Russell's first feature, the low-budget Spanking 
the Monkey, was daringly original. It and made the writer-director 
more than just promising. His next film was Flirting With Disaster, 
neither daring nor a minor landmark, but clever (though without 
brilliance or depth), inventive (but not really original), and 
amusing.
The title Three Kings is ironic. It calls to mind We Three Kings from 
Orient Are.  But these kings don't bear gifts. They are taking gold 
away. In any case they are four, not three. A redneck yahoo from 
Texas is excluded from the title --which goes to show how logic is 
sacrificed at the altar of catchy titles.
Desert Storm is ending. Is the Gulf War really over? Is there a 
truce? What's up, Doc? It's all muddled, but the U.S. soldiers are 
celebrating anyway their return-home-to be. They live it up like 
fraternity boys, with booze and clowning and rap music. It's a 
near-orgy, minus sex. But wait a moment. Special Forces Captain Gates 
(George Clooney, in fine mettle) is in a tent, vigorously copulating 
with the female assistant to Adriana. Adriana is an ace reporter for 
a TV network (invented).
The lively though not lovely start also includes encounters with 
"ragheads," captives treated like dirt, Iranians in uniform and 
others. Sometimes the soldiers shoot first, then wonder if the 
natives were friendly (anti-Saddam), foes or simply guys surrendering 
Ugh.
All this sets the tone. Mostly, it introduces the plot. An anal 
(don't ask) document on (in) a captive officer turns out to be the 
map of gold bars looted by Iraq from Kuwait. That's the stuff dreams 
(cf. The Maltese Falcon and Treasure if Sierra Madre) are made of. 
Neat, ain't it?
The next, inevitable step is for Captain Gates to lead a quartet of 
men (the old movie mix of motley guys) to the "liberation" of the 
golden stash. It could buy endless visits to Disney, Inc. at home.
Then comes non-stop action, compounded by a baffling mix of elite 
troops still faithful to Saddam --or still afraid of him,  deserters, 
an anti-Saddam Resistance (which was news to me), innocent women and 
children caught in cross-fire, underground treasure troves. Not only 
gold bars but Kuwaiti jewelry, absurd refrigerators, radios and tutti 
quanti). Plus occasional people from whatever is the "other" side 
being interrogated under torture. And later, another stash, this time 
of luxurious, shiny Kuwaiti limousines and sports cars. Enough, 
enough.
In addition, the Americans are being stalked by news-supergal Adriana 
(and her cameraman). She's been Emmy-nominated multiple times, but 
has always been a bridesmaid,  never a bride. This is her big chance: 
The Scoop.
Shot with a real (or a pretend) 16 millimiter hand-held movie camera 
(unless it is supposed to be video), the sights have that typical 
graininess, jerkiness and relative un-sharpness of news footage. A 
clever idea which adds immediacy to the action. But analyze it and 
you'll have to conclude that it's still the old Eye of God, except 
that it is not mounted on a studio tripod. (There are also shots of 
sea-birds soaked in oil as a result of blown-up oil wells by the 
Iraqis. Looks to me like footage from the Werner Herzog apocalyptic 
documentary).
In addition (again) the four soldiers must be AWOL, given the time 
frame. In re-addition, we get the old cliche characterizations of the 
group's individuals.
 From the point of view of the narrative, the well-intentioned desire 
to show the madness and chaos of war and its aftermath results in 
much murkiness and confusion. The audiences of this movie will no 
doubt be heavy with young persons who were pre-teens or early teens 
during the Gulf War --and know next to nothing about it. I suppose 
that like most viewers of action flicks they don't ask themselves 
questions but bask in the physical scenes before their eyes. But 
those non-kids who do exercise their logic and whatever they know of 
history, are bound (as I did) to spend much time trying to figure out 
who's who,what and where.
Violence is most graphic, gory and too often gratuitous here. It is 
effective in its use of firearms, mines, poison gas, vehicles and all 
--but it lacks Sam Peckinpah's ballet-ism or even the montage of 
Bonnie and Clyde's slow-motion rain of bullets. Everything seems to 
be larger and faster than life. and faster. Sort it out if you can: 
most of the males, on all sides, are primitive or ferocious. So much 
for humanism.
The narrow subject is greed, which is OK. But, like a savage kind of 
M*A*S*H, there's a pretty continuous thread of comedy running 
through, with mixed results. And, shades of umpteen movies about 
fortune-hunting, the conclusion lapses into deja vu sentimentality. 
The three American survivors will give up their gold in exchange of 
authorities allowing a procession of "good" (read anti-Saddam) Iraqis 
to enter a sanctuary at the Iranian border.
Makes you feel good, as it had in other, different films, doesn't it?
The high-budget transformation of locations in the American Southwest 
and in Mexico into the Arabian desert is remarkable. The performers 
are good, including those who play Iraqis. So is the varied music 
score by Carter Burwell.

Title
Review for Get Over It (2001)
GET OVER IT (2001) ** 1/2  Directed by Tommy O'Haver. Written by  by 
R. Lee Fleming Jr. Cinematography, Maryse Alberti. Editing,  Jeff 
Betancourt.  Production design, Robin Standefer. Music, Steve Bartek. 
Cast: Kirsten Dunst (Kelly), Ben Foster (Berke), Martin Short (Dr. 
Desmond Forrest Oakes), Melissa Sagemiller (Allison), Colin Hanks 
(Felix). Swoosie Kurtz and Ed Begley, Jr. (Berke's parents), Sisqo 
(Dennis), Shane West (Striker). A Miramax release. 87 minutes. PG-13
Do we need another teen flick? Do we need a hole in the head? We 
don't, assuming that "we" stands for minimally mature, objective and 
sophisticated viewers. But since the huge market for youth movies 
fills Hollywood's coffers, such pictures will be made ad infinitum 
and ad nauseam.
Still, once in a blue moon something acceptable pops up. "Get Over 
It" --filmed last summer in Toronto--has an unzapping title, comes 
unannounced,  had no advanced hoopla or press previews. But it is 
sort of OK.
The basic plot is strictly deja suffered through --since the dawn of 
cinema. Boy meets girl,  boy plus girl, boy minus girl, boy and other 
girl, other girl sweet on and better for boy, boy too dumb to see 
this -- until the last reel.
Fate (read US mobility) separates childhood playmates Allison and 
Berke. They meet again in high school, become sweethearts in a flash. 
After 16 months of cohabitation and bliss (at least on Berke's part) 
Allison drops him. For him it is like a sudden attack by friendly 
fire. Allison's reasons are not specific, but rather interestingly 
illustrate the French saying " tout casse, tout passe, tout lasse," 
meaning that sooner or later " everything breaks, goes away, gets 
tiresome."  Allison is emblematic of the many and short relationships 
of "celebrities." In fact, 16 months and 3 days is a long 
relationship-affair-mariage by Hollywood standards.
The girl did not ditch Berke for another fellow, yet soon enough she 
starts an affair with Striker, whose prestige includes having been in 
a boy-band. The new twosome successfully try out for the school's 
spring musical "A Midsummer Night's Rockin' Eve." (That show is 
after, you know, Shakespeare, sort of.)
The inconsolable Berke, still hoping to get Allison back, also tries 
out --against all logic--for the musical, for which he is not 
qualified (his thing is basketball) but somehow he makes it. Felix 
(Colin Hanks, the son of Tom Hanks) his best friend, has a cute 
younge sister, Kelly. She writes songs and sings pretty well.   She 
helps, instructs and encourages Berke, who, of course, does not 
notice that Kelly is drawn to him. But give them time. (Felix is 
protective of his sister, but this doesn't add anything significant 
or useful to the movie).
Expectedly mild developments and predictable complications ensue -- 
nothing really original or notable, with the big exception of the 
musical's director. The composer-writer of its twelve songs, its 
producer and part author (move over, William S!) this flick-saving 
character is the school's Chair of Fine Arts, Dr. Desmond Forrest 
Oakes. In a style as theatrical and grandiose as that name,   Martin 
Short plays him with all stops out,  no holds barred, alternating 
between cutting criticism, merciless put-downs (but you know he's 
deep down a kind person), booming imperial commands, haughty advice, 
sage orders and self-promoting declarations. and steals the show over 
and over again.
Short has been around quite a bit, on TV and in movies. The latter 
did not do right by him. They were mostly mediocre items, with an odd 
exception --odd because that was Short's first major role.
The 1986 hilariously absurdist take-off "Three Amigos!" by John 
Landis, also starred Steve Martin and Chevy Chase. It is still an 
underrated feature but has many partisans, of which I am one.
  In "Get Over It" Martin Short is given the best lines, in fact the 
only funny ones. "Bill Shakespeare was a  wonderful poet, but Burt 
Bacharach he was not!" The absurdism of this declaration is anywhere 
from amusing to delicious, depending on one's taste. So is Short's 
over-the-top, no-holds-barred mannered delivery, flamboyant in choice 
of words, intonation, gesture and body language. It's also 
gay-leaning, so that it comes as a surprise, a joke, or a gag (you 
choose) when late in the movie his secretary tells him "Your wife 
called." This bit is the only raison d'etre of Mrs. Oakes.
When the film was shot, Short was a youthful 50. Most of "the kids" 
were in their early twenties, but this is not blatantly obvious. What 
is however is that very strong impression that the film was cut down 
to its unusual  87 minutes, no doubt to qualify for a PG-13 by 
removing raunchy or vulgar passages.
Some of the latter remain, and might have been excised too, but then 
the film would have shrunk too much. Whether or not the cuts are the 
guilty parties, the picture is episodic, fragmented and choppy. This 
vagueness is not lethal, since the two best elements appear to be 
intact: Martin Short, and the updated Midsummer Night's Dream which 
we see often, in sections, from rehearsals to fantasy scenes to the 
final product. That's when things fall in place, love blooms, the 
villain is punished. There is quite a bit of pleasing imagination as 
Shakespeare, the musical and the lives of the students mix and 
reflect one another. It is the second movie by director Tommy 
O'Haver, whose debut was "Billy's First Hollywood Kiss."
Movie reviews by Edwin Jahiel are at : http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel 

Title
Review for School Ties (1992)
SCHOOL TIES (1992)  ***  [Credits follow text]
You know it is 1955 or a bit later because of the cars and a
theater marquee in a grungy part of Scranton, Pennsylvania,
with "Rebel Without A Cause" on it. But David Greene (Brendan
Fraser), a big, nice and nice-looking Jewish boy from a nice
working-class family, is no rebel. Even so, when a biker
provokes with a slur, he beats the daylights out of him.
Nothing special here. Or so it seems. But the sub-text is.
It's a counter-cliche: the Jew not as a victim of brute,
physical force but as retaliator and winner. A good start.
David is an ace high school quarterback whom the nice coach of 
a posh New England prep school has recruited on a scholarship 
to bolster the chances of the St. Matthew's team. In turn this 
bolsters David's chances to attain the unattainable, a 
scholarship to Harvard, since, for the regular WASP preppies 
-- scions of the power elite and often scions of scions of 
scions -- the 200-year old school is the gateway to Harvard, 
Princeton or Yale.  
Some students may be socially and psychologically immature and 
shielded from the common people, but in academic matters, St. 
Matthew's is a place of seriousness and quality. 
The young men do share in their milieu's snobbishness and vast 
array of prejudices. Overall, however, likable, mature 
proletarian David is accepted as a person and soon is doubly 
appreciated as a winning player. 
Even so, false pretenses are at work here. David, advised by 
his father to "fit in" and by the friendly coach not to give 
out more information than necessary, hides his Mogen David 
pendant and does not volunteer the fact he is a Jew. 
Eventually though, this will out and, for reasons of 
prejudice, jealousy and sexual rivalry (David wins over his 
pal's non-girlfriend) anti-Semitism explodes in sundry, sneaky 
and dishonorable ways. The outcome is more of a holding action 
than an epiphany. 
David's concealment-by-omission of his Jewishness is more sad 
than reprehensible, with the kind of distress that you find in 
films like "Pinky" or "Imitation of Life" where black girls 
try to pass for white.  Depressing too are the status-seeking  
pressures on the WASP students who, willy-nilly are obsessed 
with "living up to someone else's expectations." Yet they are 
not Strasbourg geese, force-fed for slaughter and "foie gras." 
Sooner or later, pass or fail, they will take their place 
among the privileged, the old boys elite, and send their own 
boys to St. Matthew's. Shed no tears for them. 
"School Ties"is, in many ways, an old-fashioned movie on a 
major theme that Hollywood, with all its Jewish presence, has 
cautiously and self-consciously played down. Movies on 
anti-Semitism as persecution by the Nazis or as one element 
among others, have been fairly common. But ask anyone about 
films that treat anti-Semitism in America per se, as the 
kernel and not merely in passing, and you get only the 1947 
"Gentleman's Agreement"in which Gregory Peck playing another 
Green (without an "e"), a goy (gentile) reporter who pretends 
he is a Jew to expose the ills of prejudice. Or else that 
other 1947 opus, "Crossfire." 
"School Ties" works its way through with a solid accumulation 
of scenes, sequences and details.  School life is 
realistically shown with, especially, the upperclassmen going 
through hi-jinx and revels, sexual stirrings or classroom 
problems. Some events are predictable (boy meets girl, 
she-WASP rejects him-Jew, a last-minute touchdown, etc. ) but 
these do not invalidate their truth or their filmic interest. 
Cleverly handled too are scenes of school assembly with 
religious overtones that puzzle David, or an encounter between 
David and the Principal (in the know) who seems entirely free 
of prejudice but still comes out with the notorious "You, 
people," something that, in the early 1990s lost to Ross Perot 
many a black supporter.  
Effective too is the portrayal of Mr. Cleary (Zeljko Ivanek), 
the fussy, martinet teacher of French, who is something of a 
sadist (shades of Emil Jannings in "The Blue Angel"). He has 
the right non-native accent of many a school-teacher of 
foreign languages, becomes the butt of some dumb, unfunny 
(hence believable) practical jokes and drives a student to 
despair. Mr. Cleary is at the same time caricatural and 
realistic.  But though an overbearing perfectionist, he makes 
an egregious error on his first day of class by declaring that 
the students will learn "francais" (French) instead of "*le* 
francais." Hollywood moviemakers are terribly sloppy about 
linguistic details, (among other cultural ones), and seldom 
check with native speakers.
Though certainly not destined for classic status, the movie 
has top-drawer production values and good acting. Fraser is 
something of a hunk, but with much over-hunkiness replaced by 
brains and sensitivity. Some of the seniors may look a tad too 
old, but that's a minor point when compared to the old college 
pictures where freshmen were in their later thirties! 
More importantly, the film makes its points with coherence and 
skill. Still, its taking place some 37 years ago is like a 
safety net and perhaps implies that "That was then, this is 
now." But have things changed radically or, as Professor 
Cleary might put it, is it a case of "plus ca change..." "the 
more things change, the more they stay the same?" A frank 
update to the 1990s might make an interesting and more 
relevant movie. 
CREDITS: SCHOOL TIES (1992)  *** Directed by Robert Mandel. 
Written by Dick Wolf, Darryl Ponicsan. Produced by Stanley R. 
Jaffe. Cinematography, Freddie Francis. Editing, Jerry 
Greenberg, Jacqueline Cambas. Production design, Janine 
Claudia Oppewall. Music, Maurice Jarre. Cast: Brendan Fraser, 
Chris O'Donnell, Andrew Lowery, Matt Damon et al. A Paramount 
release. 107 minutes. Rated PG-13 (language). 

Title
Review for Da hong deng long gao gao gua (1991)
RAISE THE RED LANTERN (DAHONG DENGLONG GAIGAO GUA) (1991) (China,Taiwan,
Hong Kong)  *** Directed by Zhang Yimou. Written by Ni Zhen from the 1989
novel by Su Tong łWives and Concubines.˛ Camera, Zhao Fei. Cast: Gong Li,
Ma Jingwu, He Caifei, Qan Quifen, Jin Shuyan. An Orion Classics release. In
Mandarin with subtitles. 125 minutes. Rated PG. Art Theater.
The first Chinese movie ever nominated for Best Foreign Film in last yearšs
Oscars, łRed Lantern˛ is the work of Zhang Yimou. He is a prize-winning
cinematographer who, within ten years, also established himself, along with
Chen Kaige, as the leading filmmaker of the Chinese New Wave called łThe
Fifth Generation˛of the mid-Eighties. Zhangšs łRed Sorghum˛ received the
Golden Bear at the Berlin Festival, his łJu Dou˛ the Golden Hugo, at the
Chicago Festival, and łRed Lantern˛ won five prizes in Venice, including
the Silver Lion.
łRaise the Red Lantern˛ is set in North China during the 1920s.  19-year
old Songlian (Gong Li, Zhangšs fetish actress), drops out of the University
after one semester and her fatheršs death.  Trapped by the lack of money
and the impossibility for a woman to become something, she can either marry
a poor man or become the fourth concubine of a wealthy one. She opts for
the latter.
The man is always anonymously referred to as The Master and the fact that
he is never photographed in close-up, underlines his psychological distance
from the women.  The non-family lives in a geometric compound where each of
the concubines has her own house around an inner courtyard.
The filmšs title refers to the red lanterns that, like the light outside a
studio where recording is in progress, are lit before the house in which
the Master chooses to spend the night. The mistress elected is prepared for
this by, among other ceremonies, a foot massage that presumably enhances
her libido.
The womenšs numbers correspond to their age. The First Mistress is an older
woman who is out of the sexual rivalry. The Second is relatively younger.
The Third is a pert, capricious, ex-opera singer.
Number Four, Songlian, is immediately immersed in intrigue. The łraison
dšetre˛ of the mistresses is solely the competition for the Masteršs
favors.  In opaque, devious ways, the women, who call each other łSister,˛
compete for this distinction with manoeuvres, schemes, temporary alliances
and realignments.  Songlianšs sullen, disappointed young maid, who had
hoped to become Number Four, adds to the tension.
There is a terrible emptiness in this household. Life is a void that,
paradoxically, has an epicenter. This is nightly sex , alluded to but never
seen graphically, but even so, sex without any hint of sensuality, feeling
or  pleasure. Everything revolves around  rank, status, the pecking order.
No one  really does anything. We see no books. We get minimal music, a
gramophone, some flutes, a game of mah-jong.  The women do eat regularly,
yet even the ordering of food is  another weapon yet in this war of
one-upmanship.
The claustrophobia is visually symbolized by the look of the place. The
courtyard is rectilinear and its geometry is repeatedly photographed from a
static, impassive point of view. The rooms have a strangely anonymous
lavishness which leads to depressing sterility, similar to the non-person
nature of the characters.
On the contrary, when the camera takes to the criss-crossing roofs of the
compound, it follows their sinuous, bisecting lines, in a way that
corresponds to the convoluted game that the łsisters˛ plot and play, a game
that leads to tragedy.
The moviešs deliberate pace and color coding oddly stress its implacable
łNo Exit˛ theme. The feudal Masteršs mates are also his inmates, locked up
in a stockade of gilded cages, and prisoners too of their own narrow,
inescapable mentality.
In passing, the film shows the touching Chinese respect for education.
Songlianšs single semester at the University gives her prestige. Says one
mistress to guests: łShe was a University student, I was just an opera
singer.˛ Another łsister˛ asks Songlian : łPlease cut my hair.˛ łBut I have
never done it.˛ łYou went to the University, youšll do it better.˛
łRaise the Red Lantern˛ takes place well before China raised the Red flag.
The Revolution, however, replaced one kind of tyranny with another. This
explains why the movie, like Zhangšs earlier łJu Dou,˛ (also about the
oppression of women), is a łpictura non grata,˛ unreleased in China.
It was made with devious, face-saving financing from Taiwan (via Hong
Kong), to a large degree thanks to Hou Hsiao-Hsien, Taiwanšs premier film
director. He is listed in the credits as executive producer and may well
have influenced the filmšs esthetics.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Title
Review for Bachelor, The (1999)
THE BACHELOR (1999) * Directed by Gary Sinyor. Written by Steve 
Cohen. Photography, Simon Archer. Editing, Robert Reitano. Production 
design,  Craig Stearns. Music by David A. Hughes & John 
Murphy.Produced by Lloyd Segan & Bing Howenstein.  Cast: Chris 
O'Donnell (Jimmy), Renee Zellweger (Anne), Artie Lange (Marco), 
Edward Asner (Gluckman), Hal Holbrook (O'Dell), James Cromwell 
(Priest), Mariah Carey (Ilana), Brooke Shields (Buckley), Peter 
Ustinov (Grandad), et al. A New Line Cinema release. 101 minutes. 
PG-13
In 1925, Buster Keaton directed and starred in the silent classic 
"Seven Chances," which was itself based on an eponymous play. It was, 
and still is, a riot.
"The Bachelor" is a remake-update of Keaton's comedy/farce. The 
director, is the Brit Gary Sinyor, whose feature debut was the 
amusing, Jewish-themed comedy "Leon the Pig Farmer" (1992), a work 
modestly distributed, hence seen in specialized venues such as 
festivals. Sinyor made two more films which, to my knowledge, have 
been seen by even smaller audiences. "The Bachelor," if there's any 
justice, ought to meet with the same non-reception. But one cannot 
count on that.
When I watched the film with a small audience, a viewer near me kept 
laughing aloud, and commenting. I was doubly irritated, by my 
fellow-viewer and by the film. Since I did not want my annoyance to 
influence my judgment, I moved discreetly to a quiet part of the 
theater. The move did not improve the movie.
"The Bachelor" opens with much footage of wild mustangs to hammer the 
point that this is just what bachelor men are. Ugh. Then, Jimmy (a 
pallid, personality-less O'Donnell) is singled out as another younger 
man playing the field. He is, however, lucky enough to enter into a 
three-year relationship with Anne (Zellweger), who is a perfect 
companion and (supposedly), is not pushing for marriage. However, for 
reasons unclear, Jimmy feels compelled to pop the question. He does 
this at a fancy restaurant where, apparently, fellow-bachelors 
traditionally take their girl-friends to offer them wedding bliss. 
(Are there such places?)
Jimmy ruins everything with his hesitations and bumbling, especially 
by telling Anne "You win" and explaining that the time had come for 
him "to s... or get off the pot."  Some courtship! Incensed, the 
girl walks out on him. His later efforts at making up for his idiocy 
are spurned.
Then grandpa (Ustinov), the very wealthy owner of a pool-table 
factory, dies, leaving a will on video. Jimmy will inherit one 
hundred million dollars if he marries on his 30th birthday --which 
just happens to be a bit over 24 hours away.  So Jimmy re-proposes to 
Anne, who says no. This sends him on a frantic searc for another 
instant bride. Riding a limousine with his best friend - the fat 
Marco- and a thin clergyman  (James Cromwell), he locates, meets and 
proposes to (all this with impossible speed) several of his ex 
girl-friends. They are all   shown as caricatures. They all refuse.
As a last resort, Marco places a big newspaper ad which results in an 
army of willing brides, all in wedding gowns, mobbing and besieging 
Jimmy.
You can see the happy ending coming ,from a thousand miles away. To 
wit,  Anne's change of heart at the last minute, and the twosome's 
beating of the clock at the last second.
"The Bachelor" is a one-and-a half joke flick,  dull, mechanically 
repetitious within its  agitated search and its regular cuts to Anne 
and her sister -- the latter used as the female equivalent of "the 
straight man" in vaudeville routines. Although peppered by a few good 
bits and  a nice soundtrack of mostly oldies, the film remains a 
loser throughout.
The time element is entirely incredible, far more so than "Around the 
World in Eighty Days." It is inconceivable that so much happens in so 
short a time. The characters are dull, except for Brooke Shields as a 
cold, calculating socialite and gold-digger. Edward Asner and Hal 
Holbrook are embarrassingly wasted. In his small part, the great, 
versatile Peter Ustinov is a bad imitation of an eccentric, 
authoritarian old geezer with a bad imitation of an American accent. 
James Cromwell, whose corrupt, sinister chief of police was so 
chill-making in "L.A. Confidential," is the clergyman,  He goes, 
unbelievably,  from a silent, dumb-looking character to a suddenly 
active one.
Worse than anything else is the "piece de resistance" : the anonymous 
throng of hundreds (thousands?) of eager brides-to-be, all of them 
grasping harridans, all wearing ugly wedding-dresses, all vulgar and 
repulsive. Buster Keaton knew something when he kept his camera 
mostly at a distance which did not personalize those women. And the 
fact that his film was silent is a blessing.

Title
Review for Lola rennt (1998)
   RUN LOLA RUN (LOLA RENNT) (Germany, 1998) ***
   ______________________________________________________________________
   Written and directed by Tom Tykwer. Photography, Frank Griebe.
   Editing, Mathilde Bonnefoy. Set design, Alexander Manasse. Music, Tom
   Tykwer, Johnny Klimek, Reimhold Heil. Animation sequences, Gil
   Alkabetz. Cast: Franka Potente (Lola), Moritz Bleibtreu (Manni),
   Herbert Knaup (Lola's father), Armin Rohde (Mr. Schuster), Joachim
   Krol (the tramp Norbert von Au), Nina Petri (Mrs. Hansen), Heino Ferch
   (Ronnie). A Sony Pictures Classics release. 81 minutes. R (some merely
   "cartoonish" violence).
   ______________________________________________________________________
   Overall applauded (but there are some naysayers too), Run Lola Run was
   probably made when its author was 32. Tom Tykwer had worked in TV, and
   in the realm of features had co-written a script, and wrote and
   directed two well-received movies. Whether or not he'll prove to have
   been a "Wunderkind" will depend on how much of his past output we can
   see (an unlikely occurrence) and what he will offer us next.
   RLR is, at the very least, an interesting novelty, an unclassifiable
   work which is, above all, a stylistic exercise. The place is Berlin,
   though not identified as such and with no landmarks identifiable by
   strangers. Twenty-something Manni, a small-time courier for powerful
   mobsters is doing nicely and hopes to be promoted. But then the
   unexpected happens. Having delivered some goods to a buyer, and
   received 100,000 Deutschmarks (at this writing $ 52,356), he leaves
   his plastic bag in the subway when he makes a hurried exit to evade
   ticket inspectors. (OK, we all know that one always should keeps
   holding such loot with clenched fingers, but the film, being a
   fantasy, makes suspension of disbelief easy). If Manni returns
   empty-handed, the top mobster will doubtlessly kill him.
   The panicked, hysterical young man phones his girlfriend Lola who asks
   him to wait 20 minutes until she gets there with the money -- which
   she does not have but somehow will get. She leaves her home, starts
   running, and runs and runs and runs. She's in great physical form, but
   see above the part about suspension of disbelief. This also applies to
   the ground she covers in just 20 minutes.
   Manni is waiting for her outside a supermarket, which he said he would
   rob if Lola didn't get there on time. We keep track of this on a large
   clock which at the start showed 20 minutes to 12, and gradually,
   inexorably, suspensefully closes in on the fatal hour of 12.  This is
   High Noon, Germanicized with a twist!
   It's all over in 20 minutes. Which leaves us 60 more of film. What the
   director does with them is to start Scenario One all over again, work
   in--with meticulous and unpredictable spontaneity--small variations,
   increase them to larger ones. Then he backtracks and ends up with a
   different ending. The same goes for the 20-minute Scenario Three.
   If I am cryptic it is that giving details, or even the main lines of
   the story (-ries) would be a killjoy. Especially since the movie's
   maker uses a full array of visual (and sound) tricks, from cartoons
   that connect to the action to split-screen, to pixillation, still
   shots, varying speeds, video, etc.
   Lola in the running (and the stopping) process discovers a number of
   new things, mainly about her banker father and about herself. Again,
   I'll be cagey on the subject.
   The Berlin of the film seems to be a sparsely populated, minor traffic
   city, which brought to my mind the title of the EricWolfgang Korngold
   opera The Dead City. I am guessing that the film must have been on
   Sundays or holidays. The relative emptiness of the sets makes it easy
   to keep track of Lola. Better yet, she can be always spotted by her
   distinctive, punkish hair painted flaming red-orange. The device is
   essentially similar to Haskell Wexler's, who made the classic Medium
   Cool (1969), a tour-de-force which dealt with the actual riots during
   the famous 1968 Democratic Convention in Chicago. Using a great deal
   of documentary footage, it inserted Wexler's actors in the streets and
   the crowds. For the audience to identify immediately Verna Bloom,
   Haskell had her wear a bright yellow dress that always stood out.
   How much of a love story RLR may be does not get pictured by overt
   sentiments. There is just one small interlude of the lovers talking in
   bed. Otherwise, it is the extremely kinetic nature of the film plus
   the fact that Lola will do anything to save Manni.
   Humor has always been an iffy aspect of Teutonic cinema. It does exist
   here however, but in indirect and/or played-down ways which do not get
   into the cuteness or broad effects that we find in much of American
   films these days. The funniest gag may be of Lola stepping out of a
   bank with a stash of stolen money and facing a regiment of heavily
   armed police. She is taken for a customer and pushed out of harm's way
   by solicitous lawmen. And the last line in the movie, spoken by Manni,
   is deliciously ironical.
   RLR, beyond showing the fickle finger of fate, has no real depth,
   carries no significant dialogue, no realistic or symbolic weight. But
   it is fresh and inventive, has a good matching musical score,
   excellent camera work, original editing (that's what makes the movie),
   and a fine musical commentary. It has avoided such smart-aleck shoals
   as pedantry, pretentiousness, pseudo-philosophy, pseudo-populism, and
   so on. On the surface, it is a light-weight job that could baffle
   audiences partial to well-made, well-told narratives. But it's also
   very clever.
     _________________________________________________________________

Title
Review for Dead Man Walking (1995)
In "Sullivan's Travels," (1941), a masterpiece by Preston 
Sturges, a Hollywood director played by Joel McCrea suddenly 
gets the urge to stop making his usual lightweight 
entertainment movies and do instead something with social 
significance. Disguised as a hobo, he enters the world of 
have-nots, sees their life . . . and changes his mind. As life 
is no bed of roses, making escapist movies gives to the 
unfortunate, including prisoners, a few minutes or hours when 
troubles are forgotten.
I used to be a bit intolerant of the many moviegoers who 
looked first and foremost for film entertainment. Later I came 
to appreciate Joel McCrea's discovery. Applied to "Dead Man 
Walking" it means that this somber, serious movie cannot be 
everyone's cup of tea - but for others it ought to rank among 
the better productions of recent months.
The film adapts the real-life experiences of a nun, with some 
liberties, notably the character played by Sean Penn who now 
is a composite figure. Susan Sarandon, director Robbins's 
companion, plays Sister Helen Prejean who, coming from a 
rather high stratum of society, dedicates herself to good 
deeds. In New Orleans, she works among those who are poor and 
need of spiritual, material, psychological help -- and, above 
all, warmth. 
When Matthew Poncelet(Penn) writes her from the Death Row of 
his Louisiana prison, she pays him a visit. Poncelet and a 
friend, high on drugs and booze, had killed a young couple in 
a Lovers' Lane, after raping the girl. Poncelet was condemned 
to death, his companion to life. 
For years, Poncelet's execution was postponed while the man 
boned up on law books. He claims that he was only a bystander 
at the rape-killing. That's what he tells Sister Helen at 
their initial meeting, one of several.
That first interview is masterfully constructed, from the 
entrance of Sister Helen into the prison through her 
departure. Sarandon does not wear a nun's habit but street 
clothes, which make the prison's chaplain raise his eyebrows. 
I must stress that throughout, the film avoids Hollywoodisms 
fully yet not pointedly. Sarandon is never made sexy, though 
she could be, even at age 50.  Her make-up is a mere touch of 
lipstick. Her clothes are discreet. She is neither colorful, 
preachy or a do-gooder. 
Wasting no time, the Sister and the audience begin to see the 
mechanical, almost clinical procedures of the penitentiary, a 
series of standard operating procedures that follow one 
routine after another. They are dehumanizing. They are also 
necessary. So, enter the first batch of ambiguities that 
pervade the movie. Susan Sarandon handles her part with total 
credibility, her constant unease with ease. 
In the interview, Sarandon and Penn are on either side of a 
wire partition. Master cinematographer Roger Deakins gives it 
a look unlike that of other prison movies by keeping before 
our eyes both the faces and the wires of Penn's cage.
Penn seems to plays Poncelet as if to the role born 
--effortlessly, naturally,  as the embodiment of a low-lifer 
who'd rather be a lifer than a corpse. With his noticeable 
hair-do and eye-catching, pointed goatee, he is like 
Mephistopheles. Chained and chain-smoking, Poncelet can be 
defiant, surly, nervous, self-pitying, all at the same time.
Sister Helen, an ideal listener, leaves the prison determined 
to help Poncelet beat the death sentence. Does she believe 
him? Dopes she believe "in" him? Is it Christian charity? The 
belief in repentance and salvation? The "thou shall not kill" 
principle that goes against capital punishment, no matter what 
the crime?  Ambiguities pile up.
The nun enlists the help of lawyer Robert Prosky, a great 
actor who can play roles from sinister to sweet with equal 
conviction. We also see her in contact with her own family and 
those of the victims, both sets disapproving her efforts--in 
further ambiguous, even disturbing ways (note the performance 
by  Raymond J. Barry, the father of the slain girl).  
Poncelet's mother and brothers, at first suspicious, never 
become overtly grateful to Sister Helen, lachrymose or 
sentimentalized. Nor does Sean Penn in the increasingly 
complex rapport between the nun and the convict.
Relentlessly, realistically, the film proceeds to its bitter 
end, its grimness relieved by a major distraction, that of the 
questions raised for and by the film's people and the 
audience. There is a solitary humorous moment. Lost in her 
thoughts, Sister Helen speeds, is stopped by a cop. Seeing in 
her papers that she's a nun he becomes wary, tells her how he 
had ticketed an IRS man and gotten his (the cop's) tax return 
audited the following year.
"Dead Man Walking" is what the guards shout on the way to the 
execution chamber. By then, Poncelet has changed, in 
appearance, somewhat, in his heart ... who knows? There is a 
mea maxima culpa but, in another ambiguity, is this a 
redeemed, saved soul or (by necessity) an invalid 
transformation? And to what extent does the movie speak 
against capital punishment? I checked with a number of 
viewers. Some thought that this was a total indictment of 
state-sanctioned killing. Others were puzzled. One person, a 
liberal, not a conservative, took the position that between 
the living hell of life without parole, and death, execution 
was kinder and saved a great deal of public funds.  
The total anti-capital punishment position is far clearer in a 
major ancestor of this movie, "We Are All Murderers," (France, 
1952) by former lawyer Andre Cayatte. And the moral/ 
theological stance is clear in another French film,  "A 
Condemned Man Escaped," (1956), about a member of the French 
Resistance, jailed and condemned by the occupying Nazis. The 
great, Catholic, ascetic director Robert Bresson concludes his 
film with "All is Grace." The salvation of body and soul are 
stated in an immensely moving way. 
"Dead Man Walking" does have some flaws. When will filmmakers 
learn that superimposing opening credits on action and 
dialogue makes the audience miss parts of both? Why are there 
so many graphic flashbacks to the earlier crime?  As a 
counterweight to any pity we might feel for Poncelet this is 
unnecessary. What is accomplished by the painful, detailed, 
protracted description of an execution by lethal injection? 
No matter. " Dead Man" is strong and hard. Whatever its 
message about capital punishment, the familiar quote from John 
Donne is unarguably at the heart of the film: "No man is an 
island, entire of itself; every man is a piece of the 
continent, a part of the main [...] therefore never send to 
know for whom the bell tolls; it tolls for thee." 
CREDITS: Written and directed by Tim Robbins from the book by 
Sister Helen Prejean, C.S.J.  Produced by Jon Kilik, Robbins, 
Rudd Simmons. Photography, Roger A. Deakins. Editing, Lisa 
Zeno Churgin. Production design,  Richard Hoover. Music, David 
Robbins. Cast: Susan Sarandon (Sister Helen Prejean), Sean 
Penn (Matthew Poncelet), Robert Prosky (Hilton Barber), 
Raymond J. Barry (Earl Delacroix) and R. Lee Ermey (Clyde 
Percy). A Gramercy release. 120 minutes. Rated R (language, 
scenes of rape, murder and execution)
